Job Title,Salary Estimate,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Spalding Consulting, Inc. is seeking a Data Scientist at MCAS Cherry Point at Havelock, NC. Spalding Consulting, Inc. is a professional services company delivering cutting-edge solutions to the Department of Defense since 2001. Our expert-level solutions include software development, information technology, program management, financial management and business intelligence services. Spalding Consulting offers competitive compensation, career development, flexible work schedules and excellent benefits.

Position Type: Full-Time

Come join our team as we support Naval Aviation at Marine Corps Air Station Cherry Point. If you seek a dynamic work environment that challenges you to learn and grow in data analysis, visualization, AI and ML, we have the opportunity for you.






Must be eligible to obtain a Secret clearance. Requirements to obtain a clearance include US Citizenship, security investigation, etc.


BS or BA degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Information Systems, Business, Mathematics, Statistics or Relevant Technical Discipline. Preferred. Additional years of experience may replace degree requirements.

Spalding Consulting, Inc. is committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all applicants and employees. We will not discriminate against any employee or applicant on the basis of race, color, ethnic origin, national origin, creed, religion, political belief, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, age, military status, physical or mental disability, or any other legally protected basis, in accordance with applicable federal, state or local laws. Spalding Consulting, Inc. is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and encourages minorities, women, disabled, and veterans to apply for job openings within our company.",4.0,"Spalding Consulting, Inc.
4.0","Havelock, NC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"The Data Scientist designs, prototypes, and develops processes for machine learning models from experimentation to production. They must work with the Data Science Department to understand current business cases, test hypotheses, and continuously improve active processes. This is a technical role that focuses on data wrangling, feature engineering, and predictive modeling.

The Data Scientist will collaborate with their team to prepare and develop data, features, and predictive models from ideation to production deployment. Current use case datasets are primarily tabular. Potential use cases include time series forecasting, clustering, binary classification, multiclass classification, multivariate regression, anomaly detection, and recommendation systems. Once approved, the Data Scientist will work with the team to transition experimental models to production models.",4.9,"EPCVIP, Inc
4.9","Los Angeles, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"About us
We are professional and agile.
Our work environment includes:
Modern office setting
Food provided
Responsibilities:
- Utilize data mining techniques to extract insights and patterns from large datasets
- Develop and implement algorithms and models for predictive analytics
- Collaborate with cross-functional teams to identify business problems and provide data-driven solutions
- Conduct statistical analysis and hypothesis testing to support decision-making processes
- Create data visualizations and reports to communicate findings to stakeholders
- Stay up-to-date with the latest advancements in data science and analytics",-1,Helix Tech IT solution,"Chapel Hill, NC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Data Scientist
- (3258897)

As a not-for-profit organization, Mass General Brigham is committed to supporting patient care, research, teaching, and service to the community by leading innovation across our system. Founded by Brigham and Women’s Hospital and Massachusetts General Hospital, Mass General Brigham supports a complete continuum of care including community and specialty hospitals, a managed care organization, a physician network, community health centers, home care, and other health-related entities. Several of our hospitals are teaching affiliates of Harvard Medical School, and our system is a national leader in biomedical research.",3.8,"Mass General Brigham
3.8","Somerville, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist (Omics data analysis (genetics, genomics and proteomics))",$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Description:
Responsibilities:
Project involves developing multi-omics directed graph networks based on causal inference framework based on multiple data types (e.g., clinical, RNA-seq, epigenetic, proteomic, and/or genetic data).
Skills:
Must be expert in at least one area of causal inference such as interpretable machine learning or data fusion problem, e.g., to reduce space of plausible causal relationships and how data from multiple sources can be combined to make causal inferences.
Experience with machine learning in the context of causal inference, so that the predictive models are more than just a black box, is strongly desired.",3.7,"Tellus Solutions
3.7",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Analyst/Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Greetings
I am seeking for technical consultant like you or someone in your network who may be interested in the opportunity below.
I am currently seeking to fill IT Analyst (Data Analyst)/Data Scientist for one of our direct client and this position is (100% REMOTE) model role. Consultant Support Proven experience in data analysis and ability to write queries and visualize data and Expert level experience in Splunk, Power BI, and SQL/SSRS.
If you are a team player that is eager to support a growing organization while contributing to company success, apply today!
If you are interested in this opportunity, please send me your updated resume and a good time to connect today!",-1,SMK Soft Inc,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"No Relocation Assistance Offered
# 154386 - Piscataway, New Jersey, United States
Ready for a career that combines global collaboration, continuous learning, and positive impact? At Colgate, we offer you the chance to be a part of something bigger than just a job!

Our iconic brands, sustainability commitment, and innovative culture set the stage for an inspiring workplace. We value creativity, experimentation, and authenticity, driving our enduring success and building a future to smile about for our employees, consumers, and communities.

As a Data Scientist on our Advanced Analytics team, you'll shape Colgate's future by developing powerful data products, implementing machine learning models, and optimizing our data science architecture. Join our collaborative team of innovators and technologists.
Your role? Lead advanced analytics projects for our Global Supply Chain, using your discernment and technical skills to generate insights that drive business decisions.

Unlock a career that leaves you smiling every day at Colgate!",4.2,"Colgate-Palmolive
4.2","Piscataway, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Details
Department: Workforce Planning and Analytics
Schedule: Full Time, 8-hour day shift, Monday - Friday
Location: Remote

Benefits
Paid time off (PTO)
Various health insurance options & wellness plans
Retirement benefits including employer match plans
Long-term & short-term disability
Employee assistance programs (EAP)
Parental leave & adoption assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Ways to give back to your community",3.4,"Ascension
3.4",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"We are looking for junior, mid-level or senior-level data scientists with the following:
Demonstrated software development experience with Python in a Unix environment.
Practical knowledge in Python Machine Learning and Data Visualization
Practical knowledge in Data ETL such as working with: Data loading from SQL, CSV, JSON, Excel, etc., Web scraping (Beautiful Soup, Scrapy, etc.) and Data Wrangling/Cleaning
Experience using the Unix command line.
Proficiency in statistical packages using any of the following: Python, R, STATA, SPSS, etc.",-1,Tech brothers infoservices,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist II,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Description
Zendesk is looking for a Data Scientist to join Enterprise Data & Analytics.
In the Decision Science group, you will be a member of a small but mighty team tasked with the most complicated and exciting problems facing the business!
On any given day, you may be exploring new datasets, learning the intricacies of a business process, building models, perfecting visualizations, or coordinating the operationalization of an asset. You’ll work with a collaborative team where you will quickly develop wide exposure to different functions and best practices for applying data science in very human environments.
Most importantly, we build things that matter! The insights we uncover and tools we develop immediately benefit our stakeholders. We strive to fail fast and iterate quickly so that we make the biggest difference with our business partners.

The US annualized base salary range for this position is $102,000.00-$152,000.00. This position may also be eligible for bonus, benefits, or related incentives. While this range reflects the minimum and maximum value for new hire salaries for the position across all US locations, the offer for the successful candidate for this position will be based on job related capabilities, applicable experience, and other factors such as work location. Please note that the compensation details listed in US role postings reflect the base salary only (or OTE for commissions based roles), and do not include bonus, benefits, or related incentives.",3.6,"Zendesk
3.6",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"· Ideal candidate should have a degree in a quantitative field (e.g., mathematics, computer science, physics, economics, engineering, statistics, operations research, quantitative social science, etc.).
· Experience with data visualization tools, such as Tableau, Qlik, Power BI, d3.js, or equivalent.
· Basic Knowledge on software development principles and architecture.
· Good analytical and problem-solving abilities.
· Ability to break down and understand complex business problems, define a solution and implement it using advanced quantitative methods.
· Familiarity with programming for data analysis; ideally Python, SQL, or R.
· Solid oral and written communication skills, especially around analytical concepts and methods.
· Great work ethic and intellectual curiosity.
· Knowledge of Cloud technologies such as AWS or Google Cloud.
· Knowledge of any relational database such as My SQL.
· Must be a team player with excellent communication and problem-solving skills and have experience working with customers across teams.'
'
Work Location:",-1,Cognowiz solutions LLC,"Herndon, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Engineer,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"At Rockstar Games, we create world-class entertainment experiences.
A career at Rockstar Games is about being part of a team working on some of the most creatively rewarding and ambitious projects to be found in any entertainment medium. You would be welcomed to a dedicated and inclusive environment where you can learn, and collaborate with some of the most talented people in the industry.
Rockstar is seeking a Data Engineer to join a team focused on building a cutting-edge game analytics platform and tools to better understand our players and enhance their experience in our games. This is a full-time permanent position based out of Rockstar's unique game development studio in Andover, MA.
The ideal candidate will be skilled in developing complex ingestion and transformation processes with an emphasis on reliability and performance. In collaboration with other data engineers, machine learning engineers, and software engineers, the candidate will empower the team of analysts and data scientists to deliver data driven insights and applications to company stakeholders.",4.3,"Rockstar Games
4.3","Andover, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Description: Would you like to join a rapidly growing and successful company?Do you want to be a part of a team where customers say things like:“I am amazed by how innovative this product is!”

Headquartered in Clifton, NJ, ClassLink is a leading education technology company serving schools around the world.
ClassLink empowers over 20 million students and staff with instant access to a library of 6,000+ single sign-on apps from in the classroom or at home.
ClassLink Analytics provides essential usage data, so instructors can measure engagement and leaders can make informed purchasing and training decisions.
ClassLink Roster Server and OneSync use automation and open standards to make rostering and provisioning easier, more secure, and less time-consuming
Requirements:",4.3,"ClassLink, Inc.
4.3",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Transferring data into a new format to make it more appropriate for analysis.
Creating new, experimental frameworks to collect data.
Building tools to automate data collection.
Searching through large data sets for usable information
Has experience within Telecom domain and experience in creating and deriving insights is preferable .
Job Type: Contract
Salary: Up to $60.00 per hour
Schedule:",2.3,"Talent Group
2.3","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Transferring data into a new format to make it more appropriate for analysis.
Creating new, experimental frameworks to collect data.
Building tools to automate data collection.
Searching through large data sets for usable information
Has experience within Telecom domain and experience in creating and deriving insights is preferable .
Job Type: Contract
Salary: Up to $60.00 per hour
Schedule:",-1,"Talent Group
2.3","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Hybrid,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Responsible for translating student, faculty, and staff data into clear, usable, actionable information that supports the designing and execution of Institute strategies. This position will interact on a regular basis with: Institute leadership, management and staff.This position typically will advise and counsel: Institute leadership, management and staff.This position will supervise: NA
Responsibilities

Job Duty 1 -
Extract, manipulate and analyze data trends and patterns using database query tools, statistical/analytical software and data tools


Design, develop and test predictive models to identify campus outcomes for various units.


Provide data summaries, trends, and patterns by using data visualization tools and reporting tools.


Research projects and prepare reports that address campus issues or topics using sound research methodology and techniques.


Provide benchmarking analysis comparing Georgia Tech data to other peer institutions.


Serve as technical resource and trainer to the Institute data analytics community.


Perform other duties as assigned",4.3,"Georgia Tech
4.3","Atlanta, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"We are looking for a Data Scientist/Engineer who lives to find the messages hidden in the madness of data. You will be responsible for keeping us on the cutting edge of data interpretation and visualization, and help us peer into the future with predictive models. As a Data Scientist, you will apply the latest data mining techniques, using statistical analysis to integrate prediction systems with our products and present findings to the business.
Data Scientist Responsibilities
Building algorithms and designing experiments to merge, manage, analyze, and extract data for tailored reports to colleagues, clients or management.
Creating, managing, and utilizing high performance relational and NoSQL databases, such as Microsoft SQL Server, Oracle, Microsoft Access, OLAP and other software.",4.9,"Datasync Techonlogies Inc
4.9","Herndon, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Junior Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Background:
DonorSearch is the leading provider of prospect research solutions and AI-powered technologies, serving over 6,800 nonprofit organizations across the US. We are family-owned, headquartered in Maryland, and have a rapidly-growing remote workforce in every U.S. timezone. With our outstanding reputation and team of innovative professionals, we seek someone to join us to expand our brand and make a lasting impact on the world.
At DonorSearch, we value: Innovation, Excellence, Growth, Collaboration, and Quality.
Job Summary:
DonorSearch Ai introduced deep learning and machine learning into the nonprofit sector by building custom models with a robust interactive visualization tool to help organizations fundraise more efficiently. The Data Scientist will use best-in-class machine learning technologies to develop machine learning algorithms to meet various objectives of fundraising staff.",3.8,"DonorSearch
3.8",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist II,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Date: Sep 13, 2023
Location: Corning, NY, US, 14831
Company: Corning
Requisition Number: 61525

Corning is vital to progress – in the industries we help shape and in the world we share.
We invent life-changing technologies using materials science. Our scientific and manufacturing expertise, boundless curiosity, and commitment to purposeful invention place us at the center of the way the world interacts, works, learns, and lives.",3.8,"Corning
3.8","Corning, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Posting Details
Posting Details
Working Title
Data Scientist

Position Number
01021A

Department
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERV-ADMIN",4.1,"Old Dominion University
4.1","Norfolk, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
USA-Data Scientist II (Clinical),$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Data Scientist II (Clinical)
Waltham, MA
12 Months contract
Pay Range: $50-65/hr on w2

General:
"" Implementation of data analysis and process workflows across Waltham R&B
"" Transversal collaborative work with mRNA center of Excellence community and collaborators to achieve objectives.
"" Key user of the electronic laboratory notebook (Benching) to support the team and development of a user-friendly benching process for work and data collection
"" Traceability of samples, reagents, and their storage for the HT platform pipeline
"" Implementation of Sample\Reagent barcode solution in the electronic laboratory notebook (Benchling)
"" Provide solutions to for data visualization to track experimental results and stock of critical reagents

Tasks requiring Skilled Ability:
"" Looking for a PhD or MS candidate in molecular biology or related field with data science experience including strong understanding of electronic laboratory notebooks (Benchling experience preferred)
"" Assist in sample submission and management for samples throughout mRNA platform production pipeline
"" General scientific understanding in the following areas:
o PCR, cloning, and pDNA preparation
o Capillary electrophoresis, SDS page, UPLC-MS, UV-ABS
o Affinity Chromatography
o Cell Culture and Transfection
o ELISA and Activity Assays
o mRNA Formulation (PNP, LNP, etc.)
"" Ability to summarize complex scientific processes highlighting key process and data collection steps",4.2,"eTeam Inc.
4.2","Waltham, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Responsibilities:
- Utilize advanced analytics techniques to extract insights from large datasets
- Develop and implement data mining algorithms to identify patterns and trends
- Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand business objectives and provide data-driven solutions
- Design and build predictive models to support decision-making processes
- Conduct statistical analysis and hypothesis testing to validate findings
- Present findings and recommendations to stakeholders in a clear and concise manner
Qualifications:
- Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field such as Mathematics, Statistics, or Computer Science
- Strong knowledge of data mining techniques and algorithms
- Proficiency in programming languages such as Python or R
- Experience working with big data platforms and tools
- Familiarity with VBA (Visual Basic for Applications) for automation tasks
- Quantum engineering knowledge is a plus
- Excellent problem-solving skills and attention to detail
- Strong communication and presentation skills",-1,Brainwave360,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist/Data Analyst,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"EMPLOYER INFORMATION:
Clifford Beers is a mental health clinic serving children and families. Our mission is to provide integrated services addressing mental, physical, and social determinants in order to improve health, resiliency and quality of life for children, families and communities.
The Integrated Care for Kids (InCK) Model, a federal grant awarded through CMS, is a child-centered local service delivery and state payment model that aims to reduce expenditures and improve the quality of care for children under 21 years of age and pregnant women covered by Medicaid through prevention, early identification, and treatment of behavioral and physical health needs.
PURPOSE:",4.1,"Clifford Beers Community Care Center
4.1","New Haven, CT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Barbaricum is a rapidly growing government contractor providing leading-edge support to federal customers, with a particular focus on Defense and National Security mission sets. We leverage more than 15 years of support to stakeholders across the federal government, with established and growing capabilities across Intelligence, Analytics, Engineering, Mission Support, and Communications disciplines. Founded in 2008, our mission is to transform the way our customers approach constantly changing and complex problem sets by bringing to bear the latest in technology and the highest caliber of talent.

Headquartered in Washington, DC's historic Dupont Circle neighborhood, Barbaricum also has a corporate presence in Tampa, FL and Dayton, OH, with team members across the United States and around the world. As a leader in our space, we partner with firms in the private sector, academic institutions, and industry associations with a goal of continually building our expertise and capabilities for the benefit of our employees and the customers we support. Through all of this, we have built a vibrant corporate culture diverse in expertise and perspectives with a focus on collaboration and innovation. Our teams are at the frontier of the Nation's most complex and rewarding challenges. Join us.",4.0,"Barbaricum
4.0",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Generative AI,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"** Locations include Spring, Texas (preferred location), and US remote.
** Typically need at least Master's degree and minimum 0-2 years full-time relevant work experience.
The Team
We are a growing centralized team helping HP take advantage of new AI/ML technology, especially around Generative AI and large language models. We engage with business units to advise and prototype solutions, and we develop and run software applications for internal use.
The Role
As a Data Scientist with a focus on Generative AI you will work on multiple engagements across HP involving large language models and other new Generative AI capabilities. Beyond our team, you will work with business stakeholders and developers from other business units. Your primary focus and mindset is to help deliver business solutions to our (mostly internal) customers. You are expected to stay up to date on important new Gen AI papers and releases, but note that this is not an AI research role.",4.2,"HP
4.2","Spring, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist – Entry Level 2024,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Introduction
Ranked by Forbes as one of the world’s best employers in 2022, IBM promotes growth and innovation to lead as we enter the era of hybrid cloud and AI – helping clients transform their business.

As a Data Scientist, you will be a member of a technical sales agile team to co-develop innovative business solutions with our clients. You will be directly collaborating and impacting the world’s most influential enterprises and brands on the
adoption of next-generation platforms.

IBM’s comprehensive onboarding program and industry-leading learning culture will prepare you with a strong foundation for client success. Our sales environment is collaborative and experiential.

You'll be surrounded by bright minds and keen co-creators ready to assist as you apply practices that will compel our clients to invest in IBM's products and services.


In this role, you’ll be the go-to subject matter expert, collaborating with colleagues from various roles to define solutions and lead the way in how they get built in the age of cloud and AI. This role is hands-on; co-creating using data science, machine learning and programming skills in six-week client engagements.

A 'Day-in-the Life' of a Data Scientist may include, but not be limited to:
To be successful in this role, you will need:
Opportunities are available in: Atlanta GA, Boston MA, Chicago IL, Dallas TX, New York NY, San Francisco CA, and Washington DC – to name a few.",3.9,"IBM
3.9","Atlanta, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Bellevue,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"JOB DESCRIPTION - Data Scientist
Title: Data Scientist
Job Function: Product
Role Type: Full time
Location: Bellevue, WA
Reporting to: Head Data Scientist
Stakeholders: Project Managers/Head of Product
About Resulticks",3.8,"RESULTICKS
3.8","Bellevue, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"We are looking for a data scientist that will help us discover the information hidden in vast amounts of data, and help us make smarter decisions to deliver even better products. Your primary focus will be in applying data mining techniques, doing statistical analysis, and building high quality prediction systems integrated with our products
Remote Role.
Duration: 12+ months
Responsibilities
Selecting features, building and optimizing classifiers using machine learning techniques",-1,Ryden Global LLC,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"Location: James J. Peters VA Medical Center, 130 West Kingsbridge Road, Bronx, NY 10468-3904, USA
About Us: Join a prestigious institution that values innovation, expertise, and dedication. At the James J. Peters VA Medical Center, we are at the forefront of medical research and data-driven solutions. We are on a mission to redefine the future of healthcare, and we need YOU!
Role Overview: As our Data Scientist, you will be the beacon of knowledge, diving deep into the world of data to bring forth actionable insights and groundbreaking solutions. Your work will directly influence medical decisions, patient care, and the future trajectory of healthcare.
Key Responsibilities:",-1,Grand Slam Universal,"Bronx, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$88K - $132K (Glassdoor est.),"FocusKPI is seeking Data Scientists to enable deep media insights through advanced analytics for our client, one of the largest retailers/e-commerce companies in the U.S.
Work Location: Remote in the U.S.
Duration: 6 months contract with potential for extension and conversion, depending on budget and performance
Pay range: $50/hour to $70/hour
Responsibilities:
Perform hands-on coding to retrieve and analyze large datasets using Python and SQL
Integrate disparate data sources and leverage state-of-the-art analytics best practices to deliver integrated actionable insights to partners and stakeholders",3.2,"FocusKPI Inc.
3.2","San Bruno, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
data scientist - multiple openings,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"Now Brewing – Data Scientist! #tobeapartner
From the beginning, Starbucks set out to be a different kind of company. One that not only celebrated coffee and the rich tradition, but that also brought a feeling of connection. We are known for developing extraordinary leaders who share this passion and are guided by their service to others.
As a Data Scientist on the Data, Analytics, Insights, and Business Operations team, you will work cross-functionally with data engineers, data scientists, business experts, and external vendors to help Starbucks make decisions better by using data and analytics. You will use your experience with forecasting, automating ETL processes, and designing and building analytical models using structured or unstructured data. You will work directly with business partners and technology teams from problem identification to solution. You will quickly become an expert in one of our key business and data domains (Supply Chain, People Analytics, Marketing, or Store) and work cross functionally in an analytics center of excellence to improve existing processes or analytical approaches",3.7,"Starbucks
3.7",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"Senior Data Scientist
Job ID
10060071
Location
Kissimmee, Florida, United States / Glendale, California, United States / Anaheim, California, United States
Business
Consumer Products Games & Publishing
Date posted
Sep. 08, 2023
Job Summary:",3.9,"Disney
3.9","Kissimmee, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Engineer (Remote),$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"#WeAreCrowdStrike and our mission is to stop breaches. As a global leader in cybersecurity, our team changed the game. Since our inception, our market leading cloud-native platform has offered unparalleled protection against the most sophisticated cyberattacks. We’re looking for people with limitless passion, a relentless focus on innovation and a fanatical commitment to the customer to join us in shaping the future of cybersecurity. Consistently recognized as a top workplace, CrowdStrike is committed to cultivating an inclusive, remote-first culture that offers people the autonomy and flexibility to balance the needs of work and life while taking their career to the next level. Interested in working for a company that sets the standard and leads with integrity? Join us on a mission that matters - one team, one fight.
About the Role:
We are looking to hire a Data Engineer for the Data Engineering team at CrowdStrike. The Data Engineering team operates within the Data Science organization, and provides the necessary pipelines, infrastructure, and automation for Data Scientist to train and evaluate models and allow users to analyze and act on vast quantities of data effortlessly. The team has one of the most critical roles to play in ensuring our products are best-in-class in the industry. You will interact with product managers, Data Scientist, and other engineers in building both internal and external facing services.

CrowdStrike, Inc. is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices. The base salary range for this position in the U.S. is $105,000 - $195,000 per year + variable/incentive compensation + equity + benefits. A candidate’s salary is determined by various factors including, but not limited to, relevant work experience, skills, certifications and location.",4.3,"CrowdStrike
4.3",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Junior Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"The Junior Data Scientist will be responsible for supporting the development of the next generation of AI solutions at Hawkeye 360. They will focus on areas of analytics exploration which will separate HawkEye 360 from the field of competitors. They will harness the power of AI,Machine Learning and Hawkeye 360's unique RF data to improve maritime domain situational awareness, further boosting HawkEye 360's dominance in this market.

The right candidate must be a creative problem solver who can look beyond the data to see underlying trends and patterns. They will need to leverage their knowledge of statistics, machine learning, and AI to create effective solutions to tackle real-world problems. The candidate will also need to leverage multiple data modalities to create solutions, so a good understanding of combining different data sources is key. Additionally, they will collaborate with engineering to transition R&D analytical solutions to production level code, integrating these solutions into existing pipelines.

As the Junior Data Scientist, your main responsibilities will be:




$90,000 - $140,000 annually

HawkEye 360 offers a compensation package that includes a competitive base salary plus annual performance bonus, stock options, and benefits. We consider many factors when determining salary offers, such as candidate's work experience, education, training & skills, as well as market and business considerations. We are also open to considering candidates with experience and qualifications at a different level than required in a job posting, which may affect the compensation package offered.


HawkEye 360 is delivering a revolutionary source of global knowledge based on radio frequency (RF) geospatial analytics to those working to make the world a safer place. The company operates a commercial satellite constellation that detects, geolocates, and identifies a broad range of signals & behaviors. We employ cutting edge AI techniques to equip our global customers with high-impact insights needed to make decisions with confidence. HawkEye 360 is headquartered in Herndon, Virginia.

HawkEye 360 is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class.

HawkEye 360 does not accept unsolicited agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, HawkEye 360 employees or any other organization location. HawkEye 360 is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",3.4,"HawkEye360
3.4","Herndon, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"Department: Business Transformation

Our Company Promise

We are committed to provide our Employees a stable work environment with equal opportunity for learning and personal growth. Creativity and innovation are encouraged for improving the effectiveness of Southwest Airlines. Above all, Employees will be provided the same concern, respect, and caring attitude within the organization that they are expected to share externally with every Southwest Customer.

Job Description:
Job Summary

A Data Scientist serves as an internal consultant, responsible for the application of statistics/math, business acumen, and computer science concepts to collect, organize, analyze, summarize, and interpret data. They'll develop data science, machine learning, artificial intelligence, or optimization products which generate competitive advantage for the enterprise by driving actionable insights and decisions in support of descriptive, diagnostic, predictive, or prescriptive business needs. This Data Scientist joins the Data Science & Automation Team, and they'll have a focus on the products specifically for partners in Technical Operations and Technical Operations Supply Chain Management. The products within these spaces are used to shift reactive maintenance to proactive maintenance, as well as provide increased efficiencies in the processes impacting maintenance activities. This Data Scientist joins an exciting and important Team, and they'll have the opportunity to learn and develop in their career with Heart while helping to shape the future of Southwest Airlines.


The culture of Southwest Airlines means we embrace a flexible workplace and value the camaraderie, collaboration, and innovation that occurs when we come together and interact face-to-face at our vibrant Corporate Campus. This role is a hybrid position based out of our Corporate Campus in Dallas, TX, which requires Employees to work onsite on our Corporate Campus at least three days a week. The Department designates the specific three days of the week Employees must work on-site.

U.S. citizenship or current authorization to work in the U.S. is required, and no current or future work authorization sponsorship available.

Southwest Airlines is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We continue to look for opportunities to reflect the communities we serve, and welcome applicants with diverse thoughts, backgrounds, and experiences.
Responsibilities
Drives moderate to complex data science, machine learning, artificial intelligence, or optimization projects, working with stakeholders to understand contextual problems quickly and define, analyze, and deliver solutions based on business objectives
Applies math, statistics, and modeling methods to create solutions which can be utilized in descriptive, diagnostic, predictive, and prescriptive analytics
Supports the ongoing effectiveness of models in use by stakeholders
Drives the formulation and communication of solutions for data analysis and models
Supports the ongoing development of analytical IQ by collaborating with and contributing to the Southwest Airlines data science community
May perform other job duties as directed by Employee's Leaders
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities
Intermediate Knowledge of statistics and math concepts
Intermediate knowledge of descriptive, diagnostic, predictive and prescriptive statistical methods and their differences
Intermediate knowledge of data science project life cycle including engaging stakeholders to define the problem, solution definition, project planning, and executing per plan
Knowledge of, at a broad level, how technology platforms and architectures are applicable to data science
Skilled in compiling, cleaning, transforming, analyzing, and visualizing large-scale data
Skilled in statistical and scripting programming languages
Ability to communicate in an engaging way with strong verbal and written communication skills for technical and non-technical audiences up to and including executives with assistance from more experienced data scientists
Ability to evaluate which data science, machine learning, artificial intelligence, or optimization techniques and methods are appropriate for a business problem and make recommendations for solutions
Ability to collaborate with vendors and evaluate their platforms, solutions, or techniques
Ability to adjust to a variety of situations and adopt new approaches and methodologies if necessary in order to effectively meet business objectives Education
High School Diploma or GED
Bachelor's Degree in Mathematics, Computer or Data Sciences, Information Technology or similar fields of study; or equivalent advance level experience
Experience
Advanced level experience, seasoned and specialized knowledge in:
Mathematics and statistics principles and techniques
Programming languages and query writing for large-scale analysis (Python, SQL, etc.)
Data analysis, advanced analytics, data science, machine learning, artificial intelligence, or optimization project experience
Data pipeline, data science and/or relevant programming
Visualization and presentation development and delivery
Solving ambiguous and complex problems through a systems thinking approach
Experience and use of AWS Sagemaker and AWS S3
Experience via Teradata/Redshift/Oracle/SQL Server
Licensing/Certification
N/A
Physical Abilities
Ability to perform work duties from [limited space work station/desk/office area] for extended periods of time
Ability to communicate and interact with others in the English language to meet the demands of the job
Ability to use a computer and other office productivity tools with sufficient speed and accuracy to meet the demands of the job
Other Qualifications
Must maintain a well-groomed appearance per Company appearance standards as described in established guidelines
Must be a U.S. citizen or have authorization to work in the United States as defined by the Immigration Reform Act of 1986
Must be at least 18 years of age.
Must be able to comply with Company attendance standards as described in established guidelines
Must meet confidentiality expectations as to confidential, proprietary and sensitive Company information


Competitive market salary from $130,750 per year to $145,300 per year* depending on qualifications and experience. For eligible Leadership and individual contributor roles, additional bonus opportunities are available and awarded at the discretion of the company.

•

Fly for free, as a privilege, on any open seat on all Southwest flights (your eligible dependents too)

Up to a 9.3% 401(k) Company match, dollar for dollar, of your eligible pay, per paycheck *

Potential for annual Profit-sharing contribution toward retirement - when Southwest profits, you prof it**

HTTPs : //careers.southwestair.com/benefits

Southwest Airlines is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
Please print/save this job description because it won't be available after you apply.",4.1,"Southwest Airlines
4.1","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"The Merchandise Systems & Analytics team is part of Disney’s CPGP (Consumer Products, Gaming and Publishing) team, which creates and sells Disney product around the globe. We are currently seeking a Senior Data Scientist who will lead, analyze, and engineer extensive datasets, generating top-tier actionable business insights through advanced predictive models across brick & mortar as well as ecommerce platforms. You'll be a mentor to the Data Science team, providing technical expertise and guiding analytics projects, fostering cross-functional collaboration to meet internal client data needs.
This role will report to the Sr. Manager Retail Analytics
You Will:

The hiring range for this position in Anaheim or Glendale, California is $123,902 to $166,210 per year and in Orlando, Florida is $117,998 to $158,290 per year. The base pay actually offered will take into account internal equity and also may vary depending on the candidate’s geographic region, job-related knowledge, skills, and experience among other factors. A bonus and/or long-term incentive units may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to the full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits, dependent on the level and position offered.",-1,Consumer Products Games & Publishing,"Kissimmee, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"Northwestern is dedicated to providing excellent support for our research community. As a Data Scientist in a collective bargaining unit with Northwestern University Libraries, you will support world-class research from across the university by implementing practical solutions to researchers’ data science challenges. In this position, you will:
Consult with and provide advice to researchers facing a wide range of data challenges,
Develop and deliver training for students, faculty, and staff on data science, programming, and computational skills, and
Collaborate with researchers on projects requiring data science, data visualization, or programming skills.",4.1,"Northwestern University
4.1","Evanston, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Machine Learning Ops,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"Hey!
Are YOU passionate about applying cutting-edge technology to improve the human experience? Are you passionate about fixing a broken healthcare system that is difficult to navigate, with barriers to access and afford life-changing medicine and treatment? Are you passionate about technical excellence and deploying software that makes people happier and healthier? If so, CareMetx wants you to be a part of our growing engineering team!
At CareMetx, data teams own an outcome - that means teams are both accountable AND empowered for a unit of business value. We create an environment for learning opportunities and believe there is no such thing as “that’s not my job.” Our vision is to generate valuable insights from the data and drive strategic decision-making. All Caremetx data team members have the opportunity to explore new technologies and data trends. That means you will have the opportunity to grow deeper in the skills you’re passionate about and expand your breadth by learning skills that will help the team succeed.",3.4,"CareMetx
3.4",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Associate Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"Work Mode:
Onsite
Responsibilities:
About Tencent
Tencent is a world-leading internet and technology company that develops innovative products and services to improve the quality of life of people around the world. Founded in 1998 with its headquarters in Shenzhen China, our guiding principle is to use technology for good.
We are not only a major video game publisher in the world, we also produce other high-quality digital content, enriching interactive entertainment experiences for people around the globe. We offer a range of services such as cloud computing, advertising, FinTech, and other enterprise services to support our clients' digital transformation and business growth.
About IEG






California
The base pay range for this position in the state(s) above is $65,450 to $130,900 per year. Actual pay is based on market location and may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. A sign on payment, relocation package, and restricted stock units may be provided as part of the compensation package, as well as other medical, financial, and/or other benefits, dependent on the specific position offered.",4.0,"Tencent
4.0","Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist( Local to dallas TX only),$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"Position – Data Scientist
Location – Onsite(Dallas, TX)
Duration – Long term Contract
Must Have:-
Pin Machine learning -AZ-ML, Python core, Pyspark
Job Description:
Experience in Machine Learning, supervised and unsupervised: - Forecasting,
Classification, Regression, Text Mining, NLP, Decision Trees, Adaptive Decision Algorithms,
Random Forest, Search Algorithms, Gradient algorithms etc",4.8,"Swanktek
4.8","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Environmental Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"SEEKOPS
POSITION SPECIFICATION
Environmental Data Scientist

The Organization

SeekOps Inc. develops and deploys advanced sensor technology for the energy sector to detect, localize, and quantify methane emissions through integrated drone-based systems. SeekOps’ unique sensor design eliminates false positive readings and localizes emissions sources to provide actionable data to oil and gas, and biogas and landfill operators in North and South America, Europe, the Middle East, and Africa, and Asia and Oceania. Backed by funding from Climate Investments (CI), Equinor Technology Ventures (ETV), SLB Tech Ventures and Caterpillar Ventures, SeekOps provides best-in-class technology to meet increasingly stringent environmental, sustainability and governance (ESG) reporting requirements, and enables customers worldwide to realize their goal of reducing methane intensity from operations.",-1,SeekOps Inc,"Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"About Us
At 1904labs, we are a human-centered technology company that focuses on using modern tools and technologies to solve enterprise organizations' crunchiest challenges. We look for innovative, courageous, intensely curious, and team-minded people. At 1904labs, we are committed to providing each team member with opportunities that will allow personal and professional growth.
The Role
As a Data Scientist at 1904labs, you will work in an Agile environment while leveraging our clients' data to implement data science algorithms as scalable, hosted services. You will be responsible for conceptualizing and executing projects from start to finish, identifying the appropriate data and methodologies to answer business questions using best practices and innovative approaches.




Flexible work from home options available.",4.9,"1904labs
4.9","Saint Louis, MO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"Job Description

Intel Foundry Services (IFS) is an independent foundry business established to meet our customers' unique product needs. With the first ""Open System Foundry"" model in the world, we help our customers build their innovative silicon designs and deliver full end-to-end customizable products from Intel's secure, resilient, and sustainable source of supply.
We are seeking a Data Scientist who is expert in data wrangling and analyzing massive and complex datasets.
Your responsibilities will include but not limited to:





Intel Foundry Services (IFS) is an independent foundry business that is established to meet our customers' unique product needs. With the first ""Open System Foundry"" model in the world, our combined offerings of wafer fabrication, advanced process, and packaging technology, chiplet, software, robust ecosystem, and assembly and test capabilities help our customers build their innovative silicon designs and deliver full end-to-end customizable products from Intel's secure, resilient and sustainable source of supply.

US, OR, Hillsboro; US, TX, Austin; US, CA, Folsom

Intel strongly encourages employees to be vaccinated against COVID-19. Intel aligns to federal, state, and local laws and as a contractor to the U.S. Government is subject to government mandates that may be issued. Intel policies for COVID-19 including guidance about testing and vaccination are subject to change over time.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, religious creed, sex, national origin, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, military and veteran status, marital status, pregnancy, gender, gender expression, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by local law, regulation, or ordinance.

We offer a total compensation package that ranks among the best in the industry. It consists of competitive pay, stock, bonuses, as well as, benefit programs which include health, retirement, and vacation. Find more information about all of our Amazing Benefits here: https://www.intel.com/content/www/us/en/jobs/benefits.html

Annual Salary Range for jobs which could be performed in US, California: $119,130.00-$178,690.00


This role will be eligible for our hybrid work model which allows employees to split their time between working on-site at their assigned Intel site and off-site.",4.1,"INTEL
4.1","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist (Remote),$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"[Quora is a ""remote-first"" company. This position can be performed remotely from anywhere in North America. Please visit careers.quora.com/eligible-countries for details regarding employment eligibility by country.]
About Quora:
Quora’s mission is to grow and share the world’s knowledge. To do so, we have two knowledge sharing products:
Quora: a global knowledge sharing platform with over 400M monthly unique visitors, bringing people together to share insights on various topics and providing a unique platform to learn and connect with others.",4.4,"Quora
4.4",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Bioinformatics",$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"Tome Biosciences is the programmable gene insertion company. Using CRISPR, our technologies allow us to insert any genetic sequence of any size at any location into any genome. We are writing the final chapter in genomic medicines, delivering cures to patients through cell and genome engineering.
Data Scientist, Bioinformatics

Tome Biosciences specializes in programmable insertion of genes using CRISPR. Our technologies enable us to insert any genetic sequence, regardless of size, into any genome at any location. We are at the forefront of genomic medicine, using cell and genome engineering to deliver cures to patients. At Tome, we prioritize research and collaboration, and offer a positive work culture, competitive compensation, and a flexible hybrid working environment.",-1,Tome Biosciences,"Watertown, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"TSPi Position Description
TSPi is a leading-edge and trusted IT solutions provider to multiple government agencies. Using our technological expertise and industry specific knowledge, we offer our clients end-to-end solutions to address their specific challenges. We are looking for a Data Scientist with an entrepreneur’s mindset to support a fast-paced and growing data science team working on projects critical to farming, conservation and environmental government missions.
The Data Scientist will be expected to build statistical models, test hypotheses, interpret, summarize, visualize, and succinctly report on data findings. The Data Scientist will perform research on various data sources, to include unstructured data using quantitative and qualitative content analytics. The Scientist will construct and perform complex database search queries in multiple databases using SQL and API interfaces. The Scientist will perform web scraping and apply various techniques for processing unstructured data. The Scientist will leverage automation and machine learning to manage data, predict scenarios and make recommendations. The Data Scientist will contribute to building new analytical tools and packages across the enterprise and will be expected to collaborate with team members in a highly technical environment. The Data Scientist will be expected to learn and leverage emerging technologies.",4.5,"Technology Solutions Provider Inc.
4.5",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Jr Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"As a junior Data Scientist, the expectation is to have a passion for organization, be a motivated self-starter, always ask questions, challenge the norms, as well as be curious.
Example Task Descriptions:
List Matching - Be able to match a client list to our internal database following the internal template, as well as client direction.
Reporting - Be the key contact person in the organization and orchestration of reporting tasks.
Data Analysis - Take a data set given in detailed format and be creative with aggregations to help the data tell a story to the requestor.
Data Pipelines - Provide support and feedback on the current running data pipelines. Also make enhancements to the structure and workflow.",-1,American Medical Communication Inc,"Manalapan, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Senior,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"Job Description
We are seeking Data Analytic expertise to support and advance a learning data analytic program that collects and analyzes training data, measures learning related organizational drivers of success and provides information to facilitate data driven decisions.
Work Requirements:
Determine appropriate approaches to analyze data sets (including statistical analysis).
Develop and utilize Artificial Intelligence/Machine Learning and other predictive data modeling techniques.",-1,The Swift Group,"Chantilly, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Entry Level Data Scientist 2023/2024,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"You may not realize it, but you’ve likely used a product today made possible by the plastics and chemicals manufactured by Chevron Phillips Chemical. From medical supplies and electronics to food packaging and cosmetics, we create the building blocks for more than 70,000 consumer and industrial products.

Even as a global company with 5,000 employees, we maintain a “small company feel” and uphold a culture of respect, diversity, and inclusion. Ask any Chevron Phillips Chemical employee what they like best about their job, and universally, the answer is “the people I work with!” We value work-life balance, and love to see our employees thrive both professionally and personally. There has never been a better time to work for Chevron Phillips Chemical. If you’re ready to grow with us and become part of our vision of being the premier Chemical Company, apply today!",3.9,"CPChem
3.9","The Woodlands, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"CORMAC is transforming the Healthcare industry using Data and Analytics. CORMAC is looking for an enthusiastic and innovative candidate to join our Data Science team. A qualified candidate should be able to provide Data Science support for our products, prototypes and projects.
Responsibilities:
Implement machine learning and deep learning algorithms, employing a wide array of ensemble methods and common deep learning architectures
Design and develop a machine learning platform to train, manage data, evaluate, deploy models and to make and monitor predictions
Maintain and update elements of the AI and machine learning code base",3.8,"CORMAC
3.8",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist II,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"GoodRx is America’s healthcare marketplace. Each month, millions of people visit goodrx.com to find reliable health information and discounts for their healthcare — and we’ve helped people save over $60 billion since 2011. We provide prescription discounts that are accepted at more than 70,000 pharmacies in the U.S., as well as telehealth services including doctor visits and lab tests. Our services have been positively reviewed by Good Morning America, The New York Times, NBC News, AARP, and many others.

Our goal is to help Americans find convenient and affordable healthcare. We offer solutions for consumers, employers, health plans, and anyone else who shares our desire to provide affordable prescriptions to all Americans.

About the Role

GoodRx is looking for a Data Scientist to join our data team. Our ideal candidate is a team player, a curious, relentless learner who’s ready to take on new challenges and deliver value in a dynamic environment. This individual will have a love of working with data and making discoveries, a deep understanding of mathematics and statistical modeling, a strong understanding of marketing analytics and its KPIs, advertising & marketing technologies and strong communication skills. This role will bring rigor to advanced projects across marketing and product data initiatives.",3.8,"GoodRx
3.8","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"Coeadapt is seeking a highly skilled and creative data scientist with a passion for optimizing data models and delivering impactful insights. The ideal candidate will be proficient in various statistical and machine learning techniques and have a proven track record of applying those methodologies to real-world business problems. The successful Data Scientist will play a pivotal role in our organization's growth and success by guiding our decisions and enriching our understanding of our customers and market.

Key Responsibilities:
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to identify and execute data-driven solutions that drive business growth and optimize operations.",-1,COEADAPT INC.,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Remote - Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"We’re looking for talented professionals, anywhere in the United States, to join us in bringing smart money management and payment solutions to everyone’s fingertips.
At Green Dot, we are evolving to a new and permanent “Work from Anywhere” model designed to maximize the benefits of remote work, promote and enable a strong culture of performance and connectedness, and attract the best and brightest talent who align with our entrepreneurial spirit and mission.
<<>><<>><<>><<>><<>><<>><<>><<>><<>><<>>
JOB DESCRIPTION
This is an exciting opportunity to apply data science techniques and drive growth and revenue of Green Dot’s Business, Enterprise-wide. Our data science team works on several projects across the entire company including Churn Modelling and Customer Scoring for Marketing efforts, Revenue Prediction Modeling for Accounting and Finance and Cash Advance Customer Modeling for our Award-Winning Tax Products.
We are looking for candidates who are passionate about leveraging data science techniques to solve business problems and supplying stakeholders with actionable insights/decisions. The ideal candidate must be a self-starter who is able to deliver high quality work within tight deadlines and potentially propose/develop innovative solutions as well. The candidate will be reporting to the Lead Data Scientist within our Data Analytics department.
Regular
The targeted base salary for this position is $78,800 to $120,200 per year. The final compensation will be determined by a number of factors such as qualifications, expertise, and the candidate’s geographical location.",3.1,"Green Dot Corporation
3.1",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Jr Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"You will be working closely with SVP of Data Science Strategy and her agile small team to develop quick prototypes and collaborate with data science development team. You will be working in a Think-tank environment to solve all sort of data science projects and turn them into new applications prototypes.
You will use the right combination of methods, models, data, or analytic tools to transform data into actionable intelligence.
Join us and be part of a best-in-class data science team that wants to push the ML and AI boundaries in the Ad-tech and Mar-Tech worlds.

Responsibilities",3.9,"Choreograph
3.9","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"Intuit is looking for innovative and hands-on Senior Data Scientist to join the Intuit AI team.

This team embeds artificial intelligence and machine learning into our product portfolio and business to create smarter products, improve anti-fraud and security and enhance customer care. Come join our collaborative and creative group of data scientists and machine learning engineers and build models that directly affect hundreds of thousands of our customers. In this role you will be building and deploying machine learning models using both analytical algorithms and deep learning approaches.",4.5,"Intuit
4.5","Atlanta, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"Morrison Foerster LLP, an Am Law 50 law firm with 18 offices worldwide, has an opening for a Data Scientist within our Information Technology Department) in our Austin Boston Denver Los Angeles Miami New York Palo Alto San Diego San Francisco Washington, D.C. office.
The Opportunity
Guided by department and firmwide objectives and priorities and under the direction of the Director of Data Science Analytics, participates in and contributes to improving firm strategy, delivery of legal services, and operations using data science tools and techniques. Partners with the Director to develop and gain buy-in for the program strategy, identifying the individuals, resources, and tools necessary to accomplish the strategy. Ensures execution and ongoing operations of same. Along with the Director, functions as a thought leader within the firm and possesses substantial data science experience in a variety of industries and scenarios. Ensures client service and satisfaction are attained in all areas of position.",3.9,"Morrison & Foerster
3.9",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist 2,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"The Microsoft 365 team is looking for a Data Scientist 2 to help design and build one of the fastest growing cloud services in Microsoft. Do you want to design and develop new components that solve complex distributed systems and search optimization problems? Do you want to work on a product that ships new features every week? If the answer to these questions is yes, then the Microsoft 365 Storage Fabric team has an opportunity for you get in on designing and building a core part of the stack. We develop software from the ground-up, running across thousands of servers with oceans of data. We build and operate the largest enterprise cloud productivity system in the world. Across products such as Exchange, Teams, and SharePoint, we power communication, sharing, search, intelligent assistance for customers, extensibility through Microsoft Graph, and more. Throughout we maintain very high reliability and availability, privacy and compliance for customers, and latency in milliseconds. We apply a combination of approaches from the fields of API design, Machine Learning, Distributed Computing, Workflow engines, Algorithm Optimization, and many more. Come to define, design, and deliver what enterprise cloud productivity means.





Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.3,"Microsoft
4.3","Redmond, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist 4676,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"As a Data Scientist, you'll integrate with cross-functional teams specializing in development, solutions, and business process analysis, informing the architecture and implementation of business processes, programs, plans, and guidance for DoD Business Systems, with the goal of making an impact across the federal government.
We know that you can't have great technology services without amazing people. At MetroStar, we are obsessed with our people and have led a two-decade legacy of building the best and brightest teams. Because we know our future relies on our deep understanding and relentless focus on our people, we live by our mission: A passion for our people. Value for our customers.
If you think you can see yourself delivering our mission and pursuing our goals with us, then check out the job description below!",3.6,"MetroStar
3.6","Quantico, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"Skills relating to Mathematics/Statistics .
Graduate/Engineer/Post-Graduate with a huge interest in handling numbers.
Ability to understand all domains in businesses across various sectors.
A natural passion for numbers, business, coding, Analytics, and Artificial Intelligence, Machine Learning, visualization.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Analyze large and complex data sets from multiple sources.
Develop and evaluate data analytics models, algorithms and solutions.
Implement algorithms to mine targeted data and the ability to convert data into a business story.",4.9,"Wise Equation Solutions
4.9","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$118K - $158K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist
Clearance: TS/ISSA W FS Poly Clearance
Location: Chantilly
Company Overview:
Ardent Principles employs a comprehensive approach to implementing discipline strategies and solutions for highly complex, agile programs and projects. Our process model is an iterative, dynamic approach that emphasizes key project management best practices throughout the full system development life-cycle. Included in our approach are benchmarking metrics and measurable performance indicators designed to inform strategic and program planning, goals, and objectives.",-1,Ardent Principles,"Chantilly, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Do you have a passion for data science, machine learning and AI ? Do you want to apply it to protect millions of customers using Microsoft online services from threat actors around the globe ? Are you curious, analytical, and motivated by new challenges? If so, we would like to hear from you!

The Microsoft Security Response Center team (MSRC) is seeking a Data Scientist to meet the growing demand and challenges of cybersecurity and threat protection. As a Data Dcientist on our team, you will partner with our engineers, other data scientists, and researchers to experiment, design, build, and deploy statistical, machine learning, and AI models to protect the Microsoft Cloud against known and emerging cyberattacks. In your day-to-day work, you will perform data analysis on big data, find useful insights, perform hypothesis testing, experiment with models, vet experiments, incorporate quality monitors, and ship successful models to productions.

You will have the opportunity to collaborate with partners across Microsoft who have decades of security, research, and ML expertise and the tools and technologies to grow your expertise in this field.








Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.3,"Microsoft
4.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
College Graduate - Data Science (BS/MS),$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job Description

Intel is a company of bold and curious inventors and problem solvers who create some of the most astounding technology advancements and experiences in the world.

With a legacy of relentless innovation and a commitment to bring smart, connected devices to every person on Earth, our diverse and brilliant teams are continually searching for tomorrow's technology and revel in the challenge that changing the world for the better brings. We work every single day to design and manufacture silicon products that empower peoples digital lives.

Do you love to solve technical challenges that no one has solved yet? Do you enjoy working with cross functional teams to deliver IP solutions for products that impact customers lives? If so, Come join us to do something wonderful.

We are looking for world class data engineers to help us build the future of technology.














Intel's Human Resources group is responsible for hiring, developing and retaining the best and brightest employees while continuing to strengthen the company's culture and values. Intel Human Resources provides first-rate, cost-effective services and support to employees worldwide and is dedicated to advancing Intel's business goals.

US, NM, Albuquerque; US, OR, Hillsboro; US, TX, Austin; US, CA, Folsom; US, CA, Santa Clara; US, GA, Atlanta

Intel strongly encourages employees to be vaccinated against COVID-19. Intel aligns to federal, state, and local laws and as a contractor to the U.S. Government is subject to government mandates that may be issued. Intel policies for COVID-19 including guidance about testing and vaccination are subject to change over time.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, religious creed, sex, national origin, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, military and veteran status, marital status, pregnancy, gender, gender expression, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by local law, regulation, or ordinance.

We offer a total compensation package that ranks among the best in the industry. It consists of competitive pay, stock, bonuses, as well as, benefit programs which include health, retirement, and vacation. Find more information about all of our Amazing Benefits here: https://www.intel.com/content/www/us/en/jobs/benefits.html

Annual Salary Range for jobs which could be performed in US, California: $105,930.00-$158,890.00


This role will be eligible for our hybrid work model which allows employees to split their time between working on-site at their assigned Intel site and off-site.",4.1,"INTEL
4.1","Santa Clara, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Strategic Customers - Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Oracle’s Strategic Customer Team has the mission to enable OCI's largest and most strategic customers. The Strategic Engineering Customers team is an inclusive and diverse team of high caliber PMs and Engineers focused on the AI/ML Pillar inside of the Strategic Engineering Customer team, distributed globally, who thrive on new challenges. We are seeking an experienced Machine Learning Engineer or Data Scientist with technical expertise in deploying, configuring, and running ML/AI jobs on OCI GPUs, to join our growing team of multidisciplinary experts. As a Senior Principal Data Scientist, you will work closely with the technical and research teams on innovative, strategic projects including advanced applications of ML for the organization. This role is responsible for the technical direction of the team and for communication with both internal and external stakeholder leadership teams, and must demonstrate critical thinking abilities, outstanding communication skills, project management experience and the ability to lead other experienced technical professionals.",3.9,"Oracle
3.9",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist (L5), Member Product",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Los Gatos, California
Data Science and Engineering
At Netflix, we seek to entertain the world. We have more than 200 million members in 190 countries, reflecting that great stories can come from anywhere and be loved everywhere. Within Product, we have a very high velocity in innovations in the member experience. We never stop challenging ourselves and are constantly thinking about connecting with our members in new ways or even in new domains!

Member Product DSE is at the forefront of these innovations with a mission to relentlessly improve Netflix member experience within our streaming and new verticals services across TV, Mobile & Web by surfacing insights. The team collaborates extensively with Product and Engineering teams to identify, incubate and enable product innovations leveraging robust measurement techniques (analytics, experimentation, modeling) and scalable tooling.",4.2,"Netflix
4.2","Los Gatos, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"DTE is one of the nation’s largest diversified energy companies. Our electric and gas companies have fueled our customer’s homes and Michigan’s progress for more than a century. And as Michigan’s largest source of renewable energy, we’re creating a cleaner, healthier environment to power our future. We’re also serving communities beyond Michigan, where our affiliated businesses offer renewable energy, emission control technologies, and energy services to industries in 19 states.

But we’re more than a leading energy company... and working at DTE is more than just a job. At DTE, we take great care of each other and our customers, and we use our energy to be a force for growth and prosperity in our communities. When you join us, you’ll be part of a team that welcomes, recognizes, and celebrates differences and values everyone’s health, safety, and wellbeing. Are you ready to make that kind of difference? Bring your energy to DTE. Together, we can achieve great things.",3.9,"DTE Energy
3.9","Detroit, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Do you want to build your brand by working for a leading consulting firm that drives eminence in the marketplace? Are you interested in leveraging your analytical skills and strategic ideas to improve mission execution? If so, Deloitte could be the place for you! Our Government and Public Services (GPS) Strategy and Analytics team brings deep industry expertise, rigorous analytical capabilities and a pragmatic mindset to help solve our client's most complex business problems. Join our team and play a key role in helping to design our clients' roadmap to the future and help transform the public sector marketplace.

Work You'll Do

In this role, the Senior Data Scientist will work directly with our federal clients to define

strategy, drive technical development, and create the next generation of AI tools and

services that include state-of-the-art methodologies in computer vision, natural

language processing, time series analysis, preventative maintenance, signal processing,

and automation of analyst workflows.

The Senior Data Scientist will:










SFL Scientific, a Deloitte Business, is a U.S. based, data science consulting firm

specializing in machine learning and AI technologies. We are looking for a senior data

scientist to design and build end-to-end AI solutions within Government & Public

Services (GPS). The candidate will be responsible for the development of AI systems

through leveraging large and complex data streams derived from the world's most

advanced aerospace, defense, intelligence, and energy systems.

Qualifications















#LI-MM4",4.0,"Deloitte
4.0","Raleigh, NC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Entry Level - Associate Data Scientist - Commercial,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Introduction
As a Associate Data Scientist at IBM, you will help transform our clients’ data into tangible business value by analyzing information, communicating outcomes and collaborating on product development. Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options. Whether it’s investigating patient trends or weather patterns, you will work to solve real world problems for the industries transforming how we live.

Your Role and Responsibilities
You uncover the stories hidden in data and find patterns in the numbers. As an Associate Data Scientist, you’ll put this skill to work to solve business problems by preparing, analyzing, and understanding data to deliver insight, predict emerging trends, and provide recommendations for better outcomes. You’ll use a variety of data (structured, unstructured, IoT streaming), analytics, AI tools, and programming languages often using a cloud infrastructure to handle the volume and veracity of data streams.

Armed with data, modeling expertise, and analytic results, as an Associate Data Scientist, you’ll formulate conclusions and recommendations to stakeholders in an organization's leadership structure, leveraging strong consulting, communication, visualization, and storytelling skills.



We have a number of positions open in these locations:




Willingness to travel up to 100%.",3.9,"IBM
3.9","Atlanta, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist - Customer Growth Marketing,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Principal Data Scientist – Customer Growth Marketing
Data Science is all about breaking new ground to enable businesses to answer their most urgent questions.Pioneering massively parallel data-intensive analytic processing, our mission is to develop a whole new approach to generating meaning and value from petabyte-scale data sets and shape brand-new methodologies, tools, statistical methods, and models. What’s more, we are in collaboration with leading academics, industry experts, and highly skilled engineers to equip our customers to generate sophisticated new insights from the biggest of big data.
Join us to do the best work of your career and make a profound social impact as a Principal Data Scientist on our Customer Growth Marketing Team working remotely in Brazil, or Panama.",4.2,"Dell Technologies
4.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - BCG X,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Who We Are

BCG X is the tech build & design unit of BCG. Turbocharging BCG’s deep industry and functional expertise, BCG X brings together advanced tech knowledge and ambitious entrepreneurship to help organizations enable innovation at scale. With nearly 3,000 technologists, scientists, programmers, engineers, and human-centered designers located across 80+ cities, BCG X builds and designs platforms and software to address the world’s most important challenges and opportunities. Teaming across our practices, and in close collaboration with our clients, our end-to-end global team unlocks new possibilities. Together we’re creating the bold and disruptive products, services, and businesses of tomorrow

To succeed, organizations must blend digital and human capabilities. Our diverse, global teams bring deep industry and functional expertise and a range of perspectives to spark change. BCG delivers solutions through leading-edge management consulting along with technology and design, corporate and digital ventures—and business purpose. We work in a uniquely collaborative model across the firm and throughout all levels of the client organization, generating results that allow our clients to thrive.",4.3,"Boston Consulting Group
4.3","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Staff Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Support Center - Irving

Michaels Staff Data Scientists will develop systems and techniques for identifying business trends and challenges through complex big data analysis. As a Staff Data Scientist at Michaels, you will design, develop, and implement data system solutions for the organization. You will interpret results from multiple sources using techniques including statistical analysis, machine learning, and data mining. You will work with teams to design architectures, breaking down tasks, and reviewing code.

The ideal candidate will have a passion for developing machine learning models, analyzing data, and identifying trends, has a high degree of customer obsession, and a track record for delivering results.

Lead the Development of new techniques for inferring user interests from online activity
Oversee the development and investigate machine learning algorithms to improve current processes.
Review the analysis of large amounts of Michaels's historical business data to detect patterns, trends, correlations, and casualties
Design and run A/B experiments that affect millions of customers and evaluate the impact of optimizations and communicate results to various business stakeholders.
Enhance applications by identifying opportunities for improvement and making recommendations
Manage individual project priorities, deadlines, and deliverables
Work with teams to implement solutions based on data findings
Design architectures, breaking down tasks, and reviewing code
Investigate and use new technologies where relevant
Other duties as assigned

Minimum Knowledge/Skills/Abilities

Minimum Education
Bachelor’s Degree or higher in Computer Science, Statistics, Math, or a related technical field.
Minimum Special Certifications or Technical Skills
Proficiency in Python, SQL, and distributed data technologies (Hive, Spark)

Minimum Type of Experience the Job Requires
6#43; years of industry experience, with experience in machine learning, data analysis, and business analysis
Fluency in Python, R, SQL
Experience in computer vision or natural language processing is a plus

Other
Ability to draw insights and present conclusions from data to inform model development and business decisions
Ability to conduct rigorous analysis and communicate conclusions to both technical and non-technical audiences
Deep understanding of Machine Learning concepts and statistical methods
Solid communication and collaboration skills with the ability to work effectively with internal teams
Excellent problem-solving and debugging skills
Excellent communication and collaboration skills.
Mentor and lead other data scientist in the team
Have a strong business acumen and experience working in a client-facing role.

Applicants in the U.S. must satisfy federal, state, and local legal requirements of the job.

For nearly 50 years, Michaels has been the destination where Makers get inspired, learn, shop, and create. We strive to cultivate an inclusive shopping environment for all Makers and work environment for all Team Members, providing a place of belonging and empowering everyone to bring their creative dreams to life. At Michaels, every Team Member is encouraged to hone their craft with opportunities for personal and professional growth. From our Stores and Distribution Centers to Artistree and our Support Center, our best-in-class team is passionate about leaving the world a better, more creative place by contributing to every “make”.

Michaels is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We are here for all Team Members and all Makers to create, innovate and be better together.

Michaels is committed to the full inclusion of all qualified individuals. In keeping with this commitment, Michaels will assure that people with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodations. Accordingly, if a reasonable accommodation is required to fully participate in the job application or interview process, to perform the essential functions of the job, and/or to receive all other benefits and privileges of employment, please contact Customer Care at 1-800-642-4235 (1800-MICHAEL).

EEOC Know Your Rights Poster in English
EEOC Know Your Rights Poster in Spanish
EEOC Poster Optimized for Screen Readers
Federal FMLA Poster
Federal EPPAC Poster",3.2,"Michaels Stores, Inc.
3.2","Irving, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Jr. Data Scientist, Minerva Analytics",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Currently enrolled in an accredited college or university Bachelor's degree program.
Majoring in Data Science, Computer Science, or a related STEM discipline.
Graduation date falls between December 2024 and June 2026.
Ability to work year-round: part-time during the school year and full-time during the summer.
Living within commutable distance to San Diego, CA.
The Jr. Data Scientist role is a unique employment opportunity for students seeking to gain on-the-job data science & analytics experience and receive excellent mentoring while completing their education. Jr. Data Scientists are immersed in an Amazon team and work on exciting, meaningful projects that impact real Amazon customers. Paired 1:1 with a Amazon Jr. Data Science Mentor, Jr. Data Scientists receive guidance and support in all aspects of their role: skill development, career advisement, project collaboration, and more! Upon successful completion of the Jr. Data Scientist Program, the opportunity for full-time employment will be available at the Amazon corporate sites in San Diego, CA.

The Jr. Data Scientist role is part of the Jr Developer Program, a unique internship program in several respects:
Jrs. who participate in the Jr. Developer Program routinely acknowledge the valuable learning experience created by the uniform excellence of their teams, mentoring offered by experienced Amazonians, and the challenge of being a principal contributor to science and software products.

Key job responsibilities
We are open to hiring candidates to work out of one of the following locations:

San Diego, CA, USA

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.

Pursuant to the Los Angeles Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Our compensation reflects the cost of labor across several US geographic markets. The base pay for this position ranges from $15/hr in our lowest geographic market up to $75.63/hr in our highest geographic market. Pay is based on a number of factors including market location and may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Amazon is a total compensation company. Dependent on the position offered, equity, sign-on payments, and other forms of compensation may be provided as part of a total compensation package, in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits. For more information, please visit https://www.aboutamazon.com/workplace/employee-benefits. Applicants should apply via our internal or external career site.",3.7,"Amazon.com Services LLC
3.7","San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"More details outside of the job description below, candidates will need related work experience: Experience: Data Scientist with strong Python coding, machine learning & natural language processing experience + web scraping required. Cybersecurity (vulnerability mitigation and open/closed source) highly desired but not required. Would still want to see a resume if they're over the rate if they have the cyber experience Project - working on developing a solution related to risk management & vulnerability management. Building a business process tool. Must include a portfolio of the projects they've worked on Full time position (40 hours) and must be available for daily stand-ups and weekly meetings Data Scientist About This Role The successful candidate will be responsible for utilizing their data science knowledge to contribute to our cybersecurity project. Ideally, this individual will have cybersecurity experience, with a deep understanding of Python for data processing and the ability to write production level code. Experience with web scraping, Machine Learning and Natural Language Processing (NLP) is crucial, as is a capacity to work in a high-pace, high-demand setting. Knowledge of Appian will be considered a plus. Qualifications Proven data science experience 7+ years Python experience, with a deep understanding of data processing and ability to write production-level code Demonstrable experience with web scraping Solid understanding of Machine Learning concepts and experience with relevant tools such as Sklearn, TensorFlow, or Pytorch Familiarity with Natural Language Processing (NLP), with practical knowledge of tools like NLTK or Spacy Ability to keep up with a fast-paced, rapidly changing environment Innate problem-solving skills, coupled with a creative and innovative mindset Cybersecurity experience desired Vulnerability management Open Source / Closed-Source Intelligence Knowledge of Appian desired",4.3,"Intone Networks
4.3",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Operations Research Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job Number 23163819
Job Category Information Technology
Location Marriott International HQ, 7750 Wisconsin Avenue, Bethesda, Maryland, United States
Schedule Full-Time
Located Remotely? Y
Relocation? N
Position Type Management

JOB SUMMARY

Applies advanced computational techniques in the development of business solutions to data-intensive problems in the hospitality industry. This rewarding position provides a career as part of a team that makes a direct revenue impact on Marriott hotels, globally, by providing tools that facilitate data-driven decision making in the disciplines of pricing, revenue management, sales and reservations. Works as part of a team supporting revenue-impacting data analysis and modeling applications, provides pricing and statistical modeling and technical expertise; performs undirected research on large volumes of data to reach business conclusions and recommendations; contributes complex programming and analysis in revenue management and sales systems; analyzes data and builds innovative models to deliver business solutions; functions as a subject matter expert in all phases of the project lifecycle – inception, prototyping, design, testing, rollout and support. The Operations Research team seeks a flexible candidate with a willingness to learn that brings unique perspectives to enable creative data-driven solutions to the challenges at Marriott.










Marriott International is the world’s largest hotel company, with more brands, more hotels and more opportunities for associates to grow and succeed. where you can do your best work, your purpose, to an amazing global team, and the best version of you.",4.0,"Marriott International, Inc
4.0","Bethesda, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, NLP",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"About Ancestry:
When you join Ancestry, you join a human-centered company where every person’s story is important. We believe that by discovering the struggles and triumphs of our past, we can foster deeper bonds and more meaningful connections among families and communities. With more than 30+ billion digitized global historical records, 125+ million family trees, and 22+ million people in our growing AncestryDNA database, Ancestry helps customers discover their family story and gain a new level of understanding about their lives.

We are committed to our location flexible work approach, allowing you to choose to work in the nearest office, from your home, or a hybrid of both (subject to location restrictions and roles that are required to be in the office- see the full list of eligible US locations HERE). We will continue to hire and promote beyond the boundaries of our office locations, to enable broadened possibilities for employee diversity.

Together, we work every day to foster a work environment that's inclusive as well as diverse, and where our people can be themselves. Every idea and perspective is valued so that our products and services reflect the global and diverse clients we serve.

Ancestry encourages applications from minorities, women, the disabled, protected veterans and all other qualified applicants. Passionate about dedicating your work to enriching people’s lives? Join the curious.",3.5,"Ancestry
3.5",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Date: 13 Sep 2023
Location: Not Applicable, CA
Company: LTTS
Job Title - Data Scientist
Location – Troy, Michigan
Job Description:
3+ years of practical experience with data processing and analytics
1+ years in a data science role with experience in Manufacturing",3.5,"LT Technology Services
3.5",California,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job Description
We are looking for a Data Scientist with a varied background to act in a consultant capacity for assessments of data science requests, including requirements gathering and expectation management. This position would be a good fit for someone interested in applying their knowledge across an extremely wide range of topics, advising and mentoring new data scientists, and designing and recommending both technical and workflow solutions. We expect the Data Scientist to conduct hands-on machine learning (i.e. existing model usage and training new models for custom needs) Familiarity with virtualized data science environment preferred. The Data Scientist will work primarily under consultative direction, develops and analyzes modeling and measuring techniques using inquisitive creativity along mathematics, machine learning, and statistical and engineering methods to discover many possible solutions to a given problem. Creates user friendly reports using various databases, programs, and scripts. Works with other teams in order to ensure connectivity between various databases and systems. Collaborates with others in order to develop solutions to problems and potential problems. Ad Hoc Tasking.",-1,The Swift Group,"Reston, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist
As a Data Scientist, you'll have the unique opportunity to shape the future of recommendation systems and make a significant impact on a dynamic startup.
Remote Kyiv London Limassol Tbilisi
Are you ready to bring your Data Science experience to the next level?
As a Data Scientist specializing in Machine Learning, you'll play a crucial role in developing and implementing cutting-edge recommendation algorithms. Your expertise will help drive user engagement, enhance customer experiences, and contribute to the growth of the company. You'll work closely with a talented cross-functional team to turn data into actionable insights that drive our recommendation platforms forward.",5.0,"Gamingtec
5.0",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, New Content Formats",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Content
Data Science
Spotify’s mission is to unlock the potential of human creativity by giving a million creative artists the opportunity to live off their art and billions of fans the opportunity to enjoy and be inspired by these creators. Everything we do is driven by our love for innovating the world of audio and expression. Today, we are the world’s most popular audio streaming subscription service with a community of more than 515 million users.
Location
New York
Job type",4.0,"Spotify
4.0","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
iO Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"We've made a lot of progress since opening the doors in 1942, but one thing has never changed - our commitment to serve, heal, lead, educate, and innovate. We believe that every award earned, every record broken and every patient helped is because of the dedicated employees who fill our hallways.
At Ochsner, whether you work with patients every day or support those who do, you are making a difference and that matters. Come make a difference at Ochsner Health and discover your future today!
This job uses advanced and predictive data analytics using machine learning and artificial intelligence technology for healthcare innovation and outcomes. Performs analysis using data science techniques on structured and unstructured data sets and develops algorithms for targeted business needs. Pilots the delivery of patient-centered and personalized advanced analytics solutions that improve contract performance, program effectiveness, and clinical, financial, and utilization outcomes across the continuum of care. Implements advanced scientific techniques, forecasting, and machine learning to predict financial and clinical outcomes in order to guide investments that improve health outcomes and reduce costs.",3.6,"Ochsner Health System
3.6","New Orleans, LA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Product Manager, Customer Service",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Remote, United States
Customer Service
Product Manager, Customer Service

Over 200 million members worldwide love Netflix. When they sit down to watch, we want to make sure that nothing gets between them and their favorite shows, movies, and games. And Netflix Customer Service (CS) is here to assist customers when they are in need of help.

The CS Technology team is part of the Customer Service organization and is responsible for ensuring the right CS tools and technologies are in place and well-functioning to support the operation, growth, and scalability of the Customer Service business now and in the future. We are looking for an experienced Product Manager to lead and manage innovation in improving our members' and support agents’ experience with our contact center platform.",4.2,"Netflix
4.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Software Programs",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Summary
Posted: Sep 11, 2023
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:200501302
Imagine what you could do here. At Apple, new ideas have a way of becoming great products, services, and customer experiences very quickly. Bring passion and dedication to your job and there's no telling what you could accomplish! The System Quality team is seeking a data science engineer to help us improve software quality for iOS and macOS. We practice agile, fast-paced development that relies heavily on a tight relationship between Engineering and QA. We're looking for critical thinkers who would like to play a key role in developing new tools and processes for the SWE Program group.",4.2,"Apple
4.2","Cupertino, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Inclusively is partnering with a multinational universal bank to hire a Data Scientist.
ABOUT INCLUSIVELY:
Inclusively is a digital tech platform that connects candidates with disabilities, who may benefit from workplace accommodations, to inclusive employers. This includes all disabilities under the ADA, including mental health conditions (e.g. anxiety, depression, PTSD), chronic illnesses (e.g. diabetes, Long COVID), and neurodivergence (e.g. autism, ADHD). Applicants with one or more of these conditions are encouraged to apply; Inclusively does not require applicants to disclose their specific disability.
What will you be doing?",5.0,"Inclusively
5.0","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Remote,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job Description

Welcome to Holland America Line, a premium cruise line dedicated to explorers, foodies and music lovers who want to explore the world on perfectly sized, refreshingly spacious ships filled with one-of-a-kind experiences.
We’re looking for an amazing IT Data Scientist to fill this role. You’ll be a member of the Revenue Management System team, specifically focused on using data science skills to conceive and develop new opportunities to improve yield performance across multiple brands through enhancing the science part of the revenue management system (YODA) and increasing its adoption across its brands. This role will work closely with YODA science teams across multiple brands to help interpret models, assess unique business cases, and incorporate feedback between the brand science teams and the RMS. This role will also be involved in other key projects that help us better understand our guests' behaviors and preferences, allowing us to maximize revenue and guest experience by providing the right cruise experience to the right guest for the right price.",3.6,"Holland America Line
3.6","Seattle, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Senior Data Scientist, Operations",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"About Us
Coalition is the world's first Active Insurance provider designed to help prevent digital risk before it strikes. Founded in 2017, Coalition combines broad insurance coverage with a digital risk assessment and continuous security monitoring to help organizations protect themselves in today’s hyper-connected world.
Coalition offers its Active Insurance products in the U.S., U.K., and Canada through relationships with leading global insurers including Allianz, Arch Insurance, Lloyd’s of London, Swiss Re and Zurich, as well as cyber capacity through its own carrier, Coalition Insurance Company. Coalition's Active Risk Platform provides automated security alerts, threat intelligence, expert guidance, and cybersecurity tools to help businesses worldwide remain resilient against cyber attacks.

Coalition comprises a team of cybersecurity and technology experts, as well as experienced insurance professionals, who have come together to build a world-class organization with a massive technological advantage. Our secret sauce is bringing these expertise together to create a world-class organization with one mission: . Today, Coalition is one of the world’s largest commercial insurtechs serving hundreds of thousands of customers worldwide.",4.5,"Coalition
4.5",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Growth and Marketing",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Company Description

Dropbox is a special place where we are all seeking to fulfill our mission to design a more enlightened way of working. We’re looking for innovative talent to join us on our journey. The words shared by our founders at the start of Dropbox still ring true today.

Wouldn’t it be great if our working environment—and the tools we use—were designed with people’s actual needs in mind? Imagine if every minute at work were well spent—if we could focus and spend our time on the things that matter. This is possible, and Dropbox is connecting the dots.

The nearly 3,000 Dropboxers around the world have helped make Dropbox a living workspace - the place where people come together and their ideas come to life. Our 700+ million global users have been some of our best salespeople, and they have helped us acquire customers with incredible efficiency. As a result, we reached a billion dollar revenue run rate faster than any software-as-a-service company in history.

Dropbox is making the dream of a fulfilling and seamless work life a reality. We hope you’ll join us on the journey.

Team Description

Our Product team advocates for our users and our business, setting the vision for our growing family of products. We use data, research, strategy, and empathy to guide multidisciplinary teams toward a common goal, balancing diverse perspectives and empowering our teams to do great work. As we scale globally, there’s plenty of space for you to grow alongside us and simplify life for millions of people around the world in team that always focuses on we, not I, and creates delightful products that are worthy of trust.

Role Description

We're looking for a Data Scientist to partner with revenue, marketing, and product teams to answer key questions about how to grow revenue, optimize product, scale and monetize the business, and launch high-impact initiatives. We solve challenging problems and boost business growth through a deep understanding of user behaviors with applied analytics techniques and business insights. An ideal candidate should have robust knowledge of consumer lifecycle and behavior analysis, customer segmentation, digital campaigns, monetization analytics and business operations for a SaaS company.
Responsibilities

Develop a deep understanding of customer journey phases and key business metrics
Perform analytical deep-dives to analyze problems and opportunities, identify the hypothesis and design & execute experiments
Inform future experimentation design and roadmaps by performing exploratory analysis to understand user engagement behavior and derive insights
Create personalized segmentation strategies leveraging propensity models to enable targeting of offers and experiences based on user attributes
Identify key trends and build automated reporting & executive-facing dashboards to track the progress of acquisition, monetization, and engagement trends.
Extract actionable insights through analyzing large, complex, multi-dimensional customer behavior data sets
Monitor and analyze a high volume of experiments designed to optimize the product for user experience and revenue & promote best practices for multivariate experiments
Translate complex concepts into implications for the business via excellent communication skills, both verbal and written
Understand what matters most and prioritize ruthlessly
Work with cross-functional teams (including Data Science, Marketing, Product, Engineering, Design, User Research, and senior executives) to rapidly execute and iterate
Requirements

Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Engineering, or related field
3-5 years experience using analytics to drive key business decisions; examples include business/product/marketing analytics, business intelligence, strategy consulting
Proven track record of being able to work independently and proactively engage with business stakeholders with minimal direction
Significant experience with SQL and large unstructured datasets such as Hadoop
Deep understanding of statistical analysis, experimentation design, and common analytical techniques like regression, decision trees
Solid background in running multivariate experiments to optimize a product or revenue flow
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Proficiency in programming/scripting and knowledge of statistical packages like R or Python is a plus

Total Rewards

Dropbox takes a number of factors into account when determining individual starting pay, including job and level they are hired into, location/metropolitan area, skillset, and peer compensation. We target most new hire offers between the minimum up to the middle of the range.

Salary/OTE is just one component of Dropbox’s total rewards package. All regular employees are also eligible for the corporate bonus program or a sales incentive (target included in OTE) as well as stock in the form of Restricted Stock Units (RSUs).


Dropbox uses the zip code of an employee’s remote work location to determine which metropolitan pay range we use. Current US Zone locations are as follows:
Dropbox is committed to investing in the holistic health and wellbeing of all Dropboxers and their families. Our benefits and perks programs include, but are not limited to:

Competitive medical, dental and vision coverage

(US Only) Competitive 401(k) Plan with a generous company match and immediate vesting

Flexible Time Off/Paid Time Off, paid holidays, Volunteer time off and more

Protection Plans including; Life Insurance, Disability Insurance and Travel benefit plans

Perks Allowance to be used on what matters most to you, whether that’s wellness, learning and development, food & groceries, and much more

Parental benefits including; Parental Leave, Child and Adult Care, Day Care FSA (US Only), Fertility Benefits (US Only), Adoption and Surrogacy support and Lactation Support

Mental Health and Wellness benefits Free Dropbox space for your friends and family

Additional benefits details are available upon request.

Dropbox is an equal opportunity employer. We are a welcoming place for everyone, and we do our best to make sure all people feel supported and connected at work. A big part of that effort is our support for members and allies of internal groups like Asians at Dropbox, BlackDropboxers, Latinx, Pridebox (LGBTQ), Vets at Dropbox, Women at Dropbox, ATX Diversity (based in Austin, Texas) and the Dropbox Empowerment Network (based in Dublin, Ireland).",4.5,"Dropbox
4.5",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Specialist-Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Join AT&T and reimagine the communications and technologies that connect the world. We’re committed to those who seek to discover the undiscoverable and dare to disrupt the norm. Bring your bold ideas and fearless risk-taking to redefine connectivity and transform how the world shares stories and experiences that matter. When you step into a career with AT&T, you won’t just imagine the future – you’ll create it.
As a Sr. Specialist Data Scientist, you will:
Translate business problems to insights and codes solutions using data extraction, cleansing, feature engineering, exploratory data analysis, model selection/creation.
Design, build, and analyze large and complex data sets from various structured and unstructured sources while thinking strategically about data use and data design.",3.6,"AT&T
3.6","Plano, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Description
JOB TITLE: Sr Data Scientist
Syneos Health is the only fully integrated biopharmaceutical solutions organization purpose-built to accelerate customer success. We lead with a product development mindset, seamlessly connecting our capabilities to add high-value insights to speed therapies to patients and provide practical value to help our customers achieve their objectives.
Every day we perform better because of how we work together, as one team, each the best at what we do. We bring many talented experts together across a wide range of business-critical services that support our business. Every role within Corporate is vital to furthering our vision of Shortening the Distance from Lab to Life®.",3.8,"Syneos Health Clinical
3.8",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Staff Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job Title:
Staff Data Scientist - Activision Blizzard Media
Requisition ID:
R020475
Job Description:
Activision Blizzard Media and King (a part of Activision-Blizzard) are building a new team to introduce innovative, impactful, and rewarding advertising experiences to our huge audience of highly-engaged players, and to create powerful marketing solutions embraced by the world's biggest marketers. Activision Blizzard Media is seeking a passionate Data Scientist interested in pushing the boundaries of mobile games analytics and advertising product performance.
In the U.S., the standard base pay range for this role is $111,780.00 - $206,882.00 Annual. This base pay range is for the U.S. and is not applicable to locations outside of the U.S. Actual amounts will vary depending on experience, performance and location. In addition to a competitive base pay, employees in this role may be eligible for incentive compensation. Incentive compensation is not guaranteed.",3.5,"Activision
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Analytics",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"About Us
Twitch is the world's biggest live streaming service, with global communities built around gaming, entertainment, music, sports, cooking, and more. It is where thousands of communities come together for whatever, every day.
We're about community, inside and out. You'll find coworkers who are eager to team up, collaborate, and smash (or elegantly solve) problems together. We're on a quest to empower live communities, so if this sounds good to you, see what we're up to on LinkedIn and Twitter, and discover the projects we're solving on our Blog. Be sure to explore our Interviewing Guide and Instagram channel to learn how to ace our interview process.
About the Role",3.9,"Twitch
3.9","Seattle, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job Title:
Data Scientist
Role Overview:
As a Data Scientist within the Office of the CTO within the Artificial Intelligence Research group at McAfee, you will play a vital role in providing our customers with cutting edge protection and peace of mind.

Use your LLM (Large Language Model) and Generative AI expertise to identify new opportunities for application across the personal security space, in addition to improving McAfee’s threat protection capabilities. Leverage your data visualization and storytelling skills to present your research to audience members ranging from fellow data scientists to senior executives.

The starting pay range for this position is $104,500.00-$171,250.00. McAfee takes into consideration an individual’s skillset, experience and location in making final salary determinations. For further details, please discuss with the Talent Acquisition Partner.",3.8,"McAfee, LLC
3.8",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"AI/ML - Sr Data Scientist, AI/ML Data",$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Summary
Posted: Sep 12, 2023
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:200502488
Do you get excited by driving product impact via measurement and evaluation, for products and services used by hundreds of millions of people globally? The vision for the AI/ML Data organization is to improve products by using data as the voice of our customers. Within this organization the mission of the Search Analytics team is to inform product evolution through measurement, evaluation, and analysis of the user experience. You will partner with Search engineering teams to improve search quality and guide feature development with data, to deliver amazing search experiences across iPhone, iPad, HomePod, Mac, Watch, tv, across dozens of languages.",4.2,"Apple
4.2","Cupertino, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Posit (formerly RStudio) creates great software that helps people understand data and make better decisions in real-world applications. Our core offering is an open source data science platform, and we aim to make it available to everyone, regardless of their economic means.
Posit is looking for a Data Scientist to join the Center of Excellence team to help deliver data-driven business decision making and deliver exceptional experiences to customers. This is a unique opportunity to grow the data science foundation working for a company that’s all about Data Science. You will work with Posit’s open-source and professional tools to transform raw data, build analyses and models, optimize campaigns and sales efforts, all the way up to designing and deploying executive and board dashboards. This is a critical role in helping Posit learn more about our business so that we can do a better job delivering on our mission.",4.8,"RStudio
4.8",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Machine Learning Ops Data Engineer/Software Engineer,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"MLOps Data Engineer/Senior Software Engineer
Data Science is all about breaking new ground to enable businesses to answer their most urgent questions. Pioneering massively parallel data-intensive analytic processing, our mission is to develop a whole new approach to generating meaning and value from petabyte-scale data sets and shape brand new methodologies, tools, statistical methods and models. What’s more, we are in collaboration with leading academics, industry experts and highly skilled engineers to equip our customers to generate sophisticated new insights from the biggest of big data.
Be a part of a team that’s ensuring Dell Technologies' product integrity and customer satisfaction. Our MLOps team turns business requirements into technology solutions by designing, coding, and testing/debugging applications, as well as documenting procedures for use and constantly seeking quality improvements.",4.2,"Dell Technologies
4.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Overview:
Are you looking for an opportunity to join a Fortune 200 company where your analytics expertise will influence our dynamic sales and marketing organizations and help craft our future? Do you thrive on transforming data into insights? If so, we want to speak with you!

We are currently recruiting for a Data Scientist to join Altria Advanced Analytics department in Richmond, VA, or we are open to remote work arrangements.

What you'll be doing:
Utilize various data sources to conduct descriptive and diagnostic analyses to derive insights and inform business decisions
Leverage big data cloud computing resources to design, test, and implement innovative analytical solutions that measure, predict, and influence business outcomes



In addition to the opportunity to apply and develop your skills toward key business priorities, we offer excellent relocation compensation packages that include a compelling base salary, comprehensive health/vision/dental insurance, and participation in our incentive compensation and deferred profit-sharing programs.
Sponsorship: Immigration Sponsorship is not available for this role. Company Overview: Altria has a leading portfolio of tobacco products for U.S. tobacco consumers 21+. Our tobacco companies – which have been the undisputed market leaders in the U.S. tobacco industry for decades – include some of the most enduring names in American business. In combustibles, we own Philip Morris USA, the maker of Marlboro cigarettes and John Middleton, manufacturer of Black & Mild cigars. Our smoke-free portfolio includes ownership of U.S. Smokeless Tobacco Company, the maker of Copenhagen and Skoal, and Helix Innovations, the maker of on! oral nicotine pouches. Additionally, we have a majority-owned joint venture with JT Group, Horizon Innovations, for the U.S. marketing and commercialization of heated tobacco stick products. Through a separate agreement with Philip Morris International, we have the exclusive U.S. commercialization rights to the IQOS* Tobacco Heating System® and Marlboro HeatSticks® through April 2024. Our equity investments include Anheuser-Busch InBev SA/NV, the world’s largest brewer and Cronos Group, a leading Canadian cannabinoid company. Each Altria company is an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to providing individuals with criminal records, including formerly incarcerated individuals and individuals with conviction records, a fair chance at employment. Learn more about Altria at www.altria.com and follow us on Twitter, Facebook and LinkedIn",3.9,"Altria
3.9","Richmond, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Bond's mission is to accelerate the pace of financial innovation and access to capital.
Today, it's difficult for many businesses to build the financial products they imagine. Whether that's launching a new credit or debit card, a savings account, a lending business, or anything else — there are barriers in the way. Bond is focused on helping brands, businesses, and banks hurdle over those roadblocks.
Bond makes it easy for businesses to compliantly offer financial products. We make integration to the myriad, often-antiquated financial vendors more streamlined and intuitive. And, we make regulatory compliance not only achievable, but accessible. Our platform streamlines the process of launching and iterating on financial products, thereby enabling digital brands to better engage their customers with unique financial products tailored to their needs.",2.4,"Bond Financial Technologies
2.4",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Duties
As a Data Scientist, you will perform the following duties:
Carry out operational assignments related to the management, upkeep, improvement, and analysis of environmental data. Conduct data mining and big data analytics to improve NOAA's mission and leverage project-tracking data to support NOAA's diverse workforce.
Conduct analysis in a programming or statistical software suite such as: R, Python, SAS, SPSS, STATA, Tableau, PowerBI, etc. to build predictive models and machine-learning algorithms to better understand current and future employee behavior, partnering with outside vendors on use of Al to drive stronger people insights.
These duties are described at the full performance level of the ZP-4; the ZP-3 is developmental leading to such performance.",4.0,"US National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration
4.0","Boulder, CO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Clinical Analytics",$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Our mission: to eliminate every barrier to mental health.
Spring Health is a comprehensive mental health solution for employers and health plans. Unlike any other solution, we use clinically validated technology called Precision Mental Healthcare to pinpoint and deliver exactly what will work for each person — whether that's meditation, coaching, therapy, medication, and beyond.
Today, Spring Health equips over 800 companies, from start-ups to multinational Fortune 500 corporations, as a leading and preferred mental health service. Companies like J.P. Morgan Chase & Co., Microsoft, J.B. Hunt, Bumble, and Instacart use the Spring Health platform to provide mental health services to thousands of their team members globally. We have raised over $370 million from prominent investors including Kinnevik, Tiger Global, Northzone, RRE Ventures, and many more. Thanks to their partnership, our current valuation has reached $2.5 billion.",3.5,"Spring Health
3.5","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Staff Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Staff Data Scientist
We’re looking for Data Scientists to join our team. You'll develop statistical and machine learning models to improve our operations platform and help us provide a better service to our clients. We're looking for generalist data scientists who are excited to jump into new problems and write production-quality code. About the work: Leverage data to solve meaningful problems with appropriate complexity. Collaborate with a diverse team across engineering, PM, and care operations to define a strategy and execute against it. Research operational/logistical problems and proactively identify potential solutions. Lead the design, implementation, and evaluation of descriptive and predictive models. Integrate machine learning into user-facing applications. Mentor and provide technical oversight on teammates' projects throughout the project lifecycle. About you: Excellent communication skills with both technical and non-technical peers. Excellent mathematical and statistical fundamentals, including a degree in a quantitative field (such as Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Physics) or equivalent professional experience. Wide-ranging professional experience solving complex business problems, and shipping/maintaining Python in a production environment. 5+ years of industry experience. Aptitude to rapidly iterate and deliver technical solutions that maximize business impact. Expertise with numerical software packages such as NumPy, scikit-learn, or Keras. Able to manage product ambiguity, seeking clarity when possible. Are accountable end-to-end for your own projects, through planning, deployment, maintenance, and monitoring. You spot and address potential issues early. Bonus points if you have professional experience with: Designing systems to optimize portfolio allocation in a two-sided marketplace (E.g., ideal matches of people needing and providing care, automated financial incentives to staff remaining shifts, etc.) Using survival analysis and related methods to evaluate risk of employee churn and to predict future high-performers Collaborating with designers to develop effective methods of collecting data in order to quantify highly qualitative attributes, such as personality, taste preferences and perceived quality Using NLP methods to build data products from a variety of unstructured data sources, including phone calls and website forms Applying spatial statistics to incorporate geographic and regional differences in a variety of problem contexts Our range reflects the hiring range for this position. We use national average to determine pay as we are a remote first company. Individual pay is based on a number of factors including qualifications, skills, experience, education, and training. Base pay is just a part of our total rewards program. Honor offers equity and 401K with up to a 4% match. We provide medical, dental and vision coverage including zero cost plans for employees. Short Term Disability, Long Term Disability and Life Insurance are fully employer paid with a voluntary additional Life Insurance option. We offer a generous time off program, mental health benefits, wellness program, and discount program.Hiring Salary Range$185,000—$215,000 USD",3.6,"Honor
3.6",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Analyst - Early Career,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Job ID: 646174BR
Date posted: Sep. 13, 2023

Description:By bringing together people that use their passion for purposeful innovation, at Lockheed Martin we keep people safe and solve the world's most complex challenges. Our people are some of the greatest minds in the industry and truly make Lockheed Martin a great place to work. With our employees as our priority, we provide diverse career opportunities designed to propel development and boost agility. Our flexible schedules, competitive pay, and comprehensive benefits enable our employees to live a healthy, fulfilling life at and outside of work. At Lockheed Martin, we place an emphasis on empowering our employees by fostering innovation, integrity, and exemplifying the epitome of corporate responsibility. Your Mission is Ours.

Lockheed Martin Aeronautics is seeking a full-time Early Career Data Scientist Analyst. In this role, you will develop AI/ML models for manufacturing processes, support the connected factory framework, and develop applications supporting the LM Digital Factory. The successful candidate will have experience and/or knowledge of complex problem solving and programming.

Must be a US Citizen.; This position will require a government security clearance.; This position is located at a facility that requires special access.


This position requires a government security clearance, you must be a US Citizen for consideration.
Secret

By applying to this job, you are expressing interest in this position and could be considered for other career opportunities where similar skills and requirements have been identified as a match. Should this match be identified you may be contacted for this and future openings.
Part-time Remote Telework: The employee selected for this position will work part of their work schedule remotely and part of their work schedule at a designated Lockheed Martin facility. The specific weekly schedule will be discussed during the hiring process.
Lockheed Martin supports a variety of alternate work schedules that provide additional flexibility to our employees. Schedules range from standard 40 hours over a five day work week while others may be condensed. These condensed schedules provide employees with additional time away from the office and are in addition to our Paid Time off benefits.
4x10 hour day, 3 days off per week

At Lockheed Martin, we use our passion for purposeful innovation to help keep people safe and solve the world's most complex challenges. Our people are some of the greatest minds in the industry and truly make Lockheed Martin a great place to work.

With our employees as our priority, we provide diverse career opportunities designed to propel, develop, and boost agility. Our flexible schedules, competitive pay, and comprehensive benefits enable our employees to live a healthy, fulfilling life at and outside of work. We place an emphasis on empowering our employees by fostering an inclusive environment built upon integrity and corporate responsibility.

If this sounds like a culture you connect with, you're invited to apply for this role. Or, if you are unsure whether your experience aligns with the requirements of this position, we encourage you to search on Lockheed Martin Jobs, and apply for roles that align with your qualifications.
4 yr and up College
AERONAUTICS COMPANY
Yes
Data Science
Full-Time
First",4.1,"Lockheed Martin
4.1","Fort Worth, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"The UFG Enterprise Analytics Department is focused on delivering strategically impactful results by building analytically based solutions that integrate a wide range of internal and external data assets. The ultimate objective of the Enterprise Analytics organization is to help UFG gain and maintain a competitive advantage in how it underwrites, and prices risk and triages and reserves claims.
UFG is currently hiring for a Data Scientist who will facilitate the development of analytics solutions in support of UFG’s strategic plan. This individual will work closely with business units throughout the organization to develop and implement strategies that leverage data to enable enhanced decision making. The ideal candidate will possess strong technical and communication skills, as well as proven experience in predictive modeling, change management, and the insurance industry.",3.5,"United Fire & Casualty Co
3.5","Cedar Rapids, IA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"About Skylight
Skylight is a digital consultancy using design and technology to help government agencies deliver better public services.
We're at the forefront of a civic movement to reinvent how all levels of government serve families, patients, and many others in today's digital world.
If you want to play a part in driving this critical movement forward, we'd love for you to join our growing team of public interest technologists.
The work we do matters.
About the job",4.5,"Skylight
4.5","Sarasota, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Data Scientist – Contractor
Kaizen Analytix LLC is an analytics services company seeking a qualified Data Science Contractor. Responsibilities and job requirements are below. This role requires an estimated 40 hours/week commitment for 4 months.
Responsibilities:
Work with a client team on performing and implementing high quality, sophisticated analysis in support of client engagements
Apply multi-variable, complex statistical analysis on large data sets to gain useful insights into the data, detect trends and outliers/invalid data conditions present in the data sets
Develop custom scalable and sustainable integrated mathematical models by leveraging Python skills",3.4,"Kaizen Analytix
3.4",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Snapshot
We are a highly innovative AI startup that builds products and solutions from the ground up while using cutting-edge technology. We are seeking a data scientist with machine learning and Python experience to work with our team to develop our products for predictive maintenance (PMX) and digital signals processing (DSP).
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience in a quantitative field (Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, etc.)
2+ years of experience in Python data science stack: NumPy, Pandas, scikit-learn, TensorFlow/PyTorch, PySpark, Dask, Matplotlib, Seaborn, Bokeh, etc.
A strong sense of ownership and accountability; eagerness to learn skills as needed by business focus
Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Comfortable with public speaking and presenting to executives",4.3,"PUTNAM RECRUITING GROUP
4.3",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Summary:
WHO ARE WE?
Live Nation Entertainment is the world’s leading live entertainment and eCommerce company, comprised of four market leaders: Ticketmaster.com, Live Nation Concerts, Front Line Management Group and Live Nation Network. Ticketmaster.com is the global event ticketing leader and one of the world’s top five eCommerce sites, with over 26 million monthly unique visitors. Live Nation Concerts produces over 20,000 shows annually for more than 2,000 artists globally. Front Line is the world’s top artist management company, representing over 250 artists. These businesses power Live Nation Network, the leading provider of entertainment marketing solutions, enabling over 800 advertisers to tap into the 200 million consumers Live Nation delivers annually through its live event and digital platforms. For additional information, visit www.livenation.com/investors .







$128,000.00 USD - $160,000.00 USD",4.0,"Live Nation
4.0",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Associate Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"At Boeing, we innovate and collaborate to make the world a better place. From the seabed to outer space, you can contribute to work that matters with a company where diversity, equity and inclusion are shared values. We’re committed to fostering an environment for every teammate that’s welcoming, respectful and inclusive, with great opportunity for professional growth. Find your future with us.
Boeing Global Services (BGS) is seeking an Associate Data Scientist to support our business in Hazelwood, MO or Dallas, TX. This organization supports BGS-Government Planning and the data analyst will apply statistical and other analytics techniques to assist with producing within the fast pace environment of aerospace. A successful candidate will understand the importance of data analytics as these positions will focus on working directly with the demand planning, new business, and the Asset management team to perform statistical and mathematical data analysis to enable the BGS business to meet their organizational goals.

U.S. Government Export Control Status: This position must meet export control compliance requirements. To meet export control compliance requirements, a “U.S. Person” as defined by 22 C.F.R. §120.15 is required. “U.S. Person” includes U.S. Citizen, lawful permanent resident, refugee, or asylee.

US based job, US Person required",3.9,"BOEING
3.9","Hazelwood, MO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Junior Data Scientist (Co-op),$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"At Gentherm, we say, “It’s about the person.” We’re with you on a cold winter day when you turn on your heated seat and steering wheel or helping manage patient body temperature in the operating room, recovering room or intensive care units. We take a human approach with everything we do.

As the global market leader of innovative thermal management and pneumatic comfort technologies for the automotive industry we embrace the opportunity to create and deliver extraordinary solutions that make meaningful differences in everyday life. We do this by improving health, wellness, comfort and energy efficiency.",3.8,"Gentherm
3.8","Farmington Hills, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"At Evolve we’re a hardworking team serious about hospitality. Our teams work every day to make vacation rental easy for everyone — from our owners who trust Evolve to build their business to our guests who rest easy with every stay to our Evolvers who make this difference a reality. Our values anchor our daily decisions and interactions with our customers, communities, and each other. Join our inclusive culture in one of the most rapidly-growing segments in travel. Find your home at Evolve.
Why this role
As a tech-enabled disruptor in the vacation rental industry, Evolve is professionalizing the category by leveraging data science to capitalize on opportunities across the vacation rental ecosystem. The projects we work on aim to fundamentally change how guests interact with vacation rentals and how homeowners maximize rental income generation. As a member of the core data science team, you will be responsible for building machine learning products using a combination of modeling, software development, exploratory analysis, and data strategy to transform how a business domain is able to operate.",2.9,"Evolve Vacation Rentals
2.9",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Revenue Data Scientist - Industry Solutions,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"About the Role
Houzz is looking for a world-class Revenue Data Scientist to join our Industry Solutions data science team. This team is focused on uncovering critical insights and delivering models to leverage those findings thus powering intelligent business decisions. As a Revenue Data Scientist here at Houzz you are on the front line of uncovering insights to directly impact Houzz Revenue.

What You’ll Do
Collaborate with leadership, sales, finance, product, engineering, operations and marketing teams to identify, and optimize revenue enhancing opportunities.
Design, develop & deploy necessary KPIs to measure, track and report on revenue and its drivers.",3.7,"Houzz
3.7",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Overview:
LMI is seeking a skilled Data Analyst. Successful Data Analysts demonstrate competency in data analysis, data visualization, statistics, programming, project execution, and critical thinking.
LMI: Innovation at the Pace of Need™
At LMI, we’re reimagining the path from insight to outcome at the new speed of possible. Combining a legacy of over 60 years of federal expertise with our innovation ecosystem, we minimize time to value and accelerate mission success. We energize the brightest minds with emerging technologies to inspire creative solutioning and push the boundaries of capability. LMI advances the pace of progress, enabling our customers to thrive while adapting to evolving mission needs.
Responsibilities:
Qualifications:",4.2,"Logistics Management Institute
4.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist II (Remote),$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Kohl's is a leading retailer nationwide. We serve hundreds of millions of customers with millions of products. We are expanding our Data Science team to solve the problem of recommending the right products to the right customers. Working within this team at Kohl's, you will be able to develop products that have a strong impact on the company's revenue and millions of customers shopping with us.
As a senior member of the Data Science organization, you will be the technical expert for a team that builds models for initiatives such as recommender systems, NLP, image recognition, segmentation, and user behaviors. You will take a mentorship role within the DS team and work collaboratively with other business areas.
PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES",3.4,"KOHLS
3.4","Menomonee Falls, WI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"OVERVIEW

Discover the possibilities of our progressive, omnichannel approach to beauty retail. At Ulta Beauty, our E-commerce associates sit at the cutting edge of our efforts to reimagine the future of retail. Through a full suite of new and emerging technologies, this team is creating an enhanced buying experience for guests who crave simplicity, choice, personal insights and the joy of discovery. With greater interactivity. Inspired applications of big data, AI and UI/UX. And creative that persuades and delights. All of this, with the opportunity to experience smart ideas come to life.

At Ulta Beauty, we’re forever imagining. Forever striving. Forever investing in next-gen—with deep and rich opportunities for ongoing learning, growth and advancement. We encourage you to take control of your career and set your own ceiling. For curious and big-picture thinkers who can flex to the need and who want to stretch themselves through courage and conviction, Ulta Beauty provides an environment perfectly suited to your ambitions. Let’s build brilliant together.









The pay range for this position is $98000.00 - $166300.00 / Year with the opportunity to earn additional compensation pursuant with the Company’s bonus plan. Exact pay will be based on factors including but not limited to relevant education qualifications certifications experience level shift geographic location and business and organizational needs. Visit our Benefits and Career Development page:https://careers.ulta.com/careers/about-us/benefits-and-career-development",3.4,"Ulta Beauty
3.4","San Jose, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"At Fulcrum, we provide cutting-edge data science consulting and software solutions to help companies solve challenging business problems. Through the utilization of our innovative products and dedicated team, clients are able to operate more efficiently, manage risk, and make informed business decisions every day. Fulcrum Analytics has stood at the forefront of data, analytics, and innovative software for over 25 years, offering sophisticated solutions, groundbreaking technologies, and winning strategies that help companies achieve their targeted results.
Role Description:
The Data Scientist role is expected to develop analytical, statistical, and machine learning solutions to client business problems. The Data Scientist will have a number of responsibilities, including:
Extract and manipulate data from various sources (databases, files, APIs, etc.); requires knowledge of how to deal with the inherent structure of the data.",-1,Fulcrum Analytics,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Requisition ID: 377004
Work Area: Information Technology
Expected Travel: 0%
Career Status: Professional
Employment Type: Regular Full Time
Career Level: T2
Original Posting Date: 7/17/23
Recruiter Name: J.L. Andal
Additional Locations:

Original Posting Date: 7/17/2023
Data Scientist",4.4,"SAP
4.4","Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist - Machine Learning,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"What we do
Deliver a highly personalized shopping experience, including personalized product recommendations - using Collaborative Filtering as well as brand, style, and shape based recommender systems for personalized affinity predictions and recommendations.
Large scale text classification - to categorize products and extract attributes which helps retailers better organize their product catalogs.
Entity disambiguation - to help make sense of the thousands of different product sizes and to translate them all to a common scale.
Anomaly detection - to identify strange user behavior and, to detect both internal and external system issues.",-1,"Shoptrue, Inc.",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Description
Come join our exceptional Department of Neurobiology, and help lead the advancement of cutting-edge basic science research into explorations of the brain and central nervous system. Our research team, the Theoretical and Computational Neuroscience Laboratory (www.dipoppalab.com), is a cooperative and vibrant environment where all members are offered excellent scientific training and career mentoring. We are looking for candidates with a keen interest in gaining research experience in Computational Neuroscience, pursuing research projects, and supporting those of other team members. The Data Scientist will develop code (primarily in Python using libraries such as numpy, scikit-learn, pytorch) to support research in computational neuroscience pursued in the laboratory as well as working on their own research project. This work will include submitting jobs to high-performance computing clusters, analyzing large-scale biological and simulated datasets using machine learning tools, and training artificial neural network models. UCLA Health is a world-renowned health system with four award-winning hospitals and dozens of primary care practices, specialty practices, urgent care centers and other ancillary locations throughout metro Los Angeles as well as the David Geffen School of Medicine, which is an internationally-respected center of advanced medical education and research. If you’re looking to experience greater challenge and fulfillment in your career, you can at UCLA Health. Salary range: $26.20-$51.39 Hourly",3.8,"UCLA Health
3.8","Los Angeles, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"The Data team leverages data from our autonomous vehicles and operations to determine autonomy and service readiness. We provide the foundation for strategic decision-making at Zoox. You will be responsible for partnering with our AI, simulation, and mission assurance teams to drive improvements, inform development, and identify high leverage projects on our path towards autonomy. You will play a key role in enabling Zoox to develop and scale with a data-driven environment.

You will join a diverse, experienced team with rapidly growing scope and responsibility while also having access to one of the most unique data sets in the autonomous vehicle industry.
Responsibilities
Collaborating with our mission assurance team to validate and ensure the safety of our software",4.1,"Zoox
4.1","Foster City, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Generative AI",$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Scale is looking for a data scientist to join our team to help advance the development of AI. As a member of the data science team, you will lead the charge of building our data science infrastructure for Gen AI products and driving insights that lead to step-function improvements in how we operate. The ideal candidate is detail oriented, rigorous about validating results, talented at distilling down complexity, and loves tackling and solving hard problems.
You will:
Build evaluation frameworks to measure LLMs efficacy, ground truth dataset quality, and guide product development roadmap
Adapt statistical models to solve specific hard problems in fields of economics, price theory, and marketplace experimentation
Be a proactive partner to your business stakeholders and provide insights and conclusions rather than just data outputs/models",3.6,"Scale AI
3.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Staff Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"About Crunchbase
Crunchbase helps over 75 million people around the world connect with the companies and people that matter. Powered by best-in-class proprietary data, Crunchbase is democratizing access to opportunities so salespeople, entrepreneurs, investors, job seekers, and others can accelerate innovation for a better future. We’re proud to build intelligent products that shape how companies and people connect and enable them to communicate in a more meaningful way.
We are committed to a positive, diverse, and inclusive culture by hiring for potential, focused on the inclusion of people who have different ways of thinking, different viewpoints, different backgrounds, and different skill sets. We value a transparent and open culture that positively impacts our teams and our products.",4.2,"Crunchbase
4.2",California,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Python - AI/ML,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Description
We are looking for a Data Scientist to support a fast-paced and growing data science team working on projects critical to National Security.

There are 2 positions available. One is more Junior/Mid - Looking for 2-5 years of experience.

The 2nd job is Senior - looking for at least 7-10 years of experience.

Hours are very flexible!

The Data Scientist will be expected to build statistical models, test hypotheses, interpret, summarize, visualize, and succinctly report on data findings.

Will perform research on various data sources, to include unstructured data using quantitative and qualitative content analytics.

Will construct and perform complex database search queries in multiple databases using SQL and API interfaces.

Will perform web scraping and apply various techniques for processing unstructured data.

Will leverage automation and machine learning to manage data, predict scenarios and make recommendations.
Will contribute to building new analytical tools and packages across the enterprise and will be expected to collaborate with team members in a highly technical environment.

The Data Scientist will be expected to learn and leverage emerging technologies including AWS and Git.





Strong experience working with Python or R programming languages






This is an ACTIVE position. We are immediately looking for candidates.

Candidate will need to have experience with AI/ML (Artificial Intelligence/Machine Learning) and strong experience with Python.


Junior
BS Degree with at least 2-3 years of Data Science experience

Senior

BS Degree and/ or 7-10 years of experience


Full-Time Salary Range: $122870 - $208890

Please note: This range is based on our market pay structures. However, individual salaries are determined by a variety of factors including, but not limited to: business considerations, local market conditions, and internal equity, as well as candidate qualifications, such as skills, education, and experience.

Employee Benefits: At BAE Systems, we support our employees in all aspects of their life, including their health and financial well-being. Regular employees scheduled to work 20+ hours per week are offered: health, dental, and vision insurance; health savings accounts; a 401(k) savings plan; disability coverage; and life and accident insurance. We also have an employee assistance program, a legal plan, and other perks including discounts on things like home, auto, and pet insurance. Our leave programs include paid time off, paid holidays, as well as other types of leave, including paid parental, military, bereavement, and any applicable federal and state sick leave. Employees may participate in the company recognition program to receive monetary or non-monetary recognition awards. Other incentives may be available based on position level and/or job specifics.


BAE Systems, Inc. is the U.S. subsidiary of BAE Systems plc, an international defense, aerospace and security company which delivers a full range of products and services for air, land and naval forces, as well as advanced electronics, security, information technology solutions and customer support services. Improving the future and protecting lives is an ambitious mission, but it’s what we do at BAE Systems. Working here means using your passion and ingenuity where it counts – defending national security with breakthrough technology, superior products, and intelligence solutions. As you develop the latest technology and defend national security, you will continually hone your skills on a team—making a big impact on a global scale. At BAE Systems, you’ll find a rewarding career that truly makes a difference.

Intelligence & Security (I&S), based in McLean, Virginia, designs and delivers advanced defense, intelligence, and security solutions that support the important missions of our customers. Our pride and dedication shows in everything we do—from intelligence analysis, cyber operations and IT expertise to systems development, systems integration, and operations and maintenance services. Knowing that our work enables the U.S. military and government to recognize, manage and defeat threats inspires us to push ourselves and our technologies to new levels.

Our Commitment to Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion:
At BAE Systems, we work hard every day to nurture an inclusive culture where employees are valued and feel like they belong. We are conscious of the need for all employees to see themselves reflected at every level of the company and know that in order to unlock the full potential of our workforce, everyone must feel confident being their best, most sincere self and be equipped to thrive. We provide impactful professional development experiences to our employees and invest in social impact partnerships to uplift communities and drive purposeful change. Here you will find significant opportunities to do meaningful work in an environment intentionally designed to be one where you will learn, grow and belong.",4.0,"BAE Systems
4.0","McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$99K - $138K (Glassdoor est.),"Intuit is hiring a Principal Data Scientist to join our Intuit AI team.

Come join our collaborative and creative group of data scientists and machine learning engineers and build models that directly affect hundreds of thousands of our customers. In this role you will be building and deploying machine learning models using both analytical algorithms and deep learning approaches. We are waiting for you to join us and do the best work of your life.",4.5,"Intuit
4.5","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
College Graduate - Data Science (BS/MS),$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Job Description

Intel is a company of bold and curious inventors and problem solvers who create some of the most astounding technology advancements and experiences in the world.

With a legacy of relentless innovation and a commitment to bring smart, connected devices to every person on Earth, our diverse and brilliant teams are continually searching for tomorrow's technology and revel in the challenge that changing the world for the better brings. We work every single day to design and manufacture silicon products that empower peoples digital lives.

Do you love to solve technical challenges that no one has solved yet? Do you enjoy working with cross functional teams to deliver IP solutions for products that impact customers lives? If so, Come join us to do something wonderful.

We are looking for world class data engineers to help us build the future of technology.














Intel's Human Resources group is responsible for hiring, developing and retaining the best and brightest employees while continuing to strengthen the company's culture and values. Intel Human Resources provides first-rate, cost-effective services and support to employees worldwide and is dedicated to advancing Intel's business goals.

US, NM, Albuquerque; US, OR, Hillsboro; US, TX, Austin; US, CA, Folsom; US, CA, Santa Clara; US, GA, Atlanta

Intel strongly encourages employees to be vaccinated against COVID-19. Intel aligns to federal, state, and local laws and as a contractor to the U.S. Government is subject to government mandates that may be issued. Intel policies for COVID-19 including guidance about testing and vaccination are subject to change over time.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, religious creed, sex, national origin, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, military and veteran status, marital status, pregnancy, gender, gender expression, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by local law, regulation, or ordinance.

We offer a total compensation package that ranks among the best in the industry. It consists of competitive pay, stock, bonuses, as well as, benefit programs which include health, retirement, and vacation. Find more information about all of our Amazing Benefits here: https://www.intel.com/content/www/us/en/jobs/benefits.html

Annual Salary Range for jobs which could be performed in US, California: $105,930.00-$158,890.00


This role will be eligible for our hybrid work model which allows employees to split their time between working on-site at their assigned Intel site and off-site.",4.1,"INTEL
4.1","Santa Clara, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Decision Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"At PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL), we believe that every person has the right to participate fully in the global economy. Our mission is to democratize financial services to ensure that everyone, regardless of background or economic standing, has access to affordable, convenient, and secure products and services to take control of their financial lives.
Job Description Summary: The Global Collections Strategy team is seeking a Decision Scientist with prior Collections and Digital Channels experience to join our organization. The ideal candidate will possess a highly developed technical skillset (SQL, Python, etc), as well as the business acumen to distill analytical results into actionable outcomes. Frequent collaboration with cross-border stakeholder teams is required as part of this role.
Job Description:
PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $84500 to $204600",4.0,"PayPal
4.0",Arkansas,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Machine Learning Data Scientist - Growth Algorithms,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"We’re a team of bright, kind individuals who are motivated by challenge and who care deeply about achieving great things. We know our individual strengths, but believe we only win as a team. We’re transforming the way people find what they love - and we need your big ideas. We just might be the perfect fit.
ABOUT THE TEAM
At Stitch Fix, our data science team combines machine learning with expert human judgment to generate innovative recommendations and insights that transform the way our clients discover what they love. We believe in a curiosity-driven data science culture where members are empowered to deliver impact through end-to-end model development. The diversity of the problems that we work on and the data-rich environment of our business make it possible, even essential, to bring the tools of multiple disciplines to bear on our hardest problems. As a large company, our growing business is looking for data scientists to join us in revolutionizing retail.
ABOUT THE ROLE",3.3,"Stitch Fix
3.3",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Generative AI,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Why Mayo Clinic

Mayo Clinic is top-ranked in more specialties than any other care provider according to U.S. News & World Report. As we work together to put the needs of the patient first, we are also dedicated to our employees, investing in competitive compensation and comprehensive benefit plans – to take care of you and your family, now and in the future. And with continuing education and advancement opportunities at every turn, you can build a long, successful career with Mayo Clinic. You’ll thrive in an environment that supports innovation, is committed to ending racism and supporting diversity, equity and inclusion, and provides the resources you need to succeed.


Responsibilities

















Exempt



$159,973 - $231,962/ year. Education, experience and tenure may be considered along with internal equity when job offers are extended.



Yes



Full Time



80



M-F, daytime hours



N/A



No










Laura Percival",3.9,"Mayo Clinic
3.9","Rochester, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Conversica is the leading provider of Conversation Automation solutions, with billions of human interactions spanning more than a decade. Our Revenue Digital Assistants (RDAs) supercharge workforces for growth. They enable marketing, sales, and customer success teams to acquire untapped revenue through perfectly structured conversations. Unlike chatbots, they are powerfully human and can hold meaningful conversations at every touchpoint. Conversica RDAs are used by leaders nationwide to get the conversation going and build a Growth Workforce.

Winning multiple awards including Inc. 5000 fastest growing companies and recognized by Gartner as a Cool Vendor, Conversica is a portfolio company of Providence Equity, Kennet Partners and Toba Capital and is headquartered in San Mateo, California in Silicon Valley with additional US offices in Seattle and Bellingham, Washington.

As a Data Scientist on our team, you will work with other data scientists and engineers on the team and directly contribute to the innovative products we are building. You will interact with product and service teams to identify questions and issues for data analysis and experiments.",2.7,"Conversica
2.7","Seattle, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
machine learning,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Job Description:
Job Title: Artificial Intelligence
Location: Remote
Type: [Full-time]
Job Overview:
We are seeking a talented and experienced Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML) Engineer to join our dynamic team. As an AI/ML Engineer, you will play a pivotal role in developing and implementing cutting-edge AI and ML solutions that will drive innovation and enhance our products/services. You will collaborate with cross-functional teams to design, build, and deploy machine learning models, algorithms, and applications.",-1,Pashtek,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Data Analytics,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Costco IT is responsible for the technical future of Costco Wholesale, the third largest retailer in the world with wholesale operations in fourteen countries. Despite our size and explosive international expansion, we continue to provide a family, employee centric atmosphere in which our employees thrive and succeed. As proof, Costco ranks seventh in Forbes “World’s Best Employers”.
This is an environment unlike anything in the high-tech world and the secret of Costco’s success is its culture. The value Costco puts on its employees is well documented in articles from a variety of publishers including Bloomberg and Forbes. Our employees and our members come FIRST. Costco is well known for its generosity and community service and has won many awards for its philanthropy. The company joins with its employees to take an active role in volunteering by sponsoring many opportunities to help others.",3.9,"Costco Wholesale
3.9","Seattle, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Advanced Analytics",$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"At Horizon Therapeutics, we define success by the number of lives touched, lives changed, and lives saved. Our global biotechnology company is made up of agile, out-of-the-box thinkers with a focus on delivering breakthrough medicines to those living with rare, autoimmune, and severe inflammatory diseases. This is the heart of our global mission. Start a career that enables you to live up to your potential and help others live up to theirs. Join us.

The exceptional support we provide patients and communities equally extends to our employees. We offer industry-leading and award-winning benefits, compensation and rewards programs that positively impact all areas of our employees' personal and professional lives.

Position Summary:

The Data Science team at Horizon Therapeutics is looking for an extraordinary Data Scientist who is passionate about crafting data science solutions that drive impact for patients. In this role you will be leveraging cutting edge artificial intelligence, algorithms, and technology to influence decisions across the organization.

The role requires extensive knowledge of machine learning, the creativity to correctly identify opportunities for data science to be impactful, and a passion for the life sciences. You will assist matrixed teams across multiple therapeutic areas and commercial functions. This individual should be an expert at manipulating messy data and apply object-oriented design principles to automate outputs and datasets. The Data Scientist should be experienced in moving models from development to production, and have a good sense for tracking and updating model performance.

Some key projects that the Data Scientist will support include physician targeting and segmentation, lead generation for our field sales teams, patient journey mapping and prediction, disease incidence and prevalence projection, and predicting patients likely to start therapy.













At Horizon, we know that disease does not discriminate. We embrace the bold ideas of one another, foster a sense of belonging, and value inclusion. We attract and develop diverse talent because we believe that when people from different backgrounds and life experiences come together, we make lives better.

Horizon intends that all qualified applications are given equal opportunity, and that selection decisions be based on job-related factors. We do not discriminate based on race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, or any other characteristics protected by law.",4.3,"The Infosoft Group
4.3","Deerfield, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Octo, an IBM company, is an industry-leading, award-winning provider of technical solutions for the federal government. At Octo, we specialize in providing agile software engineering, user experience design, cloud services, and digital strategy services that address government's most pressing missions. Octo delivers intelligent solutions and rapid results, yielding lower costs and measurable outcomes.
Our team is what makes Octo great. At Octo you'll work beside some of the smartest and most accomplished staff you'll find in your career. Octo offers fantastic benefits and an amazing workplace culture where you will feel valued while you perform mission critical work for our government. Voted one of the region’s best places to work multiple times, Octo is an employer of choice!",4.2,"Octo
4.2","Reston, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Job Description:
Remitly is on a mission to transform the lives of immigrants and their families by providing the most trusted financial products and services on the planet. Since 2011, we have been tirelessly delivering on our promises to immigrants sending their hard earned money home. Today, we are reimagining international payments at scale and building new products to create deeper relationships with our customers and their loved ones across the globe. Join over 2,700 employees across 10 offices who are growing their careers while having a positive impact on people globally.
About the Role:
The Product Analytics team delivers quantitative insights that guide product investments and improve customer and business outcomes. As a Principal Data Scientist, you will work with the Consumer Product to drive desired customer behavior throughout the product life cycle. This role would develop advanced analytical solutions to delve deeper into user behaviors, create customer segments and identify the best action to model desired customer behavior in our Product. You would also provide expertise in hypothesis generation, designing and evaluating A/B tests, driving business outcomes and be a thought partner and mentor to analysts and product managers.",4.1,"Remitly
4.1","Seattle, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Technical Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Overview: Your future team We're looking for a Data leader with business instincts and analytics mastery that has led projects improving data science efficiency. You are someone that is passionate about applying these skills to increase data quality, reduce the need for data scientists to perform data engineering tasks and love working across the organization to create the proper data layer to increase data science productivity. You will be reporting to our Head of Experimentation. Responsibilities: At Atlassian, we strive to design equitable and explainable compensation programs. To support this goal, the baseline of our range is higher than that of the typical market range, but in turn we expect to hire most candidates near this baseline. Base pay within the range is ultimately determined by a candidate's skills, expertise, or experience. In the United States, we have three geographic pay zones. For this role, our current base pay ranges for new hires in each zone are: Zone A: $201,300 - $268,400 Zone B: $181,200 - $241,600 Zone C: $167,100 - $222,800 This role may also be eligible for benefits, bonuses, commissions, and equity. Please visit go.atlassian.com/payzones for more information on which locations are included in each of our geographic pay zones. However, please confirm the zone for your specific location with your recruiter. #LI-Remote Qualifications: What you'll do
Your background",4.3,"Atlassian
4.3","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, AI Expertise",$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Job ID: 234872
Location Name: CA-FSC SF Off (0174)
Address: 350 Mission St, 20th Floor, San Francisco, CA 94105, United States (US)
Job Type: Full Time
Position Type: Regular
Job Function: Information Technology
Remote Eligible:Hybrid Schedule

Company Overview:
At Sephora we inspire our customers, empower our teams, and help them become the best versions of themselves. We create an environment where people are valued, and differences are celebrated. Every day, our teams across the world bring to life our purpose: to expand the way the world sees beauty by empowering the Extra Ordinary in each of us. We are united by a common goal - to .",3.7,"Sephora
3.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, AI Expertise",$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Job ID: 234872
Location Name: CA-FSC SF Off (0174)
Address: 350 Mission St, 20th Floor, San Francisco, CA 94105, United States (US)
Job Type: Full Time
Position Type: Regular
Job Function: Information Technology
Remote Eligible:Hybrid Schedule

Company Overview:
At Sephora we inspire our customers, empower our teams, and help them become the best versions of themselves. We create an environment where people are valued, and differences are celebrated. Every day, our teams across the world bring to life our purpose: to expand the way the world sees beauty by empowering the Extra Ordinary in each of us. We are united by a common goal - to .",-1,"Sephora
3.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Description
¡Ampliamos nuestro equipo de Data & AI!. Seleccionamos consultor/a con experiencia como Data Scientist para incorporarse de manera estable a nuestros equipos de Madrid.

¿Qué ofrecemos?
Estupendo ambiente laboral, las personas que componen nuestros equipos lo hacen posible
Teletrabajo y horario flexible.
Formación a medida y posibilidad de participar en gremios y grupos transversales de difusión de conocimientos de todo tipo.",3.9,"Vass
3.9",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Mining Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Position Description
We are looking for a Data Mining Scientist to analyze large amounts of raw information to find patterns that will help improve our company. We will rely on you to build data products to extractvaluable business insights. In this role, you should be highly analytical with a knack for analysis,math and statistics. Critical thinking and problem-solving skills are essential for interpreting data.We also want to see a passion for machine-learning and research. Your goal will be to help our company analyze trends to make better decisions.

Key Responsibilities
Identify valuable data sources and automate collection processes.
Undertake preprocessing of structured and unstructured data.",-1,Wilfred Knight,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, NLP",$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Your Future Evolves Here
New Century Health (NCH) has been transforming the delivery of specialty care and driving radical cost and quality improvement across the member journey for patients with cancer and cardiovascular disease. As part of Evolent Health, we are on a bold mission to change the health of the nation by changing the way health care is delivered. Evolenteers make a difference wherever they are, whether it is at a medical center, in the office, or while working from home across 48 states. We empower you to work from where you work best, which makes juggling careers, families, and social lives so much easier. Through our recognition programs, we also highlight employees who live our values, give back to our communities each year, and are champions for bringing their whole selves to work each day. If you’re looking for a place where your work can be personally and professionally rewarding, don’t just join a company with a mission. Join a mission with a company behind it.
Why We’re Worth the Application:

Compensation Range: The minimum salary for this position is $100,000, plus benefits. Salaries are determined by the skill set required for the position and commensurate with experience and may vary above and below the stated amounts.",3.8,"Evolent Health
3.8",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
2024 University Graduate - Security Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Our Company

Changing the world through digital experiences is what Adobe’s all about. We give everyone—from emerging artists to global brands—everything they need to design and deliver exceptional digital experiences! We’re passionate about empowering people to create beautiful and powerful images, videos, and apps, and transform how companies interact with customers across every screen.

We’re on a mission to hire the very best and are committed to creating exceptional employee experiences where everyone is respected and has access to equal opportunity. We realize that new ideas can come from everywhere in the organization, and we know the next big idea could be yours!

The Opportunity
The Adobe Cybersecurity Software Development Analytics team is dedicated to using the strength of data to protect our systems, inform security strategy, measure the efficacy of our defensive measures, and identify potential vulnerabilities. We are in search of a Data Scientist who is deeply passionate about harnessing big data to produce useful cybersecurity insights that inform critical security decisions. The ideal candidate will possess hands-on experience with analytics and data science, particularly in the cybersecurity realm, demonstrate exceptional quantitative analysis and technical abilities, communicate effectively, and collaborate within a multi-faceted team environment. The primary focus will be driving data science and analysis across an array of cybersecurity projects aimed at enhancing system defense and resilience. In essence, this role is tasked with answering: Where are our vulnerabilities? How can we improve our defenses? This role will be primarily oriented toward identifying patterns, anomalies, and potential threats, especially concerning individual user data and system-generated log data.

What Y ou’ll D o

A pply expertise in quantitative analysis, threat modeling, and cybersecurity techniques to deeply understand patterns and vulnerabilities within our systems interactions.

Use insights and data to inform cybersecurity strategies that enhance system integrity and safeguard data.

Monitor system security metrics daily, understand the root causes of security breaches or vulnerabilities, and offer guidance on risk forecasts.

Define and prioritize security opportunities and areas of focus based on potential threats and vulnerabilities.

Engage with various cross-functional teams (Security Operations, Threat Hunting, Incident Response, and other security teams) to fortify our defenses and enhance security resilience.

Capture, synthesize, and interpret disparate security data within the context of business objectives , identify potential threats, and explore vulnerabilities across different system segments.
What Y ou N eed to S ucce ed

3+ years of hands-on experience in quantitative analysis, preferably within the field of cyber security, threat intelligence, or risk assessment. A Ph.D. in Cyber Security Analytics or a related degree is preferred.

Experience in defining security problems, gathering relevant data, analyzing results, and crafting a compelling risk management strategy.

Strong analytical skills to decipher key security implications and business impacts.

Proficiency in querying and manipulating large datasets using SQL-like languages such as Spark SQL and programming languages such as Python, Scala, etc.

Statistical Modeling tools appropriate for security data such as R, Pandas, Jupyter Notebooks, PyTorch , or Spark ( PySpark ).

Experience with data visualization tools tailored for cyber security insights, like Tableau or Power BI.

Solid understanding of statistical modeling, machine learning, or data mining concepts, particularly as they relate to threat detection and anomaly recognition. Consistent track record of addressing security challenges using these methods.

Comfortable communicating security insights and findings to a wide range of collaborators, team members, and partners across various regions. Ability to convey complex data-driven security narratives in a clear and concise manner.

A strong sense of integrity, accompanied by a phenomenal sense of humor.

Eagerness and ambition to lead and pioneer new initiatives in the realm of cyber security.
Our compensation reflects the cost of labor across several U.S. geographic markets, and we pay differently based on those defined markets. The U.S. pay range for this position is $92,100 -- $161,100 annually. Pay within this range varies by work location and may also depend on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Your recruiter can share more about the specific salary range for the job location during the hiring process.

At Adobe, for sales roles starting salaries are expressed as total target compensation (TTC = base + commission), and short-term incentives are in the form of sales commission plans. Non-sales roles starting salaries are expressed as base salary and short-term incentives are in the form of the Annual Incentive Plan (AIP).

In addition, certain roles may be eligible for long-term incentives in the form of a new hire equity award.

Adobe is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and affirmative action employer. We do not discriminate based on gender, race or color, ethnicity or national origin, age, disability, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, or any other applicable characteristics protected by law. Learn more.

Adobe aims to make Adobe.com accessible to any and all users. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation to navigate our website or complete the application process, email accommodations@adobe.com or call (408) 536-3015.

Adobe values a free and open marketplace for all employees and has policies in place to ensure that we do not enter into illegal agreements with other companies to not recruit or hire each other’s employees.",4.4,"Adobe
4.4","San Jose, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Company Description

Visa is a world leader in digital payments, facilitating more than 215 billion payments transactions between consumers, merchants, financial institutions and government entities across more than 200 countries and territories each year. Our mission is to connect the world through the most innovative, convenient, reliable and secure payments network, enabling individuals, businesses and economies to thrive.
When you join Visa, you join a culture of purpose and belonging – where your growth is priority, your identity is embraced, and the work you do matters. We believe that economies that include everyone everywhere, uplift everyone everywhere. Your work will have a direct impact on billions of people around the world – helping unlock financial access to enable the future of money movement.",4.1,"Visa
4.1","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Technology Department, Data Science Team
100% Remote
The Team:
The Data Science team provides critical insights and tools to help the executive leadership team, technology teams, and business units optimize test delivery, test development, and test security. Our expertise is understanding a wide array of business problems and using a variety of techniques including data analysis, machine learning, and software engineering to create value from data and support decision making. We have a passion for data analysis, programming, applying new technologies, and building practical solutions. Our small, tight-knit, self-organized team of 6 Data Scientists and Machine Learning Engineers collaborates closely and uses creative problem solving to tackle difficult challenges for many of the organization’s strategic initiatives. We love having virtual happy hours and celebrating our accomplishments.
The Opportunity:",3.7,"The College Board
3.7",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Sr. Data Scientist, Search",$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"About Pinterest:
Millions of people across the world come to Pinterest to find new ideas every day. It's where they get inspiration, dream about new possibilities and plan for what matters most. Our mission is to help those people find their inspiration and create a life they love. In your role, you'll be challenged to take on work that upholds this mission and pushes Pinterest forward. You'll grow as a person and leader in your field, all the while helping Pinners make their lives better in the positive corner of the internet.
Creating a life you love also means finding a career that celebrates the unique perspectives and experiences that you bring. As you read through the expectations of the position, consider how your skills and experiences may complement the responsibilities of the role. We encourage you to think through your relevant and transferable skills from prior experiences.",3.7,"Pinterest
3.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Jr. / Physical Scientist Jr.,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"The Data Scientist Jr. / Physical Scientist Jr. will provide support to the team with the operation of a technical and operational reachback center dedicated to the analysis of geophysical, geospatial, and electronic data collected in the field. This position will be located at Fort Walker, VA (formerly Fort A.P. Hill).
The Data Scientist Jr. / Physical Scientist Jr. works on multi-disciplinary projects, studies, and methodologies acting as a technical advisor and consultant on remote detection methods, techniques and instrumentation and the interpretation and analysis of derived data.
The Data Scientist Jr. / Physical Scientist Jr. supports a team responsible for conducting studies, methodologies, and programs to improve the quality and efficiency of data collection, data processing, data collection procedures, and the handling, analyzing, archiving, searching/mining of large amounts of sensor data.",-1,Na Oiwi Kane,"Bowling Green, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"The Walt Disney Company Direct to Consumer’s (DTC) Data Science team combines deep data analysis and research of our rich user data to present a compelling vision around user retention and preferences across the vast ecosystem of our product offerings and content. We are the insights and modeling partners for the content, marketing, product, and engineering teams at Disney+, Hulu and ESPN+. As Data Scientists, we use data to empower decision-makers with information, predictions, and insights that ultimately influence the experiences of millions of users worldwide. Are you someone who loves to work cross-functionally, build models, perform statistical analysis, and create visualizations to provide scalable and iterative capabilities? If so, then this is a phenomenal role for you!
What you'll do
This role is integral to maintaining and improving email personalization models and pipelines, in addition to modeling engagement and content affinity.

The hiring range for this position in Santa Monica, CA is $136,038 to $182,490 per year. The base pay actually offered will take into account internal equity and also may vary depending on the candidate's geographic region, job-related knowledge, skills, and experience among other factors. A bonus and/or long-term incentive units may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to the full range of medical, financial and/or other benefits, dependent on the level and position offered.",3.9,"Disney Media & Entertainment Distribution
3.9","Santa Monica, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist(RNAseq,Genomics,Omnics,Machine Learning,data analysis)",$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Job Description:
Responsibilities:
Project involves developing multi-omics directed graph networks based on causal inference framework based on multiple data types (e.g., clinical, RNA-seq, epigenetic, proteomic, and/or genetic data).
Skills:
Must be expert in at least one area of causal inference such as interpretable machine learning or data fusion problem, e.g., to reduce space of plausible causal relationships and how data from multiple sources can be combined to make causal inferences.
Experience with machine learning in the context of causal inference, so that the predictive models are more than just a black box, is strongly desired.",3.7,"Tellus Solutions
3.7",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Senior Data Scientist, Growth",$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Grammarly is excited to offer a remote-first hybrid working model. Team members work primarily remotely in the United States, Canada, Ukraine, Germany, or Poland. Certain roles have specific location requirements to facilitate collaboration at a particular Grammarly hub.
All roles have an in-person component: Conditions permitting, teams meet 2–4 weeks every quarter at one of Grammarly’s hubs in San Francisco, Kyiv, New York, Vancouver, and Berlin, or in a workspace in Kraków. This flexible approach gives team members the best of both worlds: plenty of focus time along with in-person collaboration that fosters trust and unlocks creativity.
Grammarly team members in this role must be based in the United States or Canada, and they must be able to collaborate in person 2-3 weeks per quarter, traveling if necessary to the hub(s) where the team is based.",4.4,"Grammarly, Inc.
4.4",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Principal Data Scientist, Professional Services",$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Physics, Mathematics, etc.)
10+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building and deploying ML models or hands on experience developing deep learning models
Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++
Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data informed presentations
Would you like to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)? Are you excited about using data to develop ML models something you excel at? Eager to learn to apply ML to a diverse array of enterprise use cases? Thrilled to be a part of Amazon who has been pioneering and shaping the world’s AI/ML technology for decades?

At Amazon Web Services (AWS), we are helping large enterprises build ML models on the AWS Cloud. We are applying predictive technology to large volumes of data and against a wide spectrum of problems. AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions. AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team. We pride ourselves on being customer obsessed and highly focused on the AI enablement of our customers. If you have experience with AI, including building ML models, then we would like you to join our team. You will get to work with an innovative company, with great teammates, and have a lot of fun helping our customers. A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, inspection, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.

Key job responsibilities
About the team
The Global Practice Organization for Analytics is a team inside the AWS Professional Services Organization. Our mission in the Global Practice Organization is to be at the forefront of defining machine learning domain strategy, and ensuring the scale of Professional Services' delivery. We define strategic initiatives, provide domain expertise, and oversee the development of high-quality, repeatable offerings that accelerate customer outcomes.

Inclusive Team Culture
Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have thirteen employee-led affinity groups, reaching 85,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazon’s culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 16 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.

Work/Life Balance
Our team puts a high value on work-life harmony. Striking a healthy balance between your personal and professional life is crucial to your happiness and success here. We are a customer-obsessed organization—leaders start with the customer and work backwards. They work vigorously to earn and keep customer trust. As such, this is a customer facing role in a hybrid delivery model. Project engagements include remote delivery methods and onsite engagement that will include travel to customer locations as needed.

Mentorship & Career Growth
Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded professional and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.

We are open to hiring candidates to work out of one of the following locations:

Austin, TX, USA | Boston, MA, USA | Chicago, IL, USA | Herndon, VA, USA | Miami, FL, USA | Minneapolis, MN, USA | New York, NY, USA | Portland, OR, USA | San Diego, CA, USA | San Francisco, CA, USA

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.

Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Our compensation reflects the cost of labor across several US geographic markets. The base pay for this position ranges from $145,800/year in our lowest geographic market up to $294,700/year in our highest geographic market. Pay is based on a number of factors including market location and may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Amazon is a total compensation company. Dependent on the position offered, equity, sign-on payments, and other forms of compensation may be provided as part of a total compensation package, in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits. For more information, please visit https://www.aboutamazon.com/workplace/employee-benefits. Applicants should apply via our internal or external career site.",3.8,"Amazon Web Services, Inc.
3.8","Portland, OR",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist/Software Developer,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Description:
KSA Integration is a Service-Disabled Veteran-Owned Small Business (SDVOSB) that provides business and management solutions through four core capabilities: (1) data analytics, (2) comprehensive veterans support, (3) business process improvement, and (4) training and education. We are a rapidly growing government contractor that has built a reputation on focused customer service, on-time performance, and continuous improvement. To demonstrate this, KSA was awarded Inc. magazine’s 2019, 2020, and 2021 Best Workplaces, a prestigious list of businesses recognized for value placed on company culture, standout worker benefits, and the prioritization of employee well-being. KSA also received a spot on both the 2020 and 2021 Best for Vets List by Military Times in addition to winning the 2021 Department of Labor “Hire Vets” Platinum Medallion Award.
Requirements:",4.6,"KSA Integration
4.6",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"As Senior Data Scientist, you will:
Lead and conduct statistical analysis, quantitative analytics, and predictive analytics to identify key drivers and make informed business decisions.
Design and execute experiments in a business context, utilizing your expertise in multivariate testing and causal inference to uncover insights and improve operations.
Develop and maintain a comprehensive knowledge repository, organizing findings from experiments and observational data to create a robust knowledge base.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to implement data-driven insights into strategic decision-making processes.",-1,Health Rhythms,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Be unstoppable with us!
T-Mobile is synonymous with innovation–and you could be part of the team that disrupted an entire industry! We reinvented customer service, brought real 5G to the nation, and now we’re shaping the future of technology in wireless and beyond. Our work is as exciting as it is rewarding, so consider the career opportunity below as your invitation to grow with us, make big things happen with us, above all, #BEYOU with us. Together, we won’t stop!
The Principal Data Scientist is responsible for leading technical innovation within the data science team. The Principal Data Scientist collaborates with a multi-disciplinary team of technical and non-technical business stakeholders on a wide range of challenges and develops the next generation of advanced analytics and Machine Learning (ML) modeling products and solutions. The Principal Data Scientist is entrusted with developing the Artificial Intelligence (AI) that drives the most important aspects of the business. This position is at the forefront of new AI technologies and represents mastery of existing machine learning techniques. Paramount to this job is the understanding that a Principal Data Scientist is a forward-thinking individual contributor that helps define the long-term technical vision of the data science teams within T-Mobile.
Job Responsibilities: • Extract, prepare, and model large, complex data sets using a combination of skills, including machine learning theory, mathematics, statistics, and programming. • Identify critical and emerging technologies that will support and extend our consumer data, data integration, and quantitative analytic capabilities. • Lead the implementation, assessment and standardization of advanced analytics and modeling toolkits for our data science teams. • Partner with data engineering teams to shape data management strategies, architecture, governance, pipelines, and infrastructure enabling effective modeling environments for data science teams • Provide senior level guidance to the data science and measurement science teams on approach and methodologies • Communicate important information and insights to business leaders using verbal, written, and data visualization skills. Education: • Bachelor's Degree Quantitative Discipline (math, statistics, economics, computer science, physics, engineering) (Required) • Master's/Advanced Degree Quantitative Discipline (math, statistics, economics, computer science, physics, engineering) (Preferred) Work Experience: • 7-10 years Industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis in an ML engineer or data scientist role building and deploying ML models or hands on experience developing deep learning models (Required) • 4-7 years’ Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations (Required) • 7-10 years’ Experience articulating and translating business questions and using statistical techniques to arrive at an answer using available data (Required) • 4-7 years’ Experience with statistical methods and advanced modeling techniques. For example- SVM, Random Forest, graph models, Bayesian inference, NLP, Computer Vision, neural networks (Required) • 4-7 years’ Experience with big data architecture and pipeline, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, Kafka, etc. (Required) • 7-10 years’ Experience with data scripting languages (e.g., SQL, Python, R) (Required) • 4-7 years’ Experience in data visualization (Required) • 7-10 years Extended experience working with relational database using SQL (Required) • 4-7 years’ Experience in telecom industry (Preferred) Knowledge, Skills and Abilities: • Mathematics Calculus, linear algebra, statistics, and probability (Required) • Programming Mastery of Python and SQL (Required) • Machine Learning: Apply machine learning techniques including supervised and unsupervised learning; collaborative filtering; and artificial neural networks (Required) • Deep Learning: Research, design, implement, evaluate, and optimize novel algorithms/models in Deep Learning space (Required) • Communication Exemplary communication skills, ability to work with cross functional teams (Required)
• At least 18 years of age • Legally authorized to work in the United States Travel: • Travel Required (Yes/No): No
Washington Pay Range : $157,700.00 - $213,400.00
The pay range above is the general base pay range for a successful candidate in the state listed. The successful candidate’s actual pay will be based on various factors, such as work location, qualifications, and experience, so the actual starting pay may be above or below this range. At T-Mobile, employees in regular, non-temporary roles are eligible for an annual bonus or periodic sales incentive or bonus, based on their role. Most Corporate employees are eligible for a year-end bonus based on company and/or individual performance and which is set at a percentage of the employee’s eligible earnings in the prior year. Certain positions in Customer Care are eligible for monthly bonuses based on individual and/or team performance, while Retail and Business Sales roles are eligible for monthly or quarterly sales incentives. And since we are ALL owners, EVERY employee at T-Mobile is eligible for an Annual Stock Grant. For information about T-Mobile’s amazing benefits, check out https://careers.t-mobile.com/culture-and-benefits/",3.7,"T-Mobile
3.7","Bellevue, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Principal Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Who we are
At CarGurus (NASDAQ: CARG), our mission is to give people the power to reach their destination. We started as a small team of developers determined to bring trust and transparency to car shopping. Since then, our history of innovation and go-to-market acceleration has driven industry-leading growth. In fact, we're the largest and fastest-growing automotive marketplace, and we've been profitable for over 15 years.
What we do
The market is evolving, and we are too, moving the entire automotive journey online and guiding our customers through every step. That includes everything from the sale of an old car to the financing, purchase, and delivery of a new one. Today, tens of millions of consumers visit CarGurus.com each month, and ~30,000 dealerships use our products. But they're not the only ones who love CarGurus—our employees do, too. We have a people-first culture that fosters kindness, collaboration, and innovation, and empowers our Gurus with tools to fuel their career growth. Disrupting a trillion-dollar industry requires fresh and diverse perspectives. Come join us for the ride!",4.4,"CarGurus
4.4",Maine,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"EUROPE
REMOTE
We are Assetario
We love data. We are gamers. We are engineers. Phenomenal team of MIT graduates, technical experts and advisors who lead multi-billion-dollar businesses.
Our engineering and data teams cooperate with the goal of building a smart platform to process your users’ data, to drive personalised app experiences. Our platform processes hundreds of terabytes of data with tens of millions of daily active users with hundreds of ML models in production.
What you’ll be responsible for:",-1,Assetario,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - AI/ML,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"If you're ready to be part of our legacy of hope and innovation, we encourage you to take the first step and explore our current job openings. Your best is waiting to be discovered.

Day - 08 Hour (United States of America)
The Stanford Medicine Technology and Digital Solutions team was formed to provide the Stanford Medicine community with the most innovative technology services as efficiently as possible. Led by Michael Pfeffer, CIO and Michael Halaas, Chief Operating Officer and Associate Dean in the School of Medicine, the unified organization brings together the best of the School of Medicine and Stanford Health Care IT to enable new opportunities for groundbreaking work and compassionate care. Together, the Technology and Digital Solutions team will work to break down historic organizational barriers to enable even greater collaboration across Stanford Medicine hospital and clinics, and the entire University.






















Base Pay Scale: Generally starting at $72.49 - $96.06 per hour",3.9,"Stanford Health Care
3.9","Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"About Pinterest:
Millions of people across the world come to Pinterest to find new ideas every day. It's where they get inspiration, dream about new possibilities and plan for what matters most. Our mission is to help those people find their inspiration and create a life they love. In your role, you'll be challenged to take on work that upholds this mission and pushes Pinterest forward. You'll grow as a person and leader in your field, all the while helping Pinners make their lives better in the positive corner of the internet.
Creating a life you love also means finding a career that celebrates the unique perspectives and experiences that you bring. As you read through the expectations of the position, consider how your skills and experiences may complement the responsibilities of the role. We encourage you to think through your relevant and transferable skills from prior experiences.",3.7,"Pinterest
3.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
E-commerce Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are looking for Data Scientists to join our Global e-commerce Data Science team. The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.


Qualifications
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at USRC@tiktok.com

#LI-Hybrid
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $129000 - $316000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



At ByteDance/TikTok our benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support ByteDancers to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off(PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.",3.5,"TikTok
3.5","Seattle, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"Wintrust is a financial holding company with approximately $50 billion assets under management and traded on the NASDAQ:WTFC. Built on the ""HAVE IT ALL"" model, Wintrust offers sophisticated technology and resources of a large bank while focusing on providing service-based community banking to each and every customer. Wintrust operates fifteen community bank subsidiaries with over 170 banking locations in the greater Chicago and southern Wisconsin market areas. Additionally, Wintrust operates various non-bank business units including commercial and life insurance premium financing, short-term accounts receivable financing, out-sourced administrative services, mortgage origination and purchase, wealth management services and qualified intermediary services for tax-deferred exchanges.
Why join us?
An award-winning culture! We are rated a Top Workplace by the Chicago Tribune (past 9 years) and Employee Recommended award by the Globe & Mail (past 6 years)",3.9,"Wintrust Financial
3.9","Rosemont, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"Data Scientist
Location TX-Texas Dallas
Experience Range 8 - 10 Years
Open

Skills SQL, Snowflake, Experience in Machine Learning, Strong in Python Sr. Developer

Job Description
About Us
EVRY India and EVRY USA are wholly owned subsidiaries of TietoEVRY, a leading digital services and software company headquartered in Finland with annual revenues of around USD 3.3 billion. TietoEVRY employs around 24,000 experts globally and is recognized as the #1 IT services and #1 financial services company in the Nordics. TietoEVRY serves thousands of enterprises and public sector customers in more than 90 countries. We foster a culture of continuous learning and focus on helping our customers in accelerating their digital journey to scale business advantage. Be it talent, speed to market, innovation, or cross-pollination of ideas across markets, TietoEVRY leverages USA and India operations to compete locally as well as globally.",4.0,"EVRY India
4.0","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, New Product Introduction",$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"What to Expect
We're the New Product Introduction Team at the one of the world’s largest manufacturing facilities located in Austin, TX. This small but fast-growing central team helps coordinate cross functional teams to leverage the data we collect. We help product and process engineers through direct support by doing data analysis and understanding how they need to align on managing change.
We're looking for a talented individual to join us in providing leadership in the definition and implementation of processes and tools to enable data science at Tesla. Your work will affect Tesla engineers and production teams daily, the profitability of the company, as well as improve the functionality of products we produce now and in the future. In this position, you will be responsible for retrieving, analyzing, and summarizing results to share with cross-functional teams.

As a data scientist on the New Product Introduction team, you will be responsible for architecting and designing the data interactions and dashboarding, that prevents errors from occurring as we manage change to drive improvements in our world class products. We are looking for a leader who is goal-oriented, results driven, and data-centric.

What You’ll Do
What You’ll Bring",3.6,"Tesla
3.6","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"Duties
Lead, plan, and develop activities and program initiatives for both present and future business application projects and initiatives designed to enhance the prevention of FWA within VBA business lines and other VA stakeholders.
Assist in the selection, development, and application of appropriate problem-solving methods and techniques, provide advice on work methods, practices, and procedures, and assist the team and/or individual members in identifying a viable solution.
Plan, coordinate, integrate, and execute business strategies for new and innovative programs.
Utilize various analytic and data visualization tools to build reports, dashboards, and other artifacts represent team and organizational activities, progress, and outcomes.",3.0,"US Veterans Benefits Administration
3.0","Phoenix, AZ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"Advanced Analytics and AI are high on the agenda at UCB and we are looking to strengthen our internal team of AI experts with a particular focus on sales & marketing.
In this context we are looking for an outstanding data resource proficient with Python & Spark to contribute to the development of analytics workflows focused on insights generation, prescriptive analytics and decision support apps.

Responsibilities:
Assemble large, complex data sets that meet functional/non-functional business requirements.",4.5,"Colsh Consultants
4.5",Georgia,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"Our Mission

As humans, there are few things more exciting than meeting someone new. At Tinder, we’re inspired by the challenge of keeping the magic of human connection alive. With tens of millions of users, hundreds of millions of downloads, 2+ billion swipes per day, 20+ million matches per day, and a presence in 190+ countries, our reach is expansive—and rapidly growing.
We work together to solve complex problems. Behind the simplicity of every match, we think deeply about human relationships, behavioral science, network economics, AI and ML, online and real-world safety, cultural nuances, loneliness, love, sex, and more.

Our Values

: We work hand-in-hand, building Tinder for our members. We succeed together when we work collaboratively across functions, teams, and time zones, and think outside the box to achieve our company vision and mission.",3.5,"Match Group
3.5","Los Angeles, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"At HCSC, we consider our employees the cornerstone of our business and the foundation to our success. We enable employees to craft their career with curated development plans that set their learning path to a rewarding and fulfilling career.
Come join us and be part of a purpose driven company who is invested in your future!
Job Summary
We're seeking a talented Data Scientist with a strong focus on program evaluation to join our team. In this role, you will be responsible for utilizing advanced statistical techniques to assess the effectiveness and impact of various programs. Your expertise will drive evidence-based decision-making, helping us optimize our initiatives and improve outcomes. Proficiency in programming languages such as Python or R, along with a deep understanding of statistical methodologies. Join us to contribute to our mission by leveraging data-driven insights to enhance the success of our programs.",3.9,"HCSC
3.9","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"Who We Are:
Calico (Calico Life Sciences LLC) is an Alphabet-founded research and development company whose mission is to harness advanced technologies and model systems to increase our understanding of the biology that controls human aging. Calico will use that knowledge to devise interventions that enable people to lead longer and healthier lives. Calico’s highly innovative technology labs, its commitment to curiosity-driven discovery science, and, with academic and industry partners, its vibrant drug-development pipeline, together create an inspiring and exciting place to catalyze and enable medical breakthroughs.
Position Description:
Calico is seeking a Senior Data Scientist to join an agile and interdisciplinary team focused on generating tractable biological insights through innovative and integrative analyses of large scale ‘omics datasets.",4.1,"CALICO
4.1","South San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"Duties
Joining the Customs and Border Protection, Office of Information and Technology, will allow you to use your expertise by serving as a data analytics expert and an advisor to senior management on a variety of administration and policy issues of interest to CBP and OIT officials, as well as, other federal, state, and local agencies. This position starts at a salary of $132,368.00 (GS-14, Step 1) to $172,075.00 (GS-14, Step 10) with promotion potential to $172,075.00 (GS-14 Step 10).

In this position, you will become a key member of the Office of Information and Technology team performing the below typical work assignments:
Providing expert consultation to senior management through the application of advanced data science techniques including data extraction, transformation, cleaning, modeling, machine learning, and artificial intelligence.",4.1,"US Customs and Border Protection
4.1","Ashburn, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"Description:
About ADRM
Founded in 2014, our mission is to disrupt the security industry, drive change and create a truly safer world. We protect organizations’ critical assets with data-driven risk management solutions. We specialize in providing not only traditional security consulting services but also unique and custom solutions for customers based on risk and need. We have industry leading clients in the Financial, Bio-Tech, Critical Infrastructure, and Higher Education sectors ranging from startups to Fortune 50 Corporations.
Our core values are seen in everything we do: Balance, Curiosity, Integrity, Respect, Team, and Trust. We are committed to living our values every day and in every action. We are in a period of profound growth, nearly doubling in size over the last year. We have a great Team at ADRM, and every team member is passionate about their work and the clients we serve. Team and family are important to us. We respect work-life balance and offer a comprehensive benefits package that includes 100% company paid monthly premiums for medical, dental, and vision benefits for you and your dependents.
Requirements:",-1,ADRM,Massachusetts,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"How will this role have an impact?
Reporting directly to the Director of Data Science, the Data Scientist position is responsible for mining, analyzing, and designing methodologies for data exploration, methodically running statistical experiments, and regularly evaluating alternate models via theoretical approaches. This role will fulfill our internal and external customer needs from an analytics perspective and develop reporting to satisfy those needs. The Data Scientist's role is to transform data into identifying critical insights to the core and new products that can be used to make rational decisions by:
Collecting and preparing data for analysis – Cleansing / Data Wrangling
Creating models to evaluate the data – Statistical, Visual, Machine Learning",3.3,"Signify Health
3.3",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"We're on a mission
At Octaura, we continually evolve markets to unleash value for clients. It's in our DNA to make a difference and do things differently.
Existing workflows within our markets are painful for clients: they are outdated, overcomplicated, and time-consuming. We want to change that. Octaura fundamentally rebuilds and redefines the markets by streamlining workflows, digitizing platforms, and bringing transactions, data and analytics together for the first time.
Join our inclusive culture
At Octaura, everyone belongs.
It's so important to us that all Octaurians are confident in knowing they have the space to use their voice and talents. We love the diversity we see in the world and we actively want our team to reflect this. We're a values-driven company and by engaging, solving and evolving together, we create a culture that is collaborative, switched-on, and fun to be part of.",5.0,"Octaura
5.0","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"We are seeking a dedicated Data Scientist to join our team working on the Hospital Quality Reporting system for the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS). The ideal candidate will be an analytical thinker with a deep understanding of healthcare data and its intricacies. Your work will play a pivotal role in improving the quality and effectiveness of healthcare services provided to millions of beneficiaries.
Responsibilities
Analyze and interpret complex healthcare datasets to provide insights into hospital performance, patient outcomes, and care quality.
Develop, test, and deploy predictive models to identify areas of improvement and risk within hospital care.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to integrate your findings and models into the Hospital Quality Reporting system.",3.9,"Bellese
3.9",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"Job Description:
Principal Data Scientist
Are you interested in joining a fast paced and innovative organization where you can make an immediate impact on the business? Do you want to be an AI/ML advocate, using data to answer important questions and shape strategy for leadership? You can be a part of the Artificial Intelligence Center of Excellence (AI CoE) within Fidelity Institutional (FI) that constantly pushes the potential of data to drive the business forward! At Fidelity Institutional’s Artificial Intelligence Center of Excellence (FI AI COE), you won’t be just tinkering around the edges, you’ll be building critical solutions that will benefit our clients and internal collaborators for years to come.
N/A
$130,000 - $218,000 per year
This position is eligible for incentive compensation or an annual bonus opportunity.
N/A
N/A",4.3,"Fidelity Investments
4.3","Westlake, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Amazon Robotics - Data Scientist Co-op - Fall 2023 (July - December),$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"Currently pursuing a MS in Data Science, Statistics, Operations Research, or in highly quantitative field (e.g. Computer Science, Operations Research, Systems Engineering, Physics) with at least 3 years of work or past intern experience.
Must have at least one semester/term/quarter of school left to complete after the end of the co-op
Programming experience in Python, R or equivalent
Background in applied statistics or machine learning

Are you inspired by invention? Is problem solving through teamwork in your DNA? Do you like the idea of seeing how your work impacts the bigger picture? Answer yes to any of these and you’ll fit right in here at Amazon Robotics. We are a smart team of doers that work passionately to apply cutting edge advances in robotics and software to solve real-world challenges that will transform our customers’ experiences in ways we can’t even image yet. We invent new improvements every day. We are Amazon Robotics and we will give you the tools and support you need to invent with us in ways that are rewarding, fulfilling and fun. We seek a talented and motivated engineer to tackle broad challenges in system-level analysis. You will work in a small team to quantify system performance at scale and to expand the breadth and depth of our analysis (e.g. increase the range of software components and warehouse processes covered by our models, develop our library of key performance indicators, construct experiments that efficiently root cause emergent behaviors). You will engage with growing teams of software development and warehouse design engineers to drive evolution of the AR system and of the simulation engine that supports our work. This role is a 6 month co-op to join AR full time (40 hours/week) from July-December 2023. Come join us in North Reading, MA, or in our newly expanded innovation hub in Westborough, MA! The campus provides a unique opportunity for co-ops to have direct access to robotics testing labs and manufacturing facilities. No remote option, this is an Onsite (3 days a week on site) role.
• Experience in predictive modeling, data science and analysis • Demonstrated experience in data science and data analysis • Desire to pursue challenging questions through extensive operational and data analysis (experience to do data analysis, regression analysis) • Demonstrated outstanding written and verbal communication skills • Experience giving data presentations with graphical or data visualization tools Preferred qualifications Comfortable in a Linux environment Experience with Amazon Web Services (AWS), e.g. DynamoDB, AuroraDB (MySQL), S3, SQS, SNS, EC2 • Interest in and experience with experimental design • Experience with creative problem solving and getting things done • Experience with ROS, OpenCV, or PCL Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",3.7,"Amazon.com Services LLC
3.7","North Reading, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"Podium exists to help local businesses win. Using Podium, local businesses can simplify the way they communicate with their customers—from collecting payments to facilitating online reviews to launching marketing campaigns, and much more.
Our work and focus on helping local businesses thrive has been recognized across the industry, including Forbes’ Next Billion Dollar Startups, Forbes’ Cloud 100, the Inc. 5000, and Fast Company’s World’s Most Innovative Companies.
We look for people who are curious, creative and are willing to do the work to be a little better every day. We also embody our company values in all that we do, which always starts with being Customer Obsessed, followed by Be a Founder, Zero Drama, and Enjoy the Ride. Does that sound like you?
Podium’s Analytics and Data Science team generates insights that shape the future of our products, operations, and customer relationships. We are seeking a highly motivated and analytically adept Data Scientist with a strong strategic mindset to join our team. In this role, you will collaborate closely with cross-functional teams to uncover valuable insights from complex datasets, develop actionable strategies, and contribute to our overall business growth.",3.4,"Podium
3.4","Lehi, UT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Staff Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"General information
All posting locations: Remote, Illinois, United States of America
Job Function: 16 - Digital
Date Published: 06-Sep-2023
Ref #: R-74320
Base Salary Range: $110,200.00 - $137,800.00
Target Total Cash Range: $148,770.00 - $186,030.00
Target total cash represents this role's annualized cash earning potential at target (base salary + target bonus). Target total cash is contingent on targeted company performance achievement and individual attainment of performance goals. Therefore, target total cash is not guaranteed earnings. In addition to base salary and bonus, this role is eligible for additional compensation in the form of equity.",3.5,"Kraft Heinz Company
3.5",Illinois,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"Job Description
Location:
Honolulu,HI,US
Remote Work:
No
Job Number:
R0179639

Data Scientist
The Opportunity:



Salary at Booz Allen is determined by various factors, including but not limited to location, the individual’s particular combination of education, knowledge, skills, competencies, and experience, as well as contract-specific affordability and organizational requirements. The projected compensation range for this position is $73,000.00 to $166,000.00 (annualized USD). The estimate displayed represents the typical salary range for this position and is just one component of Booz Allen’s total compensation package for employees.",4.2,"Booz Allen Hamilton
4.2","Honolulu, HI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"About the company
Albertsons Companies is at the forefront of the revolution in retail. With a fixation on raising the bar with innovation and building belonging through our culture, our team is rallying our company around a unique purpose: to create joy around each table and inspire a healthier tomorrow for every community.
Albertsons Companies is one of the largest food and drug retailers in the United States, with over 2,200 stores in 34 states and the District of Columbia. Our well-known banners include Albertsons, Safeway, Vons, Jewel-Osco, Shaw's, Acme, Tom Thumb, Randalls, United Supermarkets, Pavilions, Star Market, Haggen, Carrs, Kings Food Markets, and Balducci's Food Lovers Market. We support our stores with 22 distribution centers and 19 manufacturing plants.",3.5,"Albertsons Companies
3.5","Pleasanton, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Machine Learning",$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"Aptos is a people-first blockchain on a mission to help billions of people achieve universal and fair access to decentralized assets in a safe and scalable way.
Founded by some of the original creators and maintainers that researched, designed, and built the Diem blockchain to serve this purpose, we have dedicated several years toward this mission. We believe the open-source Diem technology we have developed is an important foundation of a safe and scalable web3 world where everyone has more equitable opportunities to grow and access financial assets with lower fees and fewer intermediaries.
Aptos (Ohlone for ""The People"") encompasses our mission and ethos for why we build.
About The Role",4.0,"Aptos
4.0","Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"As the Senior Data Scientist , you will help shape the architecture, data engineering, and insights for a new company, the WK Kellogg Company .This role will help us define and execute our data strategy and standards for WK Kellogg Company by building and maintaining data integrations from and to source systems and building data processing solutions that enable self-service reporting and advanced analytics. Location preference is Chicago, IL Metropolitan Area or Battle Creek, MI.

Kellogg is progressing toward unleashing our full potential by the end of 2023. After this portfolio transformation journey is complete, , a leading food company in the U.S., Canada, and Caribbean with a portfolio of iconic, world-class brands. Learn more about our bold next steps at UnleashingOurPotential.com.",3.9,"Kellogg Company
3.9","Battle Creek, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"At U.S. Bank, we’re on a journey to do our best. Helping the customers and businesses we serve to make better and smarter financial decisions and enabling the communities we support to grow and succeed. We believe it takes all of us to bring our shared ambition to life, and each person is unique in their potential. A career with U.S. Bank gives you a wide, ever-growing range of opportunities to discover what makes you thrive at every stage of your career. Try new things, learn new skills and discover what you excel at—all from Day One.
Job Description
Responsible for big data/analytics projects that gather and integrate large volumes of data. Specializes in developing and programming methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyze unstructured, diverse big data sources to generate insights and solutions for client services and product enhancement. Acquires data from multiple data sources to perform analysis. Implements and validates predictive models as well as create and maintain statistical models with a focus on big data. Identifies, analyzes and interprets trends or patterns in complex data to provide answers to business questions as well as provide recommendations for action. Interprets data and analyzes results using various advanced statistical techniques and tools. Presents data and analysis in a clear and concise manner allowing the audience to quickly understand the results and recommendations and make data driven decisions. Collaborates with various partners to prioritize requests/needs and provide a holistic view of the analysis. Measures and monitors results of applied recommendations and present adjustments. Ensures all data acquisition, sharing and results of applied recommendations are compliant with company standards.




The salary range reflects figures based on the primary location, which is listed first. The actual range for the role may differ based on the location of the role. In addition to salary, US Bank offers a comprehensive benefits package, including incentive and recognition programs, equity stock purchase 401k contribution and pension (all benefits are subject to eligibility requirements). Pay Range: $99,365.00 - $116,900.00 - $128,590.00",3.7,"U.S. Bank National Association
3.7","Minneapolis, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Junior Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"You will collaborate with the brightest technical minds in building futuristic products, researching groundbreaking concepts, and influencing new ideas to transform retail. If you want to make meaningful contributions and reinvent the retail space that will impact millions of guests, Target is for you.
About This Opportunity: Responsible for the development of high performance, distributed computing tasks using Big Data technologies such as Hadoop, NoSQL, text mining and other distributed environment technologies based on the needs of the organization. Designs and drives the creation of new standards and best practices in the use of statistical data modeling, big data and optimization tools. Deploy data-science and technology based algorithmic solutions to address business needs for our customers Utilize recommender systems, collaborative filtering techniques, propensity modeling to drive our customer's business priorities
Qualifications: Msc - Statistics / Math or PhD in any stream
Experience : 0 to 2 years

Experience / Strong Knowledge of Regression/Linear Analysis
Familiarity with any of Deep Learning, Distributed RF, Generalized Linear Model,K-Mean and naive Bayes
Familiarity with designing algorithms on Hadoop ecosystem
Experience / Strong Knowledge with recommendation systems
A strong passion for empirical research and for answering hard questions with data
Excellent written and verbal communication skills",-1,ANALYTOS,"Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist - Analytics,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"About AppLovin
AppLovin makes technologies that help businesses of every size connect to their ideal customers. The company provides end-to-end software and AI solutions for businesses to reach, monetize and grow their global audiences. For more information about AppLovin, visit: www.applovin.com.
To deliver on this mission, our global team is composed of team members with life experiences, backgrounds, and perspectives that mirror our developers and customers around the world. At AppLovin, we are intentional about the team and culture we are building, seeking candidates who are outstanding in their own right and also demonstrate their support of others.
Fortune recognized AppLovin as one of the Best Workplaces in the Bay Area 2022, and is a Certified Great Place to Work in 2021, 2022 and 2023.",3.7,"AppLovin
3.7","Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"We are recruiting for a Data Scientist to join our team!

We are here for life’s journey.
Where is your life journey taking you?

Being the heartbeat of Denver means our heart reflects something bigger than ourselves, something that connects us all:

Humanity in action, Triumph in hardship, Transformation in health.
Department
Public Health Administration
Job Summary

Under minimal supervision, supports data needs of investigators in the assigned Department(s) for the purposes of research, quality improvement, grant and contract deliverables and publication. Coordinates and performs duties
related to data acquisition and analysis for multiple projects simultaneously. Responsible for querying and managing data using
Epic reporting tools, SQL Server, and SAS software suite or SPSS. Provides assistance in creating and refining research
methodologies and works closely with investigators to design analytical plans and perform statistical analysis. Prepares tables,
graphs and descriptive summaries of data for presentations, progress reports, grant applications and manuscripts.
Requires strong organizational skills to set priorities and ability to work with high degree of accuracy and attention to details
while responding to tight deadlines and multiple priorities and demands. Demonstrates skill in utilizing principles and practices
of effective and persuasive communication to elicit and/or present explanatory or interpretive information in an organized,
concise manner.






Days (United States of America)
Regular
$69,900.00 - $104,900.00 / yr",3.4,"Denver Health
3.4","Denver, CO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Analytics Engineer,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"Job Location
Cincinnati
Job Description
If data is in your blood, then we have the job to get your heart pumping!
From day 1, you'll be a key member of the engineering team driving end-to-end data and analytical solutions supporting the development, learning, and operational insights for our critical new engineering led initiatives in equipment, process, packaging, customization and supply chain.
As a Data Analysis Engineer, you will:





Full time
R000084077
Recent Grads/Entry Level (Job Segmentation)
$85,000.00 - $115,000.00 / year",4.1,"Procter & Gamble
4.1","Cincinnati, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Analytics Scientist,$72.49 - $96.06 Per Hour (Employer est.),"We are the movers of the world and the makers of the future. We get up every day, roll up our sleeves and build a better world - together. At Ford, we’re all a part of something bigger than ourselves. What will you make today?
The Ford Motor Credit Company team helps put people behind the wheels of great Ford and Lincoln vehicles. By partnering with dealerships, we provide financing, personalized service and professional expertise to five thousand dealers and more than four million customers in over one hundred countries around the world.
The Dealer Analytics team in Credit Analytics is looking for a hardworking and motivated Data Scientist to work on dealer initiatives within Ford Motor Company's Global Data, Insight, and Analytics (GDI&A) organization. In this role, you will be responsible for designing and developing statistical and AI/ML models to solve complex business problems and drive business value to support Ford Motor Credit Company’s Global Dealer & Commercial Risk activities, and report results in appropriate forums.",4.0,"Ford Motor Company
4.0","Dearborn, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Generative AI,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"** Locations include Spring, Texas (preferred location), and US remote.
** Typically need at least Master's degree and minimum 5-8 years full-time relevant work experience.
The Team
We are a growing centralized team helping HP take advantage of new AI/ML technology, especially around Generative AI and large language models. We engage with business units to advise and prototype solutions, and we develop and run software applications for internal use.
The Role
As a Data Scientist with a focus on Generative AI you will work on multiple engagements across HP involving large language models and other new Generative AI capabilities. Beyond our team, you will work with business stakeholders and developers from other business units. Your primary focus and mindset is to help deliver business solutions to our customers. This is not an AI research role.",4.2,"HP
4.2","Spring, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
E-commerce Data Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are looking for Data Scientists to join our Global e-commerce Data Science team. The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.


Qualifications
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at USRC@tiktok.com

#LI-Hybrid
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $153000 - $332000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



At ByteDance/TikTok our benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support ByteDancers to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off(PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.",3.5,"TikTok
3.5","San Jose, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Decision Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"At PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL), we believe that every person has the right to participate fully in the global economy. Our mission is to democratize financial services to ensure that everyone, regardless of background or economic standing, has access to affordable, convenient, and secure products and services to take control of their financial lives.
Job Description Summary: The Global Collections Strategy team is seeking a Decision Scientist with prior Collections and Digital Channels experience to join our organization. The ideal candidate will possess a highly developed technical skillset (SQL, Python, etc), as well as the business acumen to distill analytical results into actionable outcomes. Frequent collaboration with cross-border stakeholder teams is required as part of this role.
Job Description:
PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $84500 to $204600",4.0,"PayPal
4.0",Wyoming,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist (Omics data analysis (genetics, genomics and proteomics))",$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Description:
Responsibilities:
Project involves developing multi-omics directed graph networks based on causal inference framework based on multiple data types (e.g., clinical, RNA-seq, epigenetic, proteomic, and/or genetic data).
Skills:
Must be expert in at least one area of causal inference such as interpretable machine learning or data fusion problem, e.g., to reduce space of plausible causal relationships and how data from multiple sources can be combined to make causal inferences.
Experience with machine learning in the context of causal inference, so that the predictive models are more than just a black box, is strongly desired.",3.7,"Tellus Solutions
3.7",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Data Scientist (hybrid)

ABOUT US
Based in Chesapeake, VA, Dollar Tree, Inc. operates more than 16,000 stores across the 48 contiguous states and five Canadian provinces, supported by a coast-to-coast logistics network and more than 210,000 associates. With two iconic brands, Dollar Tree and Family Dollar, and a history of opening hundreds of stores each year, the company has grown its store formats to serve customers in all types of geographic markets. Come help us grow!

THE OPPORTUNITY
This role, which is part of the Real Estate Market Strategy team, is for an experienced data scientist who desires end to end ownership and accountability in developing analytics-based solutions that will create new avenues for profitable, efficient real estate decision making. The position will serve as a key player in growing our Dollar Tree and Family Dollar store base and analyzing our existing fleet of 16,000+ stores in North America by leading the analyses in support of Dollar Tree’s store growth and renovation objectives and developing and executing the strategic initiatives to support them. The Data Scientist will offer a modern and thoughtful approach to data analysis and bring strength in developing and operationalizing a data science/data analytics roadmap of compelling initiatives that accelerate the company’s growth agenda, advance Dollar Tree’s business objectives, and contribute to EBITDA and operating income improvements.",3.0,"Dollar Tree
3.0","Chesapeake, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
College Graduate - Physics (BS/MS),$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Description

Intel is a company of bold and curious inventors and problem solvers who create some of the most astounding technology advancements and experiences in the world.

With a legacy of relentless innovation and a commitment to bring smart, connected devices to every person on Earth, our diverse and brilliant teams are continually searching for tomorrow's technology and revel in the challenge that changing the world for the better brings. We work every single day to design and manufacture silicon products that empower peoples digital lives.

Do you love to solve technical challenges that no one has solved yet? Do you enjoy working with cross functional teams to deliver IP solutions for products that impact customers lives? If so, Come join us to do something wonderful.

We are looking for world class physics engineers to help us build the future of technology















Intel's Human Resources group is responsible for hiring, developing and retaining the best and brightest employees while continuing to strengthen the company's culture and values. Intel Human Resources provides first-rate, cost-effective services and support to employees worldwide and is dedicated to advancing Intel's business goals.

US, NM, Albuquerque; US, OR, Hillsboro; US, TX, Austin; US, CA, Folsom; US, CA, Santa Clara; US, GA, Atlanta

Intel strongly encourages employees to be vaccinated against COVID-19. Intel aligns to federal, state, and local laws and as a contractor to the U.S. Government is subject to government mandates that may be issued. Intel policies for COVID-19 including guidance about testing and vaccination are subject to change over time.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, religious creed, sex, national origin, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, military and veteran status, marital status, pregnancy, gender, gender expression, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by local law, regulation, or ordinance.

We offer a total compensation package that ranks among the best in the industry. It consists of competitive pay, stock, bonuses, as well as, benefit programs which include health, retirement, and vacation. Find more information about all of our Amazing Benefits here: https://www.intel.com/content/www/us/en/jobs/benefits.html

Annual Salary Range for jobs which could be performed in US, California: $81,800.00-$122,700.00


This role will be eligible for our hybrid work model which allows employees to split their time between working on-site at their assigned Intel site and off-site.",4.1,"INTEL
4.1","Folsom, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Co-Op,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Data Scientist Co-Op




Your Tasks and Responsibilities

Independently develop algorithms in R and/or Python to clean, process, analyze and visualize large multivariate datasets (genotypic, environmental, and phenotypic);",3.9,"Bayer
3.9","Creve Coeur, MO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Data science at the National Security Agency (NSA) is a multi-disciplinary field that uses elements of mathematics, statistics, computer science, and application-specific knowledge to gather, make, and communicate principled conclusions from data. It encompasses AI Engineering, Data Engineering, ML Ops Engineering, and Human Perception and Cognition Engineering in addition to the traditional applications of data science. Data science is present in every aspect of the mission. NSA Data Scientists tackle challenging real-world problems leveraging big data, high-performance computing, machine learning, and a breadth of other methodologies. We are looking for critical thinkers, problem solvers, and motivated individuals who are enthusiastic about data and believe that answers to hard questions lie in the yet-to-be-told story of diverse, complicated data sets. You will employ your mathematical science, computer science, and quantitative analysis skills to develop solutions to complex data problems and take full advantage of NSA's capabilities to tackle the highest priority foreign intelligence and cybersecurity challenges. As a Data Scientist, your responsibilities may include: - Exploratory data analysis and exploratory model-fitting to reveal data features of interest - Machine-learned predictive modeling - Construct usable data sets from multiple sources to meet customer needs - Identifying and analyzing anomalous data (including metadata) - Developing conceptual design and models to address mission requirements - Developing qualitative and quantitative methods for characterizing datasets in various states. - Performing analytic modeling, scripting, and/or programming - Working collaboratively and iteratively throughout the data-science lifecycle - Designing and developing analytics and techniques for analysis - Analyzing data using mathematical and statistical methods - Evaluating, documenting, and communicating research processes, analyses, and results to customers, peers, and leadership - Creating interpretable visualizations.",3.7,"National Security Agency
3.7","Fort Meade, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist / Analyst,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"About Study.com
Our mission is to open the door to the life-changing impact of education and help make education accessible for all. As a nimble growth stage start-up, we've emerged as the leading online education platform helping over 30 million learners and educators each month. Study.com has earned numerous awards and it has been recognized as one of the most transformational companies in EdTech, living up to our commitment to all learners: Breakthroughs Start Here. From students and educators in over 9,000 school districts that use Study.com, to working adults striving to complete their college degree or gain professional certifications, we empower them to reach their full potential. Our product is our impact! Across our college programs alone we have saved students over $200M in tuition and enabled tens of thousands to become nurses, teachers, accountants and more. Additionally, as part of our mission we’ve donated over $27 million across social impact programs to learners and educators.",3.1,"Study.com
3.1","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Anika Systems is looking for a passionate and talented Data Scientist to join our expanding Federal team. We are a fast-growing woman-owned small business providing innovative IT solutions for federal government agencies. This opportunity will be 100% remote.
Responsibilities:

Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data, including latent semantic indexing (LSI), entity identification and tagging, complex event processing (CEP), and the application of analysis algorithms on distributed, clustered, and cloud-based high-performance infrastructures.

Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases visualized through multi-dimensional interfaces. Handle processing and index requests against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams.",4.5,"Anika Systems
4.5",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Associate Data Scientist - Marketing Analytics,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Center 1 (19052), United States of America, McLean, Virginia
Senior Associate Data Scientist - Marketing Analytics
Data is at the center of everything we do. As a startup, we disrupted the credit card industry by individually personalizing every credit card offer using statistical modeling and the relational database, cutting edge technology in 1988! Fast-forward a few years, and this little innovation and our passion for data has skyrocketed us to a Fortune 200 company and a leader in the world of data-driven decision-making.
As a Data Scientist at Capital One, you’ll be part of a team that’s leading the next wave of disruption at a whole new scale, using the latest in computing and machine learning technologies and operating across billions of customer records to unlock the big opportunities that help everyday people save money, time and agony in their financial lives.

No agencies please. Capital One is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to diversity and inclusion in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, color, age, national origin, religion, physical and mental disability, genetic information, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity/assignment, citizenship, pregnancy or maternity, protected veteran status, or any other status prohibited by applicable national, federal, state or local law. Capital One promotes a drug-free workplace. Capital One will consider for employment qualified applicants with a criminal history in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable laws regarding criminal background inquiries, including, to the extent applicable, Article 23-A of the New York Correction Law; San Francisco, California Police Code Article 49, Sections 4901-4920; New York City’s Fair Chance Act; Philadelphia’s Fair Criminal Records Screening Act; and other applicable federal, state, and local laws and regulations regarding criminal background inquiries.",4.1,"Capital One
4.1","McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"The Associated Press is an independent global news organization dedicated to factual reporting. Founded in 1846, AP today remains the most trusted source of fast, accurate, unbiased news in all formats and the essential provider of the technology and services vital to the news business. More than half the world's population sees AP journalism every day.

The Associated Press’ Metadata and Data Science Team seeks a Data Scientist based in New York, NY.

The Data Scientist will perform data analysis, evaluate commercial and open-source models, and help design data science and data engineering solutions supporting AI initiatives, news search and discovery, content enrichment and metadata generation.

The team works closely with various departments and functions across the organization to design, implement and manage end-to-end metadata, to maintain the integrity of schema standards, and to build solutions with data, analytics, and machine learning methods.

If you were working with us, here are some tasks you may have undertaken in the past month:

Partner with the search team to define, fine-tune and test NLP and machine learning capabilities to improve the customer search experience

Set up and execute annotation tasks to build quality data training sets; use your knowledge of current best practices and available datasets to research and find best matching data to supplement training tasks

Fine-tune existing statistical and machine learning models used in production; measure performance improvements and present findings to stakeholders

Combine, clean and pre-process Google Analytics and other data from various sources to ensure accuracy and usability for analysis or modeling

Analyze news metadata to find and propose fixes to support content search and discovery

Help stakeholders understand and evaluate opportunities to use GenAI in their platforms

Develop a prototype for matching and identifying component assets within video clips, using tools like AWS Step Functions and SageMaker


approaches problems with curiosity and an eagerness to find creative solutions and make recommendations with an eye to costs and benefits

is happy digging deep into messy data problems, which may include data wrangling and coordinating across the organization, to propose a range of solutions and implement the best candidate

proactively explores emerging technologies and is conversant with the latest analytics, data science, NLP and machine learning techniques

is comfortable working with data models and data science platforms and processes with a focus on quality and performance

is eager to learn about the relevant technical details of a large-scale media operation, has patience for imperfect systems and workflows, and can self-organize in order to effectively take on several projects simultaneously

can understand who their audience is and can clearly communicate analysis and present POC demos at audience level

has an analytical mindset and strong problem-solving skills with the ability to think critically about data-related challenges.

helps grow the culture of data-driven decision making and supports colleagues as they develop data literacy skills


At least 3-5 years of relevant experience

Hands-on experience using data analysis and data science tools and methods, such as NLP techniques, LLMs, ETL, AWS SageMaker, AWS Rekognition, Google Vertex AI, Vision, AutoML, PowerBI, Pandas, NumPy

Familiarity with analytics and data science best practices; adept at predictive modeling

Familiarity with AWS services, including Step Functions, Athena, Lightsail, S3, EC2, Lambdas

Confidence implementing and demonstrating PoCs

Adept at Python and able to collaborate with colleagues working in R

Comfort working with standard data formats and schema (xml, json, etc); understanding of data transformation methods

Familiarity with standard query languages and transform protocols such as xslt, SPARQL, xquery

Advanced-level professional competency in written and spoken English language is required. Authorization to work in the United States for any employer is mandatory.
The Metadata Team is based in New York City on a hybrid basis and strongly prefers local candidates, but we encourage all qualified candidates to apply.

The anticipated salary range for this position is $105,000 - $120,000 contingent on experience and other job-related factors. Employees are eligible to participate, according to the terms of the official plan documents, in a 401(k) plan, employer-sponsored health insurance plan, and are eligible for paid time off and holidays in accordance with AP policy.

Application deadline is 11:59pm EST on September 26, 2023

AP seeks to build an inclusive organization grounded in respect for differences. We support all aspects of diversity and provide equal employment opportunity to all employees and applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, marital status, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or status as a veteran. We encourage members of traditionally underrepresented communities to apply.",4.0,"The Associated Press
4.0","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Responsibilities:
Collaborate with stake holders, DevSecOps and data engineering teams to execute on the analytics roadmap.
Analyze and explore Big Data from several systems and data sources including databases, data lakes, cloud blob stores, etc. to identify patterns and trends.
Leverage Python or PySpark to analyze, clean, transform and prepare structured, unstructured and semi-structured data for machine learning models.
Leverage Python for feature engineering, dimensionality reduction, data preparation, etc.
Implement machine learning algorithms for object detection, photo manipulation and text extraction using computer vision leveraging OpenCV library as well as deep learning frameworks like TensorFlow and PyTorch.",4.3,"Planned Systems International
4.3",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist - Tiktok Ads, Growth Marketing",$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

The mission of TikTok Ads Platform is to connect global advertisers and users, advertisers of any industry and experience level are able to get suitable marketing solutions, then easily create, manage and optimize ads. The vision is to build an easy-to-understand, easy-to-use and powerful Ads Platform.

The Ad Growth team is responsible for driving advertising growth on TikTok platform. We achieve it by acquiring and retaining advertisers through brand marketing, performance marketing, organic growth initiatives and customer management. We build products that allow us to reach more audiences, improve targeting, optimize bidding, better measure incrementally.


We are looking for experienced Data Scientists to influence the product roadmaps for the Ad Growth team.
Qualifications
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.
TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations during our recruitment process. If you need assistance or an accommodation, please reach out to us at USRC@tiktok.com.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $153000 - $296000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



At ByteDance/TikTok our benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support ByteDancers to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off(PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.",3.5,"TikTok
3.5","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Machine Learning/Model Development,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Nift is disrupting performance marketing, delivering millions of new customers to brands every month. We are actively looking for a Data Scientist, who will focus on Model development. Over the last year, eCommerce brands have shifted significant portions of their marketing budgets to Nift. Our investors are those who invested in Fitbit, Warby Parker, Wayfair, and Twitter.
The role:
As a Data Scientist reporting to our head of Data Science, you will play a crucial role in developing models for complex parts of our business. You will analyze large datasets, identify patterns, and develop a variety of model types. You'll also contribute to the improvement and re-design of our current models. You will collaborate closely with cross-functional teams to translate insights into actionable solutions. This is a hands-on position where you will apply your expertise in statistical modeling, machine learning, and data mining techniques.",4.2,"Nift
4.2","Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Junior Data Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Company Description

Read this first: If you have what it takes for this job, but don't meet all the criteria within the job description, we encourage you to apply. We'd like to connect with you to see what skills and experience you could bring to our team.
Publicis Media is one of Publicis Groupe’s four solution hubs, aligning all of Publicis Groupe’s media agencies and operations. Publicis Groupe (Euronext Paris Exchange: FR0000130577; CAC 40 index), is the world’s third largest communications group. The Data, Technology and Innovation Global Practice was created to deliver best-in-class programmatic solutions as well as to consolidate Publicis Media’s data and technology to transform our business from a service business to a platform business.",3.9,"Publicis Media
3.9","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Risk Analytics,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Why We Work at Dun & Bradstreet
Dun & Bradstreet unlocks the power of data through analytics, creating a better tomorrow. Each day, we are finding new ways to strengthen our award-winning culture and accelerate creativity, innovation and growth. Our 6,000+ global team members are passionate about what we do. We are dedicated to helping clients turn uncertainty into confidence, risk into opportunity and potential into prosperity. Bold and diverse thinkers are always welcome. Come join us!

Role: Data Scientist, Risk Analytics

The Data Scientist, Risk Analytics will create innovative approaches to statistical data modeling and analytics by using Natural Language Processing on unstructured/alternative data sources to enhance the business failure risk as well as business fraudulent risk.",3.8,"Dun & Bradstreet
3.8",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist I,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Develop decision support systems, manage their implementation, and provide support and maintenance. Define system scope, objectives and requirements based on standards and guidance from architects and senior team members. Collaborate with other IT partners within the company. Interact with internal customers to identify business requirements and develop the best course of actions to meet their needs.
Activities and Responsibilities
Use data science and analytics techniques to develop and maintain models that provide business with actionable insights to enable service excellence, drive efficiencies, profitable growth and improve cash flows.
Collaborate with team members, departmental managers, information engineers and software developers to gather requirements and work towards delivering complete analytics/reporting solutions that help improve organizational decision making.",2.9,"CSX
2.9","Jacksonville, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"The Microsoft Teams Data Science team's charter is to foster a data-driven culture to encourage and enable the entire organization to make more informed decisions through data. Our data and analytics team works closely with engineering, marketing, finance, and business leaders to identify opportunities for improving the customer experience and accelerate our business's growth in support of this mission. This is a unique opportunity to bring your knowledge of enterprise software offerings, as well as your understanding of data science methods and best practices, to help Microsoft deliver the best experience possible for our customers and partners. We are looking for a Principal Data Scientist. The person in this role will have the opportunity to influence the next generation of Microsoft Teams Meeting and Calling experiences.


We are a modern product and services organization, one of the largest business & consumer services on the planet, with over 300 million monthly active users. Data scientists on this team will be part of the broader data science team, and specific product teams focused on tangible and immediate business impact.








Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.3,"Microsoft
4.3","Redmond, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist / AI Specialist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Macmillan Learning is seeking a Data Scientist / AI Specialist. The Data Scientist focused on AI drives innovation and insights through the development of fit-for-purpose algorithms, conducting insightful analytics, identifying data architecture and modeling, collaborating with cross-functional teams, and conducting research to identify new AI applications and techniques. This Data Scientist utilizes expertise in statistics, machine learning, data visualization, and programming languages such as Python or R to analyze and interpret complex data sets and provide data-driven insights to support business decisions and improve product offerings. The Data Scientist applies excellent communication and collaboration skills to work closely with stakeholders from different teams and departments to integrate AI systems into products or services, identify requirements, and provide technical consultation on data science-related issues.

Required",3.9,"Macmillan Learning
3.9","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Staff Data Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"SentiLink provides innovative identity and risk solutions, empowering institutions and individuals to transact confidently with one another.
By building the future of identity verification in the United States and reinventing the currently clunky, ineffective, and expensive process, we believe strongly that the future will be 10x better.
We’ve had tremendous traction and are growing extremely quickly. Already our real-time APIs have helped verify hundreds of millions of identities, beginning with financial services. In 2021, we raised a $70M Series B round, led by Craft Ventures to rapidly scale our best in class products. We’ve earned coverage and awards from TechCrunch, CNBC, Bloomberg, Forbes, Business Insider, PYMNTS, American Banker, LendIt, and have recently landed on the Forbes Fintech 50, 2023. Last but not least, we’ve even been a part of history-we were the first company to go live with the eCBSV and testified before the United States House of Representatives.",5.0,"SentiLink
5.0",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Company Description

McDonald’s is proud to be one of the most recognized brands in the world, with restaurants in over 100 countries that serve 70 million customers daily. As the global leader in the food service industry, our legacy of innovation and hard work continues to drive us.
From drive thru updates to delivery to mobile order and pay, we are innovating quickly and growing. Joining McDonald's means thinking big and preparing for a career that can have influence around the world.
At McDonald’s, we see every day as a chance to create positive impact. We lead through our values centered on inclusivity, service, integrity, community and family. From support of Ronald McDonald House Charities to our Youth Opportunity project and sustainability initiatives, our values keep us dedicated to using our scale for good: good for our customers, people, industry and planet. We also offer outstanding benefits including a sabbatical program, tuition assistance and flexible work arrangements.",3.5,"McDonald's Corporation
3.5","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Overview
Working at Covenant Eyes is about something bigger than creating and selling software; it’s about creating a movement and changing culture. At the end of the day, you are contributing to saving a marriage, protecting a child’s innocence, strengthening a commitment to purity, and working to end sexual exploitation.
Covenant Eyes is a 100% Employee Owned company and constantly growing. We've made Inc.com's Fortune 5000 Fastest Growing Companiesfor 10 years running & 11 out of the last 12. This growth presents a number of opportunities for working in various technologies as well as career advancement. We offer highly competitive compensation and benefits packagesthat start day-one of employment.
Health, Vision, and Dental Insurance options",4.3,"Covenant Eyes
4.3",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Sr. Data Scientist
WEX is an innovative payments and technology company leading the way in a rapidly changing environment. Our goal is to simplify the business of running a business for our customers and free them to spend more time, with less worry, on the things they love. We are on a journey to build a unified, world class user experience across our products and services and leverage customer driven innovation to power our growth and strategic initiatives.
This is a really exciting time to be working in Data & Analytics at WEX. We are driving towards our True North vision of providing the right data, in the right place, at the right time so that we can enable and accelerate the journey to being a data-driven organization. There is strong executive support for all things data and it is viewed as a critical component for our enterprise transformation activities. What we need now is someone with a passion for solving problems and driving actionable outcomes with data. You will do this through performing and developing the following competencies: Insights Driven, Stakeholder Aligned, Results Focused, Dynamic Collaboration, Quality Mindset.
The base pay range represents the anticipated low and high end of the pay range for this position. Actual pay rates will vary and will be based on various factors, such as your qualifications, skills, competencies, and proficiency for the role. Base pay is one component of WEX's total compensation package. Most sales positions are eligible for commission under the terms of an applicable plan. Non-sales roles are typically eligible for a quarterly or annual bonus based on their role and applicable plan. WEX's comprehensive and market competitive benefits are designed to support your personal and professional well-being. Benefits include health, dental and vision insurances, retirement savings plan, paid time off, health savings account, flexible spending accounts, life insurance, disability insurance, tuition reimbursement, and more. For more information, check out the ""About Us"" section.
Salary Pay Range: $123,000.00 - $164,000.00",3.8,"WEX Inc.
3.8",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Sr Data Scientist
Location: Santa Clara, CA
· Hands-on experience in Building, training, and deploying ML models
· 10+ years of experience with 7+ in Machine Learning
· Expertise in programming using Python
· Excellent communication skills
· Entrepreneurial attitude and spirit - should be able to think and build business use cases by analyzing data",-1,I20 Technologies,"Santa Clara, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"About BHI:
BHI is a data and analytics company and helping health plans, researchers, healthcare providers, employers, and government agencies use data to improve the health outcomes, promote value-based care, and address health equity and increase the value of care provided. We leverage the industry’s most comprehensive and highest quality commercial data assets combined with advanced analytics, AI/ML, and deep healthcare expertise to collaborate with our customers to produce measurable outcomes and value.
Based on our continuing growth, and the increasing value our team is producing in partnership with our customers, we are growing our data engineering team and are looking for someone to lead this effort with us.",3.9,"Health Intelligence company LLC
3.9",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr Data Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"IT is different here. Our work as technology specialists pushes the boundaries of what’s possible in health care. You will build solutions that make a real difference in people’s lives. Driven by the importance of their work, our team members innovate to elevate. We’re encouraged to be curious, collaborate, and turn ideas into solutions that can make health care better for all.

In this role you will identify, implement, and deliver accurate and quality analyses that translate data in sound organizational decisions. You will be critical in building out our NLP capabilities.

If you are ready to make a career out of making a difference, then you are the person for this team.

What You Will Do

Own delivery of large and/or complex data science and engineering projects

Lead in the development and testing of hypotheses across all functional data sets

Lead requirements gathering sessions with business and technical staff to distill technical requirement from business requests

Define and implement integrated data models, allowing integration of data from multiple sources

Design and develop scalable, efficient data pipeline processes to handle data ingestion, cleansing, transformation, integration, and validation

Define and implement data stores based on system requirements and consumer requirements

Design and develop models to understand and solve complex business solutions using a variety of methods including data mining, statistical analysis, predictive modeling and analysis, stochastic modeling, pattern recognition, probability analysis, and network analysis

Design and implement production models leveraging technologies such as Python, and R

Leverage existing data sets and engineer new data sets including development of SQL queries, data integration and resolution of data quality issues

Apply advanced conceptual understanding of Big Data systems to data set engineering and analytic model implementation

Lead reviews of analytic models and algorithms

Identify actionable insights, suggest recommendations, and influence business direction by effectively communicating results to cross functional groups

Document and test analytic processes including performance and thorough data validation and verification

What You Bring

Master's Degree in Data Science, Applied Mathematics, Computer science, Statistics, Biostatistics, Epidemiology, Health Services Research, or a field closely related to Data Science specialization, or equivalent combination of transferrable experience and education

5 years of the following with increasing scope of project responsibilities:

SQL programming (Advance SQL programming)

Demonstrated experience with design and implementation of analytic models and methodologies for new applications

Proficiency in Python

Advanced experience working with large and complex data sets to develop regression and classification models.

Deep knowledge of state-of-the art techniques in machine learning, statistics, optimization or related fields Demonstrated experience in successfully delivering data science projects.

Great to Have

Experience with Python analytics packages such as scikit-learn, NumPy, Pandas etc.

Experience leveraging NLP

Experience preparing data for analysis

Exposure to clinical, healthcare, or insurance data

Experience with Hadoop, Hive, and/or other Big Data technologies

Experience working in AWS and/or using Linux based systems

Expert at the execution of implementing models and methodologies on big data

Demonstrated experience performing data validation on prepared data sets

Familiarity with deep-learning modeling techniques and their application

Experience in software engineering practices and software development methodologies

Ability to communicate clearly and effectively both orally and in writing

Ability to work independently

Reliable task estimation skills

Excellent quantitative, problem solving and analytic skills

Ability to document data discovery findings, feature selection process, model determination process, and interpretation of insights

Ability to collaborate effectively with business stakeholders, performance consultants, data scientists, and other data engineers

Proficient in use of MS Office applications, including expert level Excel programming

Ability to quickly become expert in operational processes and data of lines of business

Ability to troubleshoot and document findings and recommendations

Comfortable briefing internal stakeholders on findings

Proactively communicate risks and problems to leadership

Ability to keep up with a rapidly evolving technology space",4.2,"Blue Cross and Blue Shield of North Carolina
4.2","Durham, NC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Mid-Level,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Why USAA?
Let’s do something that really matters.

At USAA, we have an important mission: facilitating the financial security of millions of U.S. military members and their families. Not all of our employees served in our nation’s military, but we all share in the mission to give back to those who did. We’re working as one to build a great experience and make a real impact for our members.

We believe in our core values of honesty, integrity, loyalty and service. They’re what guides everything we do – from how we treat our members to how we treat each other. Come be a part of what makes us so special!",3.4,"USAA
3.4","Charlotte, NC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Career Area:
Information Analytics
Job Description:
Multiple openings.
Caterpillar Inc. seeks Sr. Data Scientists at its facility located at 540 W Madison Street, Chicago IL 60661.
JOB DESCRIPTION.
Will participate on cross-functional project teams, provide overall guidance to the technical direction of the project, and mentor Jr Information Scientists on the technical approaches being used in order to solve a problem presented by a Caterpillar Business Unit or Service Organization, a Caterpillar Dealer, or a Caterpillar Customer. Will apply statistical methods and/or digital methods to solve business problem. Will participate on 3-4 projects concurrently at any given time and in doing so will display strong initiative to research and apply new methods to exceed customer expectations. Will apply statistical and/or digital technology knowledge and the ability to solve low to medium complexity problems. Will demonstrate very good communication skills, being able to explain conclusions to customers with limited knowledge and experience with quantitative analytical methods. Will exhibit strong communications, a penchant for innovation, above average initiative, people development, and interpersonal skills.",4.0,"Caterpillar
4.0","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$84K - $127K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Location
Boston
Job Description
The Procter & Gamble Business Service Company is seeking a Data Scientist (Boston, MA) to develop new Natural Language Processing (NLP) capabilities and apply them to projects including voice of consumer (eCommerce Ratings & Reviews, Social Media, Consumer comments from primary research, etc.). Analyze verbatims for consumer complaints (call center data), innovation opportunity discovery (qualitative consumer research), and consumption evaluation for in-market products. Build advanced large-scale machine learning models to bring direct business impacts such as facilitating product developers and products researchers and market researchers to better understand consumers’ attitude towards products without needing to perform large scale consumer tests, researching competitors to gain insight into their products and predicting emerging trends and topics using social media data. Communicate state-of-the-art NLP techniques with other Data Scientists and business leaders. Utilize strong Python and cloud computing skills along with tools such as PyTorch or TensorFlow to derive consumer related business insights. Local telecommuting permitted up to 3 days per week.
Full time
R000089048
Experienced Professionals (Job Segmentation)
$125,000.00 - $145,000.00 / year",4.1,"Procter & Gamble
4.1","Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Decision Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"At PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL), we believe that every person has the right to participate fully in the global economy. Our mission is to democratize financial services to ensure that everyone, regardless of background or economic standing, has access to affordable, convenient, and secure products and services to take control of their financial lives.
Job Description Summary: The Global Collections Strategy team is seeking a Decision Scientist with prior Collections and Digital Channels experience to join our organization. The ideal candidate will possess a highly developed technical skillset (SQL, Python, etc), as well as the business acumen to distill analytical results into actionable outcomes. Frequent collaboration with cross-border stakeholder teams is required as part of this role.
Job Description:
PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $84500 to $204600",4.0,"PayPal
4.0",Alabama,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Technical Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Overview: Your future team We're looking for a Data leader with business instincts and analytics mastery that has led projects improving data science efficiency. You are someone that is passionate about applying these skills to increase data quality, reduce the need for data scientists to perform data engineering tasks and love working across the organization to create the proper data layer to increase data science productivity. You will be reporting to our Head of Experimentation. Responsibilities: At Atlassian, we strive to design equitable and explainable compensation programs. To support this goal, the baseline of our range is higher than that of the typical market range, but in turn we expect to hire most candidates near this baseline. Base pay within the range is ultimately determined by a candidate's skills, expertise, or experience. In the United States, we have three geographic pay zones. For this role, our current base pay ranges for new hires in each zone are: Zone A: $201,300 - $268,400 Zone B: $181,200 - $241,600 Zone C: $167,100 - $222,800 This role may also be eligible for benefits, bonuses, commissions, and equity. Please visit go.atlassian.com/payzones for more information on which locations are included in each of our geographic pay zones. However, please confirm the zone for your specific location with your recruiter. #LI-Remote Qualifications: What you'll do
Your background",4.3,"Atlassian
4.3","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Bamboo Health is a leader in cloud-based care coordination software and analytics solutions focused on patients with complex needs, including those suffering from physical health and mental health issues and substance use disorders. We are driven by our mission of enabling better care for patients across the continuum. Our software solutions help healthcare professionals collaborate on shared patients across the spectrum of care. Join us in improving healthcare for all!
Summary:
The Data Scientist will live and breathe data and be excited about building user-facing data products. They will work with the Product Development team, Health Data Science team, other internal stakeholders, and external stakeholders to develop data-driven solutions powered by our unique data pipeline. The Data Scientist will excel at creative problem solving, cross-team collaboration, and thinking independently about how to utilize data to address the challenges our customers face.",3.4,"Bamboo Health
3.4",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Technical Manager - Data Scientist (US-GDI),$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"An experienced consulting professional who has a broad understanding of solutions, industry best practices, multiple business processes or technology designs within a product/technology family. Operates independently to provide quality work products to an engagement. Performs varied and complex duties and tasks that need independent judgment, in order to implement Oracle products and technology to meet customer needs. Applies Oracle methodology, company procedures, and leading practices.

Operates independently to provide quality work products to an engagement. Performs varied and complex duties and tasks that need independent judgment, in order to implement Oracle products and technology to meet customer needs. Applies Oracle methodology, company procedures, and leading practices. Demonstrates expertise to deliver functional and technical solutions on moderately complex customer engagements. May lead the solution design and implementation aspects of engagement(s) ensuring high quality, integrated software solutions within constraints of time and budget. May act as the team lead on projects, providing coaching, guidance and feedback to develop skills of team members. Effectively consults with management of customer organizations. Participates in business development activities. Develops and leads detailed solutions for moderately complex projects.

6-8 years of experience relevant to this position including 3-4 years consulting experience preferred. Undergraduate degree or equivalent experience preferred. Product or technical expertise relevant to practice focus. Ability to communicate effectively. Ability to build rapport with team members and clients. Ability to travel as needed.",3.9,"Oracle
3.9","Reston, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Staff Data Scientist-Generative AI and NLP,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Company Description

At ServiceNow, our technology makes the world work for everyone, and our people make it possible. We move fast because the world can’t wait, and we innovate in ways no one else can for our customers and communities. By joining ServiceNow, you are part of an ambitious team of change makers who have a restless curiosity and a drive for ingenuity. We know that your best work happens when you live your best life and share your unique talents, so we do everything we can to make that possible. We dream big together, supporting each other to make our individual and collective dreams come true. The future is ours, and it starts with you.
With more than 7,700+ customers, we serve approximately 85% of the Fortune 500®, and we're proud to be one of FORTUNE 100 Best Companies to Work For® and World's Most Admired Companies™.






For positions in California (outside of the Bay Area), we offer a base pay of $143,370 - $250,830, plus equity (when applicable), variable/incentive compensation and benefits. Sales positions generally offer a competitive On Target Earnings (OTE) incentive compensation structure. Please note that the base pay shown is a guideline, and individual total compensation will vary based on factors such as qualifications, skill level, competencies and work location. We also offer health plans, including flexible spending accounts, a 401(k) Plan with company match, ESPP, matching donations, a flexible time away plan and family leave programs (subject to eligibility requirements). Compensation is based on the geographic location in which the role is located, and is subject to change based on work location. For individuals who will be working in the Bay Area, there is a pay enhancement for positions located in that geographical area; please contact your recruiter for additional information.",4.4,"ServiceNow
4.4","Santa Clara, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior People Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Working at Atlassian

Atlassians can choose where they work – whether in an office, from home, or a combination of the two. That way, Atlassians have more control over supporting their family, personal goals, and other priorities. We can hire people in any country where we have a legal entity. Interviews and onboarding are conducted virtually, a part of being a distributed-first company.

Atlassian is hiring a data scientist to join our newly formed People Insights team, a cross-disciplinary group of analysts, data scientists, behavioral scientists, researchers and business partners, who use data and research to inform strategic and operational issues facing our leaders, teams, and people. This role will be responsible for driving our approach to data-informed insights and analysis, leveraging research and creating repeatability of outputs to inform our leaders and teams.",4.3,"Atlassian
4.3","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Lead Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Remote
High performing team members. Challenging projects. A stable and profitable company. And a great place to work! This is what you can expect if you join the Quisitive team. Founded in 2016, Quisitive is a publicly traded, global Microsoft partner specializing in Microsoft platform and complementary technologies, custom solutions, and offerings that drive digital transformation and business value for enterprise customers. Our team of professionals has a long history of successfully delivering award-winning Microsoft solutions, and our culture of continual learning ensures that we remain committed to Microsoft’s long-term strategy. Quisitive was recently named the 2023 Microsoft US Health and Life Sciences AND Solution Assessments Partner of the Year.",3.5,"Quisitive
3.5",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Entry Level Data Science - December 2023 and May 2024 Grads,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Our business runs on Data, and having an accurate understanding of what's happening in all aspects of the business, from product quality, to New Product Introduction, to Human Resources.
No matter where you land as a Data Scientist within NXP, you will join a high-performing, global team, and assist with designing, developing, and deploying data driven analytic solutions supporting your assigned org to improve operations performance and product quality. Collaborating with stakeholders throughout the organization, you will design and develop predictive data models and algorithms in support of corporate goals. These solutions could include visual inspection and image classification, anomaly detection, predictive maintenance, NLP or other machine learning and AI applications.
Activities",4.2,"NXP Semiconductors
4.2","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, RegLab",$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist, RegLab
Job Code: 4745
Job Grade: I
The Regulation, Evaluation, and Governance Lab (RegLab) at Stanford University is looking for a Data Scientist to work across our research programs. This role will collaborate closely with teams of research fellows and students on projects related to machine learning and the public sector. We are looking for someone who is a self-learner, research-oriented, and excited by the mission of the Lab.
About us: Stanford RegLab is a social impact lab that partners with government and nonprofits to use machine learning and data science to modernize the public sector. We are an interdisciplinary team of lawyers, data scientists, social scientists, and engineers who are passionate about building high impact demonstration projects for the future of governance. Some of our partners include the EPA, IRS, DOL, and Santa Clara County Public Health.",4.2,"Stanford University
4.2","Stanford, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist II,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"JOB DESCRIPTION:
The Data Science job family exists across multiple departments and provides analytical expertise that leads to important insights for a portfolio of NORC projects and strategic initiatives; the Senior Data Scientist II plays a strategic role in working with our research teams to produce valuable insights for our clients. This position supports the development of the strategy and vision for large data analysis projects; may manage both the activities and the work product of data analysts and/or data scientists; provide input and guidance to task leaders especially regarding data acquisition, questionnaire content, data analysis, and overall data dissemination; design, develop, and deploy algorithms, models, and work flows to discover valuable information in large volumes of data from various sources; bring structure to large data sets; evaluate the data, construct models, create business applications, and work closely with organizational leaders to provide input into strategic business implications for the organization. The Senior Data Scientist II is expected to work collaboratively in a team environment.",3.8,"NORC at the University of Chicago
3.8","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Summary:
We are looking for a junior- to mid-level hands-on Data Scientist to work on large-scale data analytic capabilities and extract insights from structured and unstructured data. The primary focus will be in applying/developing data mining, machine learning and statistical techniques, conducting R&D on data science-integrated investment insights, and building high quality data-driven research and investment. This person will regularly engage in deep scientific research. Experience in text analytics and other unstructured data is plus; and previous experience of applying data science in equity research and the financial industry is also a plus.
Responsibilities:
Evaluate and analyze structured and unstructured data sets and R&D data-driven solutions and insights
Collaborate with research and investment teams to identify data science use cases and integrate new data sources into fundamental research and investment theses densification
The salary range for this role is $150,000-$200,000. This is the lowest to highest salary we in good faith believe we would pay for this role at the time of this posting. We may ultimately pay more or less than the posted range, and the range may be modified in the future. This range is only applicable for jobs to be performed in New York City. An employee’s pay position within the salary range will be based on several factors including, but limited to, relevant education, qualifications, certifications, experience, skills, seniority, geographic location, performance, shift, travel requirements, sales or revenue-based metrics, any collective bargaining agreements, and business or organizational needs. This job is also eligible for a discretionary bonus. We offer a comprehensive package of benefits including paid time off, medical/dental/vision insurance, 401(k), life insurance and other benefits to eligible employees.",4.3,"Neuberger Berman
4.3","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Analytica is seeking a remote Data Scientist to support one or more dynamic, long-term federal government data science programs. The company works as a trusted advisor to U.S. federal government clients in health, civilian, and national security missions. The ideal candidate will be comfortable as a key member of a multi-disciplinary team working in an Agile environment to produce advanced analytics solutions.

Analytica has been recognized by Inc. Magazine as one of the 250 fastest-growing US small businesses for three consecutive years. We work with U.S. government clients to build data-driven products and cultures that make an impact on our daily lives. Analytica offers competitive compensation with opportunities for bonuses, employer-paid health care, unlimited training funds, and a 401k match.",3.4,"Analytica
3.4",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"In a world of possibilities, pursue one with endless opportunities. Imagine Next!
When it comes to what you want in your career, if you can imagine it, you can do it at Parsons. Imagine a career working with intelligent, diverse people sharing a common quest. Imagine a workplace where you can be yourself. Where you can thrive. Where you can find your next, right now. We’ve got what you’re looking for.
Job Description:
Parsons is seeking an experienced Data Scientist / Analytics Engineer to provide embedded operations support, capability integration, and rapid prototyping in support of USCYBERCOM. In this role you will be responsible for collaborating with headquarters and local customers to develop analytic capabilities. You’ll be a critical member on a small team, responsible for bringing your high-level analytic and data science skills to bear on a critical national security mission.




Top Secret SCI w/Polygraph
This position is part of our Federal Solutions team.
Our Federal Solutions segment delivers resources to our US government customers that ensure the success of missions around the globe. Our diverse, intelligent employees drive the state of the art as they provide services and solutions in the areas of defense, security, intelligence, infrastructure, and environmental. We promote a culture of excellence and close-knit teams that take pride in delivering, protecting, and sustaining our nation's most critical assets, from Earth to cyberspace. Throughout the company, our people are anticipating what’s next to deliver the solutions our customers need now.
$113,100.00 - $203,600.00
We value our employees and want our employees to take care of their overall wellbeing, which is why we offer best-in-class benefits such as medical, dental, vision, paid time off, 401(k), life insurance, flexible work schedules, and holidays to fit your busy lifestyle!
Parsons is an equal opportunity employer committed to diversity, equity, inclusion, and accessibility in the workplace. Diversity is ingrained in who we are, how we do business, and is one of our company’s core values. Parsons equally employs representation at all job levels for minority, female, disabled, protected veteran and LGBTQ+.
We truly invest and care about our employee’s wellbeing and provide endless growth opportunities as the sky is the limit, so aim for the stars! Imagine next and join the Parsons quest—APPLY TODAY!",3.9,"Parsons
3.9",Maryland,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
MS Healthcare Data Scientist - Analytics,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Company Description

Learn how we’re delivering a better state of care.
We build upon our tradition of excellence in patient care and innovation, to be a national leader in the transformation of health care. Proud to be recognized by Forbes to the America’s Best Large Employers for 2022, UMMS' flagship academic campus, the University of Maryland Medical Center in Baltimore, is recognized regionally and nationally for excellence in specialized care.
University of Maryland Medical System (UMMS) delivers comprehensive health care services throughout Maryland. UMMS physicians and patient care teams work hand-in-hand with University of Maryland School of Medicine specialists to provide primary and specialty care at more than 150 locations across the state, including a network of academic, community and specialty hospitals that together provide 25% of all hospital-based care in Maryland.",3.3,"University of Maryland Medical System
3.3","Linthicum Heights, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Data Services - Remote",$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"HGV Now Offers Day One Team Member Benefits!
What will I be doing?
As a Data Scientist, you would be responsible for leveraging large relational and Big Data stores to produce insights and support product and experience innovation. The position will work with business stakeholders to produce repeatable research and augment analytics capabilities and IT partners to embed insights into system functionality. This position will require direct collaboration with internal stakeholders and the ability to story tell in a way that is meaningful to leadership teams.
You are responsible for driving company success through performing the following tasks to the highest standards:",3.6,"Hilton Grand Vacations
3.6","Orlando, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Senior Data Scientist, Professional Services",$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"5+ years of data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python) or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R, SAS, Matlab, etc.) experience
4+ years of data scientist experience
Experience with statistical models e.g. multinomial logistic regression
Experience working with scientists, economists, software developers, or product managers
Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field such as statistics, mathematics, data science, business analytics, economics, finance, engineering, or computer science
Are you passionate about helping the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)? Is using data to develop ML models something you excel at? Eager to learn to apply ML to a diverse array of enterprise use cases? Thrilled to be a part of Amazon who has been pioneering and shaping the world’s AI/ML technology for decades?

At Amazon Web Services (AWS), we are helping large enterprises build ML models on the AWS Cloud. We are applying predictive technology to large volumes of data and against a wide spectrum of problems. AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions. AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team. We pride ourselves on being customer obsessed and highly focused on the AI enablement of our customers. If you have experience with AI, including building ML models, we’d like you to join our team. You will get to work with an innovative company, with great teammates, and have a lot of fun helping our customers. A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, inspection, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.

Key job responsibilities
About the team
The Global Practice Organization for Analytics is a team inside the AWS Professional Services Organization. Our mission in the Global Practice Organization is to be at the forefront of defining machine learning domain strategy, and ensuring the scale of Professional Services' delivery. We define strategic initiatives, provide domain expertise, and lead the development of high-quality, repeatable offerings that accelerate customer outcomes.

Inclusive Team Culture
Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have thirteen employee-led affinity groups, reaching 85,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazon’s culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 16 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.

Work/Life Balance
Our team puts a high value on work-life harmony. Striking a healthy balance between your personal and professional life is crucial to your happiness and success here. We are a customer-obsessed organization—leaders start with the customer and work backwards. They work vigorously to earn and keep customer trust. As such, this is a customer facing role in a hybrid delivery model. Project engagements include remote delivery methods and onsite engagement that will include travel to customer locations as needed.

Mentorship & Career Growth
Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded professional and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.

We are open to hiring candidates to work out of one of the following locations:

Austin, TX, USA | Boulder, CO, USA | Dallas, TX, USA | Denver, CO, USA | Detroit, MI, USA | Houston, TX, USA | Minneapolis, MN, USA | New York, NY, USA | Salt Lake City, UT, USA | Seattle, WA, USA

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.

Our compensation reflects the cost of labor across several US geographic markets. The base pay for this position ranges from $127,300/year in our lowest geographic market up to $247,600/year in our highest geographic market. Pay is based on a number of factors including market location and may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Amazon is a total compensation company. Dependent on the position offered, equity, sign-on payments, and other forms of compensation may be provided as part of a total compensation package, in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits. For more information, please visit https://www.aboutamazon.com/workplace/employee-benefits. Applicants should apply via our internal or external career site.",3.8,"Amazon Web Services, Inc.
3.8","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, AI Expertise",$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Job ID: 234872
Location Name: CA-FSC SF Off (0174)
Address: 350 Mission St, 20th Floor, San Francisco, CA 94105, United States (US)
Job Type: Full Time
Position Type: Regular
Job Function: Information Technology
Remote Eligible:Hybrid Schedule

Company Overview:
At Sephora we inspire our customers, empower our teams, and help them become the best versions of themselves. We create an environment where people are valued, and differences are celebrated. Every day, our teams across the world bring to life our purpose: to expand the way the world sees beauty by empowering the Extra Ordinary in each of us. We are united by a common goal - to .",3.7,"Sephora
3.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Title: Data Scientist
Location: North America
Department: Architecture & Design (SketchUp)
Our Company
Trimble is transforming the way the world works by delivering products and services that connect the physical and digital worlds. Our core offerings in construction, transportation, agriculture, positioning, natural resources and utilities enable our customers to improve the productivity, quality and sustainability of their operations: “better, faster, greener”.
105682
142676
Yes",4.2,"Applanix
4.2","Westminster, CO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Power Systems,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Job Description Summary
In pursuit of accelerating the energy transition and recognizing the grid's significance in this transformation, GE Vernova is introducing Grid Orchestration, an initiative aimed at realizing the grid of the future. We are seeking a skilled Data Scientist – Power Systems to design and develop advanced machine learning-enabled engineering analytics for distribution and transmission systems. Operating within a mission-driven, disruptive innovation, agile, and fast-paced culture, you will actively participate in highly complex global projects and innovative customer engagements, necessitating a profound understanding of both GE Vernova's products and customers' operational environments. As a vital member of the Grid of the Future, Grid Orchestration team, the successful candidate will play a crucial role in driving GE Grid Orchestration initiatives pertaining to power systems research and software development. The ideal candidate should possess extensive experience and knowledge of artificial intelligence (AI) and machine learning (ML), with a proven track record of implementing AI/ML techniques in power grids.
#LI-Remote - This is a remote position",3.6,"GE Digital
3.6","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Janssen Pharmaceuticals, Inc., a member of Johnson & Johnson's Family of Companies, is recruiting for a Data Scientist in Janssen Business Technology located in Titusville, NJ.
At the Janssen Pharmaceutical Companies of Johnson & Johnson, what matters most is helping people live full and healthy lives. We focus on treating, curing and preventing some of the most devastating and complex diseases of our time. And we pursue the most promising science, wherever it might be found.
The Janssen Pharmaceutical Companies of Johnson & Johnson provide medicines for an array of health concerns in several therapeutic areas. Our ultimate goal is to help people live healthy lives. We have produced and marketed many first-in-class prescription medications and are poised to serve the broad needs of the healthcare market - from patients to practitioners, from clinics to hospitals. For more about the Pharmaceutical Companies of Johnson & Johnson, visit: http://www.janssenpharmaceuticalsinc.com/ .",4.2,"Johnson & Johnson
4.2","Titusville, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Working with the Data Science team, the Data Scientist will be responsible for developing the next generation of AI solutions at Hawkeye 360. They will take recommendations from the Senior Data Scientist and focus on areas of analytics exploration which will separate HawkEye 360 from the field of competitors. They will harness the power of AI and Machine Learning to model key aspects of RF data producing leap ahead capabilities that will power HawkEye 360's advance in the market.

The right candidate must be a creative problem solver with a desire to constantly expand their knowledge and technical skills by tackling challenging problems. The candidate will look beyond the data, developing domain specific knowledge , to discover and model underlying trends and patterns. They will need to leverage their knowledge of signal processing, statistics, machine learning, and AI to create effective solutions to tackle real-world problems.

Furthermore, the ideal candidate should be excited to work with unique types of data, and develop algorithms that leverage data driven ML approaches, expert features/intuition, and domain specific modeling. Additionally, they will collaborate with engineering to transition R&D analytical solutions to production level code, integrating these solutions into existing pipelines in a cloud environment.





$125,000 - $175,000 annually

HawkEye 360 offers a compensation package that includes a competitive base salary plus annual performance bonus, stock options, and benefits. We consider many factors when determining salary offers, such as candidate's work experience, education, training & skills, as well as market and business considerations. We are also open to considering candidates with experience and qualifications at a different level than required in a job posting, which may affect the compensation package offered.


HawkEye 360 is delivering a revolutionary source of global knowledge based on radio frequency (RF) geospatial analytics to those working to make the world a safer place. The company operates a commercial satellite constellation that detects, geolocates, and identifies a broad range of signals & behaviors. We employ cutting edge AI techniques to equip our global customers with high-impact insights needed to make decisions with confidence. HawkEye 360 is headquartered in Herndon, Virginia.

HawkEye 360 is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class.

HawkEye 360 does not accept unsolicited agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, HawkEye 360 employees or any other organization location. HawkEye 360 is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",3.4,"HawkEye360
3.4","Herndon, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"At Coinbase, our mission is to increase economic freedom around the world, and we couldn’t do this without hiring the best people. We’re a group of hard-working overachievers who are deeply focused on building the future of finance and Web3 for our users across the globe, whether they’re trading, storing, staking or using crypto. Know those people who always lead the group project? That’s us.
There are a few things we look for across all hires we make at Coinbase, regardless of role or team. First, we look for candidates who will thrive in a culture like ours, where we default to trust, embrace feedback, and disrupt ourselves. Second, we expect all employees to commit to our mission-focused approach to our work. Finally, we seek people who are excited to learn about and live crypto, because those are the folks who enjoy the intense moments in our sprint and recharge work culture. We’re a remote-first company looking to hire the absolute best talent all over the world.",3.7,"Coinbase
3.7",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Analytics",$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"About Us:
At Parafin, our mission is to grow small businesses. Small businesses are the backbone of our economy, yet banks do not have their back. Parafin is a technology company that builds infrastructure which enables small businesses to get easy access to financial services via platforms they sell on.

Parafin's first product offers capital-as-a-service for online platforms. Parafin currently powers the capital programs of platforms ranging from Series B to post-IPO companies such as DoorDash, Amazon, and Worldpay. We are a tight-knit team of engineers and designers, coming from organizations such as Stripe, Square, Plaid, Coinbase, Robinhood, Affirm, Uber, and CERN, and are excited both about helping hundreds of thousands of small businesses grow and thrive, and building products that leaders at top companies have started to use every day.

We are backed by prominent venture capitalists such as Ribbit Capital, Thrive Capital, GIC, Index Ventures, Green Oaks Capital, and SV Angel.",4.7,"Parafin
4.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Overview:
The department that this position will be working out of is located in Peoria, IL. The option to be considered as a remote/out of state worker will be determined/approved by leadership of this department. There may be times when this position would require to be present in Peoria, IL for work purposes which will be the decision by leadership of this department.

Salary range for this position is $88,420-$104,041. Actual pay will be determined by experience, skills and internal equity.

POSITION SUMMARY: The Data Scientist I will utilize the advanced application of statistical analysis, modeling, machine learning, natural language processing, image processing and data mining to support the development and implementation Advanced Analytics projects. This position will contribute to the analysis, interpretation, presentation and deployment of data science solutions to support OSF Healthcare’s strategic objectives.
Qualifications:",3.5,"OSF HealthCare
3.5","Peoria, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Silicon Valley,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"We are looking for a Data Scientist who will help us discover insights hidden in vast amounts of data from a variety of sources such as telematics (i.e. connected cars), social media, marketing, and manufacturing data to make smarter decisions to improve vehicle quality, deliver new connected car services, and derive new opportunities in departments such as marketing, after sales, and finance. Your primary focus will be in applying data analytics techniques, doing statistical analysis, and building high quality prediction systems integrated into our back end to support new and existing cloud based services.

Responsibilities
Selecting features, building and optimizing classifiers using machine learning techniques to enhance predictive analytics
Neural Networks using state-of-the-art methods



With a focus on Mobility, Operational Excellence, Value to our Customers and the Electrification of vehicles, you can expect to be part of something exciting. From the sleek design of our vehicles to the unique opportunities we offer around the globe, Nissan exemplifies ingenuity in everything we do. Our people are what drive the business forward.

Nissan is committed to a drug-free workplace. All employment is contingent upon successful completion of a drug screen for roles based in the United States and background screening for all positions.

All of us at Nissan - regardless of functional area or expertise - share a passion to design, manufacture, and sell high-performance vehicles. It is Nissan's policy to provide Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of race, gender, military status, disability, or any other status protected by law. Candidates for this position must be legally authorized to work in the United States and will be required to provide proof of employment eligibility at the time of hire; Nissan uses E-Verify to validate employment eligibility.



People are our most valuable assets, and diversity and inclusion are the key to maximizing the power of each individual member of our team. When everyone belongs, the power of NISSAN is undeniable. Our Corporate Diversity Initiative aims to improve business results by ensuring that our workplace and core businesses meet the unique needs of our employees and customer base.

Nissan is committed to creating a culture where everyone belongs and employees, customers, and partners feel respected, valued, and heard. We have over 10 Business Synergy Teams (BSTs) across the U.S. and Canada that connect employees - with shared characteristics or interests - build allies, and foster a company culture where all employees feel supported and included.

Nissan also values inclusion in all areas of our business as we strive to mirror the diversity of our customer base and the communities where we do business. We are committed to procuring innovative goods and services, retailing our products and communicating from a diverse perspective which will help us continue to offer our customers competitively designed, market-driven products.

Join us as we carry our commitment to diversity and inclusion into the future.

Santa Clara California United States of America
Salary Range:
$83,789.00 - $194,855.00
Salary Range Estimate: Annual Salary: (Minimum to Maximum of Salary Range noted here). This compensation range represents the minimum and maximum base salary rates at Nissan for jobs assigned to this particular grade level. Please note that it is uncommon for an employee to be placed at either end of the range. Rather, an employee's actual base salary generally may fall somewhere in between and reflect the employee's unique skills, work experience, education, work location, and market norms. Additionally, pay may be based on comparisons to the base salary rates of other employees with similar backgrounds working in comparable roles.",3.9,"Nissan
3.9","Santa Clara, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Reliability Engineering",$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"What to Expect
The Reliability Data Science team is looking for an exceptional Data Scientist/Software Engineer to utilize large-scale data and help Tesla design and validate the most compelling and reliable products for our customers. We collect real-time life data from test, factory and fleet of Vehicle & Energy products and develop data-driven models to unlock decision making on prognostics and targeted design actions. The role is high impact driving Prognostics and Warranty modeling efforts within the entire company.
The level of this position will be determined at the time of the interview.

What You’ll Do",3.6,"Tesla
3.6","Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Staff Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Intuit is looking for innovative and hands-on Staff Data Scientist to join the Intuit AI team.

Come join our collaborative and creative group of data scientists and machine learning engineers and build models that directly affect hundreds of thousands of our customers. In this role you will be building and deploying machine learning models using both analytical algorithms and deep learning approaches.",4.5,"Intuit
4.5","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Junior",$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Responsibilities:
Develop machine learning, data mining, statistical and graph-based algorithms to analyze and make sense of datasets. Prototype or consider several algorithms and decide upon final model based on suitable performance metrics. Build models or develop experiments to generate data when training or example datasets are unavailable. Generate reports and visualizations that summarize datasets and provide data-driven insights to customers. Partner with subject matter experts to translate manual data analysis into automated analytics. Implement prototype algorithms within production frameworks for integration into analyst workflows.
Experience with software development, either an open-source enterprise software development stack (Java/Linux/ Ruby/Python) or a Windows development stack (.NET, C#, C++). Experience with data transport and transformation APIs and technologies such as JSON, XML, XSLT, JDBC, SOAP and REST. Experience with Cloud-based data analysis. Experience with visual analytic tools and experience with entity extraction and machine learning, algorithm analysis, and data clustering.
Qualifications:



Peraton Overview:
Target Salary Range: $146,000 - $234,000. This represents the typical salary range for this position based on experience and other factors. EEO: An Equal Opportunity Employer including Disability/Veteran.",3.6,"Peraton
3.6","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Trainee,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"About us:
Who is Cintra? With US headquarters in Austin, Texas, Cintra is the leading private-sector transportation infrastructure company in the world, with experience spanning over 50 years of innovative highway development on four continents. Today, its portfolio includes nearly 1,200 miles of managed highways globally, representing a total global investment in roadway improvements of over $24.8 billion. Cintra manages over $10 billion of infrastructure projects in the United States and more than $4.7 billion of infrastructure projects in Canada. What makes us different? Our people come first. We want every single employee to develop both professionally and personally. With a strong focus on growth potential, we look to our internal employees as potential candidates for both national and international opportunities. We aim to achieve greatness by promoting from within every chance we get. We work hard and play hard and strive every day for success and achievement. With a diverse group of professionals working in a fast-paced environment, we achieve milestones constantly. And if that weren’t enough, we also offer our employees highly competitive insurance benefits, Paid Time Off, and a matching 401(k) program.",3.5,"Ferrovial external
3.5","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Bec Dx Jr Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Wondering what’s within Beckman Coulter Diagnostics? Take a closer look.
At first glance, you’ll see that for more than 80 years we’ve been dedicated to advancing and optimizing the laboratory to move science and healthcare forward. Join a team where you can be heard, be supported, and always be yourself. We’re building a culture that celebrates backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives of all our associates. Look again and you’ll see we are invested in you, providing the opportunity to build a meaningful career, be creative, and try new things with the support you need to be successful.
Beckman Coulter Diagnostics is proud to work alongside a community of six fellow Diagnostics Companies at Danaher. Together, we’re working at the pace of change to improve patient lives with diagnostic tools that address the world’s biggest health challenges.",3.6,"Beckman Coulter Diagnostics
3.6","Brea, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
College Graduate - Data Science (BS/MS),$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Job Description

Intel is a company of bold and curious inventors and problem solvers who create some of the most astounding technology advancements and experiences in the world.

With a legacy of relentless innovation and a commitment to bring smart, connected devices to every person on Earth, our diverse and brilliant teams are continually searching for tomorrow's technology and revel in the challenge that changing the world for the better brings. We work every single day to design and manufacture silicon products that empower peoples digital lives.

Do you love to solve technical challenges that no one has solved yet? Do you enjoy working with cross functional teams to deliver IP solutions for products that impact customers lives? If so, Come join us to do something wonderful.

We are looking for world class data engineers to help us build the future of technology.














Intel's Human Resources group is responsible for hiring, developing and retaining the best and brightest employees while continuing to strengthen the company's culture and values. Intel Human Resources provides first-rate, cost-effective services and support to employees worldwide and is dedicated to advancing Intel's business goals.

US, NM, Albuquerque; US, OR, Hillsboro; US, TX, Austin; US, CA, Folsom; US, CA, Santa Clara; US, GA, Atlanta

Intel strongly encourages employees to be vaccinated against COVID-19. Intel aligns to federal, state, and local laws and as a contractor to the U.S. Government is subject to government mandates that may be issued. Intel policies for COVID-19 including guidance about testing and vaccination are subject to change over time.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, religious creed, sex, national origin, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, military and veteran status, marital status, pregnancy, gender, gender expression, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by local law, regulation, or ordinance.

We offer a total compensation package that ranks among the best in the industry. It consists of competitive pay, stock, bonuses, as well as, benefit programs which include health, retirement, and vacation. Find more information about all of our Amazing Benefits here: https://www.intel.com/content/www/us/en/jobs/benefits.html

Annual Salary Range for jobs which could be performed in US, California: $105,930.00-$158,890.00


This role will be eligible for our hybrid work model which allows employees to split their time between working on-site at their assigned Intel site and off-site.",4.1,"INTEL
4.1","Santa Clara, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Generative AI,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"** Locations include Spring, Texas (preferred location), and US remote.
** Typically need at least Master's degree and minimum 5-8 years full-time relevant work experience.
The Team
We are a growing centralized team helping HP take advantage of new AI/ML technology, especially around Generative AI and large language models. We engage with business units to advise and prototype solutions, and we develop and run software applications for internal use.
The Role
As a Data Scientist with a focus on Generative AI you will work on multiple engagements across HP involving large language models and other new Generative AI capabilities. Beyond our team, you will work with business stakeholders and developers from other business units. Your primary focus and mindset is to help deliver business solutions to our customers. This is not an AI research role.",4.2,"HP
4.2","Spring, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"GEHA (Government Employees Health Association, Inc., pronounced G.E.H.A.) is a nonprofit member association that provides medical and dental benefits to more than two million federal employees and retirees, military retirees and their families. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.
GEHA has one mission: To empower federal workers to be healthy and well.
Offering one of the largest medical and dental benefit provider networks available to federal employees in the United States, GEHA empowers health and wellness by meeting its members where they are, when they need care. We serve our members with products they value and a personalized customer experience, sustained by a nimble and efficient organization.
The Data Scientist will serve in a critical role within GEHA’s Analytic Center of Excellence (ACOE), building Advanced Analytics methods to provide insights and solutions for complex business opportunities. This role will report directly to the Manager of Analytic Services, and will work closely with the Data Integration and Analytic Solution teams to ensure alignment across the longitudinal evolution of capturing data to creating actionable insights.
The annual base salary range for this position is $95,795 - $134,205 USD.",2.8,"GEHA
2.8",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Associate Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"At Boeing, we innovate and collaborate to make the world a better place. From the seabed to outer space, you can contribute to work that matters with a company where diversity, equity and inclusion are shared values. We’re committed to fostering an environment for every teammate that’s welcoming, respectful and inclusive, with great opportunity for professional growth. Find your future with us.
Boeing Global Services (BGS) is seeking an Associate Data Scientist to support our business in Hazelwood, MO or Dallas, TX. This organization supports BGS-Government Planning and the data analyst will apply statistical and other analytics techniques to assist with producing within the fast pace environment of aerospace. A successful candidate will understand the importance of data analytics as these positions will focus on working directly with the demand planning, new business, and the Asset management team to perform statistical and mathematical data analysis to enable the BGS business to meet their organizational goals.

U.S. Government Export Control Status: This position must meet export control compliance requirements. To meet export control compliance requirements, a “U.S. Person” as defined by 22 C.F.R. §120.15 is required. “U.S. Person” includes U.S. Citizen, lawful permanent resident, refugee, or asylee.

US based job, US Person required",3.9,"BOEING
3.9","Hazelwood, MO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"As a Data Scientist of Energy and Water Management Team, you will be responsible for supporting energy management analysts in retrofitting and monitoring laboratory buildings to optimize energy usage, reduce water consumption, and reduce greenhouse gas emissions. You will utilize your expertise in data analysis, machine learning, and statistical modeling to analyze large datasets, identify patterns, and develop insights to drive data-informed decision making. Your work will contribute to the team's efforts to implement energy-efficient measures, reduce environmental impact, and achieve sustainability goals, while ensuring compliance with relevant state and federal regulations.

The Campus Energy and Water Team are laser focused on reducing energy and water consumption from the portfolio of 70 buildings spanning 12 million square feet of space and growing. At the same time, we are charged with decarbonizing the entire campus through smart energy investments, all electric buildings, innovations in technology and accurate tracking and monitoring.",4.1,"University of California San Francisco
4.1","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory has multiple openings for a Data Scientist in Berkeley, CA.

Duties: Create, develop and maintain a broad array of complex numerical models and programming scripts or tools in order to analyze challenging technical and energy policy issues. Demonstrate good judgment in selecting methods and techniques. Create, manage, and utilize complex databases with a diverse scope, including technical and economic data. Identify meaningful insights from data. Investigate, create and develop new methods and apply those concepts to energy use and lifecycle cost analysis. Contribute to federal register notices, technical support documents and memos, summarizing methods, data sources, results, conclusions, and/or energy and economic implications. Develop presentations for public meetings. Manage multiple tasks under tight deadlines and uncertain schedules. Offer guidance and direction to more junior-level researchers.",4.1,"Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory
4.1","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Product Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"At PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL), we believe that every person has the right to participate fully in the global economy. Our mission is to democratize financial services to ensure that everyone, regardless of background or economic standing, has access to affordable, convenient, and secure products and services to take control of their financial lives.
Job Description Summary: What you need to know about the role At PayPal, we continue to push the boundary of what technology can help people around the world accomplish. For that, we are seeking far and wide for that select handful of exceptional world-class problem solvers with a passion for data insights and a relentless execution focus. Meet our team Digital Wallet team focuses on improving the app and web experiences of our customers to help them transact in a secure and fast manner. This is a cross functional team that works with different business lines to optimize and personalize the experience for 100M+ customers that login and transact every month
PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $72700 to $176000",4.0,"PayPal
4.0","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Responsibilities

• Make recommendations regarding the collection, extraction, and transformation of large data sets
• Interpret data and analyze results
• Translate analytical insights into clear recommendations; identify trends and patterns to inform business decisions and product design
• Leverage Python to analyze complex data
• Design and develop customized interactive reports and dashboards in Tableau; schedule in Tableau Server
• Define and develop a data migration strategy between different products and platforms
• Develop creative ways to identify and use data that significantly impact key business metrics
• Assess the potential usefulness and validity of new data sources
• Utilize statistical approaches to build predictive models
• Mentor other team members/ analysts to grow their skills and careers",4.5,"Colsh Consultants
4.5","Santa Clara, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Who you are
The first Data Scientist at Finrise will play an imperative role in enabling patient financing for out-of-pocket healthcare expenses. You recognize that 56% of Americans with a less than ideal FICO Score need new ways to evaluate creditworthiness in efficient and holistic ways. You’re excited about tackling technical problems that most wouldn’t dare touch. Working with unstructured and nontraditional data doesn’t scare you. Data science, predictive models, and statistics are second nature. You excel in building machine learning systems, conducting foolproof analyses, and leading cross functional projects. While banks are busy evaluating 30-year-old FICO scores, created before a time of the internet and smartphones, you’re building models which will decide who to lend to in real-time. Instead of hiring hundreds of people to manually review, you’re adding new data points to ensure accurate scoring. You’re hands-on, creative, and hyper-analytical. You understand that the ultimate measurement of success is enabling patients to afford care in a time of need, with a fair rate, in terms they understand. At the end of the day, you want to change the way credit is evaluated.",3.8,"Finrise
3.8","Burlingame, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Would you like to join an innovative team driven by a bold vision – unleashing tools to accelerate breakthroughs in human health?
It is an extraordinary time for Standard BioTools. Our technology is empowering customers to improve life through comprehensive health insight. We invite you to join a leading provider of indispensable life sciences tools that is accelerating global research on multiple frontiers of human health.

At Standard BioTools, we are building a positive culture where our people can do the best work of their careers, informed, and influenced by our core behaviors:
Keep customers front and center in all of our work
Be accountable and deliver on commitments
Drive continuous improvement",3.1,"Standard Biotools
3.1","South San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"General Atomics Aeronautical Systems, Inc. (GA-ASI), an affiliate of General Atomics, is a world leader in proven, reliable remotely piloted aircraft and tactical reconnaissance radars, as well as advanced high-resolution surveillance systems.

We currently have an exciting opportunity for a Data Scientist within our ASI Division to play a pivotal role in transforming data into actionable insights! Collaborate with cross-functional experts to design and implement cutting-edge BI solutions, uncovering opportunities and driving data-driven strategies that revolutionize our manufacturing processes.

DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Data Strategy Mastery: Leverage your experience to devise and execute data-driven strategies that align with GA-ASI’s overarching goals. Collaborate close with cross-functional teams to identify critical data sources, extract relevant insights, and shape the future of our business
We recognize and appreciate the value and contributions of individuals with diverse backgrounds and experiences and welcome all qualified individuals to apply.
42228

$98,100 - $171,398 0 - 25 Not Provided Yes No null Onsite",3.6,"General Atomics and Affiliated Companies
3.6","Poway, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Location: San Francisco, California
As a Data Scientist at BICP your role is to analyze, visualize, and model data. You’ll build and implement machine learning models to make more efficient and effective decisions. We are looking for a mixture between a statistician, scientist, machine learning expert and engineer: someone who has passion for building and improving Internet-scale products informed by data. Bachelor’s degree required and Master’s is preferred.",5.0,"BICP
5.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Be the first to apply to the next job.
This job already got lots of applicants. Coach Pro gives you real-time alerts so you are the first to apply to the job you want.
Get Coach Pro
En DataStudio, desbloqueamos el poder de los datos. Transformamos información cruda en conocimientos estratégicos, guiando a las empresa hacia decisiones más inteligentes y resultados impactantes. Nuestra experiencia en análisis de datos y Business Intelligence les proporciona las herramientas para convertir datos en ventajas competitivas.
¡Juntos creamos el futuro impulsado por los datos!",-1,DataStudio,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"OVERVIEW OF THE COMPANY
Fox News Media
FOX News Media operates the FOX News Channel (FNC), FOX Business Network (FBN), FOX News Digital, FOX News Audio, FOX News Books, the direct-to-consumer digital streaming services FOX Nation and FOX News International and the newly announced platform FOX Weather. Currently the number one network in all of cable, FNC has also been the most watched television news channel for 20 consecutive years, while FBN currently ranks among the top business channels on cable. Owned by FOX Corporation, FOX News Media reaches 200 million people each month.
JOB DESCRIPTION
Fox News Network, LLC seeks a Data Scientist (Senior Data Analyst) to play an essential role in supporting FOX’s newest initiative, FOX Weather and focus on deriving analyses and reporting for the FOX Weather team and key business stakeholders. Analysis will be concentrated around consumption and engagement of FOX Weather content, app behavior, and connecting the impact of weather conditions with app usage. Provide critical thinking to help drive strategic decision-making through detailed analysis, insights and reporting on key performance indicators (KPIs) to accelerate audience and profit growth. Perform data querying, modeling and problem solving. Translate data into visual presentations for different levels of data literacy. Work alongside operational and tactical team members, as well as report up to major executives on a regular basis. Specific duties include: 1) Develop foundational reporting to inform the FOX Weather team on app engagement, performance, downloads and user behavior. 2) Provide support with daily monitoring of download and engagement performance, pulling out key trends and anomalies that allow the team to hone in on untapped opportunities or risk mitigation as they build out plans. 3) Lead customer cohort and behavioral analysis. 4) Define customer lifetime value, and develop customer segmentation and engagement analysis. 5) Mine large datasets and surface actionable insights, trends and audience learnings. 6) Perform a wide range of ad-hoc analytics studies to identify actionable insights and recommendations for the programming, marketing, content, and product teams supporting the FOX Weather initiative. 7) Provide custom studies into the impact weather conditions that can have on app usage and help inform decisions for future feature development. 8) Develop analyses to monitor performance against competitors in the Weather industry. 9) Help structure A/B and multivariate tests, ensuring the structure and tracking methodology is sound in order to produce meaningful insights and success measurements. Telecommuting permitted from any location in the U.S.",3.6,"Fox Corporation
3.6","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist
Senior level Data Analyst or Data Scientist who can help us use and interpret data to generate insights to drive business decisions. The Data Analyst will be a part of the Data and Analytics team and as a part of the larger Application Development organization, will be working with business stakeholders, Data Engineers, Software Developers, and Project Managers to deliver data and analytics products.
The person will work closely with managers and senior managers to translate business objectives into analytics requirements. Analysts will use the centralized data repository to come up with the analysis and recommendations, and to communicate the insights and actions to the business via data visualization, presentation or report. An experienced resource must also be able to clean and pull the data if the data is not available in centralized repository.",-1,Technology Solutions Partners,"Olathe, KS",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Who May Apply

Job Opening: 46673. Job Posting Title: Data Scientist Open to ALL U.S. Citizens. Are you interested in a career supporting investigative and intelligence operations at America’s premier national security and law enforcement agency? Do you have experience or the desire to provide program support in the areas of data research and analysis? As a Data Scientist you will serve as a business innovator and provide support to law enforcement, national security and administrative functions across the FBI. Data Scientists will use scientific and mathematical processes to convert large datasets into more efficient databases for business needs.",4.1,"Federal Bureau of Investigation
4.1","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Work Mode:
Onsite
Responsibilities:
* Join a highly-skilled data science team to mine through data to identify data-driven opportunities in game production, publishing, and live-ops. * Solve complex business problems using advanced methods, including machine learning, deep learning, reinforcement learning, generative AI, experimentation, statistical inference, causal inference, econometrics, operational research, etc. * Establish scalable, efficient, automated processes, and provide end-to-end data products and online optimization systems. * Interact cross-functionally with various teams and provide actionable business insights to stakeholders. * Research and develop novel modeling and inference solutions to support game development and business decision-making. * Continuously improve the accuracy, efficiency, and scalability of existing models and algorithms. * Stay up-to-date with the latest advancements in data science techniques and technologies.
* Ph.D. with a specialization in computer science, operational research, mathematics, statistics, economics, or a quantitative field. * Deep and extensive knowledge in one or more of the following areas: generative AI, deep learning, reinforcement learning, causal inference, natural language processing, computer vision/graphics, recommendation systems, econometrics, and other data science domains. * Expert in statistical analysis (probabilities, hypothesis testing, multivariate analysis, time series analysis, generalized linear model, A/B experiments). * Proficient in SQL and Python (or other higher-level programming languages like Java, C++, Scala, etc.). * Experience with Big Data technologies such as Hadoop, Spark, Hive, etc. is preferred. * Ability to understand complex subjects clearly and propose actionable data-driven solutions. Good business acumen and communication skills are a plus.

California
The base pay range for this position in the state(s) above is $107,400 to $196,900 per year. Actual pay is based on market location and may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. A sign on payment, relocation package, and restricted stock units may be provided as part of the compensation package, as well as other medical, financial, and/or other benefits, dependent on the specific position offered.",4.0,"Tencent
4.0","Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Keystone is a premier strategy and economics consulting firm solving the most complex challenges of competition, strategy, and intellectual property for leading technology firms and global brands. We work at the forefront of influential technology cases changing consumer behavior and regulation laws and impacting society on a global scale. Keystone brings an interdisciplinary approach, leveraging the intersection of economics, technology, and business strategy to deliver transformative ideas.
The Keystone Advanced Technology Solutions (K.ATS) group is made up of engineers, computer scientists, and data scientists, and plays a key role in Keystone’s interdisciplinary approach. Data Scientists on the K.ATS team focus on everything from natural language processing to machine learning models, and help find creative ways to apply those approaches to solve unique, large-scale, highly complex problems.",4.0,"Keystone Strategy
4.0","Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"About The Chefs' Warehouse
The Chefs' Warehouse, Inc. (http://www.chefswarehouse.com) combines exceptional quality and brand building with broadline food service distribution for more than 35 years. With Protein, Specialty, Produce, and Broadline offerings, we service the most discerning chefs in a hybrid approach of convenience and superior quality. We introduce more than 2,000 artisan producers of the world’s finest ingredients from over 40 countries to the finest chefs in the world. We passionately consult, sell, and build relationships with more than 35,000 customers through the most experienced network of over 600 consultive sales associates, best-in-breed technology, rapid service, and support levels that solidify our long-standing ties to both established and up-and-coming premium restaurants.

Mission: The mission of The Chefs’ Warehouse is to provide the world’s greatest ingredients to the world’s best chefs.


Curious & Creative
Hungry For Food & Results
Entrepreneurial
Forward Thinking & Flexible
Supportive (Of Peers & Chefs)

We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join our team. A successful candidate will be responsible for quickly analyzing and interpreting data to help drive business decisions and will apply machine learning techniques to provide recommendations for improving our rapidly growing e-commerce platform.



#LI-ND1

The above job description is not an all-inclusive list of duties and standards of the position. Incumbents will follow any other instructions, and perform any other related duties as assigned by their supervisor.


The Chefs' Warehouse is an Equal Opportunity Employer that does not discriminate based on actual or perceived race, creed, color, religion, alienage or national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, age, disability or handicap, sex, marital status, veteran status, sexual orientation, pregnancy, gender identity or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local laws. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Our management team is dedicated to this policy with respect to recruitment, hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, training, compensation, benefits, employee activities and general treatment during employment. We are dedicated to building an inclusive and diverse workforce.",3.4,"The Chefs' Warehouse
3.4","Ridgefield, CT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Infrastructure Foundation",$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Every day, tens of millions of people come to Roblox to explore, create, play, learn, and connect with friends in 3D immersive digital experiences– all created by our global community of developers and creators.
At Roblox, we're building the tools and platform that empower our community to bring any experience that they can imagine to life. Our vision is to reimagine the way people come together, from anywhere in the world, and on any device. We're on a mission to connect a billion people with optimism and civility, and looking for amazing talent to help us get there.
A career at Roblox means you'll be working to shape the future of human interaction, solving unique technical challenges at scale, and helping to create safer, more civil shared experiences for everyone.",4.1,"Roblox
4.1","San Mateo, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Senior Data Scientist, Professional Services",$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"5+ years of data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python) or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R, SAS, Matlab, etc.) experience
4+ years of data scientist experience
Experience with statistical models e.g. multinomial logistic regression
Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field such as statistics, mathematics, data science, business analytics, economics, finance, engineering, or computer science
Experience working with scientists, economists, software developers, or product managers
Are you passionate about helping the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)? Is using data to develop ML models something you excel at? Eager to learn to apply ML to a diverse array of enterprise use cases? Thrilled to be a part of Amazon who has been pioneering and shaping the world’s AI/ML technology for decades?

At Amazon Web Services (AWS), we are helping large enterprises build ML models on the AWS Cloud. We are applying predictive technology to large volumes of data and against a wide spectrum of problems. AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions. AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team. We pride ourselves on being customer obsessed and highly focused on the AI enablement of our customers. If you have experience with AI, including building ML models, we’d like you to join our team. You will get to work with an innovative company, with great teammates, and have a lot of fun helping our customers. A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, inspection, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.

Key job responsibilities
About the team
The Global Practice Organization for Analytics is a team inside the AWS Professional Services Organization. Our mission in the Global Practice Organization is to be at the forefront of defining machine learning domain strategy, and ensuring the scale of Professional Services' delivery. We define strategic initiatives, provide domain expertise, and lead the development of high-quality, repeatable offerings that accelerate customer outcomes.

Inclusive Team Culture
Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have thirteen employee-led affinity groups, reaching 85,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazon’s culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 16 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.

Work/Life Balance
Our team puts a high value on work-life harmony. Striking a healthy balance between your personal and professional life is crucial to your happiness and success here. We are a customer-obsessed organization—leaders start with the customer and work backwards. They work vigorously to earn and keep customer trust. As such, this is a customer facing role in a hybrid delivery model. Project engagements include remote delivery methods and onsite engagement that will include travel to customer locations as needed.

Mentorship & Career Growth
Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded professional and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.

We are open to hiring candidates to work out of one of the following locations:

Irvine, CA, USA | Las Vegas, NV, USA | Los Angeles, CA, USA | Salt Lake City, UT, USA | San Diego, CA, USA | San Francisco, CA, USA | San Jose, CA, USA | Seattle, WA, USA | Tempe, AZ, USA

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.

Pursuant to the Los Angeles Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Our compensation reflects the cost of labor across several US geographic markets. The base pay for this position ranges from $127,300/year in our lowest geographic market up to $247,600/year in our highest geographic market. Pay is based on a number of factors including market location and may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Amazon is a total compensation company. Dependent on the position offered, equity, sign-on payments, and other forms of compensation may be provided as part of a total compensation package, in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits. For more information, please visit https://www.aboutamazon.com/workplace/employee-benefits. Applicants should apply via our internal or external career site.",3.8,"Amazon Web Services, Inc.
3.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"REMOTE - LOUISVILLE, KY
Bamboo Health is a leader in cloud-based care coordination software and analytics solutions focused on patients with complex needs, including those suffering from physical health and mental health issues and substance use disorders. We are driven by our mission of enabling better care for patients across the continuum. Our software solutions help healthcare professionals collaborate on shared patients across the spectrum of care. Join us in improving healthcare for all!
Summary:
The Data Scientist will live and breathe data and be excited about building user-facing data products. They will work with the Product Development team, Health Data Science team, other internal stakeholders, and external stakeholders to develop data-driven solutions powered by our unique data pipeline. The Data Scientist will excel at creative problem solving, cross-team collaboration, and thinking independently about how to utilize data to address the challenges our customers face.",3.4,"Bamboo Health
3.4","Louisville, KY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
ViiV Healthcare (GSK) US Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Site Name: Durham Blackwell Street
Posted Date: Aug 16 2023

In office two days a week
Company Overview
ViiV Healthcare is a global specialty HIV company, the only one that is 100% focused on researching and delivering new medicines for people living with, and at risk of, HIV. ViiV Healthcare is highly mission-driven in our unrelenting commitment to being a trusted partner for all people living with and affected by HIV. Our aim is to think, act, and connect differently through a focus on education on for the prevention and treatment for HIV. We go to extraordinary lengths to deliver the sorts of breakthroughs, both in prevention, treatments, care solutions and communities, that really count. We go beyond the boundaries of medicine by taking a holistic approach to HIV through developing and supporting sustainable community programs and improving access to care.",4.1,"GSK
4.1","Durham, NC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Job Description:
Pattern Inc. seeks Data Scientist in Lehi, UT. Masters in Finance or Data Science + 24 mos. as a Data Analyst. Send resume to makenna@pattern.com.

Pattern is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",4.5,"Pattern
4.5","Lehi, UT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist II,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Disney Streaming Services is responsible for developing and operating The Walt Disney Company’s direct-to-consumer video businesses globally, including the ESPN+ premium sports streaming service; Disney+, the dedicated streaming home for entertainment from Disney, Pixar, Marvel, Star Wars, National Geographic and BAMTECH Media, a global leader in direct-to-consumer video streaming products and solutions. Our core mission is to deliver global audiences the freedom to access content on their terms across any connected device, time, or location. We serve consumers by bringing the world’s most beloved characters, timeless stories, legendary athletes, and epic sporting events to global audiences through outstanding direct-to-consumer video services.
The Data Science team at Disney Streaming Services combines deep data analysis and research of our rich user data to present a compelling vision around user retention and preferences across the vast ecosystem of our product offerings and content. We are the insights and modeling partners for the content, marketing, product, and engineering teams at Disney+, Hulu and ESPN+. As Data Scientists, we use data to empower decision-makers with information, predictions, and insights that ultimately influence the experiences of millions of users worldwide. If you are someone who loves to work cross-functionally, build models, perform statistical analysis, and create visualizations to provide scalable and iterative capabilities, then this is a phenomenal role for you!

The hiring range for this position in New York, NY is $117,998 to $158,290 and in Santa Monica, CA is $112,586 to $151,030 per year. The base pay actually offered will take into account internal equity and also may vary depending on the candidate's geographic region, job-related knowledge, skills, and experience among other factors. A bonus and/or long-term incentive units may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to the full range of medical, financial and/or other benefits, dependent on the level and position offered.",3.9,"Disney Media & Entertainment Distribution
3.9","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Sr. Manager, Data Scientist - Biopharma",$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"ROLE SUMMARY:
The Commercial Analytics team at Pfizer is looking for a full-stack Senior Data Scientist Manager who is passionate about crafting and implementing predictive modeling and statistical analysis to build end-to-end solutions and insights that have a direct impact on patient's lives and the future of Pfizer as a data-driven organization. You will be a thought partner to the business, understand strategic goals, and then use your skills and subject matter expertise to surface impactful insights that drive business decisions and patient benefits. With colleagues across the globe, our rigorous analytical expertise is relied upon as the compass and decision support for the enterprise. Our dynamic, exciting team of subject-matter experts comes from diverse backgrounds and experiences, including market research, data science, digital analytics, finance, and consulting. Our culture is about getting things done iteratively and rapidly, with open feedback and debate along the way. We believe Data Science is a team sport, but we strive for independent decision-making and taking smart risks.

The annual base salary for this position ranges from $113,900.00 to $189,700.00. In addition, this position offers an annual bonus with a target of 17.5% of the base salary and eligibility to participate in our share based long term incentive program. Benefits offered include a retirement savings plan, paid vacation, holiday and personal days, paid caregiver/parental and medical leave, and health benefits to include medical, prescription drug, dental and vision coverage in accordance with the terms and conditions of the applicable plans. Pfizer compensation structures and benefit packages are aligned locally, the US Salary range provided does not apply to the Tampa, FL or any EXUS locations.
Marketing and Market Research",4.1,"Pfizer
4.1",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Co-Op,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Company Overview
At Motorola Solutions, we believe that everything starts with safety. It’s the constant that empowers people to confidently move forward. It can fill a flight or sell out a stadium. It can care for a patient or graduate a class.

As a global leader in public safety and enterprise security, we create and connect the technologies that help to keep people safe where they live, learn, work and play. Our integrated technology ecosystem unifies critical communications, video security and access control, and command center software, enabling collaboration in more powerful ways.

At Motorola Solutions, we’re ushering in a new era in public safety and security. Bring your passion, potential and talents to a career that matters.

The Service Design Tools & Infrastructure (SDTI) team is a strategic component of Centralized Managed Support Operations (CMSO), responsible for providing exceptional Service Design & innovative technology solutions to enable and empower MSI Centralized Managed Support Operations to meet and exceed customer's expectations. In this role, you will fit in the “Data & Analytics” team within SDTI.




None

None

New Grad

No",4.0,"Motorola Solutions
4.0","Schaumburg, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Responsible for working with business users to fully understand their needs for data science solutions; work with a variety of data sources, both internal and external, as well as structured and unstructured formats, to build analytic models utilizing machine learning techniques; perform deep dive analytics, ad hoc reporting, report automation, fee schedule processing, and dashboard creation/maintenance; partner with the IT group to ensure that the data is sourced from the right location for data science model building; develop ETL pipelines for model training, evaluation and deployment; develop and code data science programs, algorithms, and automated processes to cleanse, integrate and evaluate large datasets from multiple disparate sources; interact with data engineers, business analysts and others to ensure data solutions address full needs; leverage appropriate data science techniques to drive the creation of insights from data; combine data extraction, preparation, and data cleansing with model training and evaluation using Pandas and Alteryx; develop and code data science programs, algorithms and automated processes to cleanse, integrate and evaluate large datasets from multiple disparate sources; use GitHub and similar version control system to maintain source code; interpret and communicate insights and findings from analysis and experiments for a multi-department audience using Data Visualization tools including Power BI and Tableau; utilize MS Access, MS Excel, T-SQL, Oracle SQL, Python, R, healthcare data analytics, quantitative statistical analysis, baseline/trend analysis, qualitative statistical analysis and health economics to perform duties; access data from internal databases and sources, including warehoused and pre-modeled data; server as the Tableau Subject Matter Expert (SME); accountable for the development and production support of interactive data visualizations; perform Tableau server administration for users and user groups; refresh scheduling via Server and TSC; develop dynamic websites with Microsoft SharePoint, as well as automatic registration systems with Microsoft Powerplatformp; use advanced knowledge of data warehousing and data mining principles including DataMart design, fact tables, dimension tables, data views and star schema to complete assigned tasks; stay current on data science and analytics tools, techniques, and practices; and work in an Agile/Scrum environment to write clean, reliable, and testable code that supports rapid delivery via CICD and automated deployments.",3.6,"Health Alliance Plan
3.6","Detroit, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"MedeAnalytics is a leader in healthcare analytics, providing innovative solutions that enable measurable impact for healthcare payers and providers. With the most advanced data orchestration in healthcare, payers and providers count on us to deliver actionable insights that improve financial, operational, and clinical outcomes. To date, we've helped uncover millions of dollars in savings annually.
The Senior Data Scientist will produce innovative solutions driven by exploratory data analysis from complex and high-dimensional data sets. The Senior Data Scientist uses a flexible, analytical approach to design, develop, evaluate, and deploy robust solutions leveraging innovations in data science, machine learning, and predictive modeling techniques. To do this job successfully, you need exceptional skills in statistics, data modeling, advanced mathematics, and programming. The Senior Data Scientist should be able to independently complete responsibilities.",3.0,"MedeAnalytics
3.0","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$106K - $159K (Employer est.),"Janssen Pharmaceuticals, Inc., a member of Johnson & Johnson's Family of Companies, is recruiting for a Senior Data Scientist in Janssen Business Technology located in Titusville, NJ, or Horsham, PA.
At the Janssen Pharmaceutical Companies of Johnson & Johnson, what matters most is helping people live full and healthy lives. We focus on treating, curing and preventing some of the most devastating and complex diseases of our time. And we pursue the most promising science, wherever it might be found.
The Janssen Pharmaceutical Companies of Johnson & Johnson provide medicines for an array of health concerns in several therapeutic areas. Our ultimate goal is to help people live healthy lives. We have produced and marketed many first-in-class prescription medications and are poised to serve the broad needs of the healthcare market - from patients to practitioners, from clinics to hospitals. For more about the Pharmaceutical Companies of Johnson & Johnson, visit: http://www.janssenpharmaceuticalsinc.com/ .",4.2,"Johnson & Johnson
4.2","Titusville, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Work Mode:
Onsite
Responsibilities:
1.Join a highly skilled data science team to mine through data to identify data-driven opportunities in game production, publishing and live-ops
2.Work with large datasets and apply advanced analytic methods to solve challenging problems and to deliver scalable solutions.
3.Establish scalable, efficient, automated processes and provide end-to-end data products with large-scale data analysis, A/B testing, machine/deep learning model development, validation and serving.
4.Interact cross-functionally with various teams and provide actionable business insights for stakeholders.
5.Research new machine learning approaches.
1.Join a highly skilled data science team to mine through data to identify data-driven opportunities in game production, publishing and live-ops
2.Work with large datasets and apply advanced analytic methods to solve challenging problems and to deliver scalable solutions.
3.Establish scalable, efficient, automated processes and provide end-to-end data products with large-scale data analysis, A/B testing, machine/deep learning model development, validation and serving.
4.Interact cross-functionally with various teams and provide actionable business insights for stakeholders.
5.Research new machine learning approaches.
1.MS/PhD degree in a quantitative field - Computer Science, Operational Research, Mathematics, Statistics, Economics or related fields. Ph.D. with Strong publication record preferred;2.3+ years of experience of building machine learning models for business applications;3. Deep and extensive knowledge in one or more of the following areas: Deep Learning, Reinforcement Learning, Statistical Analysis, NLP, Computer Vision, Recommendation System, Big Data technologies, and any other data science related domains.4.Expert in statistical analysis (probabilities, hypothesis testing, multivariate analysis, time series analysis, generalized linear model, A/B experiments) ;5.Proficient in SQL and Python, Java, C++ or related programming languages;6.Experience with Big Data technologies such as Hadoop, Spark, Pig, Hive, etc. is preferred.7.Ability to understand complex subjects clearly and proposing actionable data-driven solutions to them. Good business acumen and communication skills is a plus.

California
The base pay range for this position in the state(s) above is $81,400 to $179,300 per year. Actual pay is based on market location and may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. A sign on payment, relocation package, and restricted stock units may be provided as part of the compensation package, as well as other medical, financial, and/or other benefits, dependent on the specific position offered.",4.0,"Tencent
4.0","Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Strategic Customers - Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Oracle’s Strategic Customer Team has the mission to enable OCI's largest and most strategic customers. The Strategic Engineering Customers team is an inclusive and diverse team of high caliber PMs and Engineers focused on the AI/ML Pillar inside of the Strategic Engineering Customer team, distributed globally, who thrive on new challenges. We are seeking an experienced Machine Learning Engineer or Data Scientist with technical expertise in deploying, configuring, and running ML/AI jobs on OCI GPUs, to join our growing team of multidisciplinary experts. As a Senior Principal Data Scientist, you will work closely with the technical and research teams on innovative, strategic projects including advanced applications of ML for the organization. This role is responsible for the technical direction of the team and for communication with both internal and external stakeholder leadership teams, and must demonstrate critical thinking abilities, outstanding communication skills, project management experience and the ability to lead other experienced technical professionals.",3.9,"Oracle
3.9",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Decision Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"At PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL), we believe that every person has the right to participate fully in the global economy. Our mission is to democratize financial services to ensure that everyone, regardless of background or economic standing, has access to affordable, convenient, and secure products and services to take control of their financial lives.
Job Description Summary: The Global Collections Strategy team is seeking a Decision Scientist with prior Collections and Digital Channels experience to join our organization. The ideal candidate will possess a highly developed technical skillset (SQL, Python, etc), as well as the business acumen to distill analytical results into actionable outcomes. Frequent collaboration with cross-border stakeholder teams is required as part of this role.
Job Description:
PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $84500 to $204600",4.0,"PayPal
4.0",Arkansas,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Technical Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Overview: Your future team We're looking for a Data leader with business instincts and analytics mastery that has led projects improving data science efficiency. You are someone that is passionate about applying these skills to increase data quality, reduce the need for data scientists to perform data engineering tasks and love working across the organization to create the proper data layer to increase data science productivity. You will be reporting to our Head of Experimentation. Responsibilities: At Atlassian, we strive to design equitable and explainable compensation programs. To support this goal, the baseline of our range is higher than that of the typical market range, but in turn we expect to hire most candidates near this baseline. Base pay within the range is ultimately determined by a candidate's skills, expertise, or experience. In the United States, we have three geographic pay zones. For this role, our current base pay ranges for new hires in each zone are: Zone A: $201,300 - $268,400 Zone B: $181,200 - $241,600 Zone C: $167,100 - $222,800 This role may also be eligible for benefits, bonuses, commissions, and equity. Please visit go.atlassian.com/payzones for more information on which locations are included in each of our geographic pay zones. However, please confirm the zone for your specific location with your recruiter. #LI-Remote Qualifications: What you'll do
Your background",4.3,"Atlassian
4.3","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, AI Expertise",$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Position
Data Scientist, AI Expertise

Profile
Job ID: 234872
Location Name: CA-FSC SF Off (0174)
Address: 350 Mission St, 20th Floor, San Francisco, CA 94105, United States (US)
Job Type: Full Time
Position Type: Regular
Job Function: Information Technology
Hybrid Schedule",3.7,"Sephora USA
3.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist I (Machine Learning),$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Battelle delivers when others can’t. We conduct research and development, manage national laboratories, design and manufacture products and deliver critical services for our clients—whether they are a multi-national corporation, a small start-up or a government agency.

We recognize and appreciate the value and contributions of individuals with diverse backgrounds and experiences and welcome all qualified individuals to apply.

We are currently seeking a Data Scientist I with Machine Learning. This position will support a team located in Columbus, OH with a hybrid schedule (combination 1-2 days on-site and partial remote option)",3.9,"Battelle
3.9","Columbus, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Advanced Analytics and AI",$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Creating Peace of Mind by Pioneering Safety and Security
At Allegion, we help keep the people you know and love safe and secure where they live, work and visit. With more than 30 brands, 11,000+ employees globally and products sold in 130 countries, we specialize in security around the doorway and beyond.
Data Scientist, Advanced Analytics and AI - Carmel, IN (hybrid)
The Data Scientist, Advanced Analytics and AI will play a key role in implementing artificial intelligence (AI) in the analytics space, with a specific focus on leveraging Power BI and Microsoft Fabric. This position requires a strong blend of technical expertise, business acumen, and knowledge of time-series forecasting methodologies. The Data Scientist will work collaboratively with cross-functional teams to develop and deploy advanced analytics solutions, leveraging AI techniques to drive actionable insights and improve decision-making processes.
What You Will Do:",4.1,"Allegion
4.1","Carmel, IN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Quantitative Analyst/Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Description
Leidos has an opening for a Junior Quantitative Analyst/Data Scientist for a project supporting HHS in Washington DC. Be part of a team performing a broad and ever-changing array of data science projects supporting national health preparedness and the ongoing COVID-19 response.

The Data Scientist will work as part of a multi-disciplinary team supporting communications outreach efforts. Examples of such efforts include: analyzing customer data to help target outreach efforts; creating novel data visualizations of data for a public audience, data exploration, and tracking the manufacture, allocation, and distribution of medical counter-measures. Analyses and modeling will focus on public health response and medical countermeasure mitigation.
Pay Range $53,300.00 - $96,350.00",3.8,"Leidos
3.8","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist / Software Engineer,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Linde Inc.
Data Scientist / Software Engineer
Tonawanda, NY, United States | req14160
What you will enjoy doing*
This is a unique opportunity to collaborate with a diverse team of technical experts to solve a variety of complex problems in a fun and dynamic environment
You will have the flexibility to use the latest tools and technology, imagination and creativity are the only limitations on your impact
You will collaborate with business partners to understand product requirements and define appropriate technical solutions, lead technical development of cutting-edge analytics and decision support tools, stay abreast of new technology and actively contribute ideas for new programs, and balance development of new solutions with replication and support of existing tools",3.8,"Linde Inc.
3.8","Tonawanda, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Staff Data Scientist, Analytics",$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Airwallex is a global payments fintech company transforming the way businesses move and manage money globally. We have built a global financial infrastructure platform to help businesses transact, collect and pay across 130+ countries and 50+ currencies, without the constraints of the traditional global financial system. We've grown to 13 global locations and have raised over $900 million in funding. To support our ambitious growth plans, we’re looking for smart, collaborative and passionate people who are looking to make a genuine impact.

The US team at Airwallex is looking for a Staff Data Scientist who will play a pivotal role in supporting our key customers with scalable data product solutions and data-driven insights. You will directly contribute to the success of Airwallex’s major customers, and bridge the gap between our customers, commercial and product teams.

This is a hybrid role based out of San Francisco, CA, with 3 days per week in our office.",3.4,"Airwallex
3.4","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Virta is the first company with a clinically-proven treatment to safely and sustainably reverse type 2 diabetes and other chronic metabolic diseases without the use of medications or surgery. Our innovations in nutritional biochemistry, data science and digital tools combined with our clinical expertise are shifting the diabetes treatment paradigm from management to reversal. Our mission - to reverse type 2 diabetes in 100 million people by 2025.
As a full stack health care company of physicians, engineers, marketers and more under one roof, Virta collects comprehensive data on our patients’ experience, and leverages this data to build the next generation of health care for chronic diseases. Here at Virta, we rely heavily on Data and Analytics to optimize our product and workflow to improve our company’s KPIs as well as to demonstrate the value of the Virta Treatment to our customers. We collect and organize disparate forms of patient data from both internal and external sources to generate insightful analyses. We are looking for a senior data analyst/scientist with considerable experience working with healthcare data to help us collect, organize, and analyze this data, to generate insights and reports that we can use to further improve Virta’s performance.",3.2,"Virta Health
3.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Junior Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Working Hours : Full Time(W2)
Experience : 1+Years
Locations : Livonia , Michigan

Soothsayer is seeking Data Scientist who has an interest in solving challenging ML/ AI problems. The Data Science team works on a variety of exciting analytics (ML, AI) projects.
Responsibilities
Solve cutting edge, challenging problems working alongside a great team of world class data scientists and analytics experts",2.9,"Soothsayer Analytics
2.9","Livonia, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Why LVT:
LVT (LiveView Technologies) is making the world a safer place and we need your help! Based in Utah, LVT is the world's leader for physical security platforms and data. With our systems in every US state and several Fortune 500 enterprise companies as customers, we're positioned for massive growth in the years to come. While we were founded 18 years ago, we are still innovative and consistently scaling. If you are looking for a market leading organization with untapped potential, look no further than LVT!

So about that scalability - we’ve been very intentional about our growth and profitability, which has driven our massive growth trajectory. To keep up with the explosive demand, we need self-motivated, innovative go-getters at every level. At LVT, we provide a fulfilling career that allows you to live your best life at work and at home. We provide the culture to work smart and have fun, while giving you the flexibility needed for yourself and your loved ones.",4.4,"LiveView Technologies
4.4","American Fork, UT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Statistician (Data Scientist),$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Duties
Serves as an advisor in leading and coordinating with stakeholders in solving complex and far reaching data management issues and problems for a wide range of systems, applications, and customers using statistical methods and techniques.
Conducts the planning, development, implementation, and administration of systems for the acquisition, storage, and retrieval of data. Transforms data from traditional and non-traditional sources.
Contributes to development of the design for advanced data systems, software, and complex programming specifications.
Designs methods to develop and manage large, complex, structured and unstructured datasets; record linkage; business analytics and efficiencies; and predictive analytics.",-1,US National Agricultural Statistics Service,"Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Company
Federal Reserve Bank of Dallas
We are dedicated to serving the public by promoting a strong financial system and a healthy economy for all. These efforts take a team of dedicated individuals doing many different jobs. Together we’re creating a workplace where talented people can thrive, and we welcome your unique background and perspective to help present the best possible solutions.

Location: #LI-Hybrid
About the Role:
The Federal Reserve Bank of Dallas is looking for a Data Scientist to join the Supervisory Risk and Surveillance group of the Banking Supervision Department. In this role, you will be a key contributor in developing and maintaining quantitative models that support Federal Reserve System supervisory decisions across the country. You will work with complex datasets and a variety of statistical modeling techniques to develop the next generation of banking risk early warning systems. In addition, you will develop and implement innovative solutions to assess and monitor risk at Federal Reserve-supervised institutions. You will collaborate with Dallas-based team members and interact with colleagues across the Federal Reserve System.
Full time
Regular
Yes
First (United States of America)",3.9,"Federal Reserve Bank of Dallas
3.9","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Email at hr@dataxpander.com
They need to have statistical, mathematical, predictive modelling as well as business strategy skills to build the algorithms necessary to ask the right questions and find the right answers. They also need to be able to communicate their findings, orally and visually. They need to understand how the products are developed and even more important, as big data touches the privacy of consumers, they need to have a set of ethical responsibilities.",-1,Data Xpander,"Irving, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Associate Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Associate Data Scientist
Locations: Wilmington, DE; Charlotte, NC
As an Associate Data Scientist, you’ll develop the technical skills to build the machine learning systems that drive our company and produce great customer outcomes. You’ll get hands-on experience as you apply your talents, creativity, and passion to create innovative solutions to real-world data science use cases. No matter the projects, you’ll have the opportunity to explore, while learning from experts in consumer lending in a close-knit team-oriented environment.
This role will provide exposure across multiple disciplines to accelerate your career growth.",3.4,"OneMain Financial
3.4","Wilmington, DE",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist (Remote),$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Job Description

In this role, you will research and develop enhancements to Epsilon's CORE Personalization Platform to continually increase the capabilities of Epsilon's digital marketing businesses.

The Decision Sciences group is a collaborative, multi-disciplinary R&D team combining data science, machine learning, AI, computer science, and more. Our colleagues love the fast-paced, dynamic work environment, the speed with which we translate research to business impact, the opportunity to continually learn new knowledge and skills, the internal research seminars, the external training opportunities, and the excellent work-life balance our culture promotes.

We prioritize talent and potential over having closely similar prior experience. If using internet scale data to drive business impact excites you, we want to talk to you.









For decades, we've been helping marketers from the world's top brands personalize experiences for millions of people with our cutting-edge technology, solutions and services. Epsilon's best-in-class identity gives brands a clear, privacy-safe view of their customers, which they can use across our suite of digital media, messaging and loyalty solutions. We process 400+ billion consumer actions each day and hold many patents of proprietary technology, including real-time modeling languages and consumer privacy advancements. Thanks to the work of every employee, Epsilon has been consistently recognized as industry-leading by Forrester, Adweek and the MRC. Positioned at the core of Publicis Groupe, Epsilon is a global company with more than 8,000 employees around the world. Check out a few of these resources to learn more about what makes Epsilon so EPIC:



We know that we have some of the brightest and most talented associates in the world, and we believe in rewarding them accordingly. If you work here, expect competitive pay, comprehensive health coverage, and endless opportunities to advance your career.

Epsilon is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Epsilon's policy is not to discriminate against any applicant or employee based on actual or perceived race, age, sex or gender (including pregnancy), marital status, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, mental or physical disability, religion, creed, color, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression (including transgender status), veteran status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law. Epsilon also prohibits harassment of applicants and employees based on any of these protected categories.

Epsilon will provide accommodations to applicants needing accommodations to complete the application process.

For San Francisco Bay and Los Angeles Areas: Epsilon will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the City of Los Angeles' Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance and San Francisco Police Code Sections 4901-4919, commonly referred to as the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance.

Applicants with criminal histories are welcome to apply.

#LI-EB1

REF186863V",3.9,"Epsilon
3.9","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Vitria Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"At Vitria, you will use your creativity and expertise to apply your machine learning experience to our VIA AIOps product, improving our customers’ operational processes and services. In this role you will:
Understand our customers’ business problems, industry context, and data sources as well as how our VIA AIOps product addresses them
Work closely with our customer facing teams, product managers, and engineers to drive analytics based product improvements in our VIA AIOps product
Build, tune, and evaluate models for real-time time-series analysis, the detection and correlation of anomalies across disparate data sets, etc.
Incorporate human-generated labels from our customers into your model development",3.6,"Vitria Technology
3.6",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Artificial Intelligence,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Overview:
This is a remote position within the Continental United States

At Adstra we know great things happen when people come together with one shared goal. The future of data is happening at Adstra. Come join our growing team.

We are currently seeking a Data Scientist - Artificial Intelligence to join our team of professionals.

Our “ideal candidate” is a seasoned data science professional with a robust understanding of machine learning, who can manage and improve the decision tree-based machine learning models. They possess strong analytical skills to understand the current algorithms and a good sense of data intuition for improving these models.









Responsibilities:

Qualifications:",4.3,"Adstra
4.3",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Manager, Data Scientist - Biopharma",$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"ROLE SUMMARY:
The Commercial Analytics team at Pfizer is looking for a full-stack Data Scientist who is passionate about crafting and implementing predictive modeling and statistical analysis to build end-to-end solutions and insights that have a direct impact on patient's lives and the future of Pfizer as a data-driven organization. You will be a thought partner to the business, understand strategic goals, and then use your skills and subject matter expertise to surface impactful insights that drive business decisions and patient benefits. With colleagues across the globe, our rigorous analytical expertise is relied upon as the compass and decision support for the enterprise. Our dynamic, exciting team of subject-matter experts comes from diverse backgrounds and experiences, including market research, data science, digital analytics, finance, and consulting. Our culture is about getting things done iteratively and rapidly, with open feedback and debate along the way. We believe Data Science is a team sport, but we strive for independent decision-making and taking smart risks.

The annual base salary for this position ranges from $90,800.00 to $151,300.00. In addition, this position offers an annual bonus with a target of 12.5% of the base salary and eligibility to participate in our share based long term incentive program. Benefits offered include a retirement savings plan, paid vacation, holiday and personal days, paid caregiver/parental and medical leave, and health benefits to include medical, prescription drug, dental and vision coverage in accordance with the terms and conditions of the applicable plans. Pfizer compensation structures and benefit packages are aligned locally, the US Salary range provided does not apply to the Tampa, FL or any EXUS locations.
Marketing and Market Research
#LI-PFE",4.1,"Pfizer
4.1",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist (Membership),$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Overview
Provide independent data science, machine learning, and analytical insights using member, financial, and organizational data to support mission critical decision making for various areas of the organization. Understand business needs and identify opportunities for new products, services, and process optimization to meet business objectives through the use of cutting-edge data science. Create descriptive, predictive, and prescriptive models and insights to drive impact across the organization. Conduct work assignments of increasing complexity, under moderate supervision with some latitude for independent judgment. Intermediate professional within field; requires moderate skill set and proficiency in discipline.
Responsibilities

You have goals, dreams, hobbies, and things you're passionate about—what's important to you is important to us. We're looking for people who not only want to do meaningful, challenging work, keep their skills sharp and move ahead, but who also take time for the things that matter to them—friends, family, and passions. And we're looking for team members who are passionate about our mission—making a difference in military members' and their families' lives. Together, we can make it happen. Don't take our word for it:









Equal Employment Opportunity: Navy Federal values, celebrates, and enacts diversity in the workplace. Navy Federal takes affirmative action to employ and advance in employment qualified individuals with disabilities, disabled veterans, Armed Forces service medal veterans, recently separated veterans, and other protected veterans. EOE/AA/M/F/Veteran/Disability EOE/AA/M/F/Veteran/Disability
Disclaimers: Navy Federal reserves the right to fill this role at a higher/lower grade level based on business need. An assessment may be required to compete for this position. Job postings are subject to close early or extend out longer than the anticipated closing date at the hiring team’s discretion based on qualified applicant volume. Navy Federal Credit Union assesses market data to establish salary ranges that enable us to remain competitive. You are paid within the salary range, based on your experience, location and market position
Bank Secrecy Act: Remains cognizant of and adheres to Navy Federal policies and procedures, and regulations pertaining to the Bank Secrecy Act.",4.1,"Navy Federal Credit Union
4.1","Pensacola, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"At AT&T we’re redefining the future of connectivity. At our core is a passion to serve our customers with products and services that create connections, improve lives and allow millions to share the stories and experiences that matter. Our Corporate teams are fueled by innovation and a desire to connect the world in meaningful ways. Join our team and bring your bold ideas, supporting and transforming our business across areas like marketing, finance and more.
Join our team as a Senior Data Scientist, where you will play a pivotal role in shaping the future of customer experience by developing cutting-edge solutions powered by generative AI (GenAI). In this position, you will collaborate closely with a cross-functional team comprising data engineers, machine learning engineers, and domain experts. Utilizing state-of-the-art machine learning (ML)/AI methodologies, including deep learning, reinforcement learning, and natural language processing, you will analyze complex, large-scale datasets and extract actionable insights. By leveraging your technical acumen and domain knowledge, you will significantly contribute to the creation of innovative products and services aimed at enhancing customer satisfaction and fueling growth within the telecommunications industry.",3.6,"AT&T
3.6","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Drug Discovery Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"We're seeking a Drug Discovery Data Scientist to join us in our mission to improve human health and quality of life!
As a member of our Drug Discovery group, you'll join a group of about 90 scientists that includes designers, modelers, computational chemists, medicinal chemists, crystallographers, biochemists, and biologists. Our team is also supported by over 100 software developers and engineers. Three of the programs we've worked on in the past seven years have progressed into the clinic, and an additional one is expected to enter clinical trials this year. You can see recent news on one of these programs here.
Who will love this job:
An independent worker who understands genomics, enzyme inhibition, or receptor agonism/antagonism",4.1,"Schrödinger
4.1","Portland, OR",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist/Machine Learning/ Artificial Intelligence,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist/Machine Learning Scientist
Location: Atlanta, GA (Remote Till Covid-19)

Job Description:
Data Scientist / Machine Learning Scientist

(Machine Learning)

Bachelor’s, Master’s or Ph.D. in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Machine Learning, Statistics or related field
Minimum of 1 year of relevant industry experience (as a Data Scientist, Research Scientist, Machine Learning Engineer, etc.), 2+ preferred; or proven qualifications.
Hands-on and theoretical knowledge of various Machine Learning algorithms and tools, e.g. xgboost/LightGBM, Random Forests, SVMs, PCA, t-sne, kmeans, DBSCAN, etc.
Expertise with Time Series problems is a plus
Excellent knowledge of Python and/or R, knowledge of Spark is a plus
What will be your duties:

Effectively utilize appropriate statistical and Machine Learning models and techniques to solve various business problems
Collaborate with various departments to identify opportunities for process improvement and developing analytics use-cases.
Evaluate accuracy and quality of data sources, as well as the designed models
Stays up to date with the latest models and changes in the technology
Communicate results to colleagues and business partners.",-1,ADPMN IT SOLUTIONS,"Atlanta, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Job Description
Overview
Data Scientist
The Data Scientist will have the ability to use statistics and programming to analyze and interpret complex and large data sets. This position will involve querying, cleaning and organizing data in order to apply various statistical and machine learning techniques to extract insights and patterns.
RESPONSIBILITIES:
Solves business problems through making testable predictions from data.",3.5,"Indiana University Health
3.5","Indianapolis, IN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Our Company

Changing the world through digital experiences is what Adobe’s all about. We give everyone—from emerging artists to global brands—everything they need to design and deliver exceptional digital experiences! We’re passionate about empowering people to create beautiful and powerful images, videos, and apps, and transform how companies interact with customers across every screen.

We’re on a mission to hire the very best and are committed to creating exceptional employee experiences where everyone is respected and has access to equal opportunity. We realize that new ideas can come from everywhere in the organization, and we know the next big idea could be yours!

The Opportunity
Do you love to seek complex business problems and use data to find the signal in the noise? Join the Product and Customer Analytics team at Adobe! We are a high-impact, high-visibility team well suited to individuals with a highly quantitative, inquisitive bent of mind. We use data science to quantify and optimize the product experience for our customers! The ideal candidate will be able to work autonomously and will have a technical background with strong communication and project management skills.
As a Senior Data Scientist you will be responsible for helping different businesses and teams achieve operational and execution efficiencies using data. Your leadership and interpersonal skills will allow you to engage with product management, customer success, marketing, and sales teams to identify problems which can be addressed with data science. You will partner with data engineers to help our team build data pipelines from a variety of sources, and use your understanding of statistics to mine data for impactful insights for the various teams. Your success is predicated on providing insights that enable our enterprise business to lower customer churn, find opportunities for product improvement, and facilitate growth opportunities.

This position is located in the San Jose, CA office.
What you'll Do
Own the data collection, analysis, and delivery of critical metrics for an enterprise SaaS product team.
Collaborate with an enterprise digital experience management product’s technical teams to understand where data is stored and how it can be extracted.
Analyze customer usage data and derive insights for product, customer success, and marketing teams.
Standardize insight generation and help build automated self-service tools for the same.
Own and lead relationships with partners across digital marketing businesses. What you need to succeed
4 to 6 years’ proven experience working in data science, product analytics, or other related field.
Degree in engineering, statistics, mathematics or related fields are strongly preferred. MS/PhDs are preferred.
SQL and R, Python, Spark or similar language are required.
Ability and preference to work in a constantly evolving and less defined business environment.
The ability to work with disparate teams, often in different geos, prioritize tasks and following up on them is crucial for success in this role.
Experience with machine learning, artificial intelligence, and/or econometrics is strongly preferred.
Knowledge of the B2B enterprise digital marketing industry preferred but not required.

Our compensation reflects the cost of labor across several U.S. geographic markets, and we pay differently based on those defined markets. The U.S. pay range for this position is $122,400 -- $223,000 annually. Pay within this range varies by work location and may also depend on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Your recruiter can share more about the specific salary range for the job location during the hiring process.

At Adobe, for sales roles starting salaries are expressed as total target compensation (TTC = base + commission), and short-term incentives are in the form of sales commission plans. Non-sales roles starting salaries are expressed as base salary and short-term incentives are in the form of the Annual Incentive Plan (AIP).

In addition, certain roles may be eligible for long-term incentives in the form of a new hire equity award.

Adobe is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and affirmative action employer. We do not discriminate based on gender, race or color, ethnicity or national origin, age, disability, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, or any other applicable characteristics protected by law. Learn more.

Adobe aims to make Adobe.com accessible to any and all users. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation to navigate our website or complete the application process, email accommodations@adobe.com or call (408) 536-3015.

Adobe values a free and open marketplace for all employees and has policies in place to ensure that we do not enter into illegal agreements with other companies to not recruit or hire each other’s employees.",4.4,"Adobe
4.4","San Jose, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist III (hybrid/remote),$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Summary: This role is responsible for employing a logical, systematic approach to problem solving and research using analytical techniques to achieve business objectives and drive change. Responsible for gathering and synthesizing data and other relevant information to develop fact-based conclusions and make business recommendations for all areas of the business.
What You’ll Be Doing:
Translates corporate strategy into analytic projects that inform and drive business performance.
Creates, documents, tests, deploys, audits, and manages statistical techniques and predictive models.
Works with the Data Warehouse, IT, business units, and third-party companies to assess and incorporate demographic, firmographic, geographic, telematic, internet-of-things (IOT), drone, wearables, sensor, social media, and other data sources for analytic benefit.",3.8,"Grange Insurance Company
3.8","Columbus, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Responsibilities:
The individual with work with the CTO team to enhance our existing geolocation products along with new complementary datasets. They would be instrumental on the design of new offerings and combining the various existing datasets in one concrete product. The main focus would be on applying statistical modeling to various structured and unstructured geolocation data for verifying the quality and integrity of the data, cleansing the data and extracting trading signals along with using them to calibrate existing forecasting models. It would be also required to write research reports describing our data and its applications. Part of the role will entail interaction with the business development team on client driven projects.
The individual should demonstrate strong ability to work on a fast paced environment, proven record of working with innovative product teams and be ambitious to participate in shaping the direction of the newly formed geolocation data industry.",-1,Advan Research Corporation,"New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Jr Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Job Description :
Data Scientist will join a team responsible for developing advanced analytics products.
Applying data visualization and statistical programming tools to enterprise data to advance and enable the key mission outcomes.
In this role, you will support all phases of analytic work product development, from the identification of key business questions, through data collection, from performing analyses and using a wide range of statistical, machine learning, and applied mathematical techniques to delivery insights to decision-makers.
Experience : 1 – 2 Years
Mandatory Skills And Qualifications :",4.1,"Veracity Software
4.1","Iselin, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Associate Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Work Mode:
Onsite
Responsibilities:
About Tencent
Tencent is a world-leading internet and technology company that develops innovative products and services to improve the quality of life of people around the world. Founded in 1998 with its headquarters in Shenzhen China, our guiding principle is to use technology for good.
We are not only a major video game publisher in the world, we also produce other high-quality digital content, enriching interactive entertainment experiences for people around the globe. We offer a range of services such as cloud computing, advertising, FinTech, and other enterprise services to support our clients' digital transformation and business growth.
About IEG






California
The base pay range for this position in the state(s) above is $65,450 to $130,900 per year. Actual pay is based on market location and may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. A sign on payment, relocation package, and restricted stock units may be provided as part of the compensation package, as well as other medical, financial, and/or other benefits, dependent on the specific position offered.",4.0,"Tencent
4.0","Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Specialist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"In a world of possibilities, pursue one with endless opportunities. Imagine Next!
When it comes to what you want in your career, if you can imagine it, you can do it at Parsons. Imagine a career working with intelligent, diverse people sharing a common quest. Imagine a workplace where you can be yourself. Where you can thrive. Where you can find your next, right now. We’ve got what you’re looking for.
Job Description:
Parsons is seeking a Data Scientist Specialist with expertise in infectious diseases to join our team in developing and enhancing a cutting-edge biosurveillance platform. The successful candidate will have a strong background in data science, experience in agile development methodologies, and expertise in nowcasting models and forecasting techniques. As a Data Scientist Specialist, you will play a critical role in the development of new features, improvement of nowcasting models, and designing advanced forecasting techniques, ultimately contributing to the advancement of our biosurveillance platform.


Not Applicable/None
This position is part of our Federal Solutions team.
Our Federal Solutions segment delivers resources to our US government customers that ensure the success of missions around the globe. Our diverse, intelligent employees drive the state of the art as they provide services and solutions in the areas of defense, security, intelligence, infrastructure, and environmental. We promote a culture of excellence and close-knit teams that take pride in delivering, protecting, and sustaining our nation's most critical assets, from Earth to cyberspace. Throughout the company, our people are anticipating what’s next to deliver the solutions our customers need now.
$81,500.00 - $142,600.00
We value our employees and want our employees to take care of their overall wellbeing, which is why we offer best-in-class benefits such as medical, dental, vision, paid time off, Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP), 401(k), life insurance, flexible work schedules, and holidays to fit your busy lifestyle!
Parsons is an equal opportunity employer committed to diversity, equity, inclusion, and accessibility in the workplace. Diversity is ingrained in who we are, how we do business, and is one of our company’s core values. Parsons equally employs representation at all job levels for minority, female, disabled, protected veteran and LGBTQ+.
We truly invest and care about our employee’s wellbeing and provide endless growth opportunities as the sky is the limit, so aim for the stars! Imagine next and join the Parsons quest—APPLY TODAY!",3.9,"Parsons
3.9",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Overview:
LMI is seeking a skilled Data Scientist. Successful Data Scientists demonstrate competency in project execution, leadership critical thinking, relationship management, and business growth while upholding the highest standard of ethical behavior.

LMI is a consultancy dedicated to improving the business of government, drawing from deep expertise in advanced analytics, digital services, logistics, and management advisory services. Established as a private, not-for-profit organization in 1961, LMI is a trusted third party to federal civilian and defense agencies, free of commercial and political bias. We operate completely free of political and commercial bias, and we are entirely aligned with the goals of our clients. Our clients value our specialized services in logistics, intelligence, homeland security, health care, and energy and environment markets. We believe government can make a difference, and we seek talented, hardworking people who share that conviction. We offer a generous compensation package with excellent benefits that start the first day of employment. Business casual dress, flex time, and tuition reimbursement are a few of our many work-life benefits available to our employees.
Responsibilities:

Qualifications:",4.2,"Logistics Management Institute
4.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Decision Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"At PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL), we believe that every person has the right to participate fully in the global economy. Our mission is to democratize financial services to ensure that everyone, regardless of background or economic standing, has access to affordable, convenient, and secure products and services to take control of their financial lives.
Job Description Summary: The Global Collections Strategy team is seeking a Decision Scientist with prior Collections and Digital Channels experience to join our organization. The ideal candidate will possess a highly developed technical skillset (SQL, Python, etc), as well as the business acumen to distill analytical results into actionable outcomes. Frequent collaboration with cross-border stakeholder teams is required as part of this role.
Job Description:
PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $84500 to $204600",4.0,"PayPal
4.0",Alabama,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, AI Expertise",$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Job ID: 234872
Location Name: CA-FSC SF Off (0174)
Address: 350 Mission St, 20th Floor, San Francisco, CA 94105, United States (US)
Job Type: Full Time
Position Type: Regular
Job Function: Information Technology
Remote Eligible:Hybrid Schedule

Company Overview:
At Sephora we inspire our customers, empower our teams, and help them become the best versions of themselves. We create an environment where people are valued, and differences are celebrated. Every day, our teams across the world bring to life our purpose: to expand the way the world sees beauty by empowering the Extra Ordinary in each of us. We are united by a common goal - to .",3.7,"Sephora
3.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Bamboo Health is a leader in cloud-based care coordination software and analytics solutions focused on patients with complex needs, including those suffering from physical health and mental health issues and substance use disorders. We are driven by our mission of enabling better care for patients across the continuum. Our software solutions help healthcare professionals collaborate on shared patients across the spectrum of care. Join us in improving healthcare for all!
Summary:
The Data Scientist will live and breathe data and be excited about building user-facing data products. They will work with the Product Development team, Health Data Science team, other internal stakeholders, and external stakeholders to develop data-driven solutions powered by our unique data pipeline. The Data Scientist will excel at creative problem solving, cross-team collaboration, and thinking independently about how to utilize data to address the challenges our customers face.",3.4,"Bamboo Health
3.4",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
2024 University Graduate - Security Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Our Company

Changing the world through digital experiences is what Adobe’s all about. We give everyone—from emerging artists to global brands—everything they need to design and deliver exceptional digital experiences! We’re passionate about empowering people to create beautiful and powerful images, videos, and apps, and transform how companies interact with customers across every screen.

We’re on a mission to hire the very best and are committed to creating exceptional employee experiences where everyone is respected and has access to equal opportunity. We realize that new ideas can come from everywhere in the organization, and we know the next big idea could be yours!

The Opportunity
The Adobe Cybersecurity Software Development Analytics team is dedicated to using the strength of data to protect our systems, inform security strategy, measure the efficacy of our defensive measures, and identify potential vulnerabilities. We are in search of a Data Scientist who is deeply passionate about harnessing big data to produce useful cybersecurity insights that inform critical security decisions. The ideal candidate will possess hands-on experience with analytics and data science, particularly in the cybersecurity realm, demonstrate exceptional quantitative analysis and technical abilities, communicate effectively, and collaborate within a multi-faceted team environment. The primary focus will be driving data science and analysis across an array of cybersecurity projects aimed at enhancing system defense and resilience. In essence, this role is tasked with answering: Where are our vulnerabilities? How can we improve our defenses? This role will be primarily oriented toward identifying patterns, anomalies, and potential threats, especially concerning individual user data and system-generated log data.

What Y ou’ll D o

A pply expertise in quantitative analysis, threat modeling, and cybersecurity techniques to deeply understand patterns and vulnerabilities within our systems interactions.

Use insights and data to inform cybersecurity strategies that enhance system integrity and safeguard data.

Monitor system security metrics daily, understand the root causes of security breaches or vulnerabilities, and offer guidance on risk forecasts.

Define and prioritize security opportunities and areas of focus based on potential threats and vulnerabilities.

Engage with various cross-functional teams (Security Operations, Threat Hunting, Incident Response, and other security teams) to fortify our defenses and enhance security resilience.

Capture, synthesize, and interpret disparate security data within the context of business objectives , identify potential threats, and explore vulnerabilities across different system segments.
What Y ou N eed to S ucce ed

3+ years of hands-on experience in quantitative analysis, preferably within the field of cyber security, threat intelligence, or risk assessment. A Ph.D. in Cyber Security Analytics or a related degree is preferred.

Experience in defining security problems, gathering relevant data, analyzing results, and crafting a compelling risk management strategy.

Strong analytical skills to decipher key security implications and business impacts.

Proficiency in querying and manipulating large datasets using SQL-like languages such as Spark SQL and programming languages such as Python, Scala, etc.

Statistical Modeling tools appropriate for security data such as R, Pandas, Jupyter Notebooks, PyTorch , or Spark ( PySpark ).

Experience with data visualization tools tailored for cyber security insights, like Tableau or Power BI.

Solid understanding of statistical modeling, machine learning, or data mining concepts, particularly as they relate to threat detection and anomaly recognition. Consistent track record of addressing security challenges using these methods.

Comfortable communicating security insights and findings to a wide range of collaborators, team members, and partners across various regions. Ability to convey complex data-driven security narratives in a clear and concise manner.

A strong sense of integrity, accompanied by a phenomenal sense of humor.

Eagerness and ambition to lead and pioneer new initiatives in the realm of cyber security.
Our compensation reflects the cost of labor across several U.S. geographic markets, and we pay differently based on those defined markets. The U.S. pay range for this position is $92,100 -- $161,100 annually. Pay within this range varies by work location and may also depend on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Your recruiter can share more about the specific salary range for the job location during the hiring process.

At Adobe, for sales roles starting salaries are expressed as total target compensation (TTC = base + commission), and short-term incentives are in the form of sales commission plans. Non-sales roles starting salaries are expressed as base salary and short-term incentives are in the form of the Annual Incentive Plan (AIP).

In addition, certain roles may be eligible for long-term incentives in the form of a new hire equity award.

Adobe is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and affirmative action employer. We do not discriminate based on gender, race or color, ethnicity or national origin, age, disability, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, or any other applicable characteristics protected by law. Learn more.

Adobe aims to make Adobe.com accessible to any and all users. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation to navigate our website or complete the application process, email accommodations@adobe.com or call (408) 536-3015.

Adobe values a free and open marketplace for all employees and has policies in place to ensure that we do not enter into illegal agreements with other companies to not recruit or hire each other’s employees.",4.4,"Adobe
4.4","San Jose, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Cloud Technologies",$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Summary
Posted: Sep 7, 2023
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:200499833
Imagine what you could do here. At Apple, we believe new insights have a way of becoming excellent products, services, and customer experiences very quickly. Bring passion and dedication to your job and there's no telling what you could accomplish. The people here at Apple don’t just create products — they create the kind of wonder that’s revolutionized entire industries. It’s the diversity of those people and their ideas that inspires the innovation that runs through everything we do, from amazing technology to industry-leading environmental efforts. Join Apple, and help us leave the world better than we found it. It takes deeply dedicated, intelligent individuals to maintain and exceed the high expectations at Apple. Cloud Technologies App Platform (AP) team is looking for an extraordinary Machine Learning engineer to join our team. You will help design and implement our machine learning strategy to take our developer experience platform to the next level and help accelerate app development inside Apple. We will be collaborating and working with multi-functional teams and applying algorithms to large-scale data.",4.2,"Apple
4.2","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Senior Associate, Data Scientist",$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Job Requisition ID: 89245
Location Designation:

Employer: New York Life Insurance Company
Job Title: Senior Associate, Data Scientist
Location: This position reports to the NY Life Headquarters in New York, NY but applicants may work from a Home Office from anywhere in the United States
Offered Wage: $178,200.10/year",3.7,"New York Life Insurance Co
3.7",New York State,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"LOCATION 4287 Route 130 S Edgewater Park NJ US 08010
Overview
Come join our growing team here at Burlington Stores as a Data Scientist I! The Data Scientist I will support business areas including Merchandising, Allocations, Marketing, IT and Supply Chain Analytics teams with insights gained from analyzing Burlington and external data. Must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. Must have strong interpersonal and relationship building skills & strong written and verbal communication skills.
Duties & Responsibilities:",3.1,"Burlington Stores
3.1","Edgewater Park, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist (2 openings),$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"SENIOR DATA SCIENTIST
Current is a leading U.S. fintech serving people who have been overlooked by traditional banks and one of the fastest growing companies with nearly 4 million members. Headquartered in NYC, our results-driven environment enables us to build better products, grow faster and empower everyone on our team to have an impact on our business and our mission to improve financial outcomes for our members.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Conduct in-depth analyses to improve product growth, engagement, retention, and revenue.
Help drive a more robust product strategy through detailed predictive modeling and market analysis.",4.0,"current
4.0","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Junior Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"WHAT WE WANT
FriendFinder Networks is looking for a Junior Data Scientist with the primary responsibility to query and analyze large disparate datasets looking for relationships and trends typically related to increasing revenue, improving membership conversions, fraud detection and prevention, and providing actionable insights for solutions to business problems. You will communicate your findings and make presentations to senior management on a regular basis. Your contributions will ensure FriendFinder Networks will continue to provide our customers the best possible user experience for everyone who visits our web sites 24 hours a day, every day of the year, all over the world.
WHAT YOU WILL DO",2.9,"FriendFinder Networks
2.9",California,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Location: Currently remote
Experience: 3+ years
3+ years of experience in data mining, statistical analysis, modeling, optimization
Experience and demonstrated skill in creating mathematical models
Expertise in delivering data driven applications in the form of APIs, dashboards, or software packages
Experience and demonstrated desire to continue learning about the industry and trends in data management
Product owner experience",-1,DT4o,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Our Careers


We promote a culture of collaboration, teamwork, and personal development. Our culture supports not only the work we do, but also our people in a variety of ways.

Our people come from a diverse range of cultural, educational, and geographic backgrounds, and they are able to work in a dynamic and professional environment that values each individual's viewpoint. Their diverse perspectives result in superior business solutions for our clients and technology equally. We proactively capitalize on business and technology opportunities that enable high performance.",-1,Pinnacle Soft Solutions,"Cedar Park, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Responsibilities:
Peraton is currently seeking an experienced Data Scientist with a data engineering or computer science background to provide support to the JDPAC team.

Location: Scott AFB, Illinois

Roles and responsibilities include, but are not limited to the following:

Key Responsibilities
Design, build, and evaluate machine learning models
Advance the mission by connecting customers and their challenges with data science solutions
Qualifications:

Peraton Overview:
Target Salary Range: $112,000 - $179,000. This represents the typical salary range for this position based on experience and other factors. EEO: An Equal Opportunity Employer including Disability/Veteran.",3.6,"Peraton
3.6","Scott Air Force Base, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist - Applied AI,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Careers Category: Data, Analytics & User Research
Careers location: Remote, US, Remote, Canada
Connected Worker Type: Connected
Requisition Id: R_109100
Zynga is a leading developer of the world's most popular social games that are played by millions of people around the world each day. Since our founding in 2007, our mission has been to connect the world through games and delight consumers with social gaming experiences.
Our team",4.4,"Zynga
4.4",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Job Description Summary
The GE Healthcare GIPC team is looking for a highly motivated individual, passionate about deep learning and AI. As the Senior Data Scientist, you will focus on developing impactful and innovative deep learning-based products for the General Imaging and Primary Care markets partnering with world-leading clinicians.

GE HealthCare is a leading global medical technology and digital solutions innovator. Our purpose is to create a world where healthcare has no limits. Unlock your ambition, turn ideas into world-changing realities, and join an organization where every voice makes a difference, and every difference builds a healthier world.
Job Description",4.3,"GE Healthcare
4.3","Waukesha, WI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Analytica is seeking a remote Senior Data Scientist to provide survey and data analytics support for the ASA (Assistant Secretary for Administration) office at the Department of Health and Human Services (HHS). In this role, you will utilize your advanced statistical programming, modeling, visualization techniques, data mining, and forecasting skills to analyze complex challenges within the public sector, primarily focusing on survey data.
Analytica has been recognized by Inc. for 3 consecutive years as one of the 250 fastest growing business. We offer competitive compensation with opportunities for bonuses, employer paid health care, training and development funds, and 401k match.

Responsibilities include:",3.4,"Analytica
3.4",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Job Location : Texas, USA
Experience : 3 – 10 Years
A successful tech start- up founded and headed by Guinness World Record Holder Dr.Amit Garg an IIT Delhi graduate who has won medals for India in Global Math Championships. Click on this link to view Dr Amit Garg's Wikipedia page: Our Client List and Global footprint: ORMAE has 30+ global clients including 12+ $1B+ clients. ORMAE has helped them on 50+ Optimization & Data Science projects across the globe including USA, Germany, UAE, Saudi Arabia, Japan & India. ORMAE's innovative product RouteCap can build optimal delivery route and dynamic gantt
ORMAE is looking for an experienced Data Scientist with good statistical background to deliver solutions for complex problems of our clients.",3.8,"Ormae
3.8",Texas,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Company Description

Our NielsenIQ teams empower our clients to make bold decisions and transform their businesses in trusted data, solutions, and insights designed to drive innovation and growth.
The NielsenIQ North America Data Science team is passionate about solving complex client challenges and providing data-driven, actionable, timely, and innovative solutions.

Job Description

As a Sr. Data Scientist you will support our US Data Science initiative, if you are passionate about learning, multi-sourced data, data quality, statistical measurement, automation, efficiency, and consumer behavior, this is role for you!",3.9,"NielsenIQ
3.9","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Who are we?
Buyers Edge Platform (""BEP"") was born out of the 20-year growth and success of its founding companies Dining Alliance, Buyers Edge and Consolidated Concepts. BEP is a technology enabled group purchasing network, which provides group purchasing services, SaaS based technology solutions, and supply chain consulting and procurement related services to foodservice operators across many verticals, including restaurants (independents as well as multiunit, chains and franchise concepts), hospitality (hotels, casinos, resorts), healthcare (LTC based operators), colleges & universities and array of other foodservice based operators (food trucks, caterers, amusement parks and other leisure based operators). BEP represents over $35 Billion in Network Transactions. We are committed and passionate about our mission to keep foodservice operators thriving by saving them money and increasing the quality of their products.",4.3,"Buyers Edge Platform, LLC
4.3",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Technology company dedicated to world-class Nearshore software products is looking for:
DATA SCIENTIST
Required Skills
Agile/Scrum development methodology.
MS Project, PowerPoint, SharePoint.
Azure DevOps.
Experience manipulating big data using open-source frameworks.",4.5,"Taltere SA de CV
4.5",Arizona,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"At PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL), we believe that every person has the right to participate fully in the global economy. Our mission is to democratize financial services to ensure that everyone, regardless of background or economic standing, has access to affordable, convenient, and secure products and services to take control of their financial lives.
Job Description Summary: PayPal’s Risk as a Service Data Scientists are comprehensive analytical experts who collaborate with a team of technical and business industry experts, to ensure that their customers are successful in their deployments in catching fraud and malicious activities. They continually improve and apply their technical knowledge and analytical skills across the product suite at every level of the customer.
Job Description:

PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $84500 to $204600",4.0,"PayPal
4.0","San Jose, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Junior Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Title:
Junior Data Scientist
The KBR team in Colorado Springs, CO is seeking a highly motivated Data Scientist to join us in supporting our great nation, specifically on the Air Force Tactical Exploitation of National Capabilities (TENCAP) HOPE contract.
Air Force TENCAP exploits National space, cyber and intelligence capabilities to deliver rapid, cost-dominant and innovative warfighting solutions across the full spectrum of Air Force and Joint military missions. AF TENCAP is a Congressionally mandated rapid acquisition organization supporting tactical and operational warfighters and serves as the Air Force executive agent for the Military Exploitation of Reconnaissance and Intelligence Technologies (MERIT) program. As the Air Force's leader for National-to-Tactical capability development, AF TENCAP collaborates with leading experts across the Intelligence Community, Department of Defense, National Laboratories, industry, inter-agency, academia, and partner nations.",3.9,"KBR
3.9","Colorado Springs, CO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"CAPE Analytics provides inspection-quality condition and property characteristics data for 110 million unique structures across the United States, derived from aerial imagery via advanced computer vision. This enables HELOC originators and investors, single-family rental investors, and loan traders to access valuable property attributes with the accuracy and detail that traditionally required an on-site inspection. Leveraging CAPE Analytics, these verticals have access to more accurate property valuations, improved decisions around bids, buys, and capital expenditure needs for portfolios, and increased efficiency by avoiding time-consuming research. Founded in 2014, CAPE Analytics is backed by leading venture firms and innovative insurers and is comprised of computer vision, data science, and risk analysis experts.

THE OPPORTUNITY
As a Senior Data Scientist on CAPE’s Data Science team, you’ll collaborate with Data Scientists, Computer Vision/Machine Learning Engineers, Data Engineers, and members across Software Engineering, Product, and Sales teams to build robust, scalable machine learning models for identification and annotation of the built world. Additionally, you will develop expertise in ground truth generation, model performance analysis, iterative model development, and unsupervised mapping of the feature space to bring scientific rigor, scalability, and robust performance to our core product offerings.",4.6,"Cape Analytics
4.6",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist 1,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Overview:
About Public Consulting Group
Public Consulting Group LLC (PCG) is a leading public sector solutions implementation and operations improvement firm that partners with health, education, and human services agencies to improve lives. Founded in 1986, PCG employs approximately 2,000 professionals throughout the U.S.—all committed to delivering solutions that change lives for the better. The firm is a member of a family of companies with experience in all 50 states, and clients in six Canadian provinces and Europe. PCG offers clients a multidisciplinary approach to meet challenges, pursue opportunities, and serve constituents across the public sector. To learn more, visit www.publicconsultinggroup.com.
Responsibilities:
The Health Data Scientist will support PCG colleagues, state agencies, and healthcare stakeholders in collecting, analyzing and reporting data to support the healthcare system in addressing complex issues. The Health Data Scientist is the team steward of health policy focused data collection, visualizations and reports; and will provide consultative guidance and training to clients and peers in the effective use of health data to help guide state leaders in Medicaid Redesign. The successful candidate will leverage strong analytical skills, technical prowess and consulting acumen to make healthcare outcome and performance data more useful to policymakers, managed care organizations and healthcare providers.

Qualifications:

Compensation:
EEO Statement:",3.8,"Public Consulting Group
3.8",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Software Engineer - Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Tau is a venture-backed advanced technology company based in the Bay Area (Redwood City, CA). We design and develop next-generation products for electrification. The company was started because we believe the key to a more sustainable future requires modern power conversion systems to increase the security of the world's energy. We have pioneered technologies that leverage software-enabled hardware to provide industry leading scale, economics, and efficiencies. Our systems include innovations across electric machines, inverters, controllers, thermal management, simulation, and charging systems.
Tau's team of engineers, scientists, technologists, operators, and industry leaders continue to advance our internal technology roadmap while collaborating with commercial partners to deploy our existing products to market in the relentless pursuit of creating efficient power conversion systems for a more sustainable future.",-1,Tau,"Redwood City, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Job ID: 2312571
Location: AUSTIN, TX, US
Date Posted: 2023-09-11
Category: Information Technology
Subcategory: Data Scientist
Schedule: Full-time
Shift: Day Job
Travel: Yes, 10 % of the Time


Covid Policy: SAIC does not require COVID-19 vaccinations or boosters. Customer site vaccination requirements must be followed when work is performed at a customer site.",4.0,"SAIC
4.0","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Jr. Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Job Type: Full Time
We are looking for Jr. Data Scientists to join our team.
Kyla is the next generation of healthcare tech. Our mission is to help people live longer and healthier. With the latest AI technologies, we provide the best digital healthcare for everyone. We have several digital products such as mobile app, and three web applications for companies and doctors. We work with Fortune 500 companies. Our solutions are used by thousands, and recently we won the Exceptional Innovation By The 2020 Pandemic Tech Innovation Awards. Our team is bright minds who love their job and development and are not afraid of working in a fast-growing lean startup.
If you would like to join us, do not hesitate to apply.
Required skills:",3.5,"Kyla
3.5","San Jose, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$65K - $131K (Employer est.),"Ref #:
5581485
Department:
Data Analytics
City:
Nutley
State/Province:
New Jersey",3.8,"Ralph Lauren
3.8","Nutley, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"In a world of possibilities, pursue one with endless opportunities. Imagine Next!
When it comes to what you want in your career, if you can imagine it, you can do it at Parsons. Imagine a career working with intelligent, diverse people sharing a common quest. Imagine a workplace where you can be yourself. Where you can thrive. Where you can find your next, right now. We’ve got what you’re looking for.
Job Description:
Parsons is seeking an experienced Data Scientist / Analytics Engineer to provide embedded operations support, capability integration, and rapid prototyping in support of USCYBERCOM. In this role you will be responsible for collaborating with headquarters and local customers to develop analytic capabilities. You’ll be a critical member on a small team, responsible for bringing your high-level analytic and data science skills to bear on a critical national security mission.




Top Secret SCI w/Polygraph
This position is part of our Federal Solutions team.
Our Federal Solutions segment delivers resources to our US government customers that ensure the success of missions around the globe. Our diverse, intelligent employees drive the state of the art as they provide services and solutions in the areas of defense, security, intelligence, infrastructure, and environmental. We promote a culture of excellence and close-knit teams that take pride in delivering, protecting, and sustaining our nation's most critical assets, from Earth to cyberspace. Throughout the company, our people are anticipating what’s next to deliver the solutions our customers need now.
$113,100.00 - $203,600.00
We value our employees and want our employees to take care of their overall wellbeing, which is why we offer best-in-class benefits such as medical, dental, vision, paid time off, 401(k), life insurance, flexible work schedules, and holidays to fit your busy lifestyle!
Parsons is an equal opportunity employer committed to diversity, equity, inclusion, and accessibility in the workplace. Diversity is ingrained in who we are, how we do business, and is one of our company’s core values. Parsons equally employs representation at all job levels for minority, female, disabled, protected veteran and LGBTQ+.
We truly invest and care about our employee’s wellbeing and provide endless growth opportunities as the sky is the limit, so aim for the stars! Imagine next and join the Parsons quest—APPLY TODAY!",3.9,"Parsons
3.9",Maryland,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Growth Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Who We Are

Verkada is the largest cloud-based B2B physical security platform company in the world. Only Verkada offers six product lines — video security cameras, access control, environmental sensors, alarms, workplace and intercoms — integrated with a single cloud-based software platform.

Designed with simplicity and scalability in mind, Verkada gives organizations the real-time insight to know what could impact the safety and comfort of people throughout their physical environment, while empowering them to take immediate action to minimize security risks, workplace frustrations and costly inefficiencies.

Founded in 2016 with more than $360M in funding raised to date, Verkada has expanded rapidly with 15 offices across three continents, 1,600+ full-time employees and 17,000+ customers across 70+ countries, including 45 companies in the Fortune 500.",3.5,"Verkada
3.5","San Mateo, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Junior Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"The Junior Data Scientist will be responsible for examining and identifying patterns in different types of data formats, including ordinal, nominal, discrete, continuous, spatial, and temporal. This role includes cleaning and preprocessing the data prior to statistical analysis, extracting descriptive statistics from the target data, and performing inferential statistical analysis to identify features about the parent population(s). This role also includes leveraging state of the art and open-source software packages, such as SAS, R, PyTorch, and others to build automated pipelines to streamline data analyses. The developer will research and develop applications leveraging exploratory data analysis, machine learning techniques, and assist in transition to production applications through software prototypes and experimentation. The role applies proven problem-solving, analytical and communication skills to successfully apply complex techniques and tools to automate the analysis of large, complex data.",3.8,"Edaptive Computing, Inc.
3.8","Dayton, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Position: Data Scientist Required: SQL, Python Pandas, PowerBI, Bachelor’s Degree Description: Job Summary: The Data Scientist is responsible for development of reports, analytics, and various analytics and machine learning model for a variety of business needs and requests, in addition to working directly with business personnel to gather requirements and incorporate feedback into deliverables. Assignments include developing new machine learning models using a variety of data sources, developing various user-ingested reports and dashboards, and developing various queries for report and user needs. This position works closely with all levels of the organization to ensure user-friendly and accurate reports, dashboards, and analytical models. Leadership Level: Informal Leader - No direct reports Description: Works daily independently and in groups with members across the organization while performing own job; may contribute to report/model development decision making regarding technical and business processes. May provide feedback on team member/co-worker performance to immediate supervisor. Decision Making Level: Limited (Individual Contributor) Description: Typically resolves straightforward and complex problems or problems that have routine solutions; moderate independent discretion; operates under direct supervision. Responsibilities: 60% - Coding, Model Building, and Report Development – Create code to extract data in accurate and required format for end-user ingestion. Develop front end reports to allow dynamic insights and representations of data for end-user down stream usage and work management. Create analytics models to provide insights and actionable information for the business to improve and optimize their workload. 20% - Liaison and project management – Work with various areas of the business to gather requirements, review reports, discuss feedback, gain approvals on deliverables. 20% - Group meetings, status updates, and learning – Participate in group meetings on general direction of the team and updates on overarching topics. Provide status updates on a regular cadence on ongoing work items. Learn various elements of the WEC system and business processes to ensure accurate reports and analytics models. Minimum Experience Required: 1+ years: Standard computer applications (Word, Excel, Power Point, etc.) to generate reports, create pertinent documentation and supply information to relevant parties. 5+ years: Experience with developing reports and SQL with various reporting platforms (SSRS, PowerBI, Tableu). 5+ years: Experience with developing analytics models utilizing various machine learning and analytical tools (eg: Python Pandas). Qualifications: Degree: Bachelor’s Degree preferred Area of Study: Engineering, Computer Science. In lieu of a Bachelor's degree, 8+ years of data scientist work experience will be considered. Preferred: Utility experience, Project Management experience, experience with PowerBI, AWS, and python Pandas",4.3,"Intone Networks
4.3","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Roles & Responsibilities: Provides support of Artificial Intelligence (AI), to include machine learning, to analyze data for accuracy, authenticity, expectancy, timeliness, relevancy, intelligence gaps, and viability. Identifies and develops innovative investigative, statistical, and predictive value of DEA’s data holdings by evaluating through data analysis and integration. Interprets results from multiple sources using a variety of techniques, ranging from simple data aggregation via statistical analysis to complex data mining. Prepares big data, implements data models, and develops databases to support the business solutions. Works on complex technical projects or business issues requiring state of the art technical or industry knowledge. Develops, deploys, and manages statistical, unsupervised, and supervised Learning Data Models with accuracy, precision, and sensitivities. Performs mathematical/statistician modeling to organize, optimize, model, research, mine, and predict new data. Identifies accuracies, precision, and sensitivities. Validates machine learning with statistical modeling. Designs algorithms such as neural networks, decision trees, and surrogate models. Uses Data Lakes, chunking, large file shares, or increased time limits for storage needs; uses serverless computing like Athena/Lambda to handle concurrency, or increased time limits; and uses extract, transform, load standard data formats, or parsing due to lack of infrastructure.",-1,Ai Vantage,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist (Strategic Insights),$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Why PlayStation?
PlayStation isn't just the Best Place to Play — it's also the Best Place to Work. Today, we're recognized as a global leader in entertainment producing The PlayStation family of products and services including PlayStation®5, PlayStation®4, PlayStation®VR, PlayStation®Plus, acclaimed PlayStation software titles from PlayStation Studios, and more.
PlayStation also strives to create an inclusive environment that empowers employees and embraces diversity. We welcome and encourage everyone who has a passion and curiosity for innovation, technology, and play to explore our open positions and join our growing global team.
The PlayStation brand falls under Sony Interactive Entertainment, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Sony Corporation.",4.0,"PlayStation Global
4.0","San Mateo, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Join the industry leader to design the next generation of breakthroughs
Sr. Data Scientist
Honeywell is a Fortune 100 company that invents and manufactures technologies to address critical challenges linked to global macrotrends such as safety, security, productivity, global urbanization and energy. With approximately 129,000 employees worldwide, including more than 19,000 engineers and scientists, Honeywell has an unrelenting focus on quality, delivery, value, and technology in everything they make and do. Honeywell has been named a Top 100 Global Innovator for seven years in a row, recognizing the company’s global reach of portfolio and invention influence.",4.0,"Honeywell
4.0","Kansas City, MO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Job ID: 2312600
Location: CHANTILLY, VA, US
Date Posted: 2023-09-12
Category: Information Technology
Subcategory: Data Scientist
Schedule: Full-time
Shift: Day Job
Travel: No


Covid Policy: SAIC does not require COVID-19 vaccinations or boosters. Customer site vaccination requirements must be followed when work is performed at a customer site.",4.0,"SAIC
4.0","Chantilly, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Secure our Nation, Ignite your Future
Join the top Information Technology and Analytic professionals in the industry to make invaluable contributions to our national security on a daily basis. In this innovative, self-contained, Big Data environment, the ManTech team is responsible for everything from infrastructure, to application development, to data science, to advanced analytics and beyond. The team is diverse, the questions are thought-provoking, and the opportunities for growth and advancement are numerous.
Currently, ManTech is seeking a motivated, career and customer-oriented Data Scientist to join our team in Chantilly, VA
Duties, Tasks & Responsibilities",4.3,"ManTech International Corporation
4.3","Chantilly, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Overview:
Overview
The successful candidate will be a Ph.D. level data scientist with knowledge in the life sciences, including protein structures, small compound analytics and broader LS/HC subject matter. The candidate will also be able to develop deep learning applications using Python as a primary tool, both to implement novel solutions and iterate on existing software solutions. The candidate will primarily work in a virtually distributed, dynamic and extensively experienced technical team.
Responsibilities:
Responsibilities for the Data Scientist will include:
Work closely with other data scientists and SMEs to develop DL/ML powered software features
Qualifications:",4.1,"Certara
4.1",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"You have a life. We like that about you.
At OCLC, we believe you'll do the best work of your life when you're living the best life possible.
We work hard to build the technology that connects thousands of today's libraries. But we also work hard to make a job at OCLC a meaningful part of a balanced life- not a substitute for one.
Technology with a Purpose. OCLC supports thousands of libraries in making information more accessible and more useful to people around the world. OCLC provides shared technology services, original research and community programs that help libraries meet the ever-evolving needs of their users, institutions, and communities. With office locations around the globe, OCLC employees are dedicated to offering premier services and software to help libraries.
The Job Details are as follows:
As a Senior Data Scientist, you will lead a technical team of data scientists and data engineers whose efforts seek to develop and communicate an understanding of OCLC’s global network of 10,000 libraries, their collections, and their patrons. The data science team collaborates with teams across the entire company, from Dublin, OH to our office in the Netherlands; they apply best practices and creative innovation to a diverse collection of OCLC’s largest datasets to extract meaningful understanding for our customers amidst the richness and heterogeneity of their collections and members. The team’s standards for excellence make them the leaders in OCLC’s innovation and product evolution, and they are expanding to make OCLC a force in the era of data-driven businesses.",3.4,"OCLC
3.4","Dublin, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, NLP",$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"About Ancestry:
When you join Ancestry, you join a human-centered company where every person’s story is important. We believe that by discovering the struggles and triumphs of our past, we can foster deeper bonds and more meaningful connections among families and communities. With more than 30+ billion digitized global historical records, 125+ million family trees, and 22+ million people in our growing AncestryDNA database, Ancestry helps customers discover their family story and gain a new level of understanding about their lives.

We are committed to our location flexible work approach, allowing you to choose to work in the nearest office, from your home, or a hybrid of both (subject to location restrictions and roles that are required to be in the office- see the full list of eligible US locations HERE). We will continue to hire and promote beyond the boundaries of our office locations, to enable broadened possibilities for employee diversity.

Together, we work every day to foster a work environment that's inclusive as well as diverse, and where our people can be themselves. Every idea and perspective is valued so that our products and services reflect the global and diverse clients we serve.

Ancestry encourages applications from minorities, women, the disabled, protected veterans and all other qualified applicants. Passionate about dedicating your work to enriching people’s lives? Join the curious.",3.5,"Ancestry
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"LOCATION: U.S. Eastern Time Zone
Must reside in the US – preferably in the Eastern Time Zone. Remote working permitted. Must be eligible to work in the US without sponsorship now or in the future. This is a full-time position with benefits. Contractors will not be considered for this position.

Who we are:
Enterra provides solutions that leverage sophisticated machine learning, artificial intelligence (ontologies, inference engines and rules) and natural language processing to provide highly actionable insights and recommendations to business users. Today, our solutions impact just about every aspect of the products you buy at your local store – from what is available to how it is priced and even where it is placed on the shelf. Our SolaaS (Solution as a Service) solutions are deployed within private clouds – principally on Azure.",4.5,"Enterra Solutions
4.5",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Posting Date: Sep 7, 2023
Location: Remote work, DE
Remote, GB
Business Area: Supply Chain Software
Company: Körber Supply Chain Software GmbH
Senior Data Scientist
We are looking for a senior data scientist with a strong background in forecasting and optimization to support the product development of our data and AI driven solutions in the supply chain management area. If you have a passion for AI, software engineering and modern software development principles you could be a great fit for our team.

Your role in our team",3.2,"Körber
3.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Jr. Engineer, Data Scientist",$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Salary Range: $90,000-$110,000 USD per year
Advanced Technology & Research Corporation (www.atrcorp.com) is seeking to fill the following full-time permanent position. Based in Maryland and incorporated in 1973, ATR is an equal-opportunity engineering company with a solid reputation in various engineering disciplines for the government and Fortune 500 commercial customers.
Salary for the position is competitive according to qualifications. ATR offers an attractive comprehensive benefits package, including Medical/Dental insurances, free basic life/ADD, and long-term and short-term disability insurances, 401(k) plan, educational assistance program, and paid time off.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, disability or veteran status.",3.5,"Advanced Technology and Research Corporation
3.5","Fort Lauderdale, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Job Responsibilities
Need someone with great forecasting skills
Need someone who can predict a value in the future that’s not 0 or 1
Demand forecasting
(Find someone out of the financial sector) – stock market, hedge fund, procurement, supply chain
Dimensionality reduction (what have you done in reducing dimensions?)
What have you done beyond ‘PCA’ principal component analysis?
Once we identify a candidate that has done more than PCA – we are cooking!",4.5,"Colsh Consultants
4.5","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Why We Exist
Every morning, 11,000 Americans wake up and begin their first day of retirement. While retirement should be an exciting, empowering, and fulfilling part of one's life, the reality today is that retirement brings along with it a fundamentally new set of challenges that make it an overwhelming time for many.

At Chapter, we believe that the current infrastructure for retirement is broken, and we're on a mission to fix it. We've started by building industry leading technology to solve the first major obstacle in retirement: navigating Medicare (healthcare coverage for retirees over 65). Our products help seniors sign up, choose an insurance plan, and leverage their plan after they are enrolled. And, unlike most Medicare advisors who only search plans that pay them, Chapter searches every Medicare option nationwide. This allows us to find savings and benefits that others miss.

But our ambition doesn't stop with Medicare — we seek to transform the way that Americans navigate and experience retirement. If this sounds exciting to you, we'd love to speak with you.",4.8,"Chapter
4.8","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Senior Data Scientist Job Description
Location: Austin, TX
About Us:
Valkyrie is an applied science firm that builds industry-defining custom AI, ML and Knowledge Engineering solutions. Our team of advanced data scientists support our clients from data normalization all the way through model deployment. Our work can be found across industry from SiriusXM, Activision, Chubb Insurance, and the Department of Defense, to name a few.
Senior Data Scientist Position:",4.8,"Valkyrie Intelligence
4.8","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Why is Health Advocate a great place to work? For starters, Health Advocate employees enjoy helping people every single day. Employees are given the training they need to do their jobs well, and they work with supervisors and staff who are supportive and friendly. Employees have room to grow, and many of Health Advocate's supervisors are promoted from within the company. Join our award winning team!
2023 Awards:
National Customer Service Association All-Stars Award: Service Organization of the Year.
Stevie® Awards for Sales & Customer Service: Customer Service Department of the Year - Healthcare, Pharmaceuticals, and Related Industries, Bronze Winner
Locations
Must be located within the Continental United States",2.8,"Health Advocate
2.8",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"As a Data Scientist, you will analyze complex mortgage and servicing operations data sets to extract valuable insights that can assist in making data-driven business decisions. You will need to understand the analytical use case and collaborate with available resources to comprehend the available data and determine the most suitable statistical/analytical model for the job. You will perform feature engineering and model selection. Once you have tested the model and obtained the desired results, you will present them using visualization tools like Power BI and “productionalize” the model for automated insights.
This is an excellent opportunity to join a fast-paced team and enhance your data scientist skills. The ideal candidate for this role should possess a solid background in data analysis, statistics, and machine learning, as well as exceptional problem-solving and communication abilities.",2.7,"Celink
2.7","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Position: Data Scientist
Location: Menlo Park CA or Remote
Qualification: Bachelors’ degree in Computer Science or a related field
Experience: 3-5yrs
Job description:
Design and develop software solutions to problems related to managing networks
consisting of a large number of devices;",4.7,"Teknatio
4.7","Menlo Park, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Currently seeking Data Scientist with clinical/health informatics expertise to include quantitative support (i.e., data science, ‘big data’ analysis and statistical analysis of clinical trials in order to provide Veterans, policymakers, providers and researchers with up-to-date information on military environmental exposures. Efforts shall include analysis of VA electronic medical record data (i.e., CDW; presentation of statistical findings that are consistent with VA, VHA, and Exposure Related Care Transformation Center/War Related Illness and Injury Study Center (EXPRT/WRIISC) strategic plans, policies, regulations, style guides, and publication standards; administrative support for research and evaluation protocols; and qualitative research support consistent with policies, regulations, style guides, and publication standards. Data Scientist requirements as follows:
Master of Science or more advanced degree with emphasis on databases, data architectures, and data structures, algorithms, statistics or equivalent.",-1,Extreme Data Technologies,"East Orange, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Position Summary
Do you want to build your brand by working for a leading consulting firm that drives eminence in the marketplace? Are you interested in leveraging your analytical skills and strategic ideas to improve mission execution? If so, Deloitte could be the place for you! Our Government and Public Services (GPS) Strategy and Analytics team brings deep industry expertise, rigorous analytical capabilities and a pragmatic mindset to help solve our client’s most complex business problems. Join our team and play a key role in helping to design our clients’ roadmap to the future and help transform the public sector marketplace.

Work You'll Do
In this role, the Data Scientist will work directly with our federal clients to define",4.0,"Deloitte
4.0","Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Job Number 23127284
Job Category Sales & Marketing
Location Marriott International HQ, 7750 Wisconsin Avenue, Bethesda, Maryland, United States
Schedule Full-Time
Located Remotely? Y
Relocation? N
Position Type Management
JOB SUMMARY

Sr Data Scientist (multiple positions) – Bethesda, MD

:








Marriott International is the world’s largest hotel company, with more brands, more hotels and more opportunities for associates to grow and succeed. where you can do your best work, your purpose, to an amazing global team, and the best version of you.",4.0,"Marriott International, Inc
4.0","Bethesda, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Staff Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Make Your Mark::
Are you passionate about leveraging data-driven insights to drive strategic decision-making in the dynamic world of financial technology? We are seeking a talented and motivated Data Scientist to join our company. As a Data Scientist, you will play a critical role in unlocking the power of data to enhance our products, optimize operations, and create innovative solutions. You will also get to play a pivotal role in implementing cutting-edge AI solutions to drive innovation, enhance customer experience, and revolutionize financial services.
You'll Get To::
Data Analysis and Modeling: Extract, clean, and analyze large, complex datasets from various sources, including financial transactions, user behavior, and market data. Apply statistical techniques, data mining, and machine learning algorithms to develop predictive models and identify patterns, trends, and anomalies.

What You'll Bring::
We’re Even More Excited If You Have::

Thrive at BlackLine Because You Are Joining::

Salary Range:: USD $139,800.00 - USD $215,800.00",3.5,"BlackLine
3.5","Pleasanton, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Principal Data Scientist - DataML, Enterprise Data Science",$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Center 3 (19075), United States of America, McLean, Virginia
Principal Data Scientist - DataML, Enterprise Data Science
Data is at the center of everything we do. As a startup, we disrupted the credit card industry by individually personalizing every credit card offer using statistical modeling and the relational database, cutting edge technology in 1988! Fast-forward a few years, and this little innovation and our passion for data has skyrocketed us to a Fortune 200 company and a leader in the world of data-driven decision-making.
As a Data Scientist at Capital One, you’ll be part of a team that’s leading the next wave of disruption at a whole new scale, using the latest in computing and machine learning technologies and operating across billions of customer records to unlock the big opportunities that help everyday people save money, time and agony in their financial lives.









No agencies please. Capital One is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to diversity and inclusion in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, color, age, national origin, religion, physical and mental disability, genetic information, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity/assignment, citizenship, pregnancy or maternity, protected veteran status, or any other status prohibited by applicable national, federal, state or local law. Capital One promotes a drug-free workplace. Capital One will consider for employment qualified applicants with a criminal history in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable laws regarding criminal background inquiries, including, to the extent applicable, Article 23-A of the New York Correction Law; San Francisco, California Police Code Article 49, Sections 4901-4920; New York City’s Fair Chance Act; Philadelphia’s Fair Criminal Records Screening Act; and other applicable federal, state, and local laws and regulations regarding criminal background inquiries.",4.1,"Capital One
4.1","McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Junior Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Overview:
LMI is seeking a skilled Data Analyst at our headquarters office in Tysons, VA. Successful Data Analysts demonstrate competency in data analysis, data visualization, statistics, programming, project execution, and critical thinking.

LMI is a consultancy dedicated to improving the business of government, drawing from deep expertise in advanced analytics, digital services, logistics, and management advisory services. Established as a private, not-for-profit organization in 1961, LMI is a trusted third party to federal civilian and defense agencies, free of commercial and political bias. We operate completely free of political and commercial bias, and we are entirely aligned with the goals of our clients. Our clients value our specialized services in logistics, intelligence, homeland security, health care, and energy and environment markets. We believe government can make a difference, and we seek talented, hardworking people who share that conviction. We offer a generous compensation package with excellent benefits that start the first day of employment. Business casual dress, flex time, and tuition reimbursement are a few of our many work-life benefits available to our employees.
Responsibilities:
Qualifications:",4.2,"Logistics Management Institute
4.2",,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Machine Learning Engineer,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Craft:
Technology & Development
Job Description:
Activision Blizzard Media and King (a part of Activision-Blizzard) are building a new team to introduce innovative, impactful, and rewarding advertising experiences to our huge audience of highly-engaged players, and to create powerful marketing solutions embraced by the world's biggest marketers. Activision Blizzard Media is seeking a passionate Data Scientist interested in pushing the boundaries of mobile games analytics and advertising product performance.
Your role within our Kingdom
In the U.S., the standard base pay range for this role is $101,000.00 - $186,754.00 Annual. This base pay range is for the U.S. and is not applicable to locations outside of the U.S. Actual amounts will vary depending on experience, performance and location. In addition to a competitive base pay, employees in this role may be eligible for incentive compensation. Incentive compensation is not guaranteed.",3.5,"Activision
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Co-op - Masters Degree,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"About the Company
At Torc, we have always believed that autonomous vehicle technology will transform how we travel, move freight, and do business.
A leader in autonomous driving since 2007, Torc has spent over a decade commercializing our solutions with experienced partners. Now a part of the Daimler family, we are focused solely on developing software for automated trucks to transform how the world moves freight.
Join us and catapult your career with the company that helped pioneer autonomous technology, and the first AV software company with the vision to partner directly with a truck manufacturer.",4.3,"Torc Robotics
4.3","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Intermediate Data Scientist,$113K - $204K (Employer est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.
None
Suitability - FAA
Onsite
Benefits information may be found here",3.0,"The MITRE Corporation
3.0","McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Do you have a passion for data science, machine learning and AI ? Do you want to apply it to protect millions of customers using Microsoft online services from threat actors around the globe ? Are you curious, analytical, and motivated by new challenges? If so, we would like to hear from you!

The Microsoft Security Response Center team (MSRC) is seeking a Data Scientist to meet the growing demand and challenges of cybersecurity and threat protection. As a Data Dcientist on our team, you will partner with our engineers, other data scientists, and researchers to experiment, design, build, and deploy statistical, machine learning, and AI models to protect the Microsoft Cloud against known and emerging cyberattacks. In your day-to-day work, you will perform data analysis on big data, find useful insights, perform hypothesis testing, experiment with models, vet experiments, incorporate quality monitors, and ship successful models to productions.

You will have the opportunity to collaborate with partners across Microsoft who have decades of security, research, and ML expertise and the tools and technologies to grow your expertise in this field.








Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.3,"Microsoft
4.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Generative AI,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Why Mayo Clinic

Mayo Clinic is top-ranked in more specialties than any other care provider according to U.S. News & World Report. As we work together to put the needs of the patient first, we are also dedicated to our employees, investing in competitive compensation and comprehensive benefit plans – to take care of you and your family, now and in the future. And with continuing education and advancement opportunities at every turn, you can build a long, successful career with Mayo Clinic. You’ll thrive in an environment that supports innovation, is committed to ending racism and supporting diversity, equity and inclusion, and provides the resources you need to succeed.


Responsibilities

















Exempt



$159,973 - $231,962/ year. Education, experience and tenure may be considered along with internal equity when job offers are extended.



Yes



Full Time



80



M-F, daytime hours



N/A



No










Laura Percival",3.9,"Mayo Clinic
3.9","Rochester, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Decision Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"At PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL), we believe that every person has the right to participate fully in the global economy. Our mission is to democratize financial services to ensure that everyone, regardless of background or economic standing, has access to affordable, convenient, and secure products and services to take control of their financial lives.
Job Description Summary: The Global Collections Strategy team is seeking a Decision Scientist with prior Collections and Digital Channels experience to join our organization. The ideal candidate will possess a highly developed technical skillset (SQL, Python, etc), as well as the business acumen to distill analytical results into actionable outcomes. Frequent collaboration with cross-border stakeholder teams is required as part of this role.
Job Description:
PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $84500 to $204600",4.0,"PayPal
4.0",Arkansas,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Lead Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Remote
High performing team members. Challenging projects. A stable and profitable company. And a great place to work! This is what you can expect if you join the Quisitive team. Founded in 2016, Quisitive is a publicly traded, global Microsoft partner specializing in Microsoft platform and complementary technologies, custom solutions, and offerings that drive digital transformation and business value for enterprise customers. Our team of professionals has a long history of successfully delivering award-winning Microsoft solutions, and our culture of continual learning ensures that we remain committed to Microsoft’s long-term strategy. Quisitive was recently named the 2023 Microsoft US Health and Life Sciences AND Solution Assessments Partner of the Year.",3.5,"Quisitive
3.5",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, AI Expertise",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Position
Data Scientist, AI Expertise

Profile
Job ID: 234872
Location Name: CA-FSC SF Off (0174)
Address: 350 Mission St, 20th Floor, San Francisco, CA 94105, United States (US)
Job Type: Full Time
Position Type: Regular
Job Function: Information Technology
Hybrid Schedule",3.7,"Sephora USA
3.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Position Description
Create and refine predictive algorithms that support the numerous product offerings as well as the overall client satisfaction initiatives for Pareto IntelligenceTM
Participate in all project phases from concept, requirements, development, test, and production support
Explore and understand new big data and analytic technologies that enable faster and more efficient system operations, ultimately delivering timely insights and models
Ensure the security, confidentiality, and integrity of client information",3.6,"Pareto Intelligence
3.6","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist
Internal Medicine - Cardiology
83563BR
University Job Title
Data Scientist 1
Bargaining Unit
None - Not included in the union (Yale Union Group)
Time Type",4.2,"Yale University
4.2","New Haven, CT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"We’re committed to being the clean energy leader in Louisiana. By investing in renewables like solar and utilizing carbon capture and sequestration technology to make our air cleaner, we’re in this for the long haul, because our state and future generations depend on it. Come be a part of our journey at Cleco where we're Energizing Your Tomorrow.
The Data Scientist is an experienced professional with knowledge of and some experience with data analytics principles, practices, concepts, and theories. The incumbent is responsible for modeling complex business problems and discovering business insights through statistical, algorithmic, mining, and visualization techniques. The incumbent contributes to building and developing the organization’s data infrastructure and supports the senior leadership with insights, management reports, and analysis for the decision-making processes.
Key Responsibilities",4.2,"Cleco
4.2","Pineville, LA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Product Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"At PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL), we believe that every person has the right to participate fully in the global economy. Our mission is to democratize financial services to ensure that everyone, regardless of background or economic standing, has access to affordable, convenient, and secure products and services to take control of their financial lives.
Job Description Summary: What you need to know about the role At PayPal, we continue to push the boundary of what technology can help people around the world accomplish. For that, we are seeking far and wide for that select handful of exceptional world-class problem solvers with a passion for data insights and a relentless execution focus. Meet our team Digital Wallet team focuses on improving the app and web experiences of our customers to help them transact in a secure and fast manner. This is a cross functional team that works with different business lines to optimize and personalize the experience for 100M+ customers that login and transact every month
PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $72700 to $176000",4.0,"PayPal
4.0","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"The ideal candidate will love working with data; be extremely curious; have good analytical intuition; want to get their hands dirty; want to lead a small, innovative team that directly affects the bottom line; and want to work from an ownership perspective by operating cross-functionally to implement solutions.
Candidate will have experience and knowledge in the following areas:
Managing/developing analysts: significant experience in leading a team of advanced analysts is very important to this job. This will involve guiding and assessing their work, teaching them skills, identifying new skills for them to acquire, and managing their projects within the larger scope of the company’s needs.
Analysis and modeling: significant experience in data analysis and advanced statistical modeling. The person needs to have used advanced data mining and modeling to support/drive business decisions and then implemented the findings within a business process used in the company. It is also beneficial if the candidate has experience with natural language processing and blockchain technologies. Below are some of the analytical tools the person should know well or have used.",-1,"DMA Associates, LLC",Pennsylvania,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"You will collaborate with the brightest technical minds in building futuristic products, researching groundbreaking concepts, and influencing new ideas to transform retail. If you want to make meaningful contributions and reinvent the retail space that will impact millions of guests, Target is for you.
About This Opportunity: Responsible for the development of high performance, distributed computing tasks using Big Data technologies such as Hadoop, NoSQL, text mining and other distributed environment technologies based on the needs of the organization. Designs and drives the creation of new standards and best practices in the use of statistical data modeling, big data and optimization tools. Deploy data-science and technology based algorithmic solutions to address business needs for our customers
Utilize recommender systems, collaborative filtering techniques, propensity modeling to drive our customer's business priorities
Qualifications: Msc - Statistics / Math or PhD in any stream

Experience of Regression/Linear Analysis
Experience with any of Deep Learning, Distributed RF, Generalized Linear Model,K-Mean and naive Bayes
Experience with designing algorithms on Hadoop ecosystem
Experience with recommendation systems
A strong passion for empirical research and for answering hard questions with data
Excellent written and verbal communication skills",-1,ANALYTOS,"Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"The Position
WHO WE ARE
Our Strategic Analytics & Intelligence (SAI) team isn’t just deciphering data. We’re here to help solve the world’s most complex healthcare challenges and improve the lives of patients.
With a mix of competitive intelligence, market research, data science, advanced analytics, access, and forecasting, SAI unlocks key insights for our internal partners that ultimately benefit healthcare providers and patients. Even if you’ve never worked in biotech, you’ll establish yourself as an expert alongside other specialists. Plus, you can gain new experiences across marketing disciplines, therapeutic areas, and commercial operations. The entire time, you’ll be surrounded by a diverse and inclusive team that aims to reflect the world we serve.",4.2,"Genentech
4.2","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job Title
Data Scientist
Job Description
We are looking for a data scientist to support evidence generation on Philips' Image Guided Therapy (IGT) devices and therapies from large-scale biomedical datasets, namely healthcare claims and hospital administrative data.
Your Challenge:
This role will work closely with our senior data scientist and data engineer as well as members of cross functional teams such as: data/solutions architecture, clinical affairs, business development, research & development, biostats, and health economics and outcomes research. This high-impact role will make direct contributions to highly visible projects such as new product introductions, obtaining market access for a specific product, continuous post-market surveillance, and pilots of emerging engineering technologies that are candidates for integration into current workflows.",3.6,"Philips
3.6","Plymouth, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Staff Data Scientist - Marketing,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"We're transforming the grocery industry
At Instacart, we invite the world to share love through food because we believe everyone should have access to the food they love and more time to enjoy it together. Where others see a simple need for grocery delivery, we see exciting complexity and endless opportunity to serve the varied needs of our community. We work to deliver an essential service that customers rely on to get their groceries and household goods, while also offering safe and flexible earnings opportunities to Instacart Personal Shoppers.
Instacart has become a lifeline for millions of people, and we're building the team to help push our shopping cart forward. If you're ready to do the best work of your life, come join our table.",3.6,"Instacart
3.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"REMOTE - LOUISVILLE, KY
Bamboo Health is a leader in cloud-based care coordination software and analytics solutions focused on patients with complex needs, including those suffering from physical health and mental health issues and substance use disorders. We are driven by our mission of enabling better care for patients across the continuum. Our software solutions help healthcare professionals collaborate on shared patients across the spectrum of care. Join us in improving healthcare for all!
Summary:
The Data Scientist will live and breathe data and be excited about building user-facing data products. They will work with the Product Development team, Health Data Science team, other internal stakeholders, and external stakeholders to develop data-driven solutions powered by our unique data pipeline. The Data Scientist will excel at creative problem solving, cross-team collaboration, and thinking independently about how to utilize data to address the challenges our customers face.",3.4,"Bamboo Health
3.4","Louisville, KY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Pay range: $91,645 to $140,700 per year
In addition to your salary, Target cares about and invests in you as a team member, so that you can take care of yourself and your family. Target offers eligible team members and their dependents comprehensive health benefits and programs, which may include medical, vision, dental, life insurance and more, to help you and your family take care of your whole selves. Other benefits for eligible team members include 401(k), employee discount, short term disability, long term disability, paid sick leave, paid national holidays, and paid vacation. Find competitive benefits from financial and education to well-being and beyond at https://corporate.target.com/careers/benefits.
Target Enterprise, Inc. seeks a full-time Senior Data Scientist based at our office in Minneapolis, MN. The Senior Data Scientist is part of the Target Data & Analytics team which creates the tools and data products to sustainably educate and enable business partners to make great data-based decisions at Target. This position requires a Master’s degree or equivalent in Quantitative Management, Analytics, Data Science or related field and 1 year related experience. Must also have experience (which may have been gained concurrently) with each of the following: (1) performing data wrangling in preparation for data analysis, statistical modelling, and feature engineering on complex big data; (2) analyzing data and applying analytical techniques (including regression, clustering, and classification) to generate statistical analysis, models, and tests to generate actionable insights; (3) generating accuracy metrics and reports on the performance of the models to be effectively communicated to business leaders through data visualization tools; (4) querying large databases with SQL and HQL; and (5) working with the following programming language and technologies: Python, R, Jupyter, SQL, Hadoop/Hive, and Github. Will accept experience gained before, during or after Master’s program. Position includes a telecommute benefit within commuting distance to a Minneapolis-area Target office, as directed. Please apply online at https://corporate.target.com/careers, or send your resume to Target.Recruitment@target.com

Qualifications:",3.6,"TARGET
3.6","Minneapolis, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Data Governance Foundation",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Company Description
Block is one company built from many blocks, all united by the same purpose of economic empowerment. The blocks that form our foundational teams — People, Finance, Counsel, Hardware, Information Security, Platform Infrastructure Engineering, and more — provide support and guidance at the corporate level. They work across business groups and around the globe, spanning time zones and disciplines to develop inclusive People policies, forecast finances, give legal counsel, safeguard systems, nurture new initiatives, and more. Every challenge creates possibilities, and we need different perspectives to see them all. Bring yours to Block.
Job Description",3.7,"Afterpay
3.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Lead Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Details
Department: Ascension Data Science Institute
Schedule: Full-time / Monday - Friday / Days
Location: Fully Remote

Benefits
Paid time off (PTO)
Various health insurance options & wellness plans
Retirement benefits including employer match plans
Long-term & short-term disability
Employee assistance programs (EAP)
Parental leave & adoption assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Ways to give back to your community",3.4,"Ascension
3.4",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist/machine Learning Engineer,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Our client, which is a large communications company based in Plano, TX needs to fill the contractor role very quickly. This position will define data requirements, gather and mine large scale of structured and unstructured data, and validate data by running various data tools in the Big Data Environment. This function needs to support the standardization, customization and ad-hoc data analysis, and will develop the mechanisms to ingest, analyze, validate, normalize and clean data. Implements statistical data quality procedures on new data sources, and by applying rigorous iterative data analytics, supports Data Scientists in data sourcing and preparation to visualize data and synthesize insights of commercial value. Will work with Big Data Policy and Security teams and Legal to create data policy and develop interfaces and retention models which requires synthesizing or anonymizing data. Develop and maintain data engineering best practices and contribute to Insights on data analytics and visualization concepts, methods and techniques.",4.5,"Colsh Consultants
4.5","Monmouth Junction, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Durham, NC | Austin, TX | Remote | Full Time
Data Scientist
We're looking for Data Scientists to work on our core and business products to help shape the future of what we build at Hyperspace Ventures. You will enjoy working with various data sets, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into real products on a regular basis. The perfect candidate will have a background in a quantitative or technical field, will have experience working with large data sets, and will have some experience in data-driven decision making. You are focused on results, a self-starter, and have demonstrated success in using analytics to drive the understanding, growth, and success of a product.

Responsibilities:",4.2,"Hyperspace Ventures
4.2","Durham, NC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Position Summary
Supports customer analytics by implementing and managing day to day delivery of Customer Analytics including Customer Experience Metrics and Analysis, collaborate with offshore resources in the development of Customer Analytics data systems, data bases and design processes. The incumbent will also be responsible to develop methodology to model relationships between multivariate operational metrics, customer survey data, and customer experience data. Incumbent will perform complex quantitate and qualitative analysis to support customer experience improvement. Make recommendations regarding customer experience analytics.
Major Responsibilities
Perform quantitative and qualitative analysis using traditional and advanced analytical models, tools and techniques, including trending, correlation, forecasting,",3.5,"Penske Truck Leasing and Logistics
3.5","Beachwood, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job #:
req24057

Organization:
World Bank

Sector:
Economics

Grade:
GF

Term Duration:",4.1,"World Bank Group
4.1","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Statistician/Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job ID: 2312395
Location: SPRINGFIELD, VA, US
Date Posted: 2023-09-12
Category: Information Technology
Subcategory: Data Scientist
Schedule: Full-time
Shift: Day Job
Travel: No




Covid Policy: SAIC does not require COVID-19 vaccinations or boosters. Customer site vaccination requirements must be followed when work is performed at a customer site.",4.0,"SAIC
4.0","Springfield, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Company Overview
At Motorola Solutions, we believe that everything starts with safety. It’s the constant that empowers people to confidently move forward. It can fill a flight or sell out a stadium. It can care for a patient or graduate a class.

As a global leader in public safety and enterprise security, we create and connect the technologies that help to keep people safe where they live, learn, work and play. Our integrated technology ecosystem unifies critical communications, video security and access control, and command center software, enabling collaboration in more powerful ways.

At Motorola Solutions, we’re ushering in a new era in public safety and security. Bring your passion, potential and talents to a career that matters.

Motorola Solutions creates innovative, mission-critical communication solutions and services that help public safety and commercial customers build safer cities and thriving communities around the world. We look for the most advanced problems solvers - like you - to help us create technologies that rise to the challenges of our customers. To connect firemen to policemen to emergency responders to nurses to specialists to lives saved. To protect communities, grow businesses and make work safer and more efficient. Motorola Solutions is looking for a self motivated individuals to help drive the next generation public safety experience, and to work with a team of top experienced professionals to enable mission critical services and solutions.






Yes",4.0,"Motorola Solutions
4.0","Schaumburg, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Sales Insights",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"About Us:
We're on a mission to make it possible for every person, team, and company to be able to tailor their software to solve any problem and take on any challenge. Computers may be our most powerful tools, but most of us can't build or modify the software we use on them every day. At Notion, we want to change this with focus, design, and craft.
We've been working on this together since 2016, and have customers like Pixar, Mitsubishi, Figma, Plaid, Match Group, and thousands more on this journey with us. Today, we're growing fast and excited for new teammates to join us who are the best at what they do. We're passionate about building a company as diverse and creative as the millions of people Notion reaches worldwide.
Notion is an in person company, and currently requires its employees to come to the office for two Anchor Days (Mondays & Thursdays) and requests that employees spend the majority of their week in the office (including a third day).",4.9,"Notion
4.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Healthcare Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Employment Type:
Full time
Shift:
Day Shift
Description:
REMOTE or ON-SITE WORK AVAILABLE
** Please note that we are not able to offer Visa Sponsorship for this position**

Position Summary:",3.1,"Loyola University Health System
3.1","Maywood, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist -AI/ML (remote),$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"JOB DESCRIPTION
Do you have a passion for machine learning / deep learning? Are you excited about using your skills to help individuals improve their health?

Our Data Science team applies Advanced Analytics, Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning to produce solutions that reduce customer healthcare costs and improve outcomes and business processes.
ROLE SUMMARY
Your work will require deep acquaintance with MultiPlan’s data, seeking to find ways to deliver value through advanced feature engineering. From your models you will deliver actionable insights that can be incorporated into existing products as well as new programs. As a data scientist part of a cross functional team you will work closely with Data & Engineering to deliver production ready code that is robust and ready to scale.

The ideal candidate for this role will have strong coding skills (preferably in Python), a passion for creating technology to improve health care, and an attitude of creativity and continual learning. You’ll enjoy the flexibility to work remotely * from anywhere within the U.S. as you take on some tough challenges.",3.7,"MultiPlan Inc.
3.7","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job Description
Our company stands at the crossroads of healthcare as a leading entity, armed with a broad continuum of prescription medicines, vaccines, and animal health products. But our ambition reaches beyond today; we’re constructing a progressive healthcare company prepared to foster a healthier tomorrow for all.
The secret to our continued success? That’s where you come in. We believe that your integrity, knowledge, innovation, skill and diversity, together with an unwavering commitment to teamwork, are the engine of our excellence. We’re devoted to nurturing a work environment defined by mutual respect, encouragement, and collaboration.
As part of our global ensemble, you’ll be given the chance to work with talented individuals while enhancing and expanding your own career. In the Data Science team in HR, your role is crucial. You’ll translate business needs into data-driven research projects and products, shedding light on our company’s talent.


$118,640.00 - $186,800.00

Regular
No relocation
No
10%
Remote Work
1st - Day
No
N/A

Business Intelligence (BI), Database Design, Data Engineering, Data Modeling, Data Science, Data Visualization, Machine Learning, Project Management, Software Development, Stakeholder Relationships

Agile Application Development, Agile Application Development, Azure Machine Learning Studio, Cloud Computing, Cloud Infrastructure, Coaching, Collaboration Tools, Communication, Computer Engineering, Computer Networking, Data Analysis, Databricks Platform, Data Research, Deployment Software, Enterprise Software Management, HR Information Management, Human Capital, Human Capital Management Systems, Human Resource Management, Information Systems, Initiative Activity, Innovation, Leadership, Machine Learning Algorithms, Mechanical Engineering {+ 8 more}",4.2,"Merck Sharp & Dohme
4.2","Rahway, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Specialist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Note: While this is a fully remote position, we can only consider those whose legal residence is in Texas, Colorado, Missouri, Virginia, Maryland, and Illinois.

All correspondence related to this position will come from a Juristat hiring manager or authorized recruiter. Protect yourself against scammers who imitate company job listings. Read more about how to protect yourself against these scams here.
This is an entry-level position with a salary range of $30-$35k/year, plus overtime (not required). There is room for potential growth into leadership, training/development, technical, or revenue positions. We at Juristat pride ourselves on our positive work culture and DEI initiatives. See our career page and our DEI page for more. We offer a fully remote work environment, flexible work times, unlimited PTO, multiple health insurance plan choices, a 401k, and company-funded equipment.",-1,Juristat,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Lead Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job Information
Competence
Development
Level of Experience
Senior
Industry
Banking",4.5,"Rinf
4.5",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, AI Expertise",$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Job ID: 234872
Location Name: CA-FSC SF Off (0174)
Address: 350 Mission St, 20th Floor, San Francisco, CA 94105, United States (US)
Job Type: Full Time
Position Type: Regular
Job Function: Information Technology
Remote Eligible:Hybrid Schedule

Company Overview:
At Sephora we inspire our customers, empower our teams, and help them become the best versions of themselves. We create an environment where people are valued, and differences are celebrated. Every day, our teams across the world bring to life our purpose: to expand the way the world sees beauty by empowering the Extra Ordinary in each of us. We are united by a common goal - to .",3.7,"Sephora
3.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, AI Expertise",$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Job ID: 234872
Location Name: CA-FSC SF Off (0174)
Address: 350 Mission St, 20th Floor, San Francisco, CA 94105, United States (US)
Job Type: Full Time
Position Type: Regular
Job Function: Information Technology
Remote Eligible:Hybrid Schedule

Company Overview:
At Sephora we inspire our customers, empower our teams, and help them become the best versions of themselves. We create an environment where people are valued, and differences are celebrated. Every day, our teams across the world bring to life our purpose: to expand the way the world sees beauty by empowering the Extra Ordinary in each of us. We are united by a common goal - to .",3.7,"Sephora
3.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist / Statistician,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Description:

Company Description
BeVera Solutions, LLC is a fast-growing Data Science Consulting provider focused on delivering high-value solutions to its Federal Government customers. BeVera places a high premium on Integrity and Respect for all employees. Our CEO values every employee and fosters that attitude throughout the company. We offer competitive compensation packages as well as interesting and important work assignments. BeVera is striving to be recognized as one of the best places to work in America.
Job Description
BeVera is seeking a highly motivated and experienced Data Scientist to work as part of a multidisciplinary team to support the CDC’s newly formed Center for Forecasting and Analysis (CFA). CFA’s goal is to enable timely, effective decision-making to improve outbreak responses. BeVera is looking for a qualified, experienced, data scientist to provide data modeling, forecasting, analysis, and systems integration to respond to outbreaks in real-time, driving effective decision making.
Requirements:",5.0,"BeVera Solutions LLC
5.0",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"To get the best candidate experience, please consider applying for a maximum of 3 roles within 12 months to ensure you are not duplicating efforts.
About Futureforce University Recruiting
Our Futureforce University Recruiting program is dedicated to attracting, retaining and cultivating talent. Our interns and new graduates work on real projects that affect how our business runs, giving them the opportunity to make a tangible impact on the future of our company. With offices all over the world, our recruits have the chance to collaborate and connect with fellow employees on a global scale. We offer job shadowing, mentorship programs, talent development courses, and much more.
Job Category
Software Engineering









Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance and the Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring, Salesforce will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.
For New York-based roles, the base salary hiring range for this position is $ to $.",4.1,"Salesforce
4.1","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Analytics & Insights",$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist, Analytics & Insights

Our Mission is to be #1 by creating a better life for our customers. At LG Electronics, we make products and services that make lives better, easier and happier through increased functionality and fun. Put simply, we offer the latest innovations to make “Life Good”! As a global leader, we strive for greatness not only in the products we make but in our people. That is why we are currently seeking the newest innovator to join our dynamic team as Data Scientist located in Englewood Cliffs, NJ. This role is onsite in our NJ office.",2.9,"LG Electronics U.S.
2.9","Englewood Cliffs, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Do you enjoy solving problems, looking at problems through a different lens, and working closely with customers to innovate new solutions to complex problems? Do you jump with excitement at the opportunity to identify trends and provide unique business solutions? Do you want to join a team where learning about a new technology or solution is part of our work every day?

The Industry Solutions Engineering (ISE) team is a global engineering organization that works directly with customers looking to leverage the latest technologies to address their toughest challenges. We work closely with our customers’ engineers to jointly develop code for cloud-based solutions that can accelerate their organization. We work in collaboration with Microsoft product teams, partners, and open-source communities to empower our customers to do more with the cloud. We pride ourselves in making contributions to open source and making our platforms easier to use.








Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.3,"Microsoft
4.3",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Dependency Planning",$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"We are hiring a Product Data Scientist for the Coordinate Area in New York to join our new Dependency Planning team. The Coordinate Area has a mission to make it effortless to plan work, do work, and adapt plans together as a team. The Dependency Planning team's vision is to enable teams to plan their work and adapt those plans effortlessly in real-time. The team will achieve their vision by allowing users to model & visualize the relationships between projects, tasks, and time. As a data scientist for this team, you will be critical in informing the team's product strategy and roadmap through rigorous data analyses and insights.
The Data Science team at Asana is instrumental in enabling Asana's mission by instilling a data-influenced approach to building the product or business strategy, defining and measuring success metrics, learning, and iterating to deliver value to our users. Data Scientists closely partner with Product, Business, Design, Engineering, and other Data team members. We leverage experimentation, statistical modelling and machine learning techniques, causal inference, and data storytelling to deepen our understanding of Asana customers and make optimal decisions to drive more business value.",4.3,"Asana
4.3","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Responsibilities:
Peraton is looking for a Senior Data Scientist to join us in supporting USSTRATCOM on the ITCC II program. In this role, you’ll serve as a key member of the Engineering team providing subject matter expertise in support of the USSTRATCOM Command Data and Artificial Intelligence directorate.

Key responsibilities include supporting USSTRATCOM customers and their artificial intelligence and machine learning requirements through complex analytics, data science activities, generation of advances in ML algorithms, maximize use of Generative AI approaches, and the application of AI-enabled by these three pillars.

What you’ll do:
The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for the following but not limited to:
Qualifications:




Peraton Overview:
Target Salary Range: $146,000 - $234,000. This represents the typical salary range for this position based on experience and other factors. EEO: An Equal Opportunity Employer including Disability/Veteran.",3.6,"Peraton
3.6","Offutt A F B, NE",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Career Consulting Data Scientist - National - College Program 2024,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"WHO WE ARE
We’re Mercer – we believe in building brighter futures by redefining the world of work, reshaping retirement and investment outcomes, and unlocking real health and well-being. Mercer’s more than 25,000 employees are based in 44 countries and the firm operates in over 130 countries.
THE POSITION: CAREER CONSULTING DATA SCIENTIST
Mercer is uniquely qualified to help organizations design and execute sophisticated workforce strategies, whether it’s for a multinational organization or a local company attempting to grow within its market. We provide best-in-class consulting, rigorous analytics, and data-driven insights that help organizations make fact-based decisions.",3.9,"Mercer
3.9","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist / Machine Learning Specialist - Pharmaceutical Commercial Excellence,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Headquartered in Dublin, Ohio, Cardinal Health, Inc. (NYSE: CAH) is a global, integrated healthcare services and products company connecting patients, providers, payers, pharmacists, and manufacturers for integrated care coordination and better patient management. Backed by nearly 100 years of experience, with more than 50,000 employees in nearly 60 countries, Cardinal Health ranks among the top 20 on the Fortune 500.
Department Overview:
Pharma Commercial Digital Partner build & run automation, analytics, and artificial intelligence solutions
that drive success for Cardinal Health by creating material savings, efficiencies, and revenue growth



""""",3.6,"Cardinal Health
3.6",Texas,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Services",$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"StreetLight pioneered the use of Big Data analytics to shed light on how people, goods, and services move, empowering smarter, data-driven transportation decisions. The company applies proprietary machine-learning algorithms and data processing resources to measure travel patterns of vehicles, bicycles and pedestrians that enable complex transportation problem solving using analytics available on SaaS platform, StreetLight InSight®. Acquired by Jacobs as a subsidiary in February 2022, StreetLight continues to provide innovative digital solutions to help communities reduce congestion, improve safe and equitable transportation, and maximize the positive impact of infrastructure investment.

As a Data Scientist on our Services team, your role will be vital in shaping our services offerings. You will directly influence the success of our customers by developing data-driven solutions tailored to their unique needs. Utilizing your data science expertise, you will be tasked not only with the creation of these solutions but also with the proactive identification and validation of potential new services offerings.",4.7,"StreetLight Data
4.7",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"It's fun to work in a company where people truly BELIEVE in what they're doing!
Job Description Summary:
Job Overview:
Rocket's Data Modernization Business Unit aids customers in managing, governing, and maximizing the value of their enterprise data assets. Our clientele comprises many Fortune 500 companies, including some of the world's largest banks, insurance companies, and manufacturing organizations. We are currently seeking motivated and innovative individuals to join our applied machine learning team. This is an opportunity to play a crucial role in the continued evolution of our world-class solutions.

The Principal Data Scientist is a highly motivated and experienced individual proficient in advanced machine learning models, particularly language models, document understanding and analysis, and code generation. The role will involve understanding and adapting current research. The position requires a deep understanding of computational linguistics, image processing, and Python programming. The selected candidate will be part of a collaborative team dedicated to building, fine-tuning, and deploying state-of-the-art models to solve real-world problems in information management, data intelligence, content automation, audit, and analytics. This presents an opportunity to create tremendous business value as we assemble a world-class applied machine learning team.

You will set the team up for success, defining best practices, illustrating canonical methods, designing roadmaps, and recommending the best technologies for the task at hand.
The base salary range for this role is $144,200.00 - $180,250.00 /year. Exact compensation may vary based on skills, experience, and location.
.",4.2,"Rocket Software
4.2",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Specialist, Data Scientist",$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Overview
Data Scientist
Bring your ideas. Make history.
BNY Mellon offers an exciting array of future-forward careers at the intersection of business, finance, and technology. We are one of the world's top asset management and banking firms that manages trillions of dollars in assets, custody and/or administration. Known as the “bank of banks” - 97% of the world’s top banks work with us as we lead and serve our customers into the new era of digital.
With over 238 years of rich history and industry firsts, BNY Mellon has been built upon our proven ability to evolve, lead, and drive new ideas at every turn. Today, we’re approximately 50,000 employees across 35 countries with a culture that empowers you to grow, take risks, experiment and be yourself. This is what #LifeAtBNYMellon is all about.
We’re seeking a future team member in the role of Data Scientist to join our Corporate Treasury Engineering team. This role is located in Lake Mary, FL or Pittsburgh, PA – Hybrid.


Defines, develops, maintains and delivers strategic data science products that demonstrate the value and effectiveness of the organization.
Establish relationships with the business and engineering project teams to design, plan and implement data solutions.
Develops reports and prepares presentations on data analytics, data quality and innovations.
Develop and communicate insights leveraging the scientific method.
Get junior members to high performing levels by recognizing areas of strength and improvement and employing appropriate coaching and development techniques.


Bachelor’s degree or the equivalent combination of education and experience is required.
6-8 years of relevant experience in similar role. Experience in the securities or financial services industry is a plus.
Experience in Data Scientist role for software development team for large initiatives.
Knowledge of various Data Analytics, Data Engineering and Design approaches.
Awareness and experience with widely used tools and technology: Alteryx, Python, PowerBI, Jupyter and DevOps tools.
Jira, Confluence, GIT
Preferred to have experience in Data-thons.
At BNY Mellon, our inclusive culture speaks for itself. Here’s a few of our awards:
Fortune World’s Most Admired Companies & Top 20 for Diversity and Inclusion
Bloomberg’s Gender Equality Index (GEI)
Human Rights Campaign Foundation, 100% score Corporate Equality Index
IN – 100% score
100 Best Workplaces for Innovators, Fast Company
CDP’s Climate Change ‘A List’


BNY Mellon offers highly competitive compensation, benefits, and wellbeing programs rooted in a strong culture of excellence and our pay-for-performance philosophy. We provide access to flexible global resources and tools for your life’s journey. Focus on your health, foster your personal resilience, and reach your financial goals as a valued member of our team, along with generous paid leaves that can support you and your family through moments that matter.
BNY Mellon is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer - Underrepresented racial and ethnic groups/Females/Individuals with Disabilities/Protected Veterans.


For over 230 years, the people of BNY Mellon have been at the forefront of finance, expanding the financial markets while supporting investors throughout the investment lifecycle. BNY Mellon can act as a single point of contact for clients looking to create, trade, hold, manage, service, distribute or restructure investments and safeguards nearly one-fifth of the world's financial assets. BNY Mellon remains one of the safest, most trusted and admired companies. Every day our employees make their mark by helping clients better manage and service their financial assets around the world. Whether providing financial services for institutions, corporations or individual investors, clients count on the people of BNY Mellon across time zones and in 35 countries and more than 100 markets. It's the collective ambition, innovative thinking and exceptionally focused client service paired with a commitment to doing what is right that continues to set us apart. Make your mark: bnymellon.com/careers.


BNY Mellon is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. Minorities/Females/Individuals With Disabilities/Protected Veterans. Our ambition is to build the best global team – one that is representative and inclusive of the diverse talent, clients and communities we work with and serve – and to empower our team to do their best work. We support wellbeing and a balanced life, and offer a range of family-friendly, inclusive employment policies and employee forums.",3.6,"BNY Mellon
3.6","Lake Mary, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Statistician,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Working with Us
Challenging. Meaningful. Life-changing. Those aren’t words that are usually associated with a job. But working at Bristol Myers Squibb is anything but usual. Here, uniquely interesting work happens every day, in every department. From optimizing a production line to the latest breakthroughs in cell therapy, this is work that transforms the lives of patients, and the careers of those who do it. You’ll get the chance to grow and thrive through opportunities uncommon in scale and scope, alongside high-achieving teams rich in diversity. Take your career farther than you thought possible.
Bristol Myers Squibb recognizes the importance of balance and flexibility in our work environment. We offer a wide variety of competitive benefits, services and programs that provide our employees with the resources to pursue their goals, both at work and in their personal lives. Read more: careers.bms.com/working-with-us.",3.9,"Bristol Myers Squibb
3.9","New Brunswick, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Engineer, Data",$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Journey with us! Combine your career goals and sense of adventure by joining our exciting team of employees. Royal Caribbean Group is pleased to offer a competitive compensation & benefits package, and excellent career development opportunities, each offering unique ways to explore the world.
Position Overview:
Data Analytics & AI department at RCG is looking for a highly skilled and experienced Data Platform Engineer This role requires a strong technical background in data platform architecture, cloud computing, and big data technologies.
The Platform Engineer is responsible for the operation, and maintenance of computer systems and software applications, operating both the cloud (primarily Azure platform) and on-premises for the data team product. They support the architecture for the platform/infrastructure behind the products that helps analyze and process data in the way the organization needs it, making sure those systems are resilient, highly available and performing smoothly. The Engineer uses technical knowledge to solve business problems, by means of a systematic and disciplined approach, employing software, hardware, and/or communication technologies to accomplish assignments.",4.0,"Royal Caribbean Group
4.0",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"At Forge (NYSE: FRGE), we know our team is our greatest asset. As technology innovators in the private market, our vision is to deliver a richer future for everyone. We live that vision through our values of being bold, humble and accountable. We experience the value that our vision brings to the world every day, helping the teams behind the greatest innovations of our generation, from space travel to planet-saving, plant-based nutrition and more.
Our mission is to empower more people to exercise ownership in the world's leading private companies via a world-class technology platform with access to the largest network of buyers and sellers in the world. With liquidity solutions, exclusive data and insights, a custody offering, and a vibrant marketplace, Forge's goal is to build the best-in-class technology infrastructure to power a global private market that is transparent, accessible and seamless for companies, their employees and investors. Through Forge, employees can sell their private shares, employers can reward shareholders with pre-IPO liquidity and individual and institutional investors can participate in private unicorn growth.",4.3,"Forge Global
4.3","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"At Fulcrum, we provide cutting-edge data science consulting and software solutions to help companies solve challenging business problems. Through the utilization of our innovative products and dedicated team, clients are able to operate more efficiently, manage risk, and make informed business decisions every day. Fulcrum Analytics has stood at the forefront of data, analytics, and innovative software for over 25 years, offering sophisticated solutions, groundbreaking technologies, and winning strategies that help companies achieve their targeted results.
Role Description:
The Senior Data Scientist role is expected to develop analytical, statistical, and machine learning solutions to client business problems. The Senior Data Scientist will have a number of responsibilities, including:
Extract and manipulate data from various sources (databases, files, APIs, etc.); requires knowledge of how to deal with the inherent structure of the data.",-1,Fulcrum Analytics,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Advanced Analytics",$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"At Horizon Therapeutics, we define success by the number of lives touched, lives changed, and lives saved. Our global biotechnology company is made up of agile, out-of-the-box thinkers with a focus on delivering breakthrough medicines to those living with rare, autoimmune, and severe inflammatory diseases. This is the heart of our global mission. Start a career that enables you to live up to your potential and help others live up to theirs. Join us.
The exceptional support we provide patients and communities equally extends to our employees. We offer industry-leading and award-winning benefits, compensation and rewards programs that positively impact all areas of our employees’ personal and professional lives.
Position Summary:
The Data Science team at Horizon Therapeutics is looking for an extraordinary Data Scientist who is passionate about crafting data science solutions that drive impact for patients. In this role you will be leveraging cutting edge artificial intelligence, algorithms, and technology to influence decisions across the organization.",3.6,"Horizon
3.6","Deerfield, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"DLA Piper is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran. Job applicant poster viewing center.
About Us
DLA Piper is, at its core, bold, exceptional collaborative and supportive. Our people are the backbone, heart, and soul of our firm. Wherever you are in your professional journey, DLA Piper is a place you can engage in meaningful work and grow your career. Let’s see what we can achieve. Together.",3.9,"DLA Piper
3.9","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Overview:
We are looking for a lead data scientist who can help fuel our transition from the mundane to the magnificent through data driven design, analytics, and insights. If you love data and want to be at the tip of the innovation spear at QSC, you have to apply!

Base Pay Range $143,000 - $203,000

QSC thrives where innovative technology and compelling audio-visual experiences intersect. For over 50 years, QSC has pioneered the technology and solutions that enable immersive cinema, live performance audio, themed entertainment, digital collaboration and meeting experiences for our customers and partners around the world. A globally recognized innovator in the design, engineering, and manufacture of category leading high-performance loudspeakers, digital mixers, power amplifiers, audio processors, digital cinema solutions, and the Q-SYS™ software-based audio, video and control Ecosystem.

Responsibilities:






Qualifications:",4.0,"QSC, LLC
4.0","Costa Mesa, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr Data Scientist,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Data Science is at the core of our business. Our Data Scientists have dedicated themselves to excellence in applied quantitative disciplines such as mathematics, statistics and physics. We are seeking Senior Data Scientists to join us in our attempt to solve the extremely challenging problem of modeling and predicting the financial markets using sophisticated machine learning techniques. If you are passionate about collaborating with a world-renowned team of Data Scientists, Engineers and Researchers Voloridge could be the home for you.
You will work alongside prominent Data Scientists, Kaggle Grandmasters and a KDD cup winner at an award-winning investment management firm managing over $7B in assets. We reward our employees with an exceptional compensation package that includes wealthy benefit plans and profit-sharing bonuses. Our office in beautiful Jupiter, Florida has water views, fully stocked kitchens with fresh fruit, snacks and salad bars, lounge and gaming areas, onsite massage rooms, free garage parking and more. We seek out only the best of the best talent to join our brilliant, collaborative, and hard-working team and boast a retention rate of 92%.",4.7,"Voloridge Investment Management
4.7","Jupiter, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist
Job Summary
The data scientist will help solve challenging problems in a variety of domains. Our team works on a large number of high-impact projects: algorithmic stock trading, an instant-decision underwriting system, staffing / scheduling optimization, fraud detection, and LLMs to automate business processes, to name a few. The goal of any data science effort at Americo is to either 1) deploy a production-level system in the cloud or 2) deliver a presentation to executive-level stakeholders to inform broader strategic endeavors. We focus on understanding the levers that drive our business and intelligently pulling them. To enable success, we provide professional development, collaboration, and the freedom to explore and innovate. Likewise, we leverage modern MLOps constructs to ensure that projects reach production and can be employed for ongoing business impact.",3.8,"Americo
3.8","Kansas City, MO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Responsibilities:
Peraton is currently seeking an experienced Data Scientist with a data engineering or computer science background to provide support to the JDPAC team.

Location: Scott AFB, Illinois

Roles and responsibilities include, but are not limited to the following:

Key Responsibilities
Design, build, and evaluate machine learning models
Advance the mission by connecting customers and their challenges with data science solutions
Qualifications:

Peraton Overview:
Target Salary Range: $112,000 - $179,000. This represents the typical salary range for this position based on experience and other factors. EEO: An Equal Opportunity Employer including Disability/Veteran.",3.6,"Peraton
3.6","Scott Air Force Base, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Company Overview
Idea Evolver specializes in audience research and consumer insights as well as designing and engineering Software as a Medical Device applications.
Our primary verticals are healthcare, food, and retail. Our client list includes American Express, Dannon, AstraZeneca, United Therapeutics, Blue Origin, and K. Hovnanian Homes.
Position Overview
We are looking for a highly skilled Data Scientist to join our Consumer Insights team. This position will be responsible for utilizing data to provide valuable insights that inform business decisions and drive growth for our company and our clients.",3.7,"Idea Evolver
3.7",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Responsibilities

• Make recommendations regarding the collection, extraction, and transformation of large data sets
• Interpret data and analyze results
• Translate analytical insights into clear recommendations; identify trends and patterns to inform business decisions and product design
• Leverage Python to analyze complex data
• Design and develop customized interactive reports and dashboards in Tableau; schedule in Tableau Server
• Define and develop a data migration strategy between different products and platforms
• Develop creative ways to identify and use data that significantly impact key business metrics
• Assess the potential usefulness and validity of new data sources
• Utilize statistical approaches to build predictive models
• Mentor other team members/ analysts to grow their skills and careers",4.5,"Colsh Consultants
4.5","Santa Clara, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"The HiLabs Story
HiLabs was born in the halls of Yale University when a cardiologist and an AI expert teamed up to tackle the data quality issue in the US healthcare system. After seven years of working with some of the best data scientists in the world, HiLabs is on the cutting edge of breakthroughs in data science and AI.
HiLabs Team
Multidisciplinary industry leaders
AI/ML and data science experts",3.7,"Hilabs
3.7","Bethesda, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Junior Data Scientist,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"We are seeking a Jr. Business Analyst to join our growing team. In this role, you will have the opportunity to focus on quantitative and statistical analysis to support process improvement, quality objectives, and maintain the program's continued focus on efficiencies.

Key Responsibilities
Required Qualifications
Requires an active TS/SCI clearance with Polygraph
Bachelor's degree
Certification in, or at least 1 year of applied experience with, R or Python for data science",3.9,"Orbis Operations, LLC
3.9","McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Job Description

BAE Systems is seeking a Data Scientist to support customer mission requirements in defense, intelligence, and federal civilian markets. The data scientist will support development of advanced analytics capabilities by developing and applying probability models, statistical inference, simulations, optimization, data analysis, and data visualization analysis of customer data using statistical and mathematical techniques to extract insight based on mission requirements.
The data scientist will introduce quantitative and qualitative analysis, data analytics, and data science to the military’s decision- making processes by developing, transforming and building data models to improve decision making. They are responsible for data extraction and manipulation of data sets. Creating workflows and predictive models for end-users using system tools. Conducting statistical analysis on data to ensure correct predictive forecasting. Manages the analytics request process by capturing requirements. Responsible for the creation and maintenance of surveys and deciphering survey analytics.
As a BAE Systems Data Scientist, you will work with key clients as a trusted adviser while collaborating with software developers, analysts, and subject matter experts to advance opportunities to enhance partnership with BAE Systems and directly impact customer mission. Successful applicants for this role will, at a minimum, demonstrate interest in the application of data to support decision making.






Full-Time Salary Range: $122870 - $208890

Please note: This range is based on our market pay structures. However, individual salaries are determined by a variety of factors including, but not limited to: business considerations, local market conditions, and internal equity, as well as candidate qualifications, such as skills, education, and experience.

Employee Benefits: At BAE Systems, we support our employees in all aspects of their life, including their health and financial well-being. Regular employees scheduled to work 20+ hours per week are offered: health, dental, and vision insurance; health savings accounts; a 401(k) savings plan; disability coverage; and life and accident insurance. We also have an employee assistance program, a legal plan, and other perks including discounts on things like home, auto, and pet insurance. Our leave programs include paid time off, paid holidays, as well as other types of leave, including paid parental, military, bereavement, and any applicable federal and state sick leave. Employees may participate in the company recognition program to receive monetary or non-monetary recognition awards. Other incentives may be available based on position level and/or job specifics.


BAE Systems, Inc. is the U.S. subsidiary of BAE Systems plc, an international defense, aerospace and security company which delivers a full range of products and services for air, land and naval forces, as well as advanced electronics, security, information technology solutions and customer support services. Improving the future and protecting lives is an ambitious mission, but it’s what we do at BAE Systems. Working here means using your passion and ingenuity where it counts – defending national security with breakthrough technology, superior products, and intelligence solutions. As you develop the latest technology and defend national security, you will continually hone your skills on a team—making a big impact on a global scale. At BAE Systems, you’ll find a rewarding career that truly makes a difference.

Intelligence & Security (I&S), based in McLean, Virginia, designs and delivers advanced defense, intelligence, and security solutions that support the important missions of our customers. Our pride and dedication shows in everything we do—from intelligence analysis, cyber operations and IT expertise to systems development, systems integration, and operations and maintenance services. Knowing that our work enables the U.S. military and government to recognize, manage and defeat threats inspires us to push ourselves and our technologies to new levels.

Our Commitment to Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion:
At BAE Systems, we work hard every day to nurture an inclusive culture where employees are valued and feel like they belong. We are conscious of the need for all employees to see themselves reflected at every level of the company and know that in order to unlock the full potential of our workforce, everyone must feel confident being their best, most sincere self and be equipped to thrive. We provide impactful professional development experiences to our employees and invest in social impact partnerships to uplift communities and drive purposeful change. Here you will find significant opportunities to do meaningful work in an environment intentionally designed to be one where you will learn, grow and belong.",4.0,"BAE Systems
4.0","Sterling, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Senior Data Scientist, Seller Experience",$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Company Description

Etsy is the global marketplace for unique and creative goods. We build, power, and evolve the tools and technologies that connect millions of entrepreneurs with millions of buyers around the world. As an Etsy Inc. employee, whether a team member of Etsy, Reverb, or Depop, you will tackle unique, meaningful, and large-scale problems alongside passionate coworkers, all the while making a rewarding impact and Keeping Commerce Human.

Job Description",4.5,"Etsy
4.5","Brooklyn, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$115K - $155K (Employer est.),"Description
We are looking for a Data Scientist with an entrepreneur’s mindset to support a fast-paced and growing data science team working on projects critical to National Security. The position is located within a classified space in the Northern Virginia area, and requires an active TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance. Position is funded and an immediate fill opportunity
The Data Scientist will be expected to build statistical models, test hypotheses, interpret, summarize, visualize, and succinctly report on data findings. The Data Scientist will perform research on various data sources, to include unstructured data using quantitative and qualitative content analytics. The Scientist will construct and perform complex database search queries in multiple databases using SQL and API interfaces. The Scientist will perform web scraping and apply various techniques for processing unstructured data. The Scientist will leverage automation and machine learning to manage data, predict scenarios and make recommendations. The Data Scientist will contribute to building new analytical tools and packages across the enterprise and will be expected to collaborate with team members in a highly technical environment. The Data Scientist will be expected to learn and leverage emerging technologies including AWS and Git.
Pay Range $78,000.00 - $141,000.00",3.8,"Leidos
3.8","McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Do you have a passion for data science, machine learning and AI ? Do you want to apply it to protect millions of customers using Microsoft online services from threat actors around the globe ? Are you curious, analytical, and motivated by new challenges? If so, we would like to hear from you!

The Microsoft Security Response Center team (MSRC) is seeking a Data Scientist to meet the growing demand and challenges of cybersecurity and threat protection. As a Data Dcientist on our team, you will partner with our engineers, other data scientists, and researchers to experiment, design, build, and deploy statistical, machine learning, and AI models to protect the Microsoft Cloud against known and emerging cyberattacks. In your day-to-day work, you will perform data analysis on big data, find useful insights, perform hypothesis testing, experiment with models, vet experiments, incorporate quality monitors, and ship successful models to productions.

You will have the opportunity to collaborate with partners across Microsoft who have decades of security, research, and ML expertise and the tools and technologies to grow your expertise in this field.








Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.3,"Microsoft
4.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Overview:
LMI is seeking a skilled Data Scientist. Successful Data Scientists demonstrate competency in project execution, leadership critical thinking, relationship management, and business growth while upholding the highest standard of ethical behavior.

LMI is a consultancy dedicated to improving the business of government, drawing from deep expertise in advanced analytics, digital services, logistics, and management advisory services. Established as a private, not-for-profit organization in 1961, LMI is a trusted third party to federal civilian and defense agencies, free of commercial and political bias. We operate completely free of political and commercial bias, and we are entirely aligned with the goals of our clients. Our clients value our specialized services in logistics, intelligence, homeland security, health care, and energy and environment markets. We believe government can make a difference, and we seek talented, hardworking people who share that conviction. We offer a generous compensation package with excellent benefits that start the first day of employment. Business casual dress, flex time, and tuition reimbursement are a few of our many work-life benefits available to our employees.
Responsibilities:

Qualifications:",4.2,"Logistics Management Institute
4.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Advanced Analytics and AI are high on the agenda at UCB and we are looking to strengthen our internal team of AI experts with a particular focus on sales & marketing.
In this context we are looking for an outstanding data resource proficient with Python & Spark to contribute to the development of analytics workflows focused on insights generation, prescriptive analytics and decision support apps.

Responsibilities:
Assemble large, complex data sets that meet functional/non-functional business requirements.",4.5,"Colsh Consultants
4.5",Georgia,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
LEAD DATA SCIENTIST,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Become a Part of the NIKE, Inc. Team

\r

\r

NIKE, Inc. does more than outfit the world's best athletes. It is a place to explore potential, obliterate boundaries and push out the edges of what can be. The company looks for people who can grow, think, dream and create. Its culture thrives by embracing diversity and rewarding imagination. The brand seeks achievers, leaders and visionaries. At NIKE, Inc. it's about each person bringing skills and passion to a challenging and constantly evolving game.

Open to remote work except in South Dakota, Vermont and West Virginia.

The annual base salary for this position ranges from $112,600.00 in our lowest geographic market to $251,800.00 in our highest geographic market. Actual salary will vary based on a candidate's location, qualifications, skills and experience.

Information about benefits can be found here .

The NIKE, Inc. Supply Chain team is the engine that propels product around the world. Supply Chain experts ensure that every year, 1.4 billion units of footwear, apparel and equipment arrive at the right place, at the right time. The complex process involves more than 70 distribution centers, a network of thousands of accounts, and more than 100,000 retail stores around the world. Supply Chain analytics professionals constantly push for ways to make Nike's supply chain faster, more efficient, and more responsive to Nike's always-changing consumer needs.

Within North America Digital Marketplace Operations in particular, the supply chain team is building and operating an analytics driven regional distribution network to ensure Nike delivers an elevated experience to its digital consumers. Supporting the highest growth area of the business provides new challenges every day, but it also provides massive opportunity for innovation and personal growth.

WHO WE ARE LOOKING FOR

We need an experienced Data Scientist to join our Digital planning and analytics team. You are an extraordinary, driven teammate with a curiosity for all things data, and while you rely on data to prove your point, you love to think creatively to solve problems. You build novel models and algorithms to solve business problems, deliver insights, and drive recommendations. You thrive in an entrepreneurial environment, and you are excited by the challenge of building something from the ground up. You ask questions, are continually learning as well as finding opportunities to share knowledge with others. You are a strong communicator who is endlessly curious, takes pride in hard work and is committed to rapidly advancing your knowledge and expertise.

WHAT YOU WILL WORK ON

As a Data Scientist, you will work with the Digital Supply Chain team to ensure Nike delivers an elevated consumer experience, using data. You will build demand forecasts for our regional distribution network to inform capacity planning, develop models that optimize inventory placement, simulate SKU velocities to plan new facilities against capacity and inventory constraints, and transform ad hoc analyses into scalable solutions and tools that can provide repeatable insights for the business. You will share your results and recommendations with a broad and senior audience, inspiring change in the organization by making analytics part of day-to-day business strategy. You'll also track model accuracy, ensuring model relevance and reliability.

WHO YOU WILL WORK WITH

As a member of Nike's North America Digital Marketplace Operations team, you will work alongside experienced analytics and supply chain professionals passionate about driving operational efficiency and better serving athletes* digitally. You will be reporting into the North America Digital Marketplace Operations Analytics leader, liaising closely with business strategy, Marketplace Operations, and Logistics (DC & Transportation) teams as well as product squads consisting of senior data scientists and engineers. You will collaborate with other data scientists across teams to problem solve and share best practices.

WHAT YOU BRING

NIKE, Inc. is a growth company that looks for team members to grow with it. Nike offers a generous total rewards package, casual work environment, a diverse and inclusive culture, and an electric atmosphere for professional development. No matter the location, or the role, every Nike employee shares one galvanizing mission: To bring inspiration and innovation to every athlete* in the world.

NIKE, Inc. is committed to employing a diverse workforce. Qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, veteran status, or disability.



At NIKE, Inc. we promise to provide a premium, inclusive, compelling and authentic candidate experience. Delivering on this promise means we allow you to be at your best - and to do that, you need to understand how the hiring process works. Transparency is key.




Whether it's transportation or financial health, we continually invest in our employees to help them achieve greatness - inside and outside of work. All who work here should be able to realize their full potential.",4.2,"Nike
4.2","Beaverton, OR",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist: Advanced Analytics,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job Description:
Perform advanced analytics tasks, including but not limited to predictive statistical models, customer profiling, segmentation analysis, data analysis and mining, and external data enhancement using SQL, SAS, R, Python or PySpark.
Identify and test hypotheses, ensuring statistical significance, and builds predictive models and data visualization to support production business. Extract and process large quantities of data from data warehouses and other data marts in support of assignments.
Analyze marketing metrics to identify cause-effect relationships between marketing levers and outcomes.
Consolidate and package up insights, analytic outputs, and action items into a well-organized, consumable package with actionable recommendations and strategies for marketers (MS Excel, PowerPoint, Word, etc.)Present statistical and nonstatistical results, using charts, bullets, and graphs, in meetings or conferences to audiences such as clients and peers.",4.3,"SysIntelli
4.3","San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Fremont, California
Type: Full-time
Min. Experience: Some Experience
Salary: $80,000 - $90,000

As a Junior Data Scientist, you will help support the Senior Data Scientist in analysis and research, and machine learning modeling that is underpinning new and current products. Additionally, the Junior Data Scientist will support the Data Engineer in building new data pipelines including new ETL functions.",3.5,"SoundThinking
3.5","Fremont, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Lead Data Scientist, Economy",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"We are hiring a Lead Data Scientist, Economy for our Data and Analytics (DnA) Data Science team. DnA Data Science partners with all of EA's game studios to offer data science products and solutions. As a Lead Data Scientist, Economy, you will report to the Sr. Manager and will be responsible for analyzing and interpreting player behavior data, developing economic models, maintaining in-game economies and providing actionable insights to increase the performance and drive monetization in our games.
Responsibilities
You will collaborate with game designers, product managers and analysts to drive the monetization and retention strategies for our games
Utilize player behavior data and statistical analysis to provide recommendations on game features, economy design, live operations, pricing strategies, and user acquisition initiatives















We are a global team of creators, storytellers, technologists, experience originators, innovators and so much more. We believe amazing games and experiences start with teams as diverse as the players and communities we serve. At Electronic Arts, the only limit is your imagination.",4.0,"Electronic Arts
4.0","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Lead Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"About Glo
Glo is a digital platform for total well-being. We help our community feel their best in body and mind through on-demand yoga, meditation, and Pilates classes with world-class teachers. The Lead Data Scientist plays an important role in Glo’s mission and vision to connect people through self-care so that, together, we can heal ourselves and our planet.
Position Overview
We’re looking for a Lead Data Scientist to formulate Glo’s data strategy and work with our Data Engineer & Analyst to implement the appropriate architecture. In this role, you will be responsible for enabling data-driven decisions across Glo by sourcing accurate data, building scalable infrastructure, and delivering analytics with predictive modeling. You’ll lead the team to implement methods that improve data reliability and quality. You’ll play a pivotal role in contributing to Glo’s mission as you work to develop solutions that drive growth and improve the overall user experience on our platform.",3.7,"Glo
3.7",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Engineer Lead,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Data Engineer Lead
Job Number: 215889

Join Forbes’ 2023 Best Employer for Diversity!
As a data engineer lead on the Claims IT Data Engineering team, you’ll contribute to highly available and scalable solutions that are built on cutting-edge cloud architecture. You'll partner with data science and IT teams to support the expansion of an application. In this role, you’ll build out the necessary data pipelines to support data science models and enable efficient access to multiple data sources. You’ll support packaging and deploying new models or updated models to production, and create the necessary infrastructure needed for model training. Also, you’ll work with our data scientist and application team to ensure the design is fit for requirements. In this highly visible role, you will also serve as the technical data expert responsible for the architecture, design, and implementation of our cloud data solutions and expanding the data pipeline infrastructure. By staying well-informed of emerging technologies and trends, you will have the opportunity to present to groups of mixed technical ability to provide direction and make recommendations, including challenging the status quo.",3.8,"Progressive
3.8",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"We help the world run better
Our company culture is focused on helping our employees enable innovation by building breakthroughs together. How? We focus every day on building the foundation for tomorrow and creating a workplace that embraces differences, values flexibility, and is aligned to our purpose-driven and future-focused work. We offer a highly collaborative, caring team environment with a strong focus on learning and development, recognition for your individual contributions, and a variety of benefit options for you to choose from. Apply now!

About the team:
The mission of the SAP Innovation Center Network (ICN) is to contextualize and pioneer emerging technologies that will be foundational for the future success of SAP and of our customers. We are a diverse, global team and collaborate across roles, functions, and locations, enabling every colleague to contribute and investigate new ideas.
As part of ICN the Business Technology Platform (BTP) AI Center of Excellence (CoE) team based out of Silicon Valley, you will spearhead our efforts to research and prototype new AI BTP offerings, create strategic platform partnerships within the AI ecosystem, and help positioning SAP as the leading AI thought leader for enterprise solutions.",4.4,"SAP
4.4","Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"As a Data Scientist you will apply your skills in programming, modeling, AI and machine learning to cutting-edge problem-solving in financial services using predictive and prescriptive analytics. You will work to develop the right set of questions and hypotheses, using the appropriate tools and skills to derive the best information to address both internal and external customer needs.
Our preferred candidate will bring technical expertise in data science, forecasting, and optimization methods and experience with implementation of ML. With a focus on developing and delivering machine learning and time series models and optimization solutions that drive business optimization, operational efficiency, and innovation.
The scope of work will be central to critical aspects of the credit union’s success, such as optimizing member engagement; evaluating credit risk, underwriting practices and product pricing; predicting delinquencies; targeted marketing; providing early warning signs of member attrition and actions needed; and developing or evaluating new techniques to serve the membership.",2.6,"Northrop Grumman Federal Credi
2.6","Gardena, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Advisor,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Clearance Level None Category Data Science Location Falls Church, Virginia
Public Trust: None
Requisition Type: Regular
Job Description
General Dynamics Information Technology, Inc. (GDIT) has an opening for the position of Data Scientist Advisor (Ref# DSA84IS).
Work Location: Position may telecommute from anywhere in the Continental U.S.
Job Duties: Work on leading data science tools to detect and prevent fraud, waste, and abuse (FWA) in the Medicare & Medicaid programs. Collaborate with internal and external stakeholders to solve FWA challenges. Produce innovative analytical solutions to solve complex issues and problems. Gather and analyze the data for building machine learning models and create data visualizations to show complex analysis. Lead and conduct ad hoc advanced analytics projects. Translate complex findings into actionable insights for non-technical audiences. Write queries to extract and synthesize large volumes of data from government data bases. Utilize both supervised and unsupervised machine learning algorithms to identify potential FWA schemes. Follow all data privacy and security procedures at all times. Evaluate and experiment with new data science tools and methods to develop innovative solutions to our team and clients. Help train and mentor more junior data scientists. Use of automatic machine learning (AutoML) and machine learning explainability/interpretability methods, SAS, R, Python, Spark, Tableau, Databricks, and SQL.",4.0,"General Dynamics Information Technology
4.0","Falls Church, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Lead Data Scientist - Optimization/Operations Research,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job Description:
LEAD DATA SCIENTIST
Optimization/Operations Research

OVERVIEW
Do you see patterns or opportunities that others don’t see? Do you enjoying asking questions and analyzing data to deepen your knowledge? Do you like to challenge historical assumptions and recommend new ways to drive action based on data driven insights? Do you like to find the best way to tackle a problem and share the approach with others?

To make the food people love, we need to make sure we feed our decision makers the right data and solutions at the right time, every time. As a Lead Data Scientist-Optimization/Operations Research at General Mills, you will apply your strong expertise in machine learning, data mining and information retrieval to design, prototype and build next generation advanced analytics engine and services. You will collaborate with product owners, business partners and other Data Scientists in the consumer marketing and media space to define technical problem statement and hypothesis to test. In addition, you will develop efficient and accurate analytical models that mimic business decisions.


Company Overview:",4.1,"General Mills
4.1","Minneapolis, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Discover. A brighter future.
With us, you'll do meaningful work from Day 1. Our collaborative culture is built on three core behaviors: We Play to Win, We Get Better Every Day & We Succeed Together. And we mean it - we want you to grow and make a difference at one of the world's leading digital banking and payments companies.We value what makes you unique so that you have an opportunity to shine.
Come build your future, while being the reason millions of people find a brighter financial future with Discover.
Job Description
If you are a motivated and experienced data scientist in the Card Payments Network who is passionate about collaborating with teams and driving business growth through data-driven solutions, we encourage you to apply. We are data-driven insights and provide recommendations to drive business growth and strategy.

The same way we treat our employees is how we treat all applicants – with respect. Discover Financial Services is an equal opportunity employer (EEO is the law). We thrive on diversity & inclusion. You will be treated fairly throughout our recruiting process and without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status in consideration for a career at Discover.",4.3,"The Infosoft Group
4.3","Riverwoods, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Jr. Data Scientist - ACF (Remote),$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job Description
Jefferson Solutions, the well-respected government consulting company of Jefferson Consulting Group, an award-winning woman-owned small business, is seeking a Data Scientist Junior to provide ongoing support to the Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) Administration for Children and Families (ACF).

Duties:
Create team charter to define Management Services Roles and Responsibilities
Provide program support and creates SOPs",4.0,"Jefferson Consulting Group
4.0","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Lead Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"POSITION SUMMARY:
The Lead Data Scientist is a member of the Bioinformatics group. Participates in the design and prototyping of cutting-edge algorithms for analysis of genetic data. Perform data analysis, contributes to our intellectual property portfolio, and interacts closely with our molecular biology team to guide and analyze experiments.
PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES:
Independently lead the development and optimization efforts within the Oncology Bioinformatics group for design of high-throughput assays built on next generation sequencing platforms.
Move products through the full development process, from research through commercial launch.",3.4,"Natera
3.4","San Carlos, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Lead,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Make your mark for patients

To strengthen our Global Advanced Analytics team within our Atlanta hub in Georgia, USA, we are looking for a talented individual to fill the position of: Data Scientist Lead.

In this position you will be responsible for making exceptional business impact with the use of secondary data and insights development through advanced analytics methods, enabling an increased use of data and, where applicable, reducing the necessity for building primary data. You will also be responsible for managing and implementing advanced analytics/AI projects to ensure successful delivery. You will be in charge of the ongoing operations of advanced analytics solutions to ensure that models continue to work and scale them up with additional demand and applications. You will serve as the subject matter expert for Advanced Analytics/AI capabilities in support of business needs. You will work with the Global Advanced Analytics Team Leads, Global Go to Market Teams, Integrated Insights Hub Leads, as well as business stakeholders in the Patient Value Units. Externally, you will work with payors and analytics vendors that support data science projects. The mission of this role is to deliver data-driven actionable insights from advanced analytics that create high impact patient value.",3.9,"UCB
3.9","Atlanta, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Mayvue is seeking a Data Scientist to join our team.
As a company, we are in a unique position. We have that “startup culture” but our team is comprised of experienced individuals, and we have a steady stream of business. Our hard work has led to explosive growth and we’re seeking individuals that recognize the opportunity and want to work alongside us to ensure we continue to reach our potential. In this role, you will be a key member of the company and team.
This position offers both in-office (Pittsburgh, PA) and the flexibility of being remote. You tell us what works for you!
Company and Team Recognitions:
2023 Inc. Best Places to Work",-1,Mayvue,"Pittsburgh, PA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist 5,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job Responsibilities
Design and prototype machine learning algorithms for EPG Equipment Intelligence concept and feasibility needs.
Work with EPG productivity team, GPE SW&C, CSBG, GPE platform team, data scientists in the company, to design and develop Machine Learning algorithm to serve the robustness/consistency requirement and performance requirement in accuracy, speed/cost for EPG product in automation.
Define interface to SW through performance requirement, system requirement defined by EPG/platform product, and interaction/alignment with SW&C, CSBG.
Follow PDR and SW development process for requirement, design, documentation and testing.",4.0,"Lam Research
4.0","Fremont, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Meet REVOLVE:
REVOLVE is the next-generation fashion retailer for Millennial and Generation Z consumers. As a trusted, premium lifestyle brand, and a go-to online source for discovery and inspiration, we deliver an engaging customer experience from a vast yet curated offering totaling over 45,000 apparel, footwear, accessories and beauty styles. Our dynamic platform connects a deeply engaged community of millions of consumers, thousands of global fashion influencers, and more than 500 emerging, established and owned brands. Through 16 years of continued investment in technology, data analytics, and innovative marketing and merchandising strategies, we have built a powerful platform and brand that we believe is connecting with the next generation of consumers and is redefining fashion retail for the 21st century. For more information please visit www.revolve.com.",2.8,"REVOLVE
2.8","Cerritos, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Analyst, Marketing",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"About Us:
We're on a mission to make it possible for every person, team, and company to be able to tailor their software to solve any problem and take on any challenge. Computers may be our most powerful tools, but most of us can't build or modify the software we use on them every day. At Notion, we want to change this with focus, design, and craft.
We've been working on this together since 2016, and have customers like Pixar, Mitsubishi, Figma, Plaid, Match Group, and thousands more on this journey with us. Today, we're growing fast and excited for new teammates to join us who are the best at what they do. We're passionate about building a company as diverse and creative as the millions of people Notion reaches worldwide.
Notion is an in person company, and currently requires its employees to come to the office for two Anchor Days (Mondays & Thursdays) and requests that employees spend the majority of their week in the office (including a third day).",4.9,"Notion
4.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Associate Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Whether you're looking for a collaborative team setting, a career path that can lead to leadership, excellent work-life balance, or experience with an industry leader, our Associate Data Scientist opportunity offers many ways for you to get involved!
The Associate Data Scientist works independently using a robust math toolbox to discover solutions for a diverse portfolio of interesting and challenging problems. The Associate Data Scientist works collaboratively with the Scientist to develop, implements, and monitors advanced analytic, medical informatics, and predictive modeling tools for health care programs.

Responsibilities:
Responsible for conceiving, planning, designing, developing and validating robust algorithms for use in analyzing health care models.
Works with science team to design, develop, and implement health care analytic and biomedical modeling programs.",3.2,"UPMC
3.2","Pittsburgh, PA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Sr. Data Scientist, Pricing Algorithms - Remote within 100 miles of Office Location",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"8901 - Corp Office West Crk - 12800 Tuckahoe Creek Parkway, Richmond, Virginia, 23238

CarMax, the way your career should be!
About The Team

The Pricing team is a community of analysts, data scientists, and systems experts with a variety of technical and strategic skillsets. We work together to continually improve CarMax's ability to accurately and systematically value each individual car that we buy and sell. Last year, CarMax sold over 1 million vehicles and appraised over 2 million vehicles, and Pricing directed over $20B in spend to purchase inventory - all while remaining responsive to constantly changing consumer demand, wholesale auction supply, and other global/local market conditions.

Our team tackles complex problems while striving to be a great representation of CarMax's 4 core values:



CarMax relies on algorithms to make important decisions about which cars to buy, how to price them, and how to allocate them across our 200+ stores. Doing so ensures that we have the right cars at the right prices to meet our customers' needs. As we continue to innovate our business and shift more of our buying and selling online, we increasingly need to make these decisions quickly with less human intervention. Our team of data scientists and business analysts plays a critical role in unlocking the business value from these innovations.

As an algorithms expert, you will build and support predictive models. Through collaboration and partnership with analysts and systems experts, you will play a key role in ensuring the models are deployed effectively to support our business goals.



1) Develop new models and improve our existing models

2) Help CarMax continue to develop its data expertise

3) Effectively communicate how our models work to team members, both at a general level and a detailed level



If you're energized by putting your math, logic, and analytical reasoning skills to the test to solve complex problems then we encourage you to apply to join our team. We frequently offer a variety of roles and recommend checking out all available Pricing positions to find the best fit for your abilities and interests.

For a candidate for this role, we're looking for the following characteristics:





CarMax disrupted the auto industry by delivering the honest, transparent and high-integrity experience customers want and deserve. This innovative thinking around the way cars are bought and sold has helped us become the nation's largest retailer of used cars, with over 200 locations nationwide.

Our amazing team of more than 25,000 associates work together to deliver iconic customer experiences. Along the way, we help every associate grow their career and achieve their best, at work and in their community. We are recognized for our commitment to training and diversity and are one of the FORTUNE 100 Best Companies to Work For®.



CarMax is committed to bringing together people from different backgrounds and perspectives, providing employees with a safe, welcoming, and inclusive work environment.

CarMax is an equal opportunity employer, and all qualified candidates will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, or any other characteristic protected by law.

Upon an applicant's request, CarMax will consider reasonable accommodation to complete the CarMax Job Application.

Work location is flexible if within 100 miles of the Richmond, VA Technology Innovation Center or Dallas Technology Hub or Atlanta, GA CarMax Auto Finance Office if approved by the Company.

Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis.

Upon an applicant's request, CarMax will consider reasonable accommodation to complete the CarMax Job Application.",3.8,"CarMax
3.8","Richmond, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Sr. Data Scientist, Reliability Engineering",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"What to Expect
Vehicle Design for Reliability Engineering is looking for an exceptional Data Scientist with experience in physical engineering disciplines (mechanical, electrical, materials) to tackle projects in modeling the reliability of new products and technologies in the real-world. As a successful candidate, you will utilize your data analysis and programming expertise to retrieve, analyze, model, and summarize test and field data to cross-functional teams to drive key decisions related to Tesla’s vehicle products.
What You’ll Do
Own the development of new performance metrics based on fundamental physics of operation for efficiently predicting reliability in test and real-world environments.
What You’ll Bring",3.6,"Tesla
3.6","Fremont, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist – Global Planning & Analytics, Analytics & Insights",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Overview:

Talented and motivated individual who will be part of a group of skilled analytic resources to develop descriptive, diagnostic, predictive business solutions and deliver actionable insights to our internal and external customers.
The person will be responsible for applying cutting edge analytics to solve our clients’ complex problems in areas such as promotions, supply and demand planning, item/menu level analytics, supply chain simulations and optimization, competitive benchmarking, and root cause analysis.
The role will involve developing advanced analytic solutions in a modular way to ensure extensibility, scalability, and agility.
This will involve keeping up to date with the latest advances in data and analytics, which will then be used to inform the solution strategy. Ensuring high quality of the deliverables will be an essential part of this role.
Responsibilities:


Desired Skills & Experience:


Benefits:",3.5,"HAVI
3.5","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Own Your Future.

Modern Technology Solutions, Inc. (MTSI) is seeking a Data Scientist.

Why is MTSI known as a Great Place to Work?
Interesting Work: Our co-workers support some of the most important and critical programs to our national defense and security.
Values: Our first core value is that employees come first. We challenge our co-workers to provide the highest level of support and service, and reward them with some of the best benefits in the industry.
100% Employee Ownership: we have a stake in each other's success, and the success of our customers. It's also nice to know what's going on across the company; we have company wide town-hall meetings three times a year.",4.9,"Modern Technology Solutions, Inc.
4.9","Beavercreek, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Lead Data Scientist, Growth",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Hinge Health is creating a new health care system, built around you. Accessible to 26 million members across 1,500 customers, Hinge Health is the #1 digital clinic for joint and muscle pain, delivering superior member outcomes and proven claims reductions. We pair the industry’s most advanced motion technology and wearable pain relief with a complete clinical care team of physical therapists, physicians, and board-certified health coaches to help people move beyond pain and reduce surgeries and opioid use. Hinge Health’s HingeConnect integrates with 1 million+ in-person providers to enable earlier interventions for avoidable MSK surgeries. Four in five health plans and employers with a digital MSK solution trust Hinge Health, including Land O’Lakes, L.L. Bean, Salesforce, Self-Insured Schools of California, Southern Company, State of New Jersey, US Foods, and Verizon. Learn more at http://www.hingehealth.com

Here at Hinge Health, we welcome all applicants and know a diverse team makes us better and stronger. We look for individuals who embody our leadership principles and we value varied experiences and skill sets. Beyond specific work experience, we also look for unique capabilities and skill sets that are key indicators an applicant will thrive in our fast-paced, frequently evolving environment. If this sounds like the kind of place you’d like to be part of, please apply - we would love to hear from you!",3.9,"Hinge Health
3.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Jr,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Overview:
Systems Planning and Analysis, Inc. (SPA) delivers high-impact, technical solutions to complex national security issues. With over 50 years of business expertise and consistent growth, we are known for continuous innovation for our government customers, in both the US and abroad. Our exceptionally talented team is highly collaborative in spirit and practice, producing Results that Matter. Come work with the best! We offer opportunity, unique challenges, and clear-sighted commitment to the mission. SPA: Objective. Responsive. Trusted.

This work will assist the Government in strategic integration to counter WMD in support of CCMDs drive synergies to services and CCMDS. SPA provides expertise across the full range of chemical, biological, radiological, nuclear and high-yield explosives (CBRNE) WMD, Counter Improvised Threat and Countering Threat Network technologies to support understanding, detection, identification, characterization, denial, control, disabling, defeating, disposing, safeguarding the force, managing consequences, and test and evaluation in support of military and civilian operations.

Responsibilities:
Qualifications:",4.4,"Systems Planning and Analysis, Inc.
4.4","Lorton, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Pay rate range - $73/hr. to $76/hr. on W2
Hybrid role
Job Description:
seeking an experienced Data Scientist to join the Product, Data, and Technology team.
You will play a key role in analyzing critical business operations and developing state-of-the-art techniques to optimize and quantify the impact of complex business processes and decisions.
Key subject areas include advertising inventory forecasting and yield optimization, causal impact, and opportunity cost analysis.",4.1,"Intelliswift Software, Inc.
4.1","Culver City, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Advanced Development Program,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Why join Vanguard’s Data Science Advanced Development Program? This program (a part of the broader Data & Analytics Advanced Development Programs) will provide an opportunity to collaborate alongside a team of best-in-class data scientists and leaders and influence the outcomes of over thirty million clients. Through hands-on involvement with critical work happening across Vanguard, equipped with the tools and resources to succeed, you will be positioned to grow as experts in data science. Make it count!
In this rotational program, you will
Experience a comprehensive approach to data science with rotations during which you will leverage deep dive diagnostics, predictive, and prescriptive analytics throughout three 6-month assignments. These rotations in various business areas will draw upon your experiences and interests as well as meet strategic business needs by working on high-impact assignments.
Vanguard is not offering visa sponsorship for this position.",3.7,"Vanguard
3.7","Charlotte, NC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Generative AI,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Why Mayo Clinic

Mayo Clinic is top-ranked in more specialties than any other care provider according to U.S. News & World Report. As we work together to put the needs of the patient first, we are also dedicated to our employees, investing in competitive compensation and comprehensive benefit plans – to take care of you and your family, now and in the future. And with continuing education and advancement opportunities at every turn, you can build a long, successful career with Mayo Clinic. You’ll thrive in an environment that supports innovation, is committed to ending racism and supporting diversity, equity and inclusion, and provides the resources you need to succeed.


Responsibilities

















Exempt



$159,973 - $231,962/ year. Education, experience and tenure may be considered along with internal equity when job offers are extended.



Yes



Full Time



80



M-F, daytime hours



N/A



No










Laura Percival",3.9,"Mayo Clinic
3.9","Rochester, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Dynamis is seeking a Data Scientist to support Homeland Security Investigations (HSI), in Northern, VA by bringing together theory and practice to identify and communicate data-driven insights that allow managers, stakeholders, and other executives in an organization to make more informed decisions on concepts of probability theory, statistical modeling, data visualization, predictive analytics, and risk management.
Responsibilities:
Analyze processes conducted by HSI personnel at their field offices and identify opportunities for process automation and/or data science tool development.
Provide Government with new capabilities related to data analytics, ingest, extraction collating, normalizing and processing.",4.7,"Dynamis, Inc.
4.7","Arlington, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Capgemini Government Solutions (CGS) LLC is seeking a highly motivated data scientist to custom-develop or leverage AI/ML-enabled applications for optical character recognition, automation, predictive modeling, pattern analysis, and fraud detection. The successful candidate will have the opportunity to conceive and deliver innovative AI solutions to the U.S. Public Sector to help address critical national and global challenges such as health, climate change and national security. This individual will join our Business Intelligence Systems and Analytics (BISA) practice in the DC Metro Area but with the flexibility to work from home. As a part of the rapidly expanding CGS BISA practice, the candidate will also help our clients develop, deploy, and modernize their data pipelines using a combination of Big Data, AI/ML, and Visualization solutions.
At Capgemini, we are committed to our staff’s professional development and offer a wide range of training and educational resources. In addition to our internal learning sites, we partnered with Coursera and Degreed to offer our staff the latest courses from academic institutions around the world. We provide education expense reimbursements as well as sponsor seminars, conferences, and certifications. Our practice leaders work with every team member to chart appropriate career paths and goals to ensure that we all stay innovative and transformative, which maximizes our ability to scale up our solutions, keep up with the cutting edge, and bring the art of what’s possible to the Federal Government.",3.7,"Capgemini Government Solutions
3.7","McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"We are looking for a Data Scientist/Engineer who lives to find the messages hidden in the madness of data. You will be responsible for keeping us on the cutting edge of data interpretation and visualization, and help us peer into the future with predictive models. As a Data Scientist, you will apply the latest data mining techniques, using statistical analysis to integrate prediction systems with our products and present findings to the business.
Data Scientist Responsibilities
Building algorithms and designing experiments to merge, manage, analyze, and extract data for tailored reports to colleagues, clients or management.
Creating, managing, and utilizing high performance relational and NoSQL databases, such as Microsoft SQL Server, Oracle, Microsoft Access, OLAP and other software.",4.9,"Datasync Techonlogies Inc
4.9","McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Enterprise Knowledge (EK) is hiring for a Data Scientist to join our growing Advanced Data Practice. This individual will be responsible for designing cutting-edge data discovery, integration, and data governance solutions for a wide range of organizations around the world. EK was recognized on KMWorld's list of leaders in Artificial Intelligence, the AI 100: The Companies Empowering Intelligent Knowledge Management.
The Data Scientist will be part of a team working on cutting-edge projects and developing orchestrated data solutions to integrate and transform source data for Artificial Intelligence (AI) solutions. This individual will be able to quickly learn new technologies and apply them to business challenges at large corporations, organizations and federal agencies.The right candidate will have a passion for working with diverse data types and applying new methods and approaches to data challenges with a strategic mindset to advise clients on AI transformations.",3.9,"Enterprise Knowledge (EK)
3.9","Arlington, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"The driving force behind our success has always been the people of AspenTech. What drives us, is our aspiration, our desire and ambition to keep pushing the envelope, overcoming any hurdle, challenging the status quo to continually find a better way. You will experience these qualities of passion, pride and aspiration in many ways — from a rich set of career development programs to support of community service projects to social events that foster fun and relationship building across our global community.
The Role
As a Senior Data Scientist in our rapidly growing AI Hub Team, you'll have the opportunity to work on the next generation of Industrial AI applications. You will be responsible for researching and building new algorithms, conducting experiments, and building mathematical models to uncover data patterns. We are looking for results-oriented individuals passionate about working with data in all its forms to transform raw data into actionable and prescriptive insights. With your expertise in Data, Machine Learning, AI, and Cognitive Computing, you will play a key role in driving AspenTech's Artificial Intelligence vision by developing innovative software solutions.",3.6,"Aspen Technology
3.6","Bedford, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Senior,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Job Description
We are seeking Data Analytic expertise to support and advance a learning data analytic program that collects and analyzes training data, measures learning related organizational drivers of success and provides information to facilitate data driven decisions.
Work Requirements:
Determine appropriate approaches to analyze data sets (including statistical analysis).
Develop and utilize Artificial Intelligence/Machine Learning and other predictive data modeling techniques.",-1,The Swift Group,"Chantilly, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Company Description

MSRcosmos is an IT Services subsidiary of the MSRcosmos Group,
A U.S.-based multinational conglomerate. MSRcosmos Group focused on diverse ventures ranging from IT services to real estate and education. Together, both companies believe that business success and serving humanity are symbiotic and strive to excel at both.

Job Description

Position: Data Scientist",-1,Ajna Infotech,"Franklin, TN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Lead Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Lead Data Scientist

Trajector helps the underserved and at-risk disabled population in their quest to receive all the disability benefits they medically, legally, and ethically qualify for from both government and private entities. We develop medical evidence that helps our clients navigate the complex disability benefits journey to improve their life trajectory.

As the pioneers in this space, we have developed new and innovative Data Science techniques which have been an important part of our growth in revenue, and EBITDA. We have a data-focused culture, and are eager to expand our team with contributors who share our passion for data and insights. We now seek a Lead Data Scientist for our Product Analytics domain to enrich our team. This remote position will report directly to our VP of Data.",3.6,"Trajector
3.6","Gainesville, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Bioinformatics",$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Tome Biosciences is the programmable gene insertion company. Using CRISPR, our technologies allow us to insert any genetic sequence of any size at any location into any genome. We are writing the final chapter in genomic medicines, delivering cures to patients through cell and genome engineering.
Data Scientist, Bioinformatics

Tome Biosciences specializes in programmable insertion of genes using CRISPR. Our technologies enable us to insert any genetic sequence, regardless of size, into any genome at any location. We are at the forefront of genomic medicine, using cell and genome engineering to deliver cures to patients. At Tome, we prioritize research and collaboration, and offer a positive work culture, competitive compensation, and a flexible hybrid working environment.",-1,Tome Biosciences,"Watertown, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Researcher/Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Position Description
Animosity between Republicans and Democrats has reached new heights, threatening American democracy. The Cooperation Game initiative is developing a scalable, evidence-based strategy for reducing partisan animosity using cooperative online quiz games. This project is a collaboration between Harvard University and the Global Development Incubator. It is supported with seed funding from Schmidt Futures, Open Philanthropy, Beyond Conflict, and the Global Development Incubator. This translational project builds on the Greene Lab’s recent experimental research in which Republicans and Democrats cooperate as game partners in real time. We aim to deploy our quiz games in organizational contexts (e.g., businesses, schools) and eventually through a publicly accessible online platform. Our current focus is on the partisan divide in the US, but there may be opportunities to expand this work to other nations.",4.3,"Harvard University
4.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Competitive Pay
Health Insurance
Paid Time-Off
Profit Sharing
Training
Tuition Reimbursement
Incentives",5.0,"ISE Data Systems
5.0","Reston, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist

Position Description
CGI is looking for an aspiring Data Scientist who can join in our Applied Intelligence Solutions sector. The candidate will be responsible for designing & developing data ingestion and data transformation framework for our AI product platform. The candidate will also be providing statistical trend analysis on large structured and unstructured data sets and analysis of advanced algorithms including artificial intelligence concepts. The member will work to understand high value opportunities and be a part of the product development team.

Your future duties and responsibilities
Serve as an expert in translating complex data into key strategy insights and valuable actions.

CANDIDATES MUST BE WILLING TO WORK EASTERN TIME ZONE HOURS

Required qualifications to be successful in this role
o Experience working with ML libraries such as Scikit-learn, Spark, Pandas/NumPyTensorflow, Keras, or PyTorch
Graduation from a four-year college or university with a degree in statistics, physics, mathematics, engineering, computer science, or management of information systems

Skill Set Years of Experience Proficiency Level

Programming - Python, R 5+ 4

ML 7+ 4

Data Science 7+ 4

Cloud Platforms (Azure) 3+ 3


At CGI we call our professionals ""members"" to reinforce that all who join our team are, as owners, empowered to participate in the challenges and rewards that come from building a world-class company. CGI's benefits include:

Competitive base salaries
Eligibility to participate in an attractive Share Purchase Plan (SPP) in which the company matches dollar-for-dollar contributions made by eligible employees, up to a maximum, for their job category
401(k) Plan and Profit Participation for eligible members
Generous holidays, vacation, and sick leave plans
Comprehensive insurance plans that include, among other benefits, medical, dental, vision, life, disability, out-of-county emergency coverage in all countries of employment;
Back-up child care, Pet insurance, a Member Assistance Program, a 529 college savings program, a personal financial management tool, lifestyle management programs and more.



While technology is at the heart of our clients' digital transformation, we understand that people are at the heart of business success.

When you join CGI, you become a trusted advisor, collaborating with colleagues and clients to bring forward actionable insights that deliver meaningful and sustainable outcomes. We call our employees ""members"" because they are CGI shareholders and owners and owners who enjoy working and growing together to build a company we are proud of. This has been our Dream since 1976, and it has brought us to where we are today - one of the world's largest independent providers of IT and business consulting services.

At CGI, we recognize the richness that diversity brings. We strive to create a work culture where all belong and collaborate with clients in building more inclusive communities. As an equal-opportunity employer, we want to empower all our members to succeed and grow. If you require an accommodation at any point during the recruitment process, please let us know. We will be happy to assist.

Ready to become part of our success story? Join CGI - where your ideas and actions make a difference.

Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, ethnicity, ancestry, color, sex, religion, creed, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, pregnancy, medical condition, military and veteran status, marital status, sexual orientation or perceived sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, and gender expression, familial status, political affiliation, genetic information, or any other legally protected status or characteristics.

CGI provides reasonable accommodations to qualified individuals with disabilities. If you need an accommodation to apply for a job in the U.S., please email the CGI U.S. Employment Compliance mailbox at US_Employment_Compliance@cgi.com . You will need to reference the requisition number of the position in which you are interested. Your message will be routed to the appropriate recruiter who will assist you. .

We make it easy to translate military experience and skills! Click here to be directed to our site that is dedicated to veterans and transitioning service members.

All CGI offers of employment in the U.S. are contingent upon the ability to successfully complete a background investigation. Background investigation components can vary dependent upon specific assignment and/or level of US government security clearance held. CGI will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrests and conviction records in accordance with all local regulations and ordinances.

CGI will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with CGI's legal duty to furnish information.",3.9,"CGI Group, Inc.
3.9","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"The Sponsor’s unit provides data management support for a large, high-visibility area of responsibility. The Sponsor requires support in all aspects of the data management lifecycle, with a focus on advancing data management tasks, tracking data lifecycle processes, and implementation of the Sponsor’s rules and regulations. The work may be performed independently or within a team environment. The Sponsor needs skills in metadata and data management; cataloging; data ingestion; data sharing; and strong interpersonal skills to be able to work with other units as required. The Sponsor project manager will manage the priorities. The Data Scientist will identify and catalog datasets relevant to the AOR and track datasets through their lifecycle; catalog datasets and records of varying volume, content, and structure following Sponsor requirements, standard operations procedures, and best practices, and provide ad hoc reports from the data catalog on specific topics requested by Sponsor. They will monitor data submissions and track through ingestion lifecycle; monitor data submissions and track through data ingestion lifecycle; coordinate with the Sponsor and system teams to troubleshoot data management and ingestion issues; and provide support and advice to the Sponsor for data submissions. The Data Scientist will also support the creation of workflows, visuals, and briefing materials for presentations as requested by the Sponsor; participate in regular meetings under the direction of the Sponsor; coordinate with the Sponsor to adjust data management priorities as needed; and provide support to the Sponsor’s organization for data sharing with other organizations. They will support the Sponsor’s data compliance objectives by monitoring, tracking, and updating email groups and the training status of stakeholders and coordinate with the Sponsor to ensure all data handling decisions are tracked in enterprise data catalog.",4.3,"Cognitio
4.3","McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
USA-Data Scientist II (Clinical),$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist II (Clinical)
Waltham, MA
12 Months contract
Pay Range: $50-65/hr on w2

General:
"" Implementation of data analysis and process workflows across Waltham R&B
"" Transversal collaborative work with mRNA center of Excellence community and collaborators to achieve objectives.
"" Key user of the electronic laboratory notebook (Benching) to support the team and development of a user-friendly benching process for work and data collection
"" Traceability of samples, reagents, and their storage for the HT platform pipeline
"" Implementation of Sample\Reagent barcode solution in the electronic laboratory notebook (Benchling)
"" Provide solutions to for data visualization to track experimental results and stock of critical reagents

Tasks requiring Skilled Ability:
"" Looking for a PhD or MS candidate in molecular biology or related field with data science experience including strong understanding of electronic laboratory notebooks (Benchling experience preferred)
"" Assist in sample submission and management for samples throughout mRNA platform production pipeline
"" General scientific understanding in the following areas:
o PCR, cloning, and pDNA preparation
o Capillary electrophoresis, SDS page, UPLC-MS, UV-ABS
o Affinity Chromatography
o Cell Culture and Transfection
o ELISA and Activity Assays
o mRNA Formulation (PNP, LNP, etc.)
"" Ability to summarize complex scientific processes highlighting key process and data collection steps",4.2,"eTeam Inc.
4.2","Waltham, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Principal Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Craft:
Job Description:
Job Title: Sr. Principal Data Scientist - Activision Blizzard Media
Location: San Francisco, CA or New York, NY
About Activision Blizzard
Our mission, to connect and engage the world through epic entertainment has never been more important. Through communities rooted in our video game franchises we enable hundreds of millions of people to experience joy, thrill and achievement. We enable social connections through the lens of fun, and we foster purpose and a sense of accomplishment through healthy competition. Like sport, but with greater accessibility, our players can find purpose and meaning through competitive gaming. Video games, unlike any other social or entertainment media, have the ability to break down the barriers that can inhibit tolerance and understanding. Celebrating differences is at the core of our culture and ensures we can create games for players of diverse backgrounds in the 190 countries our games are played.
In the U.S., the standard base pay range for this role is $189,520.00 - $350,516.00 Annual. This base pay range is for the U.S. and is not applicable to locations outside of the U.S. Actual amounts will vary depending on experience, performance and location. In addition to a competitive base pay, employees in this role may be eligible for incentive compensation. Incentive compensation is not guaranteed.",3.5,"Activision
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Senior Data Scientist, Forecasting",$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Hinge Health is creating a new health care system, built around you. Accessible to 26 million members across 1,500 customers, Hinge Health is the #1 digital clinic for joint and muscle pain, delivering superior member outcomes and proven claims reductions. We pair the industry’s most advanced motion technology and wearable pain relief with a complete clinical care team of physical therapists, physicians, and board-certified health coaches to help people move beyond pain and reduce surgeries and opioid use. Hinge Health’s HingeConnect integrates with 1 million+ in-person providers to enable earlier interventions for avoidable MSK surgeries. Four in five health plans and employers with a digital MSK solution trust Hinge Health, including Land O’Lakes, L.L. Bean, Salesforce, Self-Insured Schools of California, Southern Company, State of New Jersey, US Foods, and Verizon. Learn more at http://www.hingehealth.com

Here at Hinge Health, we welcome all applicants and know a diverse team makes us better and stronger. We look for individuals who embody our leadership principles and we value varied experiences and skill sets. Beyond specific work experience, we also look for unique capabilities and skill sets that are key indicators an applicant will thrive in our fast-paced, frequently evolving environment. If this sounds like the kind of place you’d like to be part of, please apply - we would love to hear from you!",3.9,"Hinge Health
3.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist (Remote),$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Job Description

As a Senior Data Scientist in our Decision Sciences R&D organization, you will be responsible for researching and developing identity, control theory, simulation, and machine learning applications to extend Epsilon CORE Identity Platform. Epsilon CORE Identity Platform analyzes anonymized data at Internet scale and evaluates more than one trillion advertising opportunities per month in real-time. You will work on real-world problems as part of our highly collaborative R&D team, and your solutions will directly and rapidly impact our business. This includes analyzing raw source data and derived data; researching and developing models, algorithms, and applications; building tools and analyses for new and existing products; and presenting findings.

Responsibilities







For decades, we've been helping marketers from the world's top brands personalize experiences for millions of people with our cutting-edge technology, solutions and services. Epsilon's best-in-class identity gives brands a clear, privacy-safe view of their customers, which they can use across our suite of digital media, messaging and loyalty solutions. We process 400+ billion consumer actions each day and hold many patents of proprietary technology, including real-time modeling languages and consumer privacy advancements. Thanks to the work of every employee, Epsilon has been consistently recognized as industry-leading by Forrester, Adweek and the MRC. Positioned at the core of Publicis Groupe, Epsilon is a global company with more than 8,000 employees around the world. Check out a few of these resources to learn more about what makes Epsilon so EPIC:



We know that we have some of the brightest and most talented associates in the world, and we believe in rewarding them accordingly. If you work here, expect competitive pay, comprehensive health coverage, and endless opportunities to advance your career.

Epsilon is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Epsilon's policy is not to discriminate against any applicant or employee based on actual or perceived race, age, sex or gender (including pregnancy), marital status, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, mental or physical disability, religion, creed, color, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression (including transgender status), veteran status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law. Epsilon also prohibits harassment of applicants and employees based on any of these protected categories.

Epsilon will provide accommodations to applicants needing accommodations to complete the application process.

For San Francisco Bay and Los Angeles Areas: Epsilon will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the City of Los Angeles' Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance and San Francisco Police Code Sections 4901-4919, commonly referred to as the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance.

Applicants with criminal histories are welcome to apply.

#LI-EB1

REF186864J",3.9,"Epsilon
3.9","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Mathematical Statistician or Statistician (Data Scientist),$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Agency: U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
Position: Mathematical Statistician or Statistician (Data Scientist), SK-1529/1530-14
Promotion Potential: SK-14
Open & Close Dates: 08/18/2023 to 09/01/2023
Salary: $140,830 - $238,592 per year
Location: Washington, DC
Vacancies: Three (3)
Job Link: https://sec.usajobs.gov/job/744342500",-1,U.S. Securities & Exchange Commission,"Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, EDA",$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Azurity Pharmaceuticals is a privately held, specialty pharmaceutical company that focuses on innovative products that meet the needs of underserved patients. As an industry leader in providing unique, accessible, and high-quality medications, Azurity leverages its integrated capabilities and vast partner network to continually expand its broad commercial product portfolio and robust late-stage pipeline. The company's patient-centric products span the cardiovascular, neurology, endocrinology, gastro-intestinal, institutional, and orphan markets, and have benefited millions of patients. For more information, visit www.azurity.com.
Azurity Pharmaceuticals is proud to be an inclusive workplace and an Equal Opportunity Employer. Azurity's success is attributable to our incredibly talented, dedicated team that focuses on benefiting the lives of patients by bringing the best science and commitment to quality into everything that we do. We seek highly motivated individuals with the dedication, integrity, and creative spirit needed to thrive in our organization.",3.0,"Azurity Pharmaceuticals
3.0","Woburn, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Lead Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Experience building large scale machine learning models (predictive modeling)
Strong Python experience (coding specifically) and common used Python packages
SQL
Responsibilities:
Lead, design, develop and deliver innovative ML/AI solutions for various data science projects.
Be responsible for documenting and articulating various data science projects across the organization following our engagement model, the Cross-Industry Standard Process for Data Mining (CRISP-DM).",4.4,"Pri Global Inc
4.4","Saint Louis, MO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Managing Director Data Scientist Engineer,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Managing Director, Data Science Engineer (Stamford, CT) Build statistical models and conduct data analysis on Fraud, AML and other bank data. Develop optimal data pipeline architecture. Up to 5% domestic travel. May work remotely from any U.S. location. Apply online referencing AD #1422 to employer Webster Bank, using the link below. Webster Bank is an Equal Opportunity Employer.

#LI-DNI

Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",3.5,"Webster Financial Corp
3.5","Stamford, CT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Job no: 526795
Work type: Administrative & Professional
Senior management: College of Science
Department: Statistics
Location: Roanoke, Virginia
Categories: Research / Scientific, Data Analytics / Security
Job Description
In summary, under the supervision of a senior statistician, key responsibilities for the Data Scientist include:

Collaborating with investigators to design clinical studies in the health sciences, writing statistical methods for grant proposals, manuscripts, and summary reports, generating statistical analyses to support doctoral student and faculty research, engaging in sophisticated data wrangling, including claims data and electronic health records. Conducting appropriate statistical analyses using statistical languages (SAS, R, Python), including summarizing, and disseminating analytic findings. Conducting research and applying novel analytic and statistical methods as appropriate.",4.2,"Virginia Tech
4.2","Roanoke, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Barbaricum is a rapidly growing government contractor providing leading-edge support to federal customers, with a particular focus on Defense and National Security mission sets. We leverage more than 15 years of support to stakeholders across the federal government, with established and growing capabilities across Intelligence, Analytics, Engineering, Mission Support, and Communications disciplines. Founded in 2008, our mission is to transform the way our customers approach constantly changing and complex problem sets by bringing to bear the latest in technology and the highest caliber of talent.

Headquartered in Washington, DC's historic Dupont Circle neighborhood, Barbaricum also has a corporate presence in Tampa, FL and Dayton, OH, with team members across the United States and around the world. As a leader in our space, we partner with firms in the private sector, academic institutions, and industry associations with a goal of continually building our expertise and capabilities for the benefit of our employees and the customers we support. Through all of this, we have built a vibrant corporate culture diverse in expertise and perspectives with a focus on collaboration and innovation. Our teams are at the frontier of the Nation's most complex and rewarding challenges. Join us.",4.0,"Barbaricum
4.0",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"A career at Auto-Owners is challenging and rewarding. Our group of caring associates create financial security by helping individuals and businesses make a new start when a loss occurs.
Job Description
We offer a merit-based work-from-home program based on job responsibilities. After initial training in-person, this specific role could have the flexibility to work from home up to 3 days per week.
Auto-Owners Insurance, a top-rated insurance carrier, is seeking a data scientist to join our analytics teams. The position requires the person to:
Use statistical and machine learning techniques to build models that address business needs and comply with regulatory requirements
Work with large, complex data sets and develop a comprehensive knowledge of Auto-Owners data structures and metrics",3.6,"Auto-Owners Insurance
3.6","Lansing, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Lead Data Scientist - PDPO,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

About the team
PDPO(Privacy and Data Protection Office) is the organization to lead, supervise, and empower all TikTok's privacy work in an accountable and industry leading way. This team is the expert in the landscape of privacy risks and passionate about consulting across the company on implementing the proper safeguards and technical mitigations to ensure that our users’ privacy is honored across the TikTok's products and platforms.

About the role
The Data Scientist will lead programs to solve complex problems and deliver insights on trends as well as provide mentorship to other data scientists/analysts on the team. You will utilize data-driven techniques in building solutions to help measure, validate, identify, and envision TikTok's privacy evolution. You will design and scope out projects, build operationalized analytics tools and platforms, and most importantly, use data to find insights, diagnose problems and tell compelling stories. Besides the technical side, you will also get the opportunity to work closely with various XFN teams, including but not limited to legal, audit, security, public and government relations, and product. You will be expected to build deep domain knowledge from your day by day work and build a strong domain expertise in privacy.
analysis on various privacy projects.
Qualifications
Preferred Qualifications
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at gprd.accommodations@tiktok.com.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $130000 - $188500 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



At ByteDance/TikTok our benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support ByteDancers to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off(PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.",3.5,"TikTok
3.5","San Jose, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Diseases of Aging and Regenerative Medicine",$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Location: Cambridge, Massachusetts

About the role:

We are seeking a dedicated, creative, and skilled data scientist to join our global, dynamic, agile, embedded ‘dry-lab’ research environment and enable the discovery of therapeutic targets and new medicines for diseases of aging. As part of the Disease of Aging and Regenerative Medicine (DARe) Data Science team, you will have the opportunity to drive the integration and mining of high dimensional biological data using internal and external data resources. As a member of the NIBR data science community, you will also benefit from a >200 people global community with extensive know how and resources in data analysis, data engineering and machine learning.

Key Responsibilities:

Your responsibilities include, but are not limited to:






The pay range for this position at commencement of employment is expected to be between $130,400 and $195,600 per year; however, while salary ranges are effective from 1/1/23 through 12/31/23, fluctuations in the job market may necessitate adjustments to pay ranges during this period. Further, final pay determinations will depend on various factors, including, but not limited to geographical location, experience level, knowledge, skills and abilities. The total compensation package for this position may also include other elements, including a sign-on bonus, restricted stock units, and discretionary awards in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits (including 401(k) eligibility and various paid time off benefits, such as vacation, sick time, and parental leave), dependent on the position offered. Details of participation in these benefit plans will be provided if an employee receives an offer of employment. If hired, employee will be in an “at-will position” and the Company reserves the right to modify base salary (as well as any other discretionary payment or compensation program) at any time, including for reasons related to individual performance, Company or individual department/team performance, and market factors.",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Description:
Must have some combination (2 or more) of the following skill areas:

Foundations: Mathematical, Computational, Statistical

Relevant experience must be in designing/implementing machine learning, data science, advanced analytical algorithms, programming (skill in at least on high level language (e.g. Python), statistical analysis (e.g. variability, sampling error, inference, hypothesis testing, EDA, application of linear models), data management (e.g. data cleaning and transformation), data mining, data modeling and assessment, artificial intelligence, and/or software engineering.

Requirements:
Bachelor's?Degree must be in Mathematics, Applied Mathematics Statistics, Applied Statistics, Machine learning, Data Science, Operations Research, or Computer Science or a degree in a related field (Computer Information Systems, Engineering), a degree in the physical/hard sciences (e.g. physics, chemistry, biology, astronomy), or other science disciplines with a substantial computational component (i.e. behavioral, social, or life) may be considered if it included a concentration of coursework (5 or more courses) in advanced Mathematics (typically 300 level or higher, such as linear algebra, probability and statistics, machine learning) and/or computer science (e.g. algorithms, programming, , data structures, data mining, artificial intelligence). College-level requirement, or upper-level math courses designated as elementary or basic do not count.",5.0,"Fuse Engineering LLC
5.0","Fort Meade, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"The HiLabs Story
HiLabs was born in the halls of Yale University when a cardiologist and an AI expert teamed up to tackle the data quality issue in the US healthcare system. After seven years of working with some of the best data scientists in the world, HiLabs is on the cutting edge of breakthroughs in data science and AI.
HiLabs Team
Multidisciplinary industry leaders
Healthcare domain experts
AI/ML and data science experts",3.7,"Hilabs
3.7","Bethesda, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Bioinformatics",$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"About NewLimit
NewLimit is a biotechnology company working to radically extend human healthspan. We're developing medicines to treat age-related diseases by reprogramming the epigenome, a new therapeutic mechanism to restore regenerative potential in aged and diseased cells. We leverage functional genomics, pooled perturbation screening, and machine learning models to unravel the biology of epigenetic aging and disease using experiments of unprecedented scale.
Position
NewLimit is seeing an outstanding data scientist to join our Predictive Modeling or Single Cell Genomics teams. Data-driven predictive modeling is one of the key enabling technologies of our research program, allowing us to predict the outcome and prioritize the next round of experiments to guide the design of our therapies.",-1,NewLimit,"South San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Career Area:
Information Analytics
Job Description:
Your Work Shapes the World at Caterpillar Inc.
When you join Caterpillar, you're joining a global team who cares not just about the work we do – but also about each other. We are the makers, problem solvers, and future world builders who are creating stronger, more sustainable communities. We don't just talk about progress and innovation here – we make it happen, with our customers, where we work and live. Together, we are building a better world, so we can all enjoy living in it.",4.0,"Caterpillar
4.0","Chillicothe, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Remote,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Welcome to Holland America Line, a premium cruise line dedicated to explorers, foodies and music lovers who want to explore the world on perfectly sized, refreshingly spacious ships filled with one-of-a-kind experiences.
We’re looking for an amazing IT Data Scientist to fill this role. You’ll be a member of the Revenue Management System team, specifically focused on using data science skills to conceive and develop new opportunities to improve yield performance across multiple brands through enhancing the science part of the revenue management system (YODA) and increasing its adoption across its brands. This role will work closely with YODA science teams across multiple brands to help interpret models, assess unique business cases, and incorporate feedback between the brand science teams and the RMS. This role will also be involved in other key projects that help us better understand our guests' behaviors and preferences, allowing us to maximize revenue and guest experience by providing the right cruise experience to the right guest for the right price.",3.6,"Holland America Line Inc
3.6","Seattle, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Associate Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Career Area:
Information Analytics
Job Description:
Your Work Shapes the World at Caterpillar Inc.
When you join Caterpillar, you're joining a global team who cares not just about the work we do – but also about each other. We are the makers, problem solvers, and future world builders who are creating stronger, more sustainable communities. We don't just talk about progress and innovation here – we make it happen, with our customers, where we work and live. Together, we are building a better world, so we can all enjoy living in it.
Visa Sponsorship is not available for this position. This employer is not currently hiring foreign national applicants that require or will require sponsorship tied to a specific employer, such as, H, L, TN, F, J, E, O. As a global company, Caterpillar offers many job opportunities outside of the U.S which can be found through our employment website at www.caterpillar.com/careers.",4.0,"Caterpillar
4.0","Morton, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Product",$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"About Us:
We're on a mission to make it possible for every person, team, and company to be able to tailor their software to solve any problem and take on any challenge. Computers may be our most powerful tools, but most of us can't build or modify the software we use on them every day. At Notion, we want to change this with focus, design, and craft.
We've been working on this together since 2016, and have customers like Pixar, Mitsubishi, Figma, Plaid, Match Group, and thousands more on this journey with us. Today, we're growing fast and excited for new teammates to join us who are the best at what they do. We're passionate about building a company as diverse and creative as the millions of people Notion reaches worldwide.

Notion is an in person company, and currently requires its employees to come to the office for two Anchor Days (Mondays & Thursdays) and requests that employees spend the majority of their week in the office (including a third day).",4.9,"Notion
4.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Radiance Technologies is an employee-owned company with benefits that are unmatched by most small companies. Employee ownership, generous 401K and profit sharing, health/dental/life/vision insurance benefits, educational reimbursement, competitive salaries, a skilled work force, and a pleasant work environment combine to make Radiance Technologies a great place to thrive.
Radiance Technologies, a rapidly growing employee-owned company is seeking a Data Scientist to join our team in Suitland, MD at the National Maritime Intelligence Center (NMIC). This employee will provide full-time Data Scientist support at the NMIC.
ONI is focused on providing critical intelligence and environmental knowledge to the intel community and warfighting disciplines of Anti-Submarine Warfare; Naval Special Warfare; Mine Warfare; Intelligence, Surveillance and Reconnaissance; and Fleet Operations (Strike and Expeditionary), as well as to the support areas of Maritime Operations, Aviation Operations, Navigation, Precise Time, and Astrometry. In this capacity, it is the steward of a vast repository of data covering sea floor to space and spanning over a century.",4.5,"Radiance Technologies
4.5","Suitland, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Company Overview
At Motorola Solutions, we believe that everything starts with safety.It's the constant that empowers people to confidently move forward. It can fill a flight or sell out a stadium. It can care for a patient or graduate a class.

As a global leader in public safety and enterprise security, we create and connect the technologies that help to keep people safe where they live, learn, work and play. Our integrated technology ecosystem unifies critical communications, video security and access control, and command center software, enabling collaboration in more powerful ways.

At Motorola Solutions, we're ushering in a new era in public safety and security. Bring your passion, potential and talents to a career that matters.
Department OverviewMotorola Solutions creates innovative, mission-critical communication solutions and services that help public safety and commercial customers build safer cities and thriving communities around the world. We look for the most advanced problems solvers - like you - to help us create technologies that rise to the challenges of our customers. To connect firemen to policemen to emergency responders to nurses to specialists to lives saved. To protect communities, grow businesses and make work safer and more efficient. Motorola Solutions is looking for a self motivated individuals to help drive the next generation public safety experience, and to work with a team of top experienced professionals to enable mission critical services and solutions.Job Description
Responsibilities
Preferred Qualification
Basic Requirements
Travel RequirementsRelocation ProvidedPosition TypeReferral Payment PlanYes


Motorola Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to no discrimination because of race, color, creed, marital status, age, religion, sex, national origin, citizenship, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, disability, protected veteran, or any other legally protected characteristic.",4.3,"The Infosoft Group
4.3","Schaumburg, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Research & Development Engineer Co-op (Associate Scientist),$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Location
Boston
Job Description
Your first step towards an amazing career in Research and Development (R&D) at Procter and Gamble (P&G) starts with applying to this co-op. Within an R&D co-op, you’ll be actively involved in creating, reimagining and launching new innovations which improve our consumers lives… all around the world.
The duration of our co-ops range from 4-6 months starting in January or July located on-site at our Gillette World Shaving Headquarters in Boston, MA. As a co-op, you'll receive a co-op allowance. At P&G, Intern/Co-Op sessions are considered temporary employment, with a predicted ending point. No full-time employment commitments are made. However, depending on satisfactory completion of certain criteria, you may be considered for a full-time position upon graduation.
Full time
R000083199
Internships (Job Segmentation)
$29.00 - $50.00 / hour",4.1,"Procter & Gamble
4.1","Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Responsibilities

• Make recommendations regarding the collection, extraction, and transformation of large data sets
• Interpret data and analyze results
• Translate analytical insights into clear recommendations; identify trends and patterns to inform business decisions and product design
• Leverage Python to analyze complex data
• Design and develop customized interactive reports and dashboards in Tableau; schedule in Tableau Server
• Define and develop a data migration strategy between different products and platforms
• Develop creative ways to identify and use data that significantly impact key business metrics
• Assess the potential usefulness and validity of new data sources
• Utilize statistical approaches to build predictive models
• Mentor other team members/ analysts to grow their skills and careers",4.5,"Colsh Consultants
4.5","Santa Clara, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Posted 4 years ago

Working with our DW team, you will architect our data requirements and work with various HealthVerity tools to solve the most complex problems. You will become our in-house HealthVerity expert while engaging with product owners and external clients to understand the technical and operational challenges of diverse data models, data collection processes and needs. You will also become the go-to resource for Our team because of your HealthVerity expertise, extensive knowledge of healthcare data and your strong SQL skills.

What you will do

Analyze all data assets and address complex data anomalies
Provide guidance and support during onboarding process which includes data ingestion, normalization, and QC activities
medical claims transactions (e.g. 837 and 835), pharmacy claims (NCPDP D.0), EMR/EHR, lab transactions, and other emerging data assets to guide team in all decisions and architecture challenges
Map de-identified healthcare data to proprietary data structures
Support Data Architecture activities in the mapping and normalization process, providing expertise and authority within the team on accurate meanings in source data.

About You

Extensive experience using HealthVerity suite of services
A data Czar with unmatched SQL skills and a passion for doing the right thing
A self-starter who enjoys working in a small, rapidly changing, fast-paced environment
A leader who is not afraid to guide and course correct a process or team when required
A Big Data enthusiast who will executes through several approaches to determine the best fit
Energized by learning even if outside the scope of day-to-day responsibilities
Comfortable working on several different tasks as dictated by the business
Clear and concise communicator

Desired Skills and Experience

BS degree in math, statistics, or similar
4+ years experience in the healthcare data industry, preferably in a consulting environment
Experience with HealthVerity
Proficient in programming against large data assets with a working knowledge of SQL, preferably also knowledgeable in SAS and/or R
Subject matter expertise in a wide variety of healthcare data assets
Knowledge of the healthcare industry and analytics utilized by pharmaceutical marketing teams
Proven analytical, evaluative, and problem-solving abilities
Extensive experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment

Contract",-1,SeamlessWorld Consulting,"East Brunswick, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Lead Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"About Extend:
Extend is modernizing the $100 billion-per-year protection plan industry using cutting-edge technology and top-notch customer service.
Our technology-forward omnichannel and API-first solution allows any merchant to offer protection plans, both online and in store, while also providing a merchant's end customers with a vastly improved and modern support experience that eliminates many of the issues customers face today with legacy underwriters. More recently, Extend also launched a shipping protection solution, covering consumers in the case of lost, damaged or stolen packages. This is further expanding the company's addressable market and value creation for merchants.
We are a venture-backed startup in downtown San Francisco led by founders who have previously had multiple successful exits. Extend simplifies the technology stack for the product and shipping protection industries.",3.2,"Extend
3.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"The Data Scientist handles raw data (e.g. structured, unstructured, and mixed datasets), and analyzes data through the application of various statistical techniques or tools.
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES:
The successful candidate should have at least one and preferable more than one of the following skills:
Familiar with programming languages such as, but not limited to: R, SAS, Python, MatLab, SQL, Hive, Pig, and Spark.
Experienced in working with and exploiting big data; distributed computing; predictive modelling; mathematics; statistics; machine learning; story-telling; and visualization.",3.9,"QVine Corporation
3.9","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Duties
GS-11:
Utilize data systems or other strategies to acquire and prepare data for exploration or statistical analysis.
Analyze data using exploratory techniques by leveraging statistical or programming languages or software packages.
Communicate results of analyses using ready-made, basic data visualizations to novice end-users and stakeholders.
GS-12 (in addition to the above):",4.1,"US Federal Bureau of Investigation
4.1","Huntsville, AL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Global Data Analytics Rotational Development Program (RDP) Employee,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Equifax is where you can power your possible. If you want to achieve your true potential, chart new paths, develop new skills, collaborate with bright minds, and make a meaningful impact, we want to hear from you.
Data and Analytics Rotational Development Program: Data and Analytics, the advanced analytical division of Equifax, offers state of the art solutions to current and emerging business challenges. Through our data analytics, customer insights, predictive modeling, and consulting services, we deliver the analytics and insights companies need to stay ahead. Our US Information Services team is seeking recent college graduates for data scientist positions to construct best in class analytical solutions and business insights for Equifax.
We are searching for candidates who are currently pursuing their Master's Degree with an expected graduation date of December 2023.",3.5,"Equifax
3.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist (Starlink Product),$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"SpaceX was founded under the belief that a future where humanity is out exploring the stars is fundamentally more exciting than one where we are not. Today SpaceX is actively developing the technologies to make this possible, with the ultimate goal of enabling human life on Mars.
SR. DATA SCIENTIST (STARLINK PRODUCT)
At SpaceX we're leveraging our experience in building rockets and spacecraft to deploy Starlink, the world's most advanced broadband internet system. Starlink is the world's largest satellite constellation and is providing fast, reliable internet to 2M+ users worldwide. We design, build, test, and operate all parts of the system – thousands of satellites, consumer receivers that allow users to connect within minutes of unboxing, and the software that brings it all together. We've only begun to scratch the surface of Starlink's potential global impact and are looking for best-in-class engineers to help maximize Starlink's utility for communities and businesses around the globe",3.9,"SpaceX
3.9","Hawthorne, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"To get the best candidate experience, please consider applying for a maximum of 3 roles within 12 months to ensure you are not duplicating efforts.
Job Category
Data
Job Details
About Salesforce
We’re Salesforce, the Customer Company, inspiring the future of business with AI+ Data +CRM. Leading with our core values, we help companies across every industry blaze new trails and connect with customers in a whole new way. And, we empower you to be a Trailblazer, too — driving your performance and career growth, charting new paths, and improving the state of the world. If you believe in business as the greatest platform for change and in companies doing well and doing good – you’ve come to the right place.


Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance and the Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring, Salesforce will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",4.1,"Salesforce
4.1","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Position Title: Data Scientist
Reports To: Manager of Business Intelligence
Department: Business Intelligence
Status: Exempt
Position Purpose:
The Data Scientist role is responsible for leveraging statistical and computational methods to derive insights and develop predictive models based on company and industry data. This includes building algorithms to support internal departments, designing and implementing experiments, and analyzing sales and operational data to drive decision-making across the organization. Additionally, the Data Scientist will also be responsible for creating datasets and leveraging advanced statistical analysis, machine learning and artificial intelligence techniques to guide the company's strategic initiatives. Close collaboration with cross-functional teams will be necessary to address business challenges and opportunities while continuously enhancing models and algorithms to ensure accurate and effective results.",-1,"Cal-Tex Protective Coatings, Inc.","Schertz, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Title: Data Scientist
Job Location: Houston, TX
Job Type: Full Time

Job Description:
Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, physics, applied science, engineering or similar disciplines with demonstrated research capability with 5+ years of relevant experience.
Demonstrated experience in developing core machine learning algorithms and computer vision applications in professional research and development settings
Familiarity and experience with the latest advances in Deep Learning technology",3.9,"Global Information Technology
3.9",Texas,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Posted
15-Mar-2023
Service line
GWS Segment
Role type
Full-time
Areas of Interest
Data & Analytics
Location(s)
Richardson - Texas - United States of America
Job summary
Partnering with the Principal Data Scientist, this role will involve developing ML models to infer and learn from (un)structured data.",4.0,"CBRE
4.0","Richardson, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Date Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"About the Role
As a Data Scientist at IdeasVoice your role is to explore AI to develop intelligent services to build a valuable network for startups.
You will work on analyzing web usability performance and modeling user behavior. You will build and implement machine learning models to make intelligent matching and users profiling.
You will also Identify other interesting problems to solve and work closely with engineers, designers, product managers team to iterate on solutions.
‪We are looking for a mixture between a statistician, scientist, machine learning expert and engineer: someone who has passion for building and improving Internet-scale social platform. The ideal candidate understands human behavior and knows what to look for in the data. ‬",-1,IDEASVOICE,"San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"About Pull Systems

Pull Systems helps electric vehicle (EV) manufacturers, suppliers and operators manage their fleets with increasing levels of automation. Our software platform is underpinned by a library of machine learning models that predict battery behavior using a world class database of 3 years of operating history from nearly 100k vehicles. With Pull Systems, our manufacturer customers optimize costs (e.g., by predicting battery maintenance), boost aftersales revenues (e.g., by offering warranty extension products) and improve consumer experiences (e.g., by automating charging workflows).

Pull Systems is well-funded by some of the best-known investors in mobility, spun out of the Up Labs incubator in 2023 as the flagship company formed in partnership with Porsche.",3.4,"Pull Systems
3.4",California,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Lead/Senior Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Lead/Senior Data Scientist
Data Scientist I
Who we are:
Born digital, UST transforms lives through the power of technology. We walk alongside our clients and partners, embedding innovation and agility into everything they do. We help them create transformative experiences and human-centered solutions for a better world.
UST is a mission-driven group of over 29,000+ practical problem solvers and creative thinkers in over 30+ countries. Our entrepreneurial teams are empowered to innovate, act nimbly, and create a lasting and sustainable impact for our clients, their customers, and the communities in which we live.",3.9,"UST
3.9",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"AG Grace is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join our team. The Data Scientist will establish and implement mathematical problem-solving, and coding skills to manage a wide variety of data and extract valuable insights. Data will involve structured and unstructured data from information advantage activities in support of multi-domain operations. Work is performed in a hybrid role with some on-site customer support.

Essential Job Responsibilities
The data scientist will utilize their expertise in machine learning, statistical data analytics, and predictive analytics to help create and implement data solutions and analytics for diverse Department of Defense (DoD) data sets.",4.0,"AG Grace Inc
4.0","Fort Gordon, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Come join a winning team! Here at Imprivata, you’ll see a dedicated group of professionals who care about improving healthcare. Our team thrives on collaboration and sharing ideas, whether in a cross-functional meeting or at one of our virtual team-building events.
While we're diverse in our backgrounds and skills, we have much in common. A passion for our mission. A strong sense of integrity. A belief that we're making a positive impact and a commitment to having fun.
We are seeking a Senior Data Scientist to join our team to join our team for this hybrid opportunity working out of our Waltham, MA; Austin, TX; or St. Petersburg, FL offices. We are also extending this as a remote opportunity to candidates located in the Chicago, IL metropolitan area.



The Data Science team is responsible for building out the machine learning capabilities of Imprivata's Digital Identity Platform, with specific projects ranging from detecting patient privacy violations to using machine learning to empower what would be otherwise manual workflows. As a Sr. Data Scientist, you'll be deeply involved in every aspect of the project lifecycle, including gathering requirements, cleaning and exploring datasets, running machine learning experiments, and deploying services to production.",3.5,"Imprivata
3.5","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Optimal Solutions & Technologies (OST, Inc.) is focused on excellence. We specialize in providing Management Consulting, Information Technology, and Research Development and Engineering services.
The fundamental distinction of the OST team is its business knowledge in both the public and private sectors. We serve the aerospace & transportation, association & nonprofit, defense, education, energy, financial, healthcare, and technology & telecommunications industries. OST is successful because we listen to our clients, we learn from our clients, and we know our clients.

Data Scientist

Description of specific duties in a typical workday for this position:
OST supports government customers in ground breaking and meaningful work including: disaster response through FEMA’s National Flood Insurance Program disaster response, Space Force, radio frequency monitoring through FAA Spectrum, virtual training for the Army through PEO STRI, etc. Our Data Science Team, under OST’s Strategy and Business Performance Group, provides critical analytical support to our customers and project team members for their data-driven decision making journeys. Data analysis is the backbone for helping our customer’s achieve their missions and “future” technologies (like AI/ML) will take them to the next level. As an integral part of the Data Science Team, you will provide analytical support to our customers and solution delivery teams.",3.6,"OST
3.6","McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Machine Learning / NLP Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Attadale serves some of the most sophisticated and successful companies in the world. We are at the forefront of Machine Learning solutions that influence tangible business outcomes. Our clients engage Attadale because our work drives change that increases profitability and improves decision support, all while delighting employees and customers. Attadale is a boutique Chicago-based consultancy and we are expanding our ML team, especially within financial services and healthcare, and seek candidates with demonstrated ML experience, including success implementing NLP and predictive decision models.

The job can be as exciting as you envision, with select responsibilities including:
Analyze and model structured and unstructured data using advanced statistical methods and implement algorithms and software needed to perform analyses",-1,Attadale Partners,"Schaumburg, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist - Machine Learning,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Arthrex, Inc. is a global medical device company and a leader in new product development and medical education in orthopedics. Arthrex is actively searching for a Principal Data Scientist. Join our talented team at a global medical device company focused on Helping Surgeons Treat Their Patients Better.

Main Objective:
Responsible for supporting full life cycle development of machine learning models, which includes problem analysis, data collection, data exploration and preparation, model design, testing and validation, model maintenance.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Collaborates with data engineers and domain experts to profile and understand the quality of data sources and propose data clean up methods.

Applies Statistical Analysis and Machine Learning (ML) techniques to profile and organize data sources and understand their quality.

Collaborates with business leaders, domain experts and ML engineers to design ML solutions and their acceptance criteria.

Independently designs and conducts numerical experiments to prove principles and concepts behind ML solutions.

Collaborates with domain experts and ML Engineers to understand how best to deliver a ML solution.

Collaborates with external partners to integrate Analytics and ML tools into clinical solutions.

Communicates with business leaders, domain experts and ML engineers to provide actionable insights from the data sources.

Participates in the review of design model verification, deployment, and monitoring procedures.

Participates in the review of software product complaints and performs root cause failure analysis.

Identifies and pursues novel technology to support future strategic opportunities.

Oversee and support as appropriate, publications as needed within the scope of ML.

Definition, setup, and maintenance of software systems for deployment in research mode.

Supports Quality System Audits conducted by external agencies, such as FDA, Notified Body and/or Regulatory Agency audits.

Travel up to 15% domestically and internationally.


Strong experience leading complex, cross functional teams independently.

Experience defining strategic direction that addresses both business and technical risks.

Broad knowledge of application of systems engineering to the medical software industry required.

Broad technical knowledge in ML methods, their design, and implementation trade-offs.

Deep technical knowledge of statistical techniques for data analysis and hypothesis testing.

Strong technical communication and presentation skills required.

Knowledge of Software agile (SDLC) practices required.


Master’s degree in a related field required in Statistics, Applied Math, Engineering or Physics.

PhD degree in a related field preferred.

12 years of relevant work experience required

Arthrex 2023 Benefits

Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance
Company-Provided Life Insurance
Voluntary Life Insurance
Flexible Spending Account (FSA)
Supplemental Insurance Plans (Accident, Cancer, Hospital, Critical Illness)
Matching 401(k) Retirement Plan
Annual Bonus
Wellness Incentive Program
Free Onsite Medical Clinics
Free Onsite Lunch
Tuition Reimbursement Program
Trip of a Lifetime
Paid Parental Leave
Paid Time Off
Volunteer PTO
Employee Assistance Provider (EAP)
Eligible for discretionary Long Term Incentive program

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status.

Naples",3.8,"Arthrex
3.8","Naples, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist / Senior Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"StackAdapt is a self-serve advertising platform that specializes in multi-channel solutions including native, display, video, connected TV, audio, in-game, and digital out-of-home ads. We empower hundreds of digitally-focused companies to deliver outcomes and exceptional campaign performance everyday. StackAdapt was founded with a vision to be more than an advertising platform, it’s a hub of innovation, imagination and creativity.

We are searching for a talented Data Scientist to join our engineering team as we continue to expand our data science efforts. Our platform is connected to thousands of publishers and advertisers worldwide and as a result, we're dealing with millions of requests each second, making billions of decisions. We utilize the latest technologies to solve challenges in traffic, data storage, machine learning, and scalability.

Want to learn more about our Data Science Team: https://alldus.com/ie/blog/podcasts/aiinaction-ned-dimitrov-stackadapt/",4.2,"StackAdapt
4.2",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist III,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Condé Nast is a global media company producing the highest quality content with a footprint of more than 1 billion consumers in 32 territories through print, digital, video and social platforms. The company’s portfolio includes many of the world’s most respected and influential media properties including Vogue, Vanity Fair, Glamour, Self, GQ, The New Yorker, Condé Nast Traveler/Traveller, Allure, AD, Bon Appétit and Wired, among others. Condé Nast Entertainment was launched in 2011 to develop film, television and premium digital video programming.
Job Description
Location:
New York, NY
Condé Nast is a premier media company renowned for producing the highest quality content for the world's most influential audiences, attracting over 100 million consumers across its industry-leading print, digital, and video brands.
Condé Nast is home to many of the world's most-celebrated magazine and website brands. The company's reputation for excellence is the result of our commitment to publishing the best consumer, trade, and lifestyle content. Our brands include Vogue, Epicurious, Vanity Fair, The New Yorker, Wired, and many more. Passion is the core of our philosophy at Condé Nast. Our mission is not only to inform readers but to ignite and nourish their passions.",3.7,"Conde Nast
3.7","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"Company Description
Block is one company built from many blocks, all united by the same purpose of economic empowerment. The blocks that form our foundational teams — People, Finance, Counsel, Hardware, Information Security, Platform Infrastructure Engineering, and more — provide support and guidance at the corporate level. They work across business groups and around the globe, spanning time zones and disciplines to develop inclusive People policies, forecast finances, give legal counsel, safeguard systems, nurture new initiatives, and more. Every challenge creates possibilities, and we need different perspectives to see them all. Bring yours to Block.
Job Description",3.7,"Afterpay
3.7","Seattle, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist/AI Engineer,$120K - $160K (Glassdoor est.),"This role can be based anywhere in US, Canada, or Europe. Currently, we are looking for data scientsts with experience in enterprise scale deep learning, forecasting and decisioning model. You are an awesome problem solver who is both methodical and creative. You can learn any new technology, are not ashamed of admitting errors, love to take on new challenges, and a great team player. Strong algorithmic background is required and will be thoroughly evaluated. Strong at-scale experience building decisioning models using Deep Reinforcement Learning or other approaches is a must. Experience building large scale models with RNNs, CNNs and Gradient Boosting is desired but not required. Experience building and deploying high performance deep-learning models using either Tensorflow or PyTorch on significant complexity industrial/commercial data-sets is a must. Preference will be given to candidates with significant time-series modeling experience. Computer vision and NLP experience is a plus.












If you want to get into the founding engineering team of one of the valley's top teams developing one of the most innovative and unique cloud AI services in multi-trillion USD industry sectors with massive global implications on the planet and humanity, you've found it and we would love to hear from you very soon.",-1,DeepVu,"Berkeley, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Work Mode:
Onsite
Responsibilities:
1.Join a highly skilled data science team to mine through data to identify data-driven opportunities in game production, publishing and live-ops
2.Work with large datasets and apply advanced analytic methods to solve challenging problems and to deliver scalable solutions.
3.Establish scalable, efficient, automated processes and provide end-to-end data products with large-scale data analysis, A/B testing, machine/deep learning model development, validation and serving.
4.Interact cross-functionally with various teams and provide actionable business insights for stakeholders.
5.Research new machine learning approaches.
1.Join a highly skilled data science team to mine through data to identify data-driven opportunities in game production, publishing and live-ops
2.Work with large datasets and apply advanced analytic methods to solve challenging problems and to deliver scalable solutions.
3.Establish scalable, efficient, automated processes and provide end-to-end data products with large-scale data analysis, A/B testing, machine/deep learning model development, validation and serving.
4.Interact cross-functionally with various teams and provide actionable business insights for stakeholders.
5.Research new machine learning approaches.
1.MS/PhD degree in a quantitative field - Computer Science, Operational Research, Mathematics, Statistics, Economics or related fields. Ph.D. with Strong publication record preferred;2.3+ years of experience of building machine learning models for business applications;3. Deep and extensive knowledge in one or more of the following areas: Deep Learning, Reinforcement Learning, Statistical Analysis, NLP, Computer Vision, Recommendation System, Big Data technologies, and any other data science related domains.4.Expert in statistical analysis (probabilities, hypothesis testing, multivariate analysis, time series analysis, generalized linear model, A/B experiments) ;5.Proficient in SQL and Python, Java, C++ or related programming languages;6.Experience with Big Data technologies such as Hadoop, Spark, Pig, Hive, etc. is preferred.7.Ability to understand complex subjects clearly and proposing actionable data-driven solutions to them. Good business acumen and communication skills is a plus.

California
The base pay range for this position in the state(s) above is $81,400 to $179,300 per year. Actual pay is based on market location and may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. A sign on payment, relocation package, and restricted stock units may be provided as part of the compensation package, as well as other medical, financial, and/or other benefits, dependent on the specific position offered.",4.0,"Tencent
4.0","Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
2024 University Graduate - Security Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Our Company

Changing the world through digital experiences is what Adobe’s all about. We give everyone—from emerging artists to global brands—everything they need to design and deliver exceptional digital experiences! We’re passionate about empowering people to create beautiful and powerful images, videos, and apps, and transform how companies interact with customers across every screen.

We’re on a mission to hire the very best and are committed to creating exceptional employee experiences where everyone is respected and has access to equal opportunity. We realize that new ideas can come from everywhere in the organization, and we know the next big idea could be yours!

The Opportunity
The Adobe Cybersecurity Software Development Analytics team is dedicated to using the strength of data to protect our systems, inform security strategy, measure the efficacy of our defensive measures, and identify potential vulnerabilities. We are in search of a Data Scientist who is deeply passionate about harnessing big data to produce useful cybersecurity insights that inform critical security decisions. The ideal candidate will possess hands-on experience with analytics and data science, particularly in the cybersecurity realm, demonstrate exceptional quantitative analysis and technical abilities, communicate effectively, and collaborate within a multi-faceted team environment. The primary focus will be driving data science and analysis across an array of cybersecurity projects aimed at enhancing system defense and resilience. In essence, this role is tasked with answering: Where are our vulnerabilities? How can we improve our defenses? This role will be primarily oriented toward identifying patterns, anomalies, and potential threats, especially concerning individual user data and system-generated log data.

What Y ou’ll D o

A pply expertise in quantitative analysis, threat modeling, and cybersecurity techniques to deeply understand patterns and vulnerabilities within our systems interactions.

Use insights and data to inform cybersecurity strategies that enhance system integrity and safeguard data.

Monitor system security metrics daily, understand the root causes of security breaches or vulnerabilities, and offer guidance on risk forecasts.

Define and prioritize security opportunities and areas of focus based on potential threats and vulnerabilities.

Engage with various cross-functional teams (Security Operations, Threat Hunting, Incident Response, and other security teams) to fortify our defenses and enhance security resilience.

Capture, synthesize, and interpret disparate security data within the context of business objectives , identify potential threats, and explore vulnerabilities across different system segments.
What Y ou N eed to S ucce ed

3+ years of hands-on experience in quantitative analysis, preferably within the field of cyber security, threat intelligence, or risk assessment. A Ph.D. in Cyber Security Analytics or a related degree is preferred.

Experience in defining security problems, gathering relevant data, analyzing results, and crafting a compelling risk management strategy.

Strong analytical skills to decipher key security implications and business impacts.

Proficiency in querying and manipulating large datasets using SQL-like languages such as Spark SQL and programming languages such as Python, Scala, etc.

Statistical Modeling tools appropriate for security data such as R, Pandas, Jupyter Notebooks, PyTorch , or Spark ( PySpark ).

Experience with data visualization tools tailored for cyber security insights, like Tableau or Power BI.

Solid understanding of statistical modeling, machine learning, or data mining concepts, particularly as they relate to threat detection and anomaly recognition. Consistent track record of addressing security challenges using these methods.

Comfortable communicating security insights and findings to a wide range of collaborators, team members, and partners across various regions. Ability to convey complex data-driven security narratives in a clear and concise manner.

A strong sense of integrity, accompanied by a phenomenal sense of humor.

Eagerness and ambition to lead and pioneer new initiatives in the realm of cyber security.
Our compensation reflects the cost of labor across several U.S. geographic markets, and we pay differently based on those defined markets. The U.S. pay range for this position is $92,100 -- $161,100 annually. Pay within this range varies by work location and may also depend on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Your recruiter can share more about the specific salary range for the job location during the hiring process.

At Adobe, for sales roles starting salaries are expressed as total target compensation (TTC = base + commission), and short-term incentives are in the form of sales commission plans. Non-sales roles starting salaries are expressed as base salary and short-term incentives are in the form of the Annual Incentive Plan (AIP).

In addition, certain roles may be eligible for long-term incentives in the form of a new hire equity award.

Adobe is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and affirmative action employer. We do not discriminate based on gender, race or color, ethnicity or national origin, age, disability, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, or any other applicable characteristics protected by law. Learn more.

Adobe aims to make Adobe.com accessible to any and all users. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation to navigate our website or complete the application process, email accommodations@adobe.com or call (408) 536-3015.

Adobe values a free and open marketplace for all employees and has policies in place to ensure that we do not enter into illegal agreements with other companies to not recruit or hire each other’s employees.",4.4,"Adobe
4.4","San Jose, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
E-commerce Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are looking for Data Scientists to join our Global e-commerce Data Science team. The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.


Qualifications
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at USRC@tiktok.com

#LI-Hybrid
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $153000 - $332000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



At ByteDance/TikTok our benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support ByteDancers to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off(PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.",3.5,"TikTok
3.5","San Jose, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"JOB DESCRIPTION

DESCRIPTION:
Duties: Develop and implement a set of techniques or analytics applications to transform raw data into meaningful information using data-oriented programming languages and visualization software. Develop a testing strategy to learn what drives a prospect to choose certain wealth management products; extract data on customer behavior; and analyze customer journey based on content visited. Apply data mining, data modeling, and machine learning to extract and analyze information from large structured and unstructured datasets. Search for collections of behaviors and events that are individually innocuous but collectively indicate a likely next action in order to enable timely, relevant customer outreach. Visualize, interpret, and report data findings. Create dynamic data reports to serve descriptive and diagnostic analytics. Predict a segment’s unique financial needs to improve engagement and to deepen relationships with clients. Provide expertise as to how data visualization, greedy algorithms, machine learning, and text analytics/NLP can be leveraged to optimize customer experience. Create self- serve tools to put insights in the hands of decision-makers.








Our Consumer & Community Banking division serves our Chase customers through a range of financial services, including personal banking, credit cards, mortgages, auto financing, investment advice, small business loans and payment processing. We’re proud to lead the U.S. in credit card sales and deposit growth and have the most-used digital solutions – all while ranking first in customer satisfaction.",4.0,"JPMorgan Chase & Co
4.0","Jersey City, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Computational Biology Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"The Quantitative Sciences Unit (QSU) is an interdisciplinary collaborative statistics unit in the Biomedical Informatics Research Division within the Department of Medicine at Stanford University. The mission of the QSU is to facilitate cutting-edge scientific studies initiated by Stanford investigators by providing expertise in biostatics and informatics, to mentor and educate clinical investigators in research methods and to mentor data scientists. To optimally achieve this mission, the QSU members become fully integrated into individual research teams.
The QSU is seeking a highly motivated, hard-working and professional computational biology data scientist to extend our team of collaboration with clinical, immunological and bioinformatical researchers. We generate and have access to clinical and immunological data as well as many large data sets, including mass cytometry (CyTOF) and single cell sequencing data. The successful candidate will join a vibrant team of academic statisticians working on a wide variety of collaborative projects in medicine. This position holds excellent career development opportunities. This is an academic staff fixed-term position.",4.2,"Stanford University
4.2","Stanford, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Senior",$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Job Description
Location:
Bethesda,MD,US
Remote Work:
Hybrid
Job Number:
R0179617

Data Scientist, Senior
The Opportunity:
Salary at Booz Allen is determined by various factors, including but not limited to location, the individual’s particular combination of education, knowledge, skills, competencies, and experience, as well as contract-specific affordability and organizational requirements. The projected compensation range for this position is $93,300.00 to $212,000.00 (annualized USD). The estimate displayed represents the typical salary range for this position and is just one component of Booz Allen’s total compensation package for employees.",4.2,"Booz Allen Hamilton
4.2","Bethesda, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Career Area:
Information Analytics
Job Description:
Multiple openings.
Caterpillar Inc. seeks Sr. Data Scientists at its facility located at 540 W Madison Street, Chicago IL 60661.
JOB DESCRIPTION.
Will participate on cross-functional project teams, provide overall guidance to the technical direction of the project, and mentor Jr Information Scientists on the technical approaches being used in order to solve a problem presented by a Caterpillar Business Unit or Service Organization, a Caterpillar Dealer, or a Caterpillar Customer. Will apply statistical methods and/or digital methods to solve business problem. Will participate on 3-4 projects concurrently at any given time and in doing so will display strong initiative to research and apply new methods to exceed customer expectations. Will apply statistical and/or digital technology knowledge and the ability to solve low to medium complexity problems. Will demonstrate very good communication skills, being able to explain conclusions to customers with limited knowledge and experience with quantitative analytical methods. Will exhibit strong communications, a penchant for innovation, above average initiative, people development, and interpersonal skills.",4.0,"Caterpillar
4.0","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"At Boeing, we innovate and collaborate to make the world a better place. From the seabed to outer space, you can contribute to work that matters with a company where diversity, equity and inclusion are shared values. We’re committed to fostering an environment for every teammate that’s welcoming, respectful and inclusive, with great opportunity for professional growth. Find your future with us.
Boeing Global Services (BGS) is seeking an Experienced Data Scientist to support our business in Mesa, AZ or Hazelwood, MO or Ridley Park, PA. This organization supports BGS-Government Planning and the data analyst will apply statistical and other analytics techniques to assist with producing recommendations within the fast pace environment of aerospace.
A successful candidate will understand the importance of data analytics as these positions will focus on working directly with the demand planning, new business, and the Asset management team to perform statistical and mathematical data analysis to enable the BGS business to meet their organizational goals.





U.S. Government Export Control Status: This position must meet export control compliance requirements. To meet export control compliance requirements, a “U.S. Person” as defined by 22 C.F.R. §120.15 is required. “U.S. Person” includes U.S. Citizen, lawful permanent resident, refugee, or asylee.

US based job, US Person required",3.9,"BOEING
3.9","Mesa, AZ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Specialist, Data Scientist",$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist
Bring your ideas. Make history.
BNY Mellon offers an exciting array of future-forward careers at the intersection of business, finance, and technology. We are one of the world's top asset management and banking firms that manages trillions of dollars in assets, custody and/or administration. Known as the “bank of banks” - 97% of the world’s top banks work with us as we lead and serve our customers into the new era of digital.
With over 238 years of rich history and industry firsts, BNY Mellon has been built upon our proven ability to evolve, lead, and drive new ideas at every turn. Today, we’re approximately 50,000 employees across 35 countries with a culture that empowers you to grow, take risks, experiment and be yourself. This is what #LifeAtBNYMellon is all about.",3.6,"The Bank of New York Mellon Corporation
3.6","Lake Mary, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Entry Level - Associate Consultant (Federal),$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Introduction
IBM is a global cognitive and cloud company changing the way the world works. We foster a culture of creative, innovative thinkers; people who are curious about how technology can transform businesses and impact the world. Our consultants are part of IBM Consulting where we engage with clients across every industry to deliver technology-driven solutions. We cultivate a diverse, inclusive, global team of people who want to pioneer, reimagine, and disrupt the future. We’re driven to stay ahead in the marketplace and enhance our relevance to be essential to our clients, and this begins with our talent.

Here’s where you come in. We’re looking for passionate, original thinkers who want to drive progress, grow their network and further their careers. If you see yourself as someone who never stops learning and is dedicated to staying ahead and being essential for clients, who believes no problem is too big to solve, and who wants to unleash your potential, IBM Consulting is for you.

As an Associate, you’ll be a part of client-facing teams as a consultant, developer, designer, data scientist, or technical specialist to help businesses change the way they work.

Our clients' technical and business needs are constantly evolving. We’re hiring inspired, talented individuals eager to apply their knowledge and perspective to challenging work that evolves industries and our world. We prioritize ongoing learning, development of technical skills, and continuous personal growth, all grounded in a culture of coaching and apprenticeship.


You’re right at the intersection of technology, people, and process, helping your clients transform how they adapt to shifts in the market, and more closely align their business strategy and vision.

Consultants are important and key players for our clients. You’ll be their guide to developing an understanding of their processes, goals, and objectives to define their future state, then help them get there.

You’ll help clients understand leading technologies and the impact they can have on traditional business processes. You’ll have an opportunity to build a powerful portfolio of interesting and rewarding experiences, taking advantage of opportunities to master new skills, learning about, and becoming an expert in our client's industries, and tackle new challenges. Leveraging a growth mindset, you’re ready and willing to deliver business value, wherever needed.",3.9,"IBM
3.9","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
ML Ops Engineer,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"USA, Remote
Join us to advance data science and machine learning.
Comet is accelerating the machine learning development process for data science and ML teams. From the individual data scientist tracking training runs to the enterprise team moving hundreds of models into production, Comet is the platform used by some of the most innovative builders in the industry. We started Comet to make it possible for teams to manage and optimize models across the complete ML lifecycle and achieve business value faster.",4.4,"Comet.ml
4.4",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Staff Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"General information
All posting locations: Remote, Illinois, United States of America
Job Function: 16 - Digital
Date Published: 16-Aug-2023
Ref #: R-73166
Base Salary Range: $110,200.00 - $137,800.00
Target Total Cash Range: $148,770.00 - $186,030.00
Target total cash represents this role's annualized cash earning potential at target (base salary + target bonus). Target total cash is contingent on targeted company performance achievement and individual attainment of performance goals. Therefore, target total cash is not guaranteed earnings. In addition to base salary and bonus, this role is eligible for additional compensation in the form of equity.",3.5,"Kraft Heinz Company
3.5",Illinois,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Staff Data Scientist - Algorithms, Guest Science",$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Airbnb was born in 2007 when two Hosts welcomed three guests to their San Francisco home, and has since grown to over 4 million Hosts who have welcomed more than 1 billion guest arrivals in almost every country across the globe. Every day, Hosts offer unique stays and experiences that make it possible for guests to connect with communities in a more authentic way.
The Community You Will Join:
Understanding Who are our Guests and What they want is at the heart of providing a high quality user experience and informing thoughtful personalization of our online product. The core of the Airbnb platform is hospitality and we aim to become the ultimate host for our users, at every detail. To achieve such a goal, the Data Science team mines various collections of behavioral data to design and build machine learning models to understand our user experience and app performance. This derived understanding is used to inform product improvements that make the steps from search to booking easy and fast for guests.",4.4,"Airbnb
4.4","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist/AI Engineer,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"This role is based in Canada or France. Currently, we are looking for highly innovative energetic principal data scientsts with experience in enterprise scale deep learning, forecasting and decisioning model. You are an awesome problem solver who is both methodical and creative. You can learn any new technology, are not ashamed of admitting errors, love to take on new challenges, and a great team player. Strong algorithmic background is required and will be thoroughly evaluated. Strong at-scale experience building decisioning models using Deep Reinforcement Learning or other approaches is a must. Experience building and deploying high performance deep-learning models using either Tensorflow or PyTorch on significant complexity industrial/commercial data-sets is a must. Preference will be given to candidates with significant time-series modeling experience.

We'd love to chat if you have:










If you want to get into the founding engineering team of one of the valley's top teams developing one of the most innovative and unique cloud AI SaaS in multi-trillion USD industry sectors with massive global implications on the planet and humanity, you've found it and we would love to hear from you very soon.",-1,DeepVu,"Berkeley, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Lead Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Ready to help us transform healthcare? Bring your true colors to blue.

Position Overview:
The Data Scientist has the overall responsibility to serve as the strategic interface with assigned business units or functional area for the purpose of business analytics strategy development, solution development and service management, related to business intelligence and advanced analytics initiative. Data Scientist serves as the partner between business units and Analytics teams including Enterprise Analytics, Enterprise Architecture, IT, and Business Pillars. The Data Scientist provides highly valued strategic consulting and Data Science support and guidance through key Analytics initiatives. They proactively share knowledge of risks and opportunities to build competitive advantage and improve efficiency and effectiveness of aligned business units. They partner with business leadership and other key stakeholders to define opportunities and identify and prioritize projects based on predefined criteria such as return on customer experience, investment, productivity, efficiency, compliance and state/federal regulations.
The Data Scientist proactively serves as a “trusted analytics advisor” and is the primary Analytics Pod point of contact to business stakeholders for Data Science and Advanced Analytics related issues. The “Lead Data Scientist” focuses on strategic initiatives and planning activities for their business area. They serve a lead role in enabling the business to achieve their objectives through the effective use of analytics.

eWorker, mobile, resident.


Responsible for the development and implementation of Data Science roadmaps and to ensure successful introductions across the functional team and with customers
Work directly with aligned business partners to develop analytics for internal asset optimization to better align program performance to top outcomes
Create reusable implementations of statistical tests and models using the available technologies in the ecosystem
Work with the academic and business community to develop new techniques and to contribute to research in the area of advanced analytics on large databases
Assist in customer engagement management, requirements definition, project scoping, timeline management, and results documentation to ensure professional relationship management
Develop solution concepts and business cases for new analytical initiatives.
Perform business analysis and prepare recommendations and business plans as needed.
Translate the Data Science solution roadmap into an executable plan. Identify and document high-level business requirements and match capability needs with internal and external vendors/service providers.
Responsible for detailed data science business requirements documentation.
Create and analyze relevant information and develop recommendations that they present to various stakeholders.
Act as the key liaison across aligned functional areas, including business units, the information technology department, and outside vendors.
Possess a broad knowledge of most technical and business resources and use them to effectively coordinate team members and external resources.
Create shared vision of their respective analytical solutions and facilitate decision making.
Oversee the launch of analytical solutions and help to maximize the positive impact on the organization.
Identify, screen and evaluate new solution opportunities to address unmet (internal and external) customer needs.
Possess strong analytical skills, including an understanding of business economics and financial resources.
Utilize the appropriate technologies and ensure that customers have the solutions they need, when they need them, and in the media best suited to their requirements.
Collaborate with enterprise architecture and IT teams to ensure solution compatibility with company standards.

Education and Experience
Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, or Information Technology
Experience in using mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
Experience in working with assignments that involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors
Requires knowledge of R, Python or SAS. (or other similar open source technologies)
At least 5 years of related experience
Advanced Tableau visualization skills
Knowledge of the software development lifecycle and proven ability to execute in an agile environment
Strong facilitation skills, including ability to drive business use cases, and discovery process
Proven ability to lead multiple initiatives, think strategically and drive projects to completion
Strategic thinking and planning
Strong organizational skills
Curious and innovative
Effective and strong written and oral communication skills
Ability to work in a dynamic and changing environment
Knowledge of Agile philosophy and workflow
Knowledge of using version control software such as Gitlab for team collaboration
Advanced machine learning knowledge, and model development
Ability to train new users on these new tools and technologies


High school degree or equivalent required unless otherwise noted above

Location Boston Time Type Full time

$157,050.00 - $191,950.00

The job posting range is the lowest to highest salary we in good faith believe we would pay for this role at the time of this posting. We may ultimately pay more or less than the posted range, and the range may be modified in the future. An employee’s pay position within the salary range will be based on several factors including, but limited to, relevant education, qualifications, certifications, experience, skills, performance, shift, travel requirements, sales or revenue-based metrics, and business or organizational needs and affordability.

This job is also eligible for variable pay.

We offer comprehensive package of benefits including paid time off, medical/dental/vision insurance, 401(k), and a suite of well-being benefits to eligible employees.

No amount of pay is considered to be wages or compensation until such amount is earned, vested, and determinable. The amount and availability of any bonus, commission, or any other form of compensation that are allocable to a particular employee remains in the Company's sole discretion unless and until paid and may be modified at the Company’s sole discretion, consistent with the law.

WHY Blue Cross Blue Shield of MA?
We understand that the confidence gap and imposter syndrome can prevent amazing candidates coming our way, so please don’t hesitate to apply. We’d love to hear from you. You might be just what we need for this role or possibly another one at Blue Cross Blue Shield of MA. The more voices we have represented and amplified in our business, the more we will all thrive, contribute, and be brilliant. We encourage you to bring us your true colors, , your perspectives, and your experiences. It’s in our differences that we will remain relentless in our pursuit to transform healthcare for ALL.

As an employer, we are committed to investing in your development and providing the necessary resources to enable your success. Learn how we are dedicated to creating an inclusive and rewarding workplace that promotes excellence and provides opportunities for employees to forge their unique career path by visiting our Company Culture page. If this sounds like something you’d like to be a part of, we’d love to hear from you. You can also join our Talent Community to stay “in the know” on all things Blue.

At Blue Cross Blue Shield of Massachusetts, we believe in wellness and that work/life balance is a key part of associate wellbeing. We provide a flexible hybrid work model in which roles are designated as resident (on site 4-5 days/week), mobile (on site 1-3 days/week), or eworker (on site 0-3 days/month).",3.8,"Blue Cross Blue Shield of Massachusetts
3.8","Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Quantitative Analytics Tech Lead - Data Scientist (Hybrid - 3 Days in Office),$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"At Freddie Mac, you will do important work to build a better housing finance system and you’ll be part of a team helping to make homeownership and rental housing more accessible and affordable across the nation.
Position Overview:
Are you looking for an opportunity to put your technical skills to use working on advanced modeling challenges? Freddie Mac’s Modeling, Econometrics, Data Science & Analytics Department is currently seeking a Quantitative Analytics Lead. The candidate will have subject matter expertise in credit data. The position requires deep understanding of credit data, credit reports and raw credit in-files. The Lead will be responsible for the development and execution of quantitative analytics and modeling projects in support of Freddie Mac’ business. Apply now and learn why there’s #MoreAtFreddieMac!
Time-type:Full time
FLSA Status:Exempt
This position has an annualized market-based salary range of $134,000 - $200,000 and is eligible to participate in the annual incentive program. The final salary offered will generally fall within this range and is dependent on various factors including but not limited to the responsibilities of the position, experience, skill set, internal pay equity and other relevant qualifications of the applicant.",3.4,"Freddie Mac
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Field Data Scientist (Spanish speaking) - IDS2009,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Our Purpose
We work to connect and power an inclusive, digital economy that benefits everyone, everywhere by making transactions safe, simple, smart and accessible. Using secure data and networks, partnerships and passion, our innovations and solutions help individuals, financial institutions, governments and businesses realize their greatest potential. Our decency quotient, or DQ, drives our culture and everything we do inside and outside of our company. We cultivate a
culture of inclusion
for all employees that respects their individual strengths, views, and experiences. We believe that our differences enable us to be a better team – one that makes better decisions, drives innovation and delivers better business results.
Title and Summary
Field Data Scientist (Spanish speaking) - IDS2009
Who is Mastercard?

Mastercard is a global technology company in the payments industry. Our mission is to connect and power an inclusive, digital economy that benefits everyone, everywhere by making transactions safe, simple, smart, and accessible. Using secure data and networks, partnerships and passion, our innovations and solutions help individuals, financial institutions, governments, and businesses realize their greatest potential.

Our decency quotient, or DQ, drives our culture and everything we do inside and outside of our company. With connections across more than 210 countries and territories, we are building a sustainable world that unlocks priceless possibilities for all.

Overview

The Cyber and Intelligence Solutions (C&I) team is responsible for product management and innovative product development of products and services to address the evolving risk & cybersecurity needs of all of Mastercard’s various customer segments. The C&I team was established with the responsibility to safeguard all aspects of safety and security in payments and have made great strides with new products, services and standards, positively impacting all aspects of our current and future payment ecosystem.

Ekata, a Mastercard company, is the global standard in identity verification, providing businesses worldwide the ability to link any digital transaction to the human behind it. Our Ekata Identity Engine, the first and only of its kind, uses complex machine learning to combine features derived from the billions of transactions within our proprietary network and the data from our graph to deliver industry leading risk assessment solutions.

As a Field Data Scientist at Ekata, a Mastercard Company, you will have a diverse set of responsibilities supporting sales (pre-sales), customer success (post-sale), and product development, with the aim of supporting, growing, and developing a best-in-class product suite in the identity verification industry. The role is focused on making sure potential prospects & clients see the best possible value from the Ekata data ecosystem through machine learning or rule-based systems. As a product implementation expert, you will advise customers how to best leverage Ekata data in their fraud workflows through proof of value tests. This role specifically will have a focus supporting prospects and customers in our Latin America & Caribbean region.

Role

As a Field Data Scientist you will:

Support the sales team to ensure Ekata can highlight the maximum benefit of its dataset, through proof of value (POV) tests.

Support development of machine learning and rules-based models to maximize fraud detection and false positive reduction for clients.

Understand customer business needs and workflows, using this knowledge to position Ekata products and design solutions using them.

Proactively nurture & maintain one-on-one relationships with customer data scientists, with the aim of providing deep insights for development of fraud models.

Acquire a deep knowledge of Ekata products and data, using this knowledge to act as subject matter expert for customers.

Identify & analyze Ekata data features that a) could be adapted to provide better value b) not currently provided by Ekata and would add value c) are not providing and should be removed to reduce signal to noise ratio.

Work with customer IT and engineering resources to QA their integration of Ekata APIs and ensure the correct data is available for modeling.

Assist with internal training on Ekata products, data, and processes.

Attend product spec reviews to bring customer facing perspectives and share feedback from the market.

All About You

Ability to speak Spanish and English fluently in a business setting

Computer/Data Science or Engineering degree, or equivalent experience.

Experience in a machine learning or data analytics capacity.

Experience in a customer-facing or heavily cross-functional role

Excellent scripting and analysis skills in python and SQL.

Excellent presentation and communication skills.

Ability to create and understand supervised machine learning models.

Experience in understanding customer needs and using those to build design docs or technical specifications.

Proven ability to establish credibility with technical leaders in customer organizations.
In the US, Mastercard is an inclusive Equal Employment Opportunity employer that considers applicants without regard to gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, ethnicity, disabled or veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. If you require accommodations or assistance to complete the online application process, please contact reasonable_accommodation@mastercard.com and identify the type of accommodation or assistance you are requesting. Do not include any medical or health information in this email. The Reasonable Accommodations team will respond to your email promptly.",4.3,"Mastercard
4.3","Miami, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist- Predictive Modeling,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Description
The Principal Data Scientist will be responsible for developing a wide range of analytical functions, potentially including but not limited to: development of statistical models, machine learning, data intelligence, analytical insights, customer analytics, and process improvement, with the intent to optimize business spend & function, identify new opportunities, enhance the customer experience, and provide strategic direction to stakeholders.
This role will serve as the Statistical Modeling / Data Science support for the Student Lending line of business. This Principal Data Scientist will report within an Advanced Analytics team to enable collaboration, the sharing of analytical ideas, and the alignment of best practices.
At Citizens, you'll find a customer-centric culture built around helping our customers and giving back to our local communities. When you join our team, you are part of a supportive and collaborative workforce, with access to training and tools to accelerate your potential and maximize your career growth",3.7,"Citizens
3.7","Columbus, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr Clinical Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Clinical Data Scientist
This position is Full-Time and Hybrid: will be required to work 1-2 days per week on-site in Wilmington, DE
Why DSSS?
Data Sciences Staffing Solutions, DSSS or DS3, is a unit within IQVIA that provides our sponsors with fully dedicated resources through a Functional Service Provider (FSP) partnership. This means you get all the benefits of working for an industry leading global CRO while operating within a sponsor environment and utilizing sponsor systems. These sponsor clients include world class pharmaceutical and biotech companies offering you unique opportunities to influence the future of medicine and advance therapies.",4.0,"IQVIA
4.0","Wilmington, DE",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Global Validation Services, LLC is seeking to fill a Data Science Position
Job Title: Data Scientist
Clearance: Top Secret/SCI
Employee Type: Full Time
Percentage of Travel: Local NCR and possibly outside NCR
Location: Arlington, VA
Job Overview:
The mission of the FAM program is to coordinate with internal and external partners to provide
accurate, complete, timely, and relevant, vetting, tracking, and analysis services in order to
reduce the risk of foreign engagement within the Department.",-1,GLOBAL Validation Services (GVS),"Arlington, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist
Job #:
req24057

Organization:
World Bank

Sector:
Economics

Grade:
GF",4.0,"IFC Systems Corporation
4.0","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Hims & Hers Health, Inc. (better known as Hims & Hers) is a multi-specialty telehealth platform building a virtual front door to the healthcare system. We connect consumers to licensed healthcare professionals, enabling people to access high-quality medical care—from wherever is most convenient—for numerous conditions related to sexual health, hair care, mental health, skincare, primary care, and more.
With products and services available across all 50 states and Washington, D.C., Hims & Hers is on a mission to help the world feel great through the power of better health. We believe how you feel in your body and mind transforms how you show up in life. That's why we're building a future where nothing stands in the way of harnessing this power. We normalize health & wellness challenges—and innovate on their solutions—to make feeling happy and healthy easy to achieve. No two people are the same, so we provide access to personalized care designed for results. At our core, our mission is deeply personal—because we too are customers.",4.0,"hims & hers
4.0",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Senior Product Data Scientist, Roku Pay",$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Teamwork makes the stream work.
Roku is changing how the world watches TV
Roku is the #1 TV streaming platform in the US, and we've set our sights on powering every television in the world. Roku pioneered streaming to the TV. Our mission is to be the TV streaming platform that connects the entire TV ecosystem. We connect consumers to the content they love, enable content publishers to build and monetize large audiences, and provide advertisers unique capabilities to engage consumers.
From your first day at Roku, you'll make a valuable - and valued - contribution. We're a fast-growing public company where no one is a bystander. We offer you the opportunity to delight millions of TV streamers around the world while gaining meaningful experience across a variety of disciplines.",4.1,"Roku
4.1","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Leads and executes deep dive diagnostic, predictive, and prescriptive analytics to support data-driven business decision making. Mentors and develops junior data scientists and analysts.
Core Responsibilities
Develops complex queries and performs extensive programming to access, transform, and prepare data for statistical modeling.
Leads and executes deep dive diagnostic, predictive, and prescriptive analytics to support data-driven business decision making. Mentors and develops junior data scientists and analysts.
Identifies and diagnoses data inconsistencies and errors, documents data assumptions, and forages to fill data gaps.",3.7,"Vanguard
3.7","Philadelphia, PA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Staff Data Scientist - Search,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"About Faire
Faire is an online wholesale marketplace built on the belief that the future is local — independent retailers around the globe are doing more revenue than Walmart and Amazon combined. At Faire, we're using the power of tech, data, and machine learning to connect this thriving community of entrepreneurs across the globe. Picture your favorite boutique in town — we help them discover the best products from around the world to sell in their stores. With the right tools and insights, we believe that we can level the playing field so that small businesses everywhere can compete with these big box and e-commerce giants.
By supporting the growth of independent businesses, Faire is driving positive economic impact in local communities, globally. We're looking for smart, resourceful and passionate people to join us as we power the shop local movement. If you believe in community, come join ours.",4.6,"Faire
4.6",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"2024 Co-Op, Data Science and Artificial Intelligence",$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"The Role
The Data Science and Artificial Intelligence (DSAI) Co-op Program is a 6-month experience designed for students studying towards a Bachelor’s, Master’s, or PhD degree in applying machine learning methods to problems in clinical trial recruitment and regulatory affairs,. As part of our mission to “Build The Digital Biotech Company” we see a central role for DSAI in accelerating the science and engineering at the heart of our innovative culture. During this co-op you will learn about the biotechnology industry, work under the supervision of an experienced data scientist, and apply your academic knowledge and personal experience to projects focused on aligning business objectives to people's priorities. You will be accountable for delivering clean code and deploying models on our internal computational infrastructure. We are looking for someone who is detail-oriented, deeply curious, exhibits an excellent work ethic, and is eager to expand their existing machine learning skillsets with cutting-edge methods while applying them to impactful scientific questions.

Our program starts on Jan 16, 2024, and ends on Jun 14, 2024. All applicants must be available to work full-time during this time range and must be willing to relocate to Cambridge, MA for the duration of the co-op.

If you are bold, relentless, collaborative and obsess over learning, this co-op opportunity at Moderna will help augment your experience and accelerate your career. If you are interested in any one of the following fields, here is a list of potential projects you might be working on during this 6-month period :

Clinical trial Recruitment - Leveraging historical search data and patient referrals proximity to a site to identify the likelihood of a patient to enroll in a clinical trail

Regulatory Affairs – Leveraging state of the art Language models such as llama2, gpt4 etc to perform document understanding, document retrieval and developing a chatbot that learns from user feedback to respons to user queries on the knowledge base of regulatory documents

Here’s What You’ll Need ( Basic Qualifications)

Current B.S., M.S., or Ph.D. students in Computer Science, Applied Math, Engineering or other related quantitative STEM disciplines.

Solid understanding of probabilistic models and applied statistics.

Fluency in Python, especially the scientific Python stack (Jupyter/Pandas/Scikit-learn/PyTorch).

Work experience in Unix/Linux environment.

Prior experience with deep learning or machine learning projects.

Excellent communication skills (verbal, written, and virtual/remote).

Willing and able to relocate to Cambridge, MA for the co-op.

Indefinite right to work in the United States without the need for sponsorship now or in the future.

Here’s What You’ll Bring to the Table (Preferred Qualifications)

Familiarity with both the theory and practice of Natural Language Processing/Understanding (SpaCy/NLTK/transformers/word embeddings/etc.).

Experience in probability modeling of a real-world system involving the inherent uncertainty

Familiarity with large language models and its applications

Experience in finetuning large language models on custom infrastructure

Experience in identifying, procuring, and integrating external data sources.

Familiarity with software development processes and git version control.

Deliver documented and unit-tested code, visualizations, in-depth user-facing documentation, and stakeholder-facing written and oral presentations on the chosen project.

A desire to make an impact as part of a high-growth, transformational company that is Bold, Relentless, Curious, and Collaborative.

Moderna is pleased to provide you with an innovative suite of benefits, including:
Free premium access to meditation and mindfulness classes
Free parking or subsidized commuter passes


Location-specific perks and extras!

About Moderna
Since our founding in 2010, we have aspired to build the leading mRNA technology platform, the infrastructure to reimagine how medicines are created and delivered, and a world-class team. We believe in giving our people a platform to change medicine and an opportunity to change the world.

By living our mission, values, and mindsets every day, our people are the driving force behind our scientific progress and our culture. Together, we are creating a culture of belonging and building an organization that cares deeply for our patients, our employees, the environment, and our communities.

We are proud to have been recognized as a Science Magazine Top Biopharma Employer, a Fast Company Best Workplace for Innovators, and a Great Place to Work in the U.S.

If you want to make a difference and join a team that is changing the future of medicine, we invite you to visit modernatx.com/careers to learn more about our current opportunities.

Moderna is a smoke-free, alcohol-free and drug-free work environment.

Moderna is a place where everyone can grow. If you meet the Basic Qualifications for the role and you would be excited to contribute to our mission every day, please apply!

Moderna is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer.

Moderna is committed to equal employment opportunity and non-discrimination for all employees and qualified applicants without regard to a person's race, color, sex, gender identity or expression, age, religion, national origin, ancestry or citizenship, ethnicity, disability, military or protected veteran status, genetic information, sexual orientation, marital or familial status, or any other personal characteristic protected under applicable law. Moderna is an E-Verify Employer in the United States. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements.

Belonging, Inclusion, and Diversity are critical to the success of our company and our impact on society. We’re focused on attracting, retaining, developing, and advancing our employees and believe that by cultivating diverse experiences, backgrounds, and ideas, we can provide an environment where every employee is able to contribute their best.

Moderna is committed to offering reasonable accommodations to qualified job applicants with disabilities. Any applicant requiring an accommodation in connection with the hiring process and/or to perform the essential functions of the position for which the applicant has applied should make a request to the Talent Acquisition Partner or contact the Accommodations team at leavesandaccommodations@modernatx.com . (EEO/AAP Employer) #LI-HS1
-",3.7,"Moderna
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist (C),$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"The Team:
At Client’s Artificial Intelligence Center of Excellence (AI COE), you won’t be just tinkering around the edges, you’ll be building critical solutions that will benefit our clients for years to come. Collect requirements and deliver high value AI/ML solutions that drive customer, shareholder, and business value. The AI COE houses some of the highest caliber scientists, mathematicians and statisticians who implement the use of rigorous AI & quantitative approaches to ensure that we are efficiently building algorithms and technology relevant to the business or customer experience issue at hand. Those of us who love to work with data see this as the pinnacle of opportunities that you cannot find anywhere else in the industry. We are looking for an experienced Data Science AI Engineer to join our team at client you will play a critical role in developing and fine-tuning AI models using the Vertex.AI platform. The ideal candidate should have a strong background in natural language processing (NLP), machine learning, and software engineering. Your expertise in AI prompt engineering, coupled with proficiency in the Vertex.AI platform, will be essential in creating high-quality AI models to enhance the capabilities of client.",-1,IVID TEK INC,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"The ideal candidate will have a strong background in data analytics, online experimentation, inference, and quantitative methods. In addition, hands-on ability to push production code with sound engineering fundamentals would be nice to have.You will collaborate closely with a vibrant cross-functional team (ML engineers, data engineers, designers and product managers).
If you are looking to apply state-of-the-art Data Science techniques to novel products leveraging AI/NLP, we have the opportunity for you.
Who we are
Moveworks is on a mission to make language the universal UI. We give enterprises a conversational interface that works across every system — from Microsoft to Workday to Salesforce. Powered by GPT-class machine learning models, the Moveworks platform learns the unique language of each organization to solve thousands of use cases. Brands like Databricks, Broadcom, DocuSign, and Palo Alto Networks leverage Moveworks’ proprietary enterprise data, out-of-the-box solutions, and intuitive developer tools to bring conversational automation to all aspects of their business.",3.9,"Moveworks.ai
3.9","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Company Description

Visa is a world leader in digital payments, facilitating more than 215 billion payments transactions between consumers, merchants, financial institutions and government entities across more than 200 countries and territories each year. Our mission is to connect the world through the most innovative, convenient, reliable and secure payments network, enabling individuals, businesses and economies to thrive.
When you join Visa, you join a culture of purpose and belonging – where your growth is priority, your identity is embraced, and the work you do matters. We believe that economies that include everyone everywhere, uplift everyone everywhere. Your work will have a direct impact on billions of people around the world – helping unlock financial access to enable the future of money movement.",4.1,"Visa
4.1","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Senior Data Scientist, Attribution",$81K - $179K (Employer est.),"Company Description
Since we opened our doors in 2009, the world of commerce has evolved immensely, and so has Square. After enabling anyone to take payments and never miss a sale, we saw sellers stymied by disparate, outmoded products and tools that wouldn’t work together.

So we expanded into software and started building integrated, omnichannel solutions – to help sellers sell online, manage inventory, offer buy now, pay later functionality through Afterpay, book appointments, engage loyal buyers, and hire and pay staff. Across it all, we’ve embedded financial services tools at the point of sale, so merchants can access a business loan and manage their cash flow in one place. Afterpay furthers our goal to provide omnichannel tools that unlock meaningful value and growth, enabling sellers to capture the next generation shopper, increase order sizes, and compete at a larger scale.

Today, we are a partner to sellers of all sizes – large, enterprise-scale businesses with complex operations, sellers just starting, as well as merchants who began selling with Square and have grown larger over time. As our sellers grow, so do our solutions. There is a massive opportunity in front of us. We’re building a significant, meaningful, and lasting business, and we are helping sellers worldwide do the same.",3.7,"Afterpay
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Generative AI,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Why Mayo Clinic

Mayo Clinic is top-ranked in more specialties than any other care provider according to U.S. News & World Report. As we work together to put the needs of the patient first, we are also dedicated to our employees, investing in competitive compensation and comprehensive benefit plans – to take care of you and your family, now and in the future. And with continuing education and advancement opportunities at every turn, you can build a long, successful career with Mayo Clinic. You’ll thrive in an environment that supports innovation, is committed to ending racism and supporting diversity, equity and inclusion, and provides the resources you need to succeed.


Responsibilities

















Exempt



$159,973 - $231,962/ year. Education, experience and tenure may be considered along with internal equity when job offers are extended.



Yes



Full Time



80



M-F, daytime hours



N/A



No










Laura Percival",3.9,"Mayo Clinic
3.9","Rochester, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Product",$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"About Us:
We're on a mission to make it possible for every person, team, and company to be able to tailor their software to solve any problem and take on any challenge. Computers may be our most powerful tools, but most of us can't build or modify the software we use on them every day. At Notion, we want to change this with focus, design, and craft.
We've been working on this together since 2016, and have customers like Pixar, Mitsubishi, Figma, Plaid, Match Group, and thousands more on this journey with us. Today, we're growing fast and excited for new teammates to join us who are the best at what they do. We're passionate about building a company as diverse and creative as the millions of people Notion reaches worldwide.

Notion is an in person company, and currently requires its employees to come to the office for two Anchor Days (Mondays & Thursdays) and requests that employees spend the majority of their week in the office (including a third day).",4.9,"Notion
4.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Job Description
Location:
Honolulu,HI,US
Remote Work:
No
Job Number:
R0179639

Data Scientist
The Opportunity:



Salary at Booz Allen is determined by various factors, including but not limited to location, the individual’s particular combination of education, knowledge, skills, competencies, and experience, as well as contract-specific affordability and organizational requirements. The projected compensation range for this position is $73,000.00 to $166,000.00 (annualized USD). The estimate displayed represents the typical salary range for this position and is just one component of Booz Allen’s total compensation package for employees.",4.2,"Booz Allen Hamilton
4.2","Honolulu, HI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Staff Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"General information
All posting locations: Remote, Illinois, United States of America
Job Function: 16 - Digital
Date Published: 06-Sep-2023
Ref #: R-74320
Base Salary Range: $110,200.00 - $137,800.00
Target Total Cash Range: $148,770.00 - $186,030.00
Target total cash represents this role's annualized cash earning potential at target (base salary + target bonus). Target total cash is contingent on targeted company performance achievement and individual attainment of performance goals. Therefore, target total cash is not guaranteed earnings. In addition to base salary and bonus, this role is eligible for additional compensation in the form of equity.",3.5,"Kraft Heinz Company
3.5",Illinois,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist
Description: Formulates and leads guided, multifaceted analytic studies against large volumes of data. Interprets and analyzes data using exploratory mathematic and statistical techniques based on the scientific method. Coordinates research and analytic activities utilizing various data points (unstructured and structured) and employ programming to clean, massage, and organize the data. Experiments against data points, provide information based on experiment results and provide previously undiscovered solutions to command data challenges. Develops methodology and processes for prioritization and scheduling of projects. Analyzes problems and determines root causes. Works closely with all stakeholders to develop strategy for long term data platform architecture. Apply data science methods and techniques, such as machine learning, statistical modeling, and artificial intelligence to measure and improve results. Analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns; build predictive models and machine-learning algorithms; combine models through ensemble modeling; present information using data visualization techniques; propose solutions and strategies to business challenges; collaborate with engineering and product development teams.",1.9,"CDIT LLC
1.9",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Lead Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Mosaic Data Science, located in the Northern Virginia/Washington, DC Metro area,
encourages qualified lead data scientists to contact us regarding current full-time, salaried
consulting opportunities in the United States and Canada.
Mosaic Data Science is a dynamic, growing data science consultancy solving some of the
most complex and interesting problems in industry. At Mosaic, you’ll contribute to data
science projects requiring a variety of analytical and business skills in many verticals,
including logistics, retail, utilities, healthcare, telecommunications, media, oil and gas, and
manufacturing. As a lead data scientist, you will have responsibility for technical direction
and execution on data science projects, and you will manage the work of the data scientists,
analysts, and software engineers on the project team. You’ll work with talented, creative,
and self-motivated colleagues who hold themselves to very high standards of
professionalism and quality. You will work closely with customers to understand their
business problems and design and scope analytics-based solutions ; part-time travel to
customer sites may be required. Telecommute options are available. You can expect your
responsibilities to grow as quickly as you’re willing and able to meet them. You’ll enjoy a
fantastic benefits package that includes profit sharing and generous personal leave,
professional development opportunities, as well as first-rate healthcare and retirement
benefits. Most folks who join Mosaic stay here for a long time.


Bachelor’s degree or higher in applied math, statistics, operations research,
computer science, engineering, physics, cognitive science, or a related field;
Master’s/PhD preferred
Working knowledge of statistics, machine learning, optimization, data visualization,
computer programming, and database systems
Expert knowledge in one or more technical domains of data science, such as
Computer Vision, Natural Language Processing, ML Engineering, or MLOps
Proficiency and significant experience with R or Python and relevant data
manipulation, visualization, and machine learning libraries
4+ years of experience applying technical skills to real-world business problems
1+ years of experience leading data science projects
Strong written and verbal communication skills, a high level of professionalism, and
genuine customer orientation
Willingness and ability to learn new skills, tools, and business domains quickly on the
job
Desire to collaborate with, learn from, and share knowledge with colleagues
Must be a US or Canadian Citizen or Permanent Resident

Interested applicants should submit a cover letter and resume to:
employment@mosaicdatascience.com.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be
discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, national origin, age, disability, or protected veteran status. Mosaic Data Science
takes affirmative action in support of its policy to employ and advance in employment
individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities.
www.mosaicdatascience.com",-1,Mosaic Data Science,Virginia,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist II- Outcomes,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"We are looking for a person to support a growing Outcomes team and help develop new methodology to broadly evaluate Gillette's clinical outcomes. This includes leveraging multiple existing data sources, evaluating new data opportunities, or obtaining new data to better understand Gillette's population health. This person will seek to understand patient, family, and health system mechanisms that influence effective, family-centered, and equitable outcomes.
This is a hybrid with opportunities to work onsite and from home. The office location is 10 River Park Plaza, St. Paul, MN 55101.
Compensation & Benefits
The annual salary range for this opportunity is $98,217/annually to $147,326/annually, with a median salary of $122,772/annually. Pay is dependent on several factors including relevant work experience and internal equity. Salary is just one component of the compensation package for employees. Gillette supports career progression and offers a competitive benefits package, including a retirement saving match, tuition and certification reimbursement, paid time off, and health and wellness benefits.",4.1,"Gillette Children's
4.1","Saint Paul, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Overview:
CVP seeks a highly talented Data Scientists to provide expertise for our federal health IT client. Our mission is to architect, build, and support innovative federal IT systems which focus on optimizing government programs and outcomes. The Data Scientist will apply advanced statistical methods to the data from these systems, looking for new insights and measures that can improve performance and outcomes.

The professional in this role will work with clients to perform exploratory data analysis, train predictive models, diagnose their performance, and put them into production use. The Data Scientist will also collaborate with team members to develop dynamic dashboards that enhance the utility of information. This is an excellent opportunity to demonstrate creativity and expertise in analysis, visualizations, and adoption of innovative techniques and approaches.
Responsibilities:
Qualifications:",4.1,"Customer Value Partners, Inc
4.1",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Title: Data Scientist
Location: McLean, VA
*Clearance: *Active TS/SCI w/ Polygraph needed to apply *
Company Overview:
Cornerstone Defense is the Employer of Choice within the Intelligence, Defense, and Space communities of the U.S. Government. Realizing early on that our most prized assets are our employees, we continually focus our attention on improving the overall work/life experience they have supporting the mission. Our Team is pushed every day to use their industry leading knowledge to provide end-to-end solutions to combat our nation’s toughest and most secure problems. If you are looking for a place to not only be professionally challenged, but encouraged and supported by a company that cares, don’t look any further than Cornerstone Defense.

Position Description:
HIGHLY DESIRED SKILLS AND DEMONSTRATED EXPERIENCE",4.4,"Cornerstone Defense
4.4","McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Contract - Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"The Contract - Data Scientist role is a short-term contract position with an expected duration of approximately 5 months. This role will combine data science, machine learning and engineering as well as ability to create a simple WebApp to solve critical path challenges for health care professionals. As the Covid Pandemic highlighted, healthcare providers need to be able to quickly identify unavailable medical products and source clinically equivalent medical products. The role will take existing data and infrastructure to complete and improve a rudimentary existing solution. Determining the orderability of a medical product and identifying clinically equivalent substitutes are challenging problems that can be solved through clever use of machine learning data science.
Essential Duties:
Work with SMEs to understand backorders and substitutions.",3.6,"GHX
3.6","Louisville, CO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"REMOTE - LOUISVILLE, KY
Bamboo Health is a leader in cloud-based care coordination software and analytics solutions focused on patients with complex needs, including those suffering from physical health and mental health issues and substance use disorders. We are driven by our mission of enabling better care for patients across the continuum. Our software solutions help healthcare professionals collaborate on shared patients across the spectrum of care. Join us in improving healthcare for all!
Summary:
The Data Scientist will live and breathe data and be excited about building user-facing data products. They will work with the Product Development team, Health Data Science team, other internal stakeholders, and external stakeholders to develop data-driven solutions powered by our unique data pipeline. The Data Scientist will excel at creative problem solving, cross-team collaboration, and thinking independently about how to utilize data to address the challenges our customers face.",3.4,"Bamboo Health
3.4","Louisville, KY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"THE ROLE:

As an Associate Director of Business Intelligence you will support the development and ongoing maintenance of Business Intelligence projects to enable data driven decision making through automated real time reporting and visualization. The AD will see projects from start to finish by understanding the business challenge, implementing a solution, and teaching and empowering end users to leverage BI tools to reach actionable insights.
You will own the Datorama relationship, and you will be the Subject Matter Expert in BI for Xaxis. Additionally, you will work with key stakeholders to track and report out on wider Xaxis business initiatives.",3.9,"GroupM Nexus Xaxis
3.9","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - SQL / SAS & Tableau,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Your career starts now. We’re looking for the next generation of health care leaders.
At AmeriHealth Caritas, we’re passionate about helping people get care, stay well and build healthy communities. As one of the nation's leaders in health care solutions, we offer our associates the opportunity to impact the lives of millions of people through our national footprint of products, services and award-winning programs. AmeriHealth Caritas is seeking talented, passionate individuals to join our team. Together we can build healthier communities. If you want to make a difference, we’d like to hear from you.
Headquartered in Newtown Square, AmeriHealth Caritas is a mission-driven organization with more than 30 years of experience. We deliver comprehensive, outcomes-driven care to those who need it most. We offer integrated managed care products, pharmaceutical benefit management and specialty pharmacy services, behavioral health services, and other administrative services. Discover more about us at",3.4,"AmeriHealth Caritas
3.4","Robbinsville, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"JOB DESCRIPTION AND POSITION REQUIREMENTS:
The Algorithms, Prototyping and Integration Department within the Communications, Information and Navigation Office (CINO) at the Applied Research Laboratory (ARL) is looking for two talented, experienced and a highly motivated Data Scientist’s to assist in providing its customers with state-of-the-art visualization and decision support. The primary focus will be researching and developing feasible algorithmic solutions to our sponsor’s complex problems given large sets of multivariate data. Specifically, you will be engaged in:
Applying data mining and enhancement techniques
Performing statistical analysis in support of pattern of life and anomaly detection",4.1,"Penn State University
4.1","University Park, PA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"We offer challenging and rewarding opportunities in many locations globally. With offices in the US, India. At ITCS you will have the opportunity to work alongside team members who are experts in their field and innovators in many different areas of business and IT.

If you are looking for a good opportunities for advancement or progress in your career. ITCS is the place to be.
IT Requirements





IT Consulting Services Inc seeks Data Scientist for Fairless, PA office to apply algorithms to models predict outcomes of interest such as health, pharmaceutical, epidemiological and laboratory data for medical use. to apply sampling techniques to determine groups to be surveyed and use enumeration methods to better analyze future health trends. Clean and manipulate raw data using statistical software for better and more efficient health data and aid innovations in the pharmaceutical industry. May travel and relocate to various unanticipated sites throughout the US. Must have bachelorâ€™s degree in Biology, Pharmacy or related & 6 months of experience. Send resume to contacthr@itconsultservices.com.",4.5,"IT Consulting Services
4.5","Fairless Hills, PA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Company Description
At Intuitive, we are united behind our mission: we believe that minimally invasive care is life-enhancing care. Through ingenuity and intelligent technology, we expand the potential of physicians to heal without constraints.

As a pioneer and market leader in robotic-assisted surgery, we strive to foster an inclusive and diverse team, committed to making a difference. For more than 25 years, we have worked with hospitals and care teams around the world to help solve some of healthcare's hardest challenges and advance what is possible.

Intuitive has been built by the efforts of great people from diverse backgrounds. We believe great ideas can come from anywhere. We strive to foster an inclusive culture built around diversity of thought and mutual respect. We lead with inclusion and empower our team members to do their best work as their most authentic selves.

Passionate people who want to make a difference drive our culture. Our team members are grounded in integrity, have a strong capacity to learn, the energy to get things done, and bring diverse, real world experiences to help us think in new ways. We actively invest in our team members to support their long-term growth so they can continue to advance our mission and achieve their highest potential.

Join a team committed to taking big leaps forward for a global community of healthcare professionals and their patients. Together, let's advance the world of minimally invasive care.",4.1,"Intuitive Surgical
4.1","Blacksburg, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Description
We're powering a cleaner, brighter future.

Exelon is leading the energy transformation, and we're calling all problem solvers, innovators, community builders and change makers. Work with us to deliver solutions that make our diverse cities and communities stronger, healthier and more resilient.

We're powered by purpose-driven people like you who believe in being inclusive and creative, and value safety, innovation, integrity and community service. We are a Fortune 200 company, 19,000 colleagues strong serving more than 10 million customers at six energy companies - Atlantic City Electric (ACE), Baltimore Gas and Electric (BGE), Commonwealth Edison (ComEd), Delmarva Power & Light (DPL), PECO Energy Company (PECO), and Potomac Electric Power Company (Pepco).

In our relentless pursuit of excellence, we elevate diverse voices, fresh perspectives and bold thinking. And since we know transforming the future of energy is hard work, we provide competitive compensation, incentives, excellent benefits and the opportunity to build a rewarding career.

Are you in?",4.1,"Exelon Corporation
4.1","Philadelphia, PA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist (Data Platforms & Applied Intelligence),$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"This will be a hybrid position based out of the Banfield Pet Hospital headquarters in Vancouver, WA. Remote candidates who meet all requirements may be considered.
Salary Range: $100,531 - $138,230 (DOE)
Summary and Qualifications:
Provides expertise to the successful implementation of Banfield’s Analytics strategy for various business divisions such as P&O, Marketing, Finance, Operations and Veterinary Affairs.",3.0,"Banfield, The Pet Hospital
3.0","Vancouver, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Locations
United States
You will
• Design and develop the data models for the solution
Design, test, refine and iterate models in real world environments
Work collaboratively with other data scientists and data engineers to build out the solution
You have",5.0,"Concentric AI
5.0",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"When you join Verizon
Verizon is one of the world’s leading providers of technology and communications services, transforming the way we connect around the world. We’re a human network that reaches across the globe and works behind the scenes. We anticipate, lead, and believe that listening is where learning begins. In crisis and in celebration, we come together—lifting up our communities and striving to make an impact to move the world forward. If you’re fueled by purpose, and powered by persistence, explore a career with us. Here, you’ll discover the rigor it takes to make a difference and the fulfillment that comes with living the #NetworkLife.
What you’ll be doing...
In this worksite-based role, you'll work onsite at a defined location(s).
40",3.8,"Verizon
3.8","Ashburn, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Overview:
Since 2006, Intelligent Waves has delivered mission-focused multi-domain operational expertise and innovation to the Government through high-impact technology solutions in cybersecurity, data science, enterprise network engineering, software development, and platform mission support. Anytime. Anywhere. Any domain.

Advana is a multi-domain technology platform which offers military and business decision makers, analysts, and users at all levels unprecedented access to authoritative enterprise data and structured analytics in a scalable, reliable, and secure environment. It offers platform-, data analytics-, and data science-as-a-service tools to complete analysis and data exploration and data visualization capabilities. Using one central data platform with right-time data, data tools, and other self-service products, the goal of Advana is to simplify solutions and put the power of analytics in the pocket of every analyst and decision-making authority within the DOD.






Responsibilities:
Qualifications:",4.1,"Intelligent Waves LLC
4.1","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
DATA SCIENTIST,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"DATA SCIENTIST

Req #:
222359

Department:
eSCIENCE INSTITUTE

Job Location:
Remote/Hybrid, Seattle Campus

Posting Date:",4.2,"University of Washington
4.2","Seattle, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"The Data Scientist may be responsible for any of the following tasks: Analyzing data that is collected in our current and future products and services. The Data Scientist would need to be able to take this data and apply to the markets our products are in for us to better serve our customers. The Data Scientist must have good communication and organization skills, along with a working knowledge of day to day operations and priorities within their department and the company. Assume other duties as ssigned.
Now offering a 4.5-day workweek!




Qualifications: Bachelors or Masters Degree in Statistics or Mathematics preferred or any other quantitative discipline
Strong proficiencies in Python and its frameworks
Knowledge of the products and customers of the Auction and Heavy Equipment industries
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design and development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Strong skills working with technical aspects of SQL, R and Tableau
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing large datasets
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Adept at queries, report writing, and present findings
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Able to work independently and communicate within a team environment
Results oriented
Flexible and open to change
Stable and progressive work history
Professional appearance and demeanor,
Ability to travel by air and ground - valid driver’s license required
Able to work with minimal supervision.",3.2,"Sandhills Global, Inc.
3.2","Lincoln, NE",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"At Evolve we're a hardworking team serious about hospitality. Our teams work every day to make vacation rental easy for everyone — from our owners who trust Evolve to build their business to our guests who rest easy with every stay to our Evolvers who make this difference a reality. Our values anchor our daily decisions and interactions with our customers, communities, and each other. Join our inclusive culture in one of the most rapidly-growing segments in travel. Find your home at Evolve.
Why this role
As a tech-enabled disruptor in the vacation rental industry, Evolve is professionalizing the category by leveraging data science to capitalize on opportunities across the vacation rental ecosystem. The projects we work on aim to fundamentally change how guests interact with vacation rentals and how homeowners maximize rental income generation. As a member of the core data science team, you will be responsible for building machine learning products using a combination of modeling, software development, exploratory analysis, and data strategy to transform how a business domain is able to operate.",2.9,"Evolve
2.9","Denver, CO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist II,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"To apply for the Data Scientist II role please click on the iCIMS link below. The link will guide you to ConstructConnect's new Careers page portal.

Data Scientist II in Remote -US | Careers at Remote - US (icims.com)

Please do not use the apply button in the top right-hand corner, use the link above to submit your application.

Privacy Notice

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.9,"ConstructConnect, Inc
3.9","Cincinnati, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Interconnection Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Hanwha Q CELLS USA Corp (“HQC US”) develops, invests, and delivers solar photovoltaic (PV) and battery energy storage systems (BESS) projects through Engineering, Procurement, Construction (EPC) services in North America.

The company brings a decade of global leadership in solar PV to deliver utility-scale power generation plants customized for local and regional energy markets. HQC US offers the full spectrum of PV solutions – from the core technology of cells and modules to large-scale project development and investment. With proven capabilities across the solar and battery storage value chain, HQC US minimizes uncertainty and risk and helps customers achieve a higher return on their investment in renewable energy.

Qcells is looking for an experienced data scientist with experience in energy forecasting. This position will lead thedevelopment oflong-termenergy time series probabilistic forecasting tool to facilitate our long-term utility scaled renewable revenue forecast in different markets. As anInterconnection Data Scientist, you would haveopportunities to collaborate with subcontractors and other data scientist to refine the forecast methodology and integration with other internal tools.",3.0,"Qcells
3.0",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"About the Team
JudieAI is an always available, expert tutor and learning support platform that provides the attention and resources students, teachers, parents, and administrators need to shape the next generation of learners. We at Judie are committed to safe and effective learning strategies that leverage the next generation of machine learning capabilities to assist with teaching well-rounded and capable students.
About the Job
This role works in a cross disciplinary manner at the intersection of machine learning, product engineering, and business analytics. You will get to build out our analytics strategy and pipeline for product growth from the ground up. Working with machine learning and product teams you will guide high impact projects ranging from training set aggregation and analysis to at-scale personalized customer dashboards. You will get to join the project at an exciting time with extreme flexibility in direction and impact while having the scale to drive real data insights.",-1,Judie AI,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Company Description

Freshworks makes it fast and easy for businesses to delight their customers and employees. We do this by taking a fresh approach to building and delivering software that is affordable, quick to implement, and designed for the end user. Headquartered in San Mateo, California, Freshworks has a global team operating from 13 global locations to serve more than 60,000 companies - from startups to public companies – that rely on Freshworks software-as-a-service to enable a better customer experience (CRM) and employee experience (ITSM).
Freshworks’ cloud-based software suite includes Freshdesk (omni-channel customer support), Freshsales (sales automation), Freshmarketer (marketing automation), Freshservice (IT service desk), Freshchat (AI-powered bots), supported by Neo, our underlying platform of shared services.",3.8,"Freshworks
3.8","San Mateo, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Revecore is an innovative, technology-driven company that is committed to helping our clients, our employees, our company, and our communities thrive. An award-winning services firm, partnering with hospitals and health systems, providing the momentum they need to maintain a strong revenue cycle amid today’s evolving healthcare environment.

With a 20+ year history, Revecore is the leading provider of revenue integrity and complex claims solutions for hospitals.

We offer a dynamic and flexible work environment, full of opportunity for motivated, hands-on team players. We strive each day to solve complex business problems and find new ways to enhance the efficiency, effectiveness, and quality of our services. If those attributes resonate with you, regardless of where you are located—we want you on our team!",3.4,"Revecore
3.4",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$160K - $232K (Employer est.),"Meet Zartico, the world’s first Destination Operating System.

Zartico’s mission is to empower DMOs to be better stewards of the world’s tourist destinations through improved data intelligence and decision-making. Makers of the first Destination Operating System, Zartico harnesses and streamlines complex data to provide a full-spectrum of data science, benchmarking and analytical services for use in marketing, community development and sustainability efforts. Based in Salt Lake City, Utah, Zartico has over thirty years of experience in technology, tourism, and destination, travel and tourism marketing.

Zartico is looking to add a Data Scientist to the team. In this role, you will be designing and developing new tools, architecture, and models to flexibly extract actionable information from large, complex data sets. To be successful in this role, you will need a strong background in mathematical and statistical reasoning, comfortability programming (SQL and Python required), experience designing, evaluating and testing models with/on complex data sets, and an ability to problem solve effectively in ambiguous settings.",-1,Zartico,"Salt Lake City, UT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Do you have a passion for data science, machine learning and AI ? Do you want to apply it to protect millions of customers using Microsoft online services from threat actors around the globe ? Are you curious, analytical, and motivated by new challenges? If so, we would like to hear from you!

The Microsoft Security Response Center team (MSRC) is seeking a Data Scientist to meet the growing demand and challenges of cybersecurity and threat protection. As a Data Dcientist on our team, you will partner with our engineers, other data scientists, and researchers to experiment, design, build, and deploy statistical, machine learning, and AI models to protect the Microsoft Cloud against known and emerging cyberattacks. In your day-to-day work, you will perform data analysis on big data, find useful insights, perform hypothesis testing, experiment with models, vet experiments, incorporate quality monitors, and ship successful models to productions.

You will have the opportunity to collaborate with partners across Microsoft who have decades of security, research, and ML expertise and the tools and technologies to grow your expertise in this field.








Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.3,"Microsoft
4.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Cloud Technologies",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Summary
Posted: Sep 7, 2023
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:200499833
Imagine what you could do here. At Apple, we believe new insights have a way of becoming excellent products, services, and customer experiences very quickly. Bring passion and dedication to your job and there's no telling what you could accomplish. The people here at Apple don’t just create products — they create the kind of wonder that’s revolutionized entire industries. It’s the diversity of those people and their ideas that inspires the innovation that runs through everything we do, from amazing technology to industry-leading environmental efforts. Join Apple, and help us leave the world better than we found it. It takes deeply dedicated, intelligent individuals to maintain and exceed the high expectations at Apple. Cloud Technologies App Platform (AP) team is looking for an extraordinary Machine Learning engineer to join our team. You will help design and implement our machine learning strategy to take our developer experience platform to the next level and help accelerate app development inside Apple. We will be collaborating and working with multi-functional teams and applying algorithms to large-scale data.",4.2,"Apple
4.2","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Overview:
LMI is seeking a skilled Data Scientist. Successful Data Scientists demonstrate competency in project execution, leadership critical thinking, relationship management, and business growth while upholding the highest standard of ethical behavior.

LMI is a consultancy dedicated to improving the business of government, drawing from deep expertise in advanced analytics, digital services, logistics, and management advisory services. Established as a private, not-for-profit organization in 1961, LMI is a trusted third party to federal civilian and defense agencies, free of commercial and political bias. We operate completely free of political and commercial bias, and we are entirely aligned with the goals of our clients. Our clients value our specialized services in logistics, intelligence, homeland security, health care, and energy and environment markets. We believe government can make a difference, and we seek talented, hardworking people who share that conviction. We offer a generous compensation package with excellent benefits that start the first day of employment. Business casual dress, flex time, and tuition reimbursement are a few of our many work-life benefits available to our employees.
Responsibilities:

Qualifications:",4.2,"Logistics Management Institute
4.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Career Area:
Information Analytics
Job Description:
Your Work Shapes the World at Caterpillar Inc.
When you join Caterpillar, you're joining a global team who cares not just about the work we do – but also about each other. We are the makers, problem solvers, and future world builders who are creating stronger, more sustainable communities. We don't just talk about progress and innovation here – we make it happen, with our customers, where we work and live. Together, we are building a better world, so we can all enjoy living in it.",4.0,"Caterpillar
4.0","Chillicothe, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Remote,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Welcome to Holland America Line, a premium cruise line dedicated to explorers, foodies and music lovers who want to explore the world on perfectly sized, refreshingly spacious ships filled with one-of-a-kind experiences.
We’re looking for an amazing IT Data Scientist to fill this role. You’ll be a member of the Revenue Management System team, specifically focused on using data science skills to conceive and develop new opportunities to improve yield performance across multiple brands through enhancing the science part of the revenue management system (YODA) and increasing its adoption across its brands. This role will work closely with YODA science teams across multiple brands to help interpret models, assess unique business cases, and incorporate feedback between the brand science teams and the RMS. This role will also be involved in other key projects that help us better understand our guests' behaviors and preferences, allowing us to maximize revenue and guest experience by providing the right cruise experience to the right guest for the right price.",3.6,"Holland America Line Inc
3.6","Seattle, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Secure our Nation, Ignite your Future
Join the top Information Technology and Analytic professionals in the industry to make invaluable contributions to our national security on a daily basis. In this innovative, self-contained, Big Data environment, the ManTech team is responsible for everything from infrastructure, to application development, to data science, to advanced analytics and beyond. The team is diverse, the questions are thought-provoking, and the opportunities for growth and advancement are numerous.
Currently, ManTech is seeking a motivated, career and customer-oriented Data Scientist to join our team in Chantilly, VA
Duties, Tasks & Responsibilities",4.3,"ManTech International Corporation
4.3","Chantilly, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Senior",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job Description
Location:
Bethesda,MD,US
Remote Work:
Hybrid
Job Number:
R0179617

Data Scientist, Senior
The Opportunity:
Salary at Booz Allen is determined by various factors, including but not limited to location, the individual’s particular combination of education, knowledge, skills, competencies, and experience, as well as contract-specific affordability and organizational requirements. The projected compensation range for this position is $93,300.00 to $212,000.00 (annualized USD). The estimate displayed represents the typical salary range for this position and is just one component of Booz Allen’s total compensation package for employees.",4.2,"Booz Allen Hamilton
4.2","Bethesda, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Associate Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Career Area:
Information Analytics
Job Description:
Your Work Shapes the World at Caterpillar Inc.
When you join Caterpillar, you're joining a global team who cares not just about the work we do – but also about each other. We are the makers, problem solvers, and future world builders who are creating stronger, more sustainable communities. We don't just talk about progress and innovation here – we make it happen, with our customers, where we work and live. Together, we are building a better world, so we can all enjoy living in it.
Visa Sponsorship is not available for this position. This employer is not currently hiring foreign national applicants that require or will require sponsorship tied to a specific employer, such as, H, L, TN, F, J, E, O. As a global company, Caterpillar offers many job opportunities outside of the U.S which can be found through our employment website at www.caterpillar.com/careers.",4.0,"Caterpillar
4.0","Morton, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Sr.,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Your Impact:

Jacobs is seeking for Senior Data Scientist to support its federal client in Charlottesville, VA.
The Program is a premier program in the industry that advances the use of tactical and strategic Identity Intelligence tradecraft to inform decision-makers, from ground force commanders to international partners and national security policymakers. Our employees lead the Intelligence community in providing superior Identity Intelligence analysis and developing innovative data-driven solutions, supporting the customer through intelligence analysis and tradecraft proliferation.
Responsibilities:
Conducts data analytics, data engineering, data mining, exploratory analysis, predictive analysis, and statistical analysis, and uses scientific techniques to correlate data into graphical, written, visual and verbal narrative products, enabling more informed analytic decisions. Proactively retrieves information from various sources, analyzes it for better understanding about the data set, and builds AI tools that automate certain processes. Duties typically include: creating various ML-based tools or processes, such as recommendation engines or automated lead scoring systems. Performs statistical analysis, applies data mining techniques, and builds high quality prediction systems. Should be skilled in data visualization and use of graphical applications, including Microsoft Office (Power BI) and Tableau; major data science languages, such as R and Python; managing and merging of disparate data sources, preferably through R, Python, or SQL; statistical analysis; and data mining algorithms. Should have prior experience with large data Multi-INT analytics, ML, and automated predictive analytics.

#August23HotJobs",4.0,"Jacobs
4.0","Charlottesville, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Business Analytics",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Universal Orlando Resort believes in-person collaboration is key to our success. Many of our Team Members work in a hybrid capacity, contributing from the workplace a minimum of three days per week. Some remote opportunities are available within specific departments. There are also roles that require being on-site full time. You’ll learn more about this during the application process.
JOB SUMMARY: Formulates and applies advanced analytical approaches such as mathematical optimization, stochastic process models, econometric methods and decision analysis in the development of revenue management models and forecasts for pricing of Universal’s Products (Tickets, Express Pass, Foods, and Merchandise). Supports and guides Revenue Management Analysts on the use of advanced model development methodologies.",4.0,"Universal Orlando Resort
4.0","Orlando, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Position,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist position available through the Princeton Precision Health Initiative at Princeton University. The new Princeton Precision Health (PPH) initiative is seeking to hire a staff scientist in the area of data science and computational biology. This position is at the rank of Professional Specialist and will initially be a three-year term position, with the possibility of renewal based on job performance and funding availability. The PPH initiative is taking an interdisciplinary, data-driven approach to healthcare, leveraging the synergy of science and policy to enable targeted solutions to biomedical, clinical, and societal challenges and support precision health. Professional data scientists with expertise in both computer science and in genomics and/or biomedical research will be key contributors to the success of PPH. The position will report to Professor Olga Troyanskaya, the Director of PPH, though the data scientist will have the opportunity to work with multiple groups participating in PPH research, providing data analysis expertise across this interdisciplinary research space at Princeton. The data scientist should have a strong track record in data science and its application in the life sciences, the biomedical domain, or other health-related field so that they can successfully develop and apply computational methods for a variety of applications. In addition, candidates should have experience with creating robust software code that can be shared across groups and with the biomedical research community at large. The data scientist will need to serve as a hub for collaborative projects across disciplines; thus, extensive research experience is required. Applications must be submitted online at https://www.princeton.edu/acad-positions/position/28182. Applications must include a curriculum vitae and contact information for three references. Essential Qualifications: - A PhD in Computer Science, Computational Biology, or a related field. - At least ten years prior research experience in data science or computational biology. Preferred Qualifications: At least five years prior research experience in genomics and/or sequencing data analyses. This position is subject to the University's background check policy.",4.5,"Princeton University
4.5","Princeton, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Position Title:
Data Scientist
Job Group:
Professional & Scientific
Required Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree and 5 years of related experience
Preferred Qualifications:
Master's or PhD in Computer Science or Engineering with Data Science/Machine Learning focus
Experience with software-hardware platforms for data science and machine/deep learning research
Experience in data analytics/machine learning research, with focus including but not limited to the areas of AI core, ML theory, AI for dynamical systems, control and autonomy with science/engineering applications
Experience in developing and instructing courses/workshops/tutorials/bootcamps on data analytics/machine learning basics
Experience in onboarding/mentoring data science/AI + X students
Established scientific record as indicated by (a) peer reviewed technical journal or conference publications, (b) open source codes



Regular with Term Appointment (Fixed Term)
12 Month Work Period
Full time
PS810









September 12, 2023
September 18, 2023
R12909",4.3,"Iowa State University
4.3","Ames, IA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Incentivio is unique in the restaurant tech space. Growing 250%+ YoY, Incentivio is set to break the norms of how restaurants drive guests to their business! As restaurants continue to struggle with labor shortages, 3rd party delivery economics and juggling a complex tech stack, Incentivio’s market leading data-driven engagement and analytics platform is designed to help restaurant’s reclaim their guests, data, and brand awareness while continuing to grow and thrive!
Incentivio is a fast-growing startup that helps restaurants increase revenue and margins by owning the digital guest experience - from branded mobile apps to online ordering, loyalty, delivery, analytics, and much more. Our cloud-based platform allows restaurants to launch branded digital guest experiences in weeks, and our restaurant clients hail from all over North America - from Florida to Montreal and British Columbia to San Diego. We're looking for hard-working, self-motivated individuals to join our growing team (70+ team members) and help us make a difference in the restaurant industry!",-1,Incentivio,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"At Imagine we go beyond print to help our clients deliver game-changing visual communications from concept to delivery that set the standard for our industry. The first step in this process is hiring great employees! Our innovative teams are the most committed, highly experienced artisans in the business. We are committed to delivering high-quality marketing solutions, in every environment and campaign, helping our clients capture the heart, minds, and loyalty of their customers. For more than 30 years, The Imagine Group has established itself as one of the most influential and innovative visual communications companies in the industry. Join us and let’s Imagine a better way together.
Candidates for this position must be local to the Minneapolis, St. Paul Area. This is a Hybrid role requiring 2-3 days onsite at our offices in Shakopee, MN.
:",4.0,"The Imagine Group, LLC
4.0","Shakopee, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Develop quality analytics on internal technology migrations, migration to GCP, migrations across cloud platforms, customer migrations
Take ownership on analytical quality of the entire attribute and score quality lifecycle development validation, model certification, User Acceptance Testing, Platform and Channel certification and post production certification
Apply statistical rigor and develop analytical solutions to drive Equifax analytical quality within data & analytics and across pre and post production technology platforms
Design quality impact analytics framework including sampling methodology and drift policy
Design, develop and implement machine learning and deep learning systems for internal quality analytics application and product development for customer application",5.0,"AdvanceSoft
5.0","Ashburn, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Responsibilities:
Peraton is currently seeking an experienced Data Scientist with a data engineering or computer science background to provide support to the JDPAC team.

Location: Scott AFB, Illinois

Roles and responsibilities include, but are not limited to the following:

Key Responsibilities
Design, build, and evaluate machine learning models
Advance the mission by connecting customers and their challenges with data science solutions
Qualifications:

Peraton Overview:
Target Salary Range: $112,000 - $179,000. This represents the typical salary range for this position based on experience and other factors. EEO: An Equal Opportunity Employer including Disability/Veteran.",3.6,"Peraton
3.6","Scott Air Force Base, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"AE Studio is an LA-based company focused on increasing human agency while maintaining our ineffable culture and whimsy. If the work diminishes agency, we may simply decide to “eff” it after all. In our Venice CA office and our respective domiciles live a team of highly-skilled developers, data scientists, and dubiously-lucid humorists building agency-increasing products you may recall from such sentences as the one in this paragraph. We’ve worked with Samsung, Walmart, Berkshire Hathaway, and other large, important entities you’ve probably heard of. Our work environment is fantastic for aspiring coders, calculators, and entrepreneurs. Also, we have neither VC, nor PE, nor other acronyms funding us. We have a weird business model where we sell our work for a profit and use those profits to pay people (I told you it was weird!).
More specifically, we deploy the proceeds from our consulting work in development and data science to support and incubate internal skunkworks projects (anything interesting working on right now?). The proceeds from projects (we just sold one!) are used to fund cutting-edge brain-computer-interface (BCI) research - maximizing human agency before some corporate megalomaniacs interrupt our thoughts with advertisements!",4.3,"AE Studio
4.3","Los Angeles, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"CPower is a leading, national energy solutions provider guiding customers towards a clean and dependable energy future. We maximize the value of our customers’ distributed energy resources by facilitating participation in demand-side management programs. CPower works with over 17,000 sites across North America to provide superior economics, while delivering the highest-rated customer experience in the industry. We have entered our 8th year as CPower but we have a rich history in the demand response industry going back 30 years.
We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join our EnerWise Site Optimization strategy team. Your primary responsibility will be to lead the creation of forecast functionality, optimization techniques, and strategies to improve the accuracy of CPower’s energy markets scheduling optimization solution, known commercially as EnerWiseTM. This will include identifying and proposing quantitative approaches to improve scheduling optimization results, customer load forecasting, and solar production forecasting; administering optimization accuracy reports for each customer site (i.e., KPI reporting) to identify and articulate the causes of any accuracy issues; and identifying, testing, and proposing potential changes to EnerWise that address the causes of any accuracy issues.",3.9,"CPower
3.9",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Truth Initiative® is America’s largest non-profit public health organization dedicated to making tobacco use a thing of the past. We speak, seek and spread the truth about tobacco through education, tobacco-control research and policy studies, community activism and engagement, and innovation in tobacco dependence treatment. We are a diverse and inclusive organization.
The Innovations Center at Truth Initiative is a cross-functional team that designs, builds, evaluates, and sells leading digital solutions to help people live tobacco free. In addition to delivering cessation solutions, we conduct field-leading, federally-funded research to advance the science of tobacco cessation. The Data Scientist will support our two main products: EX Program and This is Quitting.
The EX Program® is Truth Initiative’s enterprise-level digital tobacco cessation program designed for employers, health systems, and health plans. Developed in collaboration with Mayo Clinic, it builds on the highly successful consumer platform, EX, launched in 2008 that has helped nearly 1 million tobacco users on their quitting journey. The EX Program is designed for tobacco users across the motivational continuum. It supports users through multiple, integrated modalities which include a website with an online social network, dynamically tailored text messaging fully integrated with the website, email, synchronous live chat digital coaching, and pharmacotherapy decision support and delivery. We provide value to our clients by helping their employees/members live healthier lives and demonstrating that value through a variety of reporting mechanisms.",4.6,"Truth Initiative
4.6","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist-Audience Team,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"The Trade Desk is a global technology company with a mission to create a better, more open internet for everyone through principled, intelligent advertising. Handling over 1 trillion queries per day, our platform operates at an unprecedented scale. We have also built something even stronger and more valuable: an award-winning culture based on trust, ownership, empathy, and collaboration. We value the unique experiences and perspectives that each person brings to The Trade Desk, and we are committed to fostering inclusive spaces where everyone can bring their authentic selves to work every day.
Do you have a passion for solving hard problems at scale? Are you eager to join a dynamic, globally-connected team where your contributions will make a meaningful difference in building a better media ecosystem? Come and see why Fortune magazine consistently ranks The Trade Desk among the best small-medium-sized workplaces globally.
Data Scientist – Audiences
$100,400 -$184,000",4.2,"The Trade Desk
4.2","San Jose, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job Description
Data Scientists sought by Dataline, Inc., in Princeton, NJ, to build statistical predictive models to identify target customers for clients; perform data extraction, processing and mining on large databases.
Requirements
MS or higher degree in statistics, applied mathematics, or related, or equivalent, 6 months experience, demonstrated knowledge of mathematical and statistical modeling, data mining, big data, applied regression, machine learning, design and analysis of data structures and algorithms, programming (C, C++, SQL, Python), R, SPSS, and Matlab.",-1,Dataline,"Princeton, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"DATA SCIENTIST:
One of The Select Group's clients is looking for a Data Scientist to join their team! This person can sit REMOTE and will be working west coast hours. The ideal candidate must have a strong background within the retail industry and comes from a data scientist/economist background. You will be responsible for supporting Digital Experimentation within the Experimentation Center of Excellence to meet the rapid growth of our client's eCommerce business and loyalty programs. If the below sounds like you, please apply!

DATA SCIENTIST REQUIREMENTS:
4-8 years of experience working in retail data domain
Minimum of 3 projects focused on in-store experimentation data",5.0,"CEDENT
5.0",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Job Title: Data Scientist
Reports To: VP of Data Science
FLSA Status: Exempt
DeepHealth is a Cambridge, MA-based subsidiary of RadNet, Inc and is a leading developer of artificial intelligence (AI) for medical imaging interpretation. Our mission at DeepHealth is to enable the best care by providing products that clinicians and patients can trust, through rigorous science, and clinical integration.
Job Summary
The Data Scientist is responsible for maximizing the value of rich date resources available. This person will independently investigate and derive actionable insights to drive improvement for research and development and for the clinical deployment of DeepHealth products.",4.0,"DeepHealth
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"ARGO is a leading provider of software and analytics solutions for both the financial services and healthcare industries. ARGO transforms business processes for financial service providers and healthcare organizations using proven business models and software innovation informed by real customer challenges, breakthrough technology, and rich analytics.
ARGO- Data Scientist (Markham, ON; Memphis, TN; ...) (theapplicantmanager.com)
A Data Scientist with mathematician/statistician and computer science knowledge/experience test that will work within the data science team in developing, evaluating and implementing advanced algorithms for classification, clustering, data reduction, sampling and optimization based on statistical models to power ARGO analytical solutions. This person should also be able to execute robust models for automating various aspects of the data analysis process, including getting customer data, running analytics, and building value-add models for delivery to a production environment.",2.7,"Argo Data
2.7","Richardson, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist
Basking Ridge, NJ

Who We Are:
Excelacom has a global presence in the consulting and technology solutions industry with a focus on Communications and Media providers. We collaborate with our clients to solve their complex business, technology and operational challenges through a combination of consulting expertise and telecom-focused solutions and products. Excelacom provides extensive experience in product development, IT consulting, telecom-focused software and managed services, as well as strategic management and thought leadership to steer our clients towards a successful business and technology transformation.",3.2,"Excelacom
3.2","Basking Ridge, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Analytics - Ads",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"About Quizlet:

Inspired by our belief that anyone can learn anything and powered by our own curiosity, we build the smartest tools we can imagine to help students learn.

Quizlet is the popular, global learning platform and app that millions of students, teachers and everyday people use to study any subject imaginable for school, work or as part of their personal interests - including two-thirds of high school students and half of all college students in the US. Combining cognitive science and machine learning, Quizlet guides students through adaptive study activities to confidently reach their learning goals. We’re on track to become the undisputed leader in user-generated learning content and engagement, at the scale of YouTube.

Valued at $1 billion, Quizlet has raised over $60 million in venture capital from investors including Icon Ventures, Union Square Ventures, General Atlantic, Costanoa Ventures, Owl Ventures, and Altos Ventures.",3.8,"Quizlet
3.8","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist - Applied Research,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Center 2 (19050), United States of America, McLean, Virginia
Principal Data Scientist - Applied Research
At Capital One, we think big and do big things. We are a Top-10 bank by deposits—a high-tech company, scientific laboratory, and a nationally recognized brand. Our products reach tens of millions of consumers and have been recognized by numerous prestigious awards for their customer-friendliness. Capital One was the first major bank to move to cloud computing and to publish APIs for the Open Banking future. AI is transforming every industry, at Capital One you will help shape how it transforms financial services.

Team Description:



No agencies please. Capital One is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to diversity and inclusion in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, color, age, national origin, religion, physical and mental disability, genetic information, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity/assignment, citizenship, pregnancy or maternity, protected veteran status, or any other status prohibited by applicable national, federal, state or local law. Capital One promotes a drug-free workplace. Capital One will consider for employment qualified applicants with a criminal history in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable laws regarding criminal background inquiries, including, to the extent applicable, Article 23-A of the New York Correction Law; San Francisco, California Police Code Article 49, Sections 4901-4920; New York City’s Fair Chance Act; Philadelphia’s Fair Criminal Records Screening Act; and other applicable federal, state, and local laws and regulations regarding criminal background inquiries.",4.1,"Capital One
4.1","McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Position Classification
Staff

Employment Type
Full Time

Benefits
Full Time Benefitted

Department
Grants & Rural Initiatives

Summary",3.4,"Western New Mexico University
3.4","Silver City, NM",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
DATA SCIENTIST,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist at various unanticipated client locations throughout the US to lead data assessment, modeling and forecast for big size multi-national companies; provide ETL big data integration; utilize Data Stage to populate tables in data warehouse and data marts. Hadoop, Pig, Hvive, Data Stage, and Netezza. Must have a Master’s degree in Management Information Systems, or Business Administration, or foreign equivalent.",-1,Big Bright International,"Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Principal Data Scientist, Shopbop",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"MS in Mathematics, Statistics, Machine Learning, or a related quantitative field
7+ years industry experience building successful production software systems
Deep understanding and practical experience in several of the following areas: machine learning, statistics, recommendation systems, and forecasting
Excellent problem-solving skills with the ability to design algorithms, which may include data profiling, clustering, anomaly detection, and predictive modeling methodologies
Ability to combine skills to create new prototypes with the creativity and thoroughness to interrogate the most challenging questions
Shopbop is seeking a Principal Data Scientist to build & lead a new team that will help us elevate how we inspire & delight our customers. As a leader of this team, you will bring business and industry context to science & technology decisions that transform forecasting product demand & placement, ensuring we always have the right product in the right quantity at the right time and price. You will Think Big to tackle intrinsically hard problems, acquiring expertise and building partnerships to accelerate shared success. You will identify opportunities for Shopbop to experiment and innovate across demand prediction, product/outfit styling, and fit guidance – and partner with Fashion experts, Buyers, Product Managers, and Engineers to implement solutions. Your impact will create and grow a science competency throughout the company.

Key job responsibilities
As a hands-on leader of this team, you’ll need superior ability to quickly gather information and requirements from stakeholders, be responsible for defining key research questions, identifying relevant data, adopting or proposing innovative machine learning solutions conducting rigorous experiments, publishing results and working with the engineering team to deploy these solutions. As a strategic leader, you will interact frequently with senior leadership, you will identify investment opportunities, develop long term strategies, and propose, prioritize and deliver on goals. You’ll also participate in organizational planning, hiring, mentorship and leadership development. You will be technically fearless and with a passion for building scalable science and engineering solutions. You will serve as a key scientific resource in full-cycle development (conception, design, implementation, testing to documentation, delivery, and maintenance).

About the team
Shopbop’s mission is to be your destination for style inspiration and discovery. We operate at the forefront of fashion by offering a curated selection of ready-to-wear & accessories from established & emerging designers. We are your daily source for what's new, offering best-in-class curations that inspire & delight every time you visit. We provide a shopping experience that is easy, innovative, and most of all, fun. Simply put, we indulge your style obsession.

We are open to hiring candidates to work out of one of the following locations:

Madison, WI, USA | Miami, FL, USA | New York, NY, USA

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.

Our compensation reflects the cost of labor across several US geographic markets. The base pay for this position ranges from $145,800/year in our lowest geographic market up to $294,700/year in our highest geographic market. Pay is based on a number of factors including market location and may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Amazon is a total compensation company. Dependent on the position offered, equity, sign-on payments, and other forms of compensation may be provided as part of a total compensation package, in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits. For more information, please visit https://www.aboutamazon.com/workplace/employee-benefits. Applicants should apply via our internal or external career site.",3.7,"Bop LLC
3.7","Madison, WI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
E-commerce Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

We are looking for Data Scientists to join our Global e-commerce Data Science team. The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.


Qualifications
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at USRC@tiktok.com

#LI-Hybrid
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $129000 - $316000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



At ByteDance/TikTok our benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support ByteDancers to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off(PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.",3.5,"TikTok
3.5","Seattle, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"The world isn’t standing still, and neither is Allstate. We’re moving quickly, looking across our businesses and brands and taking bold steps to better serve customers’ evolving needs. That’s why now is an exciting time to join our team. You’ll have opportunities to take risks, challenge the status quo and shape the future for the greater good.

You’ll do all this in an environment of excellence and the highest ethical standards – a place where values such as integrity, inclusive diversity and accountability are paramount. We empower every employee to lead, drive change and give back where they work and live. Our people are our greatest strength, and we work as one team in service of our customers and communities.

Everything we do at Allstate is driven by a shared purpose: to protect people from life’s uncertainties so they can realize their hopes and dreams. For more than 89 years we’ve thrived by staying a step ahead of whatever’s coming next – to give customers peace of mind no matter what changes they face. We acted with conviction to advocate for seat belts, air bags and graduated driving laws. We help give survivors of domestic violence a voice through financial empowerment. We’ve been an industry leader in pricing sophistication, telematics, digital photo claims and, more recently, device and identity protection.",3.4,"Allstate
3.4","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Bamboo Health is a leader in cloud-based care coordination software and analytics solutions focused on patients with complex needs, including those suffering from physical health and mental health issues and substance use disorders. We are driven by our mission of enabling better care for patients across the continuum. Our software solutions help healthcare professionals collaborate on shared patients across the spectrum of care. Join us in improving healthcare for all!
Summary:
The Data Scientist will live and breathe data and be excited about building user-facing data products. They will work with the Product Development team, Health Data Science team, other internal stakeholders, and external stakeholders to develop data-driven solutions powered by our unique data pipeline. The Data Scientist will excel at creative problem solving, cross-team collaboration, and thinking independently about how to utilize data to address the challenges our customers face.",3.4,"Bamboo Health
3.4",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Advanced Analytics and AI are high on the agenda at UCB and we are looking to strengthen our internal team of AI experts with a particular focus on sales & marketing.
In this context we are looking for an outstanding data resource proficient with Python & Spark to contribute to the development of analytics workflows focused on insights generation, prescriptive analytics and decision support apps.

Responsibilities:
Assemble large, complex data sets that meet functional/non-functional business requirements.",4.5,"Colsh Consultants
4.5",Georgia,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Computational Physicist/Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Job Description
Physical Sciences Inc., an employee-owned company located just north of Boston in Andover, is looking for a Computational Physicist and/or Data Scientist to contribute to a number of programs in data analysis and data fusion. We develop systems and algorithms that solve challenging real-world problems in computer vision, graph analytics, generative artificial intelligence, and sensor fusion and modeling. Systems that we develop are continuously deployed with relevant local and federal agencies, directly contributing to our nation’s security.
The ideal candidate should possess a robust background in analyzing and interpreting complex datasets, coupled with expertise in developing algorithms and analysis tools that yield definitive results and conclusions.Strong research and written communication skills are required, as the candidate should have the desire to write proposals. Familiarity with machine learning techniques and model development, obtained through formal or self-directed education, is highly desirable. Specific areas of research interest currently include vision-language models, few-shot learning, and self-supervised learning. However, the candidate is expected to proactively develop their own research interests and draft proposals in novel research domains.",3.8,"Physical Sciences Inc.
3.8","Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist - Tiktok Ads, Growth Marketing",$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

The mission of TikTok Ads Platform is to connect global advertisers and users, advertisers of any industry and experience level are able to get suitable marketing solutions, then easily create, manage and optimize ads. The vision is to build an easy-to-understand, easy-to-use and powerful Ads Platform.

The Ad Growth team is responsible for driving advertising growth on TikTok platform. We achieve it by acquiring and retaining advertisers through brand marketing, performance marketing, organic growth initiatives and customer management. We build products that allow us to reach more audiences, improve targeting, optimize bidding, better measure incrementally.


We are looking for experienced Data Scientists to influence the product roadmaps for the Ad Growth team.
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.
TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations during our recruitment process. If you need assistance or an accommodation, please reach out to us at USRC@tiktok.com.",3.9,"ByteDance
3.9","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Visualization/Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Codes software applications to adhere to designs supporting internal business requirements or external customers. Standardizes the quality assurance procedure for software. Oversees testing and develops fixes.
May require a bachelor’s degree in a related area and 2-5 years of experience in the field or in a related area. Has knowledge of standard concepts, practices, and procedures within Spotfire.
Ability to collaborate with our team to edit and develop custom Visualization reports, dashboards and charts.
2 years Spotfire, Tableau or BI experience
1+ years working with Clinical related data",1.0,"Vita Data Sciences
1.0","Waltham, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Senior Data Scientist, AI and Computational Chemistry",$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Work Your Magic with us!

Ready to explore, break barriers, and discover more? We know you've got big plans - so do we! Our colleagues across the globe love innovating with science and technology to enrich people's lives with our solutions in Healthcare, Life Science, and Electronics. Together, we dream big and are passionate about caring for our rich mix of people, customers, patients, and planet. That's why we are always looking for curious minds that see themselves imagining the unimaginable with us.

By unlocking the power of data AI for drug discovery (AIDD) has the potential to enable personalized medicine and change patient lives. An M-Ventures funded biotech start-up is poised to seize the opportunity at the intersection between the Healthcare and Life Science Divisions of Merck, KGaA Darmstadt, Germany. Our mandate is to think big and reach across teams to leverage the full capabilities of the organization. For more than 350 years and across the world we have passionately pursued our curiosity to find novel and vibrant ways of enhancing the lives of others.



The Senior Scientist in AI and Computational Chemistry will be a key role in shaping up the AI-enabled Drug Discovery (AIDD) project that aims at the total drug discovery solution from design to delivery. You will work closely with other scientists to build the key analysis and prediction modules used in SaaS-based drug design solution employing the artificial intelligence and machine-learn (AI/ML) techniques as well as other algorithmic approaches, and work with the reaction automation team to support the link between drug-design and drug-delivery.

In this role, you will be typically involved in activities, such as:


To be an ideal candidate for this role, you should

Remote flexible; Burlington, MA; hybrid preferred

<10>

We are curious minds that come from a broad range of backgrounds, perspectives, and life experiences. We celebrate all dimensions of diversity and believe that it drives excellence and innovation, strengthening our ability to lead in science and technology. We are committed to creating access and opportunities for all to develop and grow at your own pace. Join us in building a culture of inclusion and belonging that impacts millions and empowers everyone to work their magic and champion human progress!

Apply now and become a part of our diverse team!

If you would like to know more about what diversity, equity, and inclusion means to us, please visit https://www.emdgroup.com/en/company/press-positions.html",3.9,"MilliporeSigma
3.9","Burlington, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Researcher/Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Position Description
Animosity between Republicans and Democrats has reached new heights, threatening American democracy. The Cooperation Game initiative is developing a scalable, evidence-based strategy for reducing partisan animosity using cooperative online quiz games. This project is a collaboration between Harvard University and the Global Development Incubator. It is supported with seed funding from Schmidt Futures, Open Philanthropy, Beyond Conflict, and the Global Development Incubator. This translational project builds on the Greene Lab’s recent experimental research in which Republicans and Democrats cooperate as game partners in real time. We aim to deploy our quiz games in organizational contexts (e.g., businesses, schools) and eventually through a publicly accessible online platform. Our current focus is on the partisan divide in the US, but there may be opportunities to expand this work to other nations.",4.3,"Harvard University
4.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Marketing Analytics,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Who We Are
MarketBridge is the leading provider of rapidly scalable, innovative go-to-market solutions for Marketing, Sales, and CX leaders. For over 25 years we’ve delivered customer-centric, data-driven strategies to Fortune 500 clients. Our unique approach—Go-to-Market® Science—uses analytics and insight to drive revenue growth and customer value. As a boutique consulting firm, we pride ourselves on:
Deep Go-to-Market® Expertise - We are a mix of go-to-market® strategists and execution-oriented practitioners who wrote the book on multi-channel commercial strategy
Data-Centric Approach - We love measuring results and understand the value of the good and the bad to unearth real performance optimization",3.5,"MarketBridge
3.5","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist
Pathology - Operations
75131BR
University Job Title
Data Scientist 1
Bargaining Unit
None - Not included in the union (Yale Union Group)
Time Type",4.2,"Yale University
4.2","New Haven, CT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Marketing Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"About SimpliSafe
We're a high-tech home security company that's passionate about protecting the life you've built and our mission of keeping Every Home Secure. And we've created a culture here that cares just as deeply about the career you're building. Ours is a no ego culture of collaboration and innovation where those seeking their next challenge can find big opportunities and make a huge impact on the lives of all those who we protect. We don't just want you to work here. We want you to grow and thrive here.
We're embracing a hybrid work model that enables our teams to split their time between office and home. Hybrid for us means we expect our teams to come together in our state-of-the-art office on two core days, typically Tuesday and Wednesday, working together in person and choose where they work for the remainder of the week. We all benefit from flexibility and get to use the best of both worlds to get our work done.",3.6,"SimpliSafe
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Description:
Whisker, formerly known as AutoPets, is the maker of Litter-Robot, Feeder-Robot, and Litterbox.com. At Whisker, we believe pet parenthood can always get better.
As leading innovators in pet tech and refined pet accessories, we work tirelessly to solve problems and deliver smarter insights for pet parents while enriching the lives of pets. Whether it’s a self-cleaning litter box that automates scooping, an automatic feeder that helps pets develop healthier eating habits, or a modern cat tree that delights both humans and felines, we strive to deliver better solutions for consumers while transforming pet care along the way. To us, having a pet is the best thing ever. At Whisker, life together just keeps getting better.
Whisker is based in Auburn Hills, Michigan and Juneau, Wisconsin with 450+ passionate team members.
Requirements:",3.3,"Whisker
3.3","Auburn Hills, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Machine Learning Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Machinify is a revolutionary healthcare software company with a mission to ensure that patients get the right medical treatment, at the right time, at the right price. Our cloud-based Machinify AI platform leverages the latest advances in machine learning, large language models, data analytics, and cloud processing to solve previously intractable problems, transforming healthcare administration and payment operations.
Our team has deployed models that check for anomalies in medical claims, predict the trajectory of care of a particular patient and the next likely treatment and even “read and understand” medical record documents using state-of-the-art NLP and computer vision techniques to assist clinicians. There are many more such problems to be solved. So if you are looking for a place where you can apply your expertise in AI/ML to solve real problems and make a difference in an industry that impacts millions of lives while accelerating your career, you’ll love Machinify. We are seeking a Sr Machine Learning Scientist to join our team.",3.7,"Machinify
3.7",California,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist
Eastport Analytics has an immediate opportunity for a full time Data Scientist with strong SQL & Python experience. Our data subject matter experts, technologists, and domain/industry specialists work directly with financial investigators, auditors, and analysts to gain better insights out of existing structured/unstructured data and IT systems. These teams drive innovation that allows their clients to modernize their data strategy, understand and improve their data management, automate, and optimize their business and technological procedures, and build insights through modeling, reporting, and generalized data analytics. We measure success by our client’s mission accomplishments, be it higher compliance, improved asset recovery, or enhanced law/tax enforcement.
As a Data Scientist, you will be performing data manipulation, data analysis, and data wrangling/ETL. You will be using statistical software and other exploratory data analysis (EDA) tools/techniques to inform senior leadership decision-making. You will be responsible for building, maintaining, executing, and documenting SQL models to ensure data is managed efficiently and effectively for our client. This role includes developing and implementing databases and data collection systems, acquiring data from primary and secondary sources, maintaining data ingest processes and identifying/analyzing/interpreting trends or patterns in complex datasets.",-1,Eastport Analytics,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Senior Data Scientist, Analytics (Communities)",$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Discord is looking for experienced and passionate data scientist to join our mighty Data Science team! As a member of the Data Science team, you will help Discord achieve its mission of being the best place to hang out, by collaborating directly with the teams who design, build, and support Discord. We're specifically hiring for the Communities Data Science team, and this individual will focus primarily on the Moderator Tools space. Moderator Tools are a vital part of Discord - with the diverse needs of Moderators across so many different types of servers, you'd partner closely with Product, UX, Engineering, and other cross-functional teams to evolve how these tools benefit a very important contributor to the Discord ecosystem. If you’re passionate about data, impact, and working on an amazing team, read on and check out our blog about how our team informs strategy &amp; innovation at Discord here! What You'll Be Doing Partner with teams through the full lifecycle of data analytics from ideation and exploratory analysis, to building dashboards and reports Define KPIs and diagnostic metrics that help improve the user experience, encapsulating these measures in clean crisp dashboards that provide the company with timely and actionable information Use our amazing infrastructure to quickly and easily build custom data sets to monitor novel product features and processes Proactively socialize insights, dashboards, and reports with technical and non-technical audiences, soliciting feedback on where to improve Be a champion of A/B testing and help groups throughout the company design, analyze, and interpret A/B tests correctly Collaborate with data and engineering teams to design scalable and future-proof instrumentation You Will Thrive In This Role If 4+ years of experience autonomously translating ambiguous business problems into deep informative insights through hands-on analytics 4+ years of experience building performant dashboards using Tableau, Looker, or similar software - with proficiency in designing clean crisp visualizations 3+ years experience writing excellent SQL Excellent communication skills, with the ability to translate complicated findings or technical approaches in easy-to-understand ways 2+ years of experience in the design, analysis, and interpretation of A/B tests in a large data environment A desire to work with amazing, passionate people who care deeply about solve challenging problems to improve Discord Last but not least - a collaborative attitude and a healthy dose of natural curiosity! Bonus Points Passion for Discord or online communities Experience with writing production ETL Experience with technical leadership, being the point person for one or more stakeholder groups Experience with analytics for social media or international subscription-based online services, including familiarity with concepts such as social graphs, LTV/user-lifecycle analysis, funnel analysis, etc Experience writing performant code in BigQuery SQL The US base salary range for this full-time position is $178,000 to $192,000 + equity + benefits. Our salary ranges are determined by role and level. Within the range, individual pay is determined by additional factors, including job-related skills, experience, and relevant education or training. Please note that the compensation details listed in US role postings reflect the base salary only, and do not include equity, or benefits. Benefits and Perks Comprehensive medical insurance including Health, Dental and Vision (plus up to $20,000 for gender affirmation procedures) Mental health resources and quarterly wellness stipends 14+ paid holidays, 4 weeks of PTO + use-what-you-need sick days Paid parental leave (plus fertility, adoption and other family planning benefits) Flexible long-term work options (remote and hybrid) Volunteer time off A diverse slate of Employee Resource Groups Plus commuter contributions and other perks for office-based employees About Us Discord is a voice, video and text app that helps friends and communities come together to hang out and explore their interests — from artists and activists, to study groups, sneakerheads, plant parents, and more. With 150 million monthly users across 19 million active communities, called servers, Discord has grown to become one of the most popular communications services in the world. Discord was built without selling ads or user data and instead, offers a premium subscription called Nitro that gives users special perks like higher quality streams and fun customizations. We’re working toward an inclusive world where no one feels like an outsider, where genuine human connection is a click, text chat, or voice call away. A place where everyone can find belonging. Challenging? Heck yes. Rewarding? Double heck yes. It’s a mission that gives us the chance to positively impact millions of people all over the world. So if this strikes a chord with you, come build belonging with us!",3.1,"Discord
3.1","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist(s) - Analytics (Product),$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"About the Role
We are looking for a Senior Data Scientist to join our Analytics team to generate insights and build data products that will allow us to answer some of our toughest questions to help us innovate and grow. You will be solving challenging business problems, performing statistical analyses and identifying and solving data quality issues. You will be collaborating with engineering and product teams to define data requirements and shape strategic direction. If you are passionate about using data to solve hard problems, we want to hear from you!
Our team consists of people that are passionate about creating finely polished and intuitive experiences and, at the same time, obsess over performance and reliability of what we build. We challenge the status quo and strive towards finding the best way to solve problems.",3.7,"Spin
3.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
USA-Data Scientist II (Clinical),$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist II (Clinical)
Waltham, MA
12 Months contract
Pay Range: $50-65/hr on w2

General:
"" Implementation of data analysis and process workflows across Waltham R&B
"" Transversal collaborative work with mRNA center of Excellence community and collaborators to achieve objectives.
"" Key user of the electronic laboratory notebook (Benching) to support the team and development of a user-friendly benching process for work and data collection
"" Traceability of samples, reagents, and their storage for the HT platform pipeline
"" Implementation of Sample\Reagent barcode solution in the electronic laboratory notebook (Benchling)
"" Provide solutions to for data visualization to track experimental results and stock of critical reagents

Tasks requiring Skilled Ability:
"" Looking for a PhD or MS candidate in molecular biology or related field with data science experience including strong understanding of electronic laboratory notebooks (Benchling experience preferred)
"" Assist in sample submission and management for samples throughout mRNA platform production pipeline
"" General scientific understanding in the following areas:
o PCR, cloning, and pDNA preparation
o Capillary electrophoresis, SDS page, UPLC-MS, UV-ABS
o Affinity Chromatography
o Cell Culture and Transfection
o ELISA and Activity Assays
o mRNA Formulation (PNP, LNP, etc.)
"" Ability to summarize complex scientific processes highlighting key process and data collection steps",4.2,"eTeam Inc.
4.2","Waltham, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Senior Data Scientist, Ops Data Platform",$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"The NVIDIA Datacenter organization is seeking an experienced technology professional for the position of Data Scientist to support initiatives for the Operation Data Platforms Reporting, and Analytics Organization for our DGX™ and other Datacenter products. As a Data Scientist in our team, you will be an integral part of the team in Operations that is building the Operations Data Platform to turn data into business insights and results. You will develop key insights and use those insights to enable our business key users and management to drive business strategies
What you’ll be doing:
Support implementation of the End-to-End Ops Data platform for our Datacenter products
Build and deploy scalable prediction algorithms by applying statistical analytics and Machine Learning (ML) to accelerate the root cause analysis of production issues and NPI products.
The base salary range is $160,000 - $247,250. Your base salary will be determined based on your location, experience, and the pay of employees in similar positions.
NVIDIA is committed to fostering a diverse work environment and proud to be an equal opportunity employer. As we highly value diversity in our current and future employees, we do not discriminate (including in our hiring and promotion practices) on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,"NVIDIA
4.6","Santa Clara, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"U.S. News & World Report is a multifaceted digital media company dedicated to helping citizens, consumers, business leaders and policy officials make important decisions in their lives. We publish independent reporting, rankings, data journalism and advice that has earned the trust of our readers and users for nearly 90 years. Our platforms on usnews.com include Education, Health, Money, Travel, Cars, News and 360 Reviews.
We reach more than 40 million people monthly during moments when they are most in need of expert advice and motivated to act on that advice directly on our platforms. Our signature franchises include our ?Best? series of consumer guides on colleges, graduate schools, hospitals, diets, cars, financial services and more. These guides provide an easy-to-digest list for consumers to better understand and compare when making their decisions. We continue to publish annual guides of the authoritative Best Colleges and Best Hospitals rankings on our website and in print. And our U.S. News Live flagship conferences highlight important national conversations including Healthcare of Tomorrow and Healthiest Communities.",3.3,"US News & World Report ,L.P.
3.3","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Data-Driven Marketing",$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Job Description:
**This is a hybrid role based in our Newark, NJ office.
As a Data Scientist, Data-Driven Marketing, you will uncover consumer behaviors through advanced analytics and modeling, discovering the audiences most relevant to our brands and categories, and creating models and algorithms that are actioned within marketing campaigns and programs.
What are we looking for?
Bachelor’s degree in Analytics or related quantitative fields (statistics, mathematics, econometrics etc.). Advanced degree will be preferred.",4.3,"Mars
4.3","Newark, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior/Principal Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Who We Are:
Calico (Calico Life Sciences LLC) is an Alphabet-founded research and development company whose mission is to harness advanced technologies and model systems to increase our understanding of the biology that controls human aging. Calico will use that knowledge to devise interventions that enable people to lead longer and healthier lives. Calico’s highly innovative technology labs, its commitment to curiosity-driven discovery science and, with academic and industry partners, its vibrant drug-development pipeline, together create an inspiring and exciting place to catalyze and enable medical breakthroughs.
Position Description:
Calico is seeking a Senior/Principal Data Scientist to join our efforts in advancing novel therapies from target discovery to clinical development. The ideal candidate, working collaboratively with the translational and development teams, will apply their deep technical knowledge in machine learning, probabilistic modeling and methods for analyzing single-cell -omics data to understand the basic biology of aging and drive drug development decisions. You will lead efforts to develop novel methods for analyzing single-cell data (e.g., scRNAseq, scATACseq, CITEseq) and to combine them with other data modalities such as in-situ multiplexed imaging (e.g., MIBI-ToF, CODEX) and physiological sensor data across a variety of both in-vivo and in-vitro models. These methods will be used to design experiments and identify therapeutic targets. The candidate will also be responsible for the analysis and interpretation of data in support of Calico’s translational activities. This may include analysis of NGS, imaging and proteomics datasets, mining publicly available data sources and designing data-driven follow-up experiments. This role requires the ability to communicate computational results and outcomes to scientists in both quantitative and non-quantitative disciplines, as well as to external collaborators at AbbVie, Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center, and others.",4.1,"CALICO
4.1","South San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist/Algorithm Developer,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"DATA SCIENTIST/ALGORITHM DEVELOPER
Raptor Scientific, a Global Aerospace & Defense Test and Measurement Company, is seeking an exceptional Engineer or Applied Mathematician with expertise in signal processing to join our dynamic team. You will have the opportunity to work on challenging projects that demand a deep understanding of signal processing algorithms and imaging techniques. Your expertise in handling I/Q data and proficiency in programming languages such as C, C#, and MATLAB will be instrumental in driving our technological advancements. In this role, you will play a pivotal part in developing and optimizing advanced technologies that will enhance the performance and capabilities of our mission-critical aerospace and defense systems.
As part of the Raptor Scientific Family, the RF Systems (RFS) group specializes in radar cross section (RCS) measurements and is constantly innovating to produce the next generation of radar systems. RFS has a multifaceted team that develops cutting edge measurement systems in support of the Aerospace and Defense industry. Our team is focused on customer needs and providing full spectrum support including engineering, field measurement, software development and manufacturing.",-1,Raptor Scientific,"Livermore, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Kunai is a fast-growing digital agency of 120+ people specializing in fintech. Our fully remote team is driven by innovation and experimentation. Over the past decade, we've shipped over 150 products for clients that include Visa, the United Nations, Wells Fargo, Ernst & Young, and TOMS Shoes. Our founders built a previous agency (Monsoon) that was acquired by Capital One in 2015.

We are looking for an experience Data Scientist who will provide solutions for the deployment, execution, validation, monitoring, and improvement of data science solutions. You will create scalable Machine Learning systems that are highly performant. Further, you will build reusable production data pipelines for implemented machine learning models as well as write production-quality code and libraries that can be packaged as containers, installed and deployed. Finally, you will collaborate with cross-functional teams and business partners and will have the opportunity to drive current and future strategy by leveraging your analytical skills as you ensure business value and communicate the results.


As a Senior Data Scientist, you will be a Technical lead on Data science projects/Products and take ownership of implementation and delivery responsibilities
You will work closely with product stakeholders to develop “intelligent” features and deliver outstanding business outcomes leveraging Machine Learning, Deep Learning, NLP and CV.
Ideate with stakeholders to identify ML/Deep Learning opportunities for solutions.
Formulate problems and translate into Data Science project requirements.
Build solutions that can be easily integrated into external frameworks or existing applications.
Select appropriate ML modeling techniques for complex problems with large-scale data.
Develop and iterate on features collaboratively with the business partners.
Lead model development and guide team members through building, testing, and deploying ML models at scale.
Establish best practices for model deployment, monitoring, and interpretability.
Ensure production-ready ML solutions with low latency inference times and risk assessment.


Expertise in Statistics, Machine Learning, Deep Learning, NLP (Computer Vision is a plus)
Proven industry experience in solving Retail and Customer science problems.
Proficient in Python/R, PyTorch/TensorFlow, SQL, Big Data and cloud technologies.
Experience leading and mentoring data science teams,
Effective technical communication to non-technical stakeholders.
Knowledge of Deployment and Scaling best practices.
Bachelors/Masters degree in Statistics, Economics, Analytics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Information Technology or related field and 4 – 6 years' experience in an analytics related field, Data science, machine learning, optimization models, etc...
PhD in Machine Learning, Computer Science, Information Technology, Operations Research, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Econometrics a big plus
Successful completion of one or more assessments in Python, Spark, Scala, or R, Using open source frameworks (for example, scikit learn, tensorflow, torch).",4.3,"Kunai
4.3","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Global Data Analytics Rotational Development Program (RDP) Employee,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Equifax is where you can power your possible. If you want to achieve your true potential, chart new paths, develop new skills, collaborate with bright minds, and make a meaningful impact, we want to hear from you.
Data and Analytics Rotational Development Program: Data and Analytics, the advanced analytical division of Equifax, offers state of the art solutions to current and emerging business challenges. Through our data analytics, customer insights, predictive modeling, and consulting services, we deliver the analytics and insights companies need to stay ahead. Our US Information Services team is seeking recent college graduates for data scientist positions to construct best in class analytical solutions and business insights for Equifax.
We are searching for candidates who are currently pursuing their Master's Degree with an expected graduation date of December 2023.",3.5,"Equifax
3.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"CO-OP, Data Scientist",$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"The Data Science Team in SGRNA is focused on various activities supporting various businesses of Saint-Gobain, especially in R&D and Manufacturing. Our R&D is looking for a highly motivated individual to help us uncover insights into material formulation using data informed analytics, in addition to supporting Industry 4.0 projects. During this temporary assignment, the candidate will work with various types of data (structured, unstructured, images), analyze the data and use advanced ML techniques to develop state of the art algorithms to identify relationships and drivers of data patterns, and present the findings in both written and oral formats. The candidate should enjoy learning new ML technologies, problem solving, and potentially designing innovative algorithms using modern and up to date ML and AI techniques alongside good coding practices (git). In addition to the candidate’s primary projects, the candidate will be expected to support projects led by others. The candidate should demonstrate an open and collaborative approach in all areas of responsibility and seek out others to enhance and streamline development and decision making.",4.1,"Saint-Gobain Research North America
4.1","Northborough, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist

Work Location: Remote
Status: Non-Exempt
Contract Duration: 1 month (possible extension)
About This Role
The successful candidate will be responsible for utilizing their data science knowledge to contribute to our cybersecurity project. Ideally, this individual will have cybersecurity experience, with a deep understanding of Python for data processing and the ability to write production level code. Experience with web scraping, Machine Learning and Natural Language Processing (NLP) is crucial, as is a capacity to work in a high-pace, high-demand setting. Knowledge of Appian will be considered a plus.",4.3,"IntelliDyne
4.3","Falls Church, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Machine Learning / Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Docugami uses powerful artificial intelligence to unlock the information contained in highly varied, unstructured business documents. Business users, without IT or development projects, can immediately create custom analysis of vital document content and information from large batches of contracts, can assist users in creating new documents more efficiently and consistently, and can automatically connect information from within documents to other business systems.
Docugami started with years of R&D, and has received a $10M seed round of VC funding as well as multiple endorsements from industry leaders and publications. The founders are seasoned ex-Microsoft engineers and leaders, some already well known in the software industry for their record of building and running $1B+ innovative software product businesses.
Docugami is looking for Machine Learning, Data Science and Math PhD researchers to work alongside our world-renowned science and engineering team to create a revolutionary product. We are looking for experienced researchers to work with our luminary science advisors on major scientific breakthroughs.",5.0,"Docugami
5.0","Kirkland, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"Skills : machine learning, python, REST API, ad attirbution, marketing mix modeling, Robyn, ligtmmm
· Hands-on experience in Building, training and deploying Client models
· 10+ years of experience with 7+ in Machine Learning
· Expertise in programming using Python
· Excellent communication skills
· Entrepreneurial attitude and spirit - should be able to think and build business use cases by analysing data",4.1,"Vedainfo
4.1","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$129K - $316K (Employer est.),"About Lightsource bp

Lightsource bp is a global leader in the development and management of solar energy projects. We are a 50:50 joint venture with bp with a mission to help drive the world’s transition to low carbon energy.

With solar set to increase tenfold in the next 20 years, we are well-positioned to capitalize on this growth. By joining the Lightsource bp team, you will ‘be the change’ on the world’s energy transition to a more sustainable future.",4.2,"Lightsource BP
4.2","Denver, CO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Do you have a passion for data science, machine learning and AI ? Do you want to apply it to protect millions of customers using Microsoft online services from threat actors around the globe ? Are you curious, analytical, and motivated by new challenges? If so, we would like to hear from you!

The Microsoft Security Response Center team (MSRC) is seeking a Data Scientist to meet the growing demand and challenges of cybersecurity and threat protection. As a Data Dcientist on our team, you will partner with our engineers, other data scientists, and researchers to experiment, design, build, and deploy statistical, machine learning, and AI models to protect the Microsoft Cloud against known and emerging cyberattacks. In your day-to-day work, you will perform data analysis on big data, find useful insights, perform hypothesis testing, experiment with models, vet experiments, incorporate quality monitors, and ship successful models to productions.

You will have the opportunity to collaborate with partners across Microsoft who have decades of security, research, and ML expertise and the tools and technologies to grow your expertise in this field.








Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.3,"Microsoft
4.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Decision Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"At PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL), we believe that every person has the right to participate fully in the global economy. Our mission is to democratize financial services to ensure that everyone, regardless of background or economic standing, has access to affordable, convenient, and secure products and services to take control of their financial lives.
Job Description Summary: The Global Collections Strategy team is seeking a Decision Scientist with prior Collections and Digital Channels experience to join our organization. The ideal candidate will possess a highly developed technical skillset (SQL, Python, etc), as well as the business acumen to distill analytical results into actionable outcomes. Frequent collaboration with cross-border stakeholder teams is required as part of this role.
Job Description:
PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $84500 to $204600",4.0,"PayPal
4.0",Arkansas,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Marketing Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"It is our people behind life’s passions who will make the big difference. If you are interested in becoming part of a company that delivers market leading products, driving your own career and working with brands committed to active lifestyles, then you’ve found your fit.
Have what it takes? Join us.
Marketing Data Scientist
Brunswick is seeking a highly analytical and data-driven data scientist to join our team. you will be responsible for extracting insights from large datasets, conducting statistical analyses, and providing actionable recommendations to enhance marketing strategies. You will collaborate with cross-functional teams, including marketing, analytics, and data engineering, to drive data-driven decision-making and improve overall marketing performance.

#Brunswick Corporation",4.0,"Brunswick Corporation
4.0","Mettawa, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - REMOTE,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"What Is Your Impact?
Data Scientists produce innovative solutions driven by exploratory data analysis from complex and high-dimensional datasets. Apply knowledge of statistics, data modeling, machine learning and advanced mathematics to recognize patterns, identify opportunities, pose business questions, and make valuable discoveries. Use a flexible, analytical approach to design, develop, and evaluate predictive models. Generate and test hypotheses. The Data Scientist proactively seeks to develop their skillsets and provide value-added support within the Data Science team.

What Are Your Key Responsibilities?",4.0,"Florida Blue
4.0",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"REMOTE - LOUISVILLE, KY
Bamboo Health is a leader in cloud-based care coordination software and analytics solutions focused on patients with complex needs, including those suffering from physical health and mental health issues and substance use disorders. We are driven by our mission of enabling better care for patients across the continuum. Our software solutions help healthcare professionals collaborate on shared patients across the spectrum of care. Join us in improving healthcare for all!
Summary:
The Data Scientist will live and breathe data and be excited about building user-facing data products. They will work with the Product Development team, Health Data Science team, other internal stakeholders, and external stakeholders to develop data-driven solutions powered by our unique data pipeline. The Data Scientist will excel at creative problem solving, cross-team collaboration, and thinking independently about how to utilize data to address the challenges our customers face.",3.4,"Bamboo Health
3.4","Louisville, KY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Remote,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"At UnitedHealthcare, we’re simplifying the health care experience, creating healthier communities and removing barriers to quality care. The work you do here impacts the lives of millions of people for the better. Come build the health care system of tomorrow, making it more responsive, affordable and equitable. Ready to make a difference? Join us and start doing your life's best work.(sm)

As the Data Analyst 2, you will act as the Analytical expert and will provide analytic leadership to support Government Program operational reporting and analytics, planning, forecasting, machine learning and process improvements. You'll work closely with business leaders to develop innovative analytic solutions, create actionable insights and drive better decisions and performance to help Government Operation fulfill its mission.",3.6,"UnitedHealthcare
3.6","Minnetonka, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Sr. Data Scientist
Location: Torrance, CA
Workstyle: Remote
What Makes a Honda, is Who makes a Honda
Honda has a clear vision for the future, and it’s a joyful one. We are looking for individuals with the skills, courage, persistence, and dreams that will help us reach our future-focused goals.
At our core is innovation. Honda is constantly innovating and developing solutions to drive our business with record success. We strive to be a company which serves as a source of “power” that supports people around the world who are trying to do things based on their own initiative and that helps people expand their own potential. To this end, Honda strives to realize “the joy and freedom of mobility” by developing new technologies and an innovative approach to achieve a “zero environmental footprint.”",3.3,"American Honda Motor Co
3.3",California,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Junior Consultant in Strategy & Data Science - New York,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Ekimetrics is a leader in data science and AI-powered solutions. For over 16 years, we’ve pioneered the use of AI and advanced data science applied to unified marketing measurement, holistic business optimization and broad-ranging sustainability goals.
Our goal: combine high impact with long-term business purpose.
Ekimetrics is one of the world’s largest independent analytics firms with offices on 3 continents, and with more than 400 data experts. Since 2006, we have led more than a thousand data science projects in over 50 countries, generating more than $1bn in profit for our customers.
We help companies rethink the way they operate, so they can reconcile financial KPIs with non-financial goals. We are uniquely specialized in creating scalable data and analytics solutions that drive high-impact optimizations in alignment with overarching brand strategy and sustainability goals.
At Ekimetrics, we believe our best assets are our people. They are what set us apart and drive our success with entrepreneurial spirit and innovation. We encourage entrepreneurial spirit and innovation. We share what we know with others, and, above all, we love what we do. These sentiments are supported by our company values which serve as pillars in our work and attitude: curiosity, creativity, excellence, transmission, and pleasure.",4.1,"Ekimetrics
4.1","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"This is role is REMOTE.
*********************************
The responsibilities of the Senior Data Scientist:
We are looking for a data scientist that has experience working with financial market data, large language models and has experience with scripting languages like Python.
***Experience with Asset Management experience in the Financial industry is critical.
Responsibilities",-1,Eclipse Network Services (ENS),Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist/Data Visualization Specialist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Eagle Integrated Services, LLC (EIS) is seeking a Data Scientist/Data Visualization Specialist

Mandatory Qualifications:
The contracted employee shall possess a minimum of a B.S. degree in data analytics, biostatistics, bioinformatics, business intelligence, epidemiology, statistics, computer science, or a related science or engineering field that emphasizes data processing, graphical data presentation, and programming.
Contractor employees requiring access to USAF bases, AFRL facilities, and/or access to U.S. Government Information Technology (IT) networks in connection with the work on this contract must be U.S. citizens.
The contracted employee shall demonstrate at least 3 years of experience analyzing and processing data sets using Python / Pandas, R, SQL, or related programming software.
Highly Desired Qualifications

Tasks.",-1,BRS,"Wright Patterson AFB, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Lead Data Scientist - Online Platforms Reinforcement Learning (Remote),$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Position Purpose:
The Lead Data Scientist is responsible for leading data science initiatives that drive business profitability, increased efficiencies and improved customer experience. This role assists in the development of the Home Depot advanced analytics infrastructure that informs decision making by applying expertise of both business and Advanced Analytics Modeling techniques. Lead Data Scientists focus on seeking out business opportunities to leverage data science as a competitive advantage. Based on the specific data science team, this role has expertise in one or more data science specializations, such as optimization, computer vision, recommendation, search or NLP.


As a Lead Data Scientist, you will be responsible for large data science projects, identifying opportunities to leverage best technology and approach, and mentoring data scientists on the project team. This role is expected to own the library of reusable algorithms for future use, ensuring developed codes are documented. This role supports the building of skilled and talented data science teams by providing input to staffing needs and participating in the recruiting and hiring process. In addition, this role leads data science communities across several business units.


30% Solution Development - Utilize expertise when designing and developing algorithms and models to use against large datasets to create business insights; Make appropriate selection, utilization and interpretation of advanced analytics methodologies; Effectively communicate insights and recommendations to both technical and non-technical leaders and business customers/partners; Clearly communicate impacts of recommendations to drive alignment and appropriate implementation


25% Project Management & Team Support - Lead and manage large and complex projects and teams; Provide direction on prioritization of work and ensure quality of work; Provide mentoring and coaching to more junior roles to support their technical competencies; Collaborate with managers and team in the distribution of workload and resources; Support recruiting and hiring efforts for the team; Serve as a technical subject matter expert (SME) for one or more data science methods, both predictive and prescriptive; Lead data science communities across several business units


20% Business Collaboration - Leverage extensive business knowledge into solution approach; Effectively develop trust and collaboration with internal customers and cross-functional teams; Provide technical education on advanced analytics to data science community; Partner with IT to understand potential for new tools and ways to maintain technical agility for data science; Actively seek out new business opportunities to leverage data science as a competitive advantage


25% Technical Exploration & Development - Seek further knowledge on key developments within data science by attending conferences and publishing papers; Participate in the continuous improvement of data science and analytics by developing replicable solutions (for example, codified data products, project documentation, process flowcharts) to ensure solutions are leveraged for future projects; Define best practices and develop clear vision for data analysis and model productionalization; Ownership of library of reusable algorithms for future use, ensure developed code/models are documented; Develop mastery in one or more prescriptive modeling techniques, like optimization, computer vision, recommendation, search or NLP


This position typically reports to manager or above
This position has 0 Direct Reports and leads/manages projects

For Colorado, Connecticut, Nevada and New York City residents: The pay range for this position is between $120,000 and $240,000. Starting salary may vary based on a number of factors including, but not limited to, the position being offered, location, education, training, and/or experience. The Home Depot offers additional competitive financial and non-financial benefits, which may include a performance-based bonus program or a profit sharing program depending on position.



1. Located in a comfortable indoor area. Any unpleasant conditions would be infrequent and not objectionable.

Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time.",3.8,"Home Depot / THD
3.8","Atlanta, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Sr Data Scientist, Risk Data Mining",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul, and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

The Business Risk Integrated Control (BRIC) team is missioned to:
The BRIC team works to minimize the damage of inauthentic behaviors on TikTok platforms (e.g. TikTok, CapCut, Resso, Lark), covering multiple classical and novel community and business risk areas such as account integrity, engagement authenticity, anti spam, API abuse, growth fraud, live streaming security and financial safety (ads or e-commerce), etc.

In this team you'll have a unique opportunity to have first-hand exposure to the strategy of the company in key security initiatives, especially in building scalable and robust, intelligent and privacy-safe, secure and product-friendly systems and solutions. Our challenges are not some regular day-to-day technical puzzles -- You'll be part of a team that's developing novel solutions to first-seen challenges of a non-stop evolvement of a phenomenal product eco-system. The work needs to be fast, transferrable, while still down to the ground to making quick and solid differences.


Qualifications


TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at gprd.accommodations@tiktok.com
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $165000 - $240000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



At ByteDance/TikTok our benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support ByteDancers to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off(PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.",3.5,"TikTok
3.5","San Jose, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Responsibilities
Contribute to development on multiple work streams / projects / programs simultaneously.
Work with product lead, eng lead and program manager to understand business/functional requirements and roadmap/timeline for delivery.
Develop data model, pipelines and reports/dashboards per requirements and project plan.
Plan and execute test plans and test cases.
Participate in project team meetings.",4.2,"eTeam Inc.
4.2","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"At Boeing, we innovate and collaborate to make the world a better place. From the seabed to outer space, you can contribute to work that matters with a company where diversity, equity and inclusion are shared values. We’re committed to fostering an environment for every teammate that’s welcoming, respectful and inclusive, with great opportunity for professional growth. Find your future with us.
Boeing Global Services (BGS) is seeking an Experienced Data Scientist to support our business in Mesa, AZ or Hazelwood, MO or Ridley Park, PA. This organization supports BGS-Government Planning and the data analyst will apply statistical and other analytics techniques to assist with producing recommendations within the fast pace environment of aerospace.
A successful candidate will understand the importance of data analytics as these positions will focus on working directly with the demand planning, new business, and the Asset management team to perform statistical and mathematical data analysis to enable the BGS business to meet their organizational goals.





U.S. Government Export Control Status: This position must meet export control compliance requirements. To meet export control compliance requirements, a “U.S. Person” as defined by 22 C.F.R. §120.15 is required. “U.S. Person” includes U.S. Citizen, lawful permanent resident, refugee, or asylee.

US based job, US Person required",3.9,"BOEING
3.9","Mesa, AZ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Position Role:
The Data Scientist plays a critical role on the Data Analytics Platform team – collaborating with Product and internal operations teams to use data insights to advance student literacy and inform decision-making and strategy. Successful candidates in this role will blaze a new trail for Benchmark in the use of advanced Data Analytics with Benchmark’s Adaptive Learning technology. The Data Scientist will also contribute to business strategy and operations by leveraging internal data sets to help Benchmark delivery value more efficiently and effectively to its customers. This role is one of both technical leadership and hands-on execution. Data Scientists will often work directly with stakeholders and software engineers, alike.

Duties and Responsibilities:",3.0,"Benchmark Education Co
3.0","New Rochelle, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"About Us
Title Resources Group – the underwriter built for the real estate industry – is one of the nation’s largest title insurance underwriters, according to the American Land Title Association’s 2022 market share data. A joint venture with Centerbridge Partners, L.P., Anywhere Real Estate Inc., HomeServices of America (a Berkshire Hathaway affiliate), and Opendoor Technologies Inc., TRG serves title insurance agents in 37 states and the District of Columbia. Its financial strength and stability are rated A’ (Unsurpassed) by Demotech, Inc., and B++ (Good) by AM Best Rating Services, and since its inception, the company has consistently operated profitably without a net operating loss in any fiscal year. With a mission to provide knowledgeable and responsive underwriting solutions, TRG is dedicated to growing lifelong relationships and maintaining quality through integrity and financial stability. For more information, please visit www.titleresources.com.",3.0,"Title Resource Group
3.0",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist (Machine Learning Engineering),$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Grow your career internally at Petco, our best talent comes from within!
Name of Employer: Petco Animal Supplies Stores, Inc.
Position Title: Sr. Data Scientist (Machine Learning Engineering)
Position Location: 10850 Via Frontera, San Diego, CA 92127 *Can work remotely*

Summary of Duties: As a member of Enterprise Analytics and Data Science team, lead projects to build company’s Omnichannel experience by working on machine learning models in areas of customer, pricing, inventory, space and assortment to help discover insights that drive customer, operational and product strategy for Stores, eCommerce and Services. Use customer, operational and interaction data to build datasets that can be consumed by various models and reports. Perform data modeling, exploratory data analysis, and feature selection using advanced statistical methods and techniques. Calibrate models to provide interpretable and repeatable outputs by using various metrics like ROC, RMSE, quantile loss, etc. Model output will be consumed by various teams to create best in industry customer experience. Clearly document objective, statistical model, and results.

Master’s degree or equivalent in Statistics, Mathematics, Economics or related field of study and 4 years of combined experience in Data Science and Business Analytics. Employer will accept a Bachelor’s degree or equivalent in Statistics, Mathematics, Economics or related field of study and 8 years of combined progressive experience in Data Science and Business Analytics in lieu of a Master’s degree or equivalent and 4 year of experience.

Applicants must have demonstrated experience with the following:

analysis of large, complex, multi-dimensional data sets with variety of tools; data mining, machine learning and statistical learning techniques; quantitative analysis techniques to include: clustering, regression, pattern recognition, or descriptive and inferential statistics; time series forecasting; design of experiments and hypothesis testing, drive causal conclusions; statistical programming and modeling in R and Python; ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes, relational database (SQL or PL*SQL), and NoSQL database; large scale data processing infrastructures using distributed systems (including Hadoop, Hive, and Spark); providing data visualizations using data visualization tools; cloud-based technology for machine learning model development and deployment using Amazon Web Services (AWS) or Google Cloud Platform (GCP), to include: cloud-based data processing and storage infrastructures (Amazon DynamoDB, Amazon S3); cloud-based machine learning model development using Amazon SageMaker; cloud-based serverless computing service (AWS Lambda); and building and landing data engineering pipelines and workflows using Airflow; Machine Learning model deployment using container orchestration system including Docker and Kubernetes; building and landing machine learning models as web application using Flask Python; building machine learning models using TensorFlow or PyTorch; distributed version control system using Git or GitLab; mathematical optimization, decision analysis, and linear and nonlinear programming; communicating and presenting results of data analyses; and partnering and collaborating with cross-functional teams such as Marketing, Engineering, User Research, and Product.

Individuals interested in applying for the position may email a resume with Job #YC-0929 to valerie.giroux@petco.com.

The pay range(s) below are provided in compliance with state specific laws. Pay ranges may be different in other locations.
$151,736 - $178,900/year. Exact rate of pay will be based on position, location, and experience level.

Petco Animal Supplies, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, age, protected veteran status, or any other protected classification.",3.0,"Petco
3.0","San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Junior Data Engineer,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Overview
Technomics is a growing employee-owned, decision analytics company that specializes in cost and economic analysis to facilitate better decisions faster. We enable a wide range of clients across the Federal government, from senior level policy makers to program managers, to choose smartly, buy effectively and operate efficiently. We deliver practical, credible and defensible results offering actionable insights by applying data-driven and analytics-based approaches in combination with multidisciplinary talent, subject matter experts, and tangible and repeatable assets in the form of databases, models, approaches and techniques.
Our data engineers have the knowledge, skills, and initiative to deliver timely and innovative data management solutions to our clients. You will function as part of high-performing project team that is responsible for ensuring that organizations throughout the federal government are able to leverage their data to improve both their day-to-day operations and decision-making power. Our data engineers are responsible for shaping the future of analytics for your clients by identifying new data sources, modeling techniques, and ways of leveraging that data.",4.5,"Technomics
4.5","Arlington, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Greetings
I am seeking for technical consultant like you or someone in your network who may be interested in the opportunity below.
I am currently seeking to fill Senior Data Scientist Consultant for one of our direct client and this position is (HYBRID) model role located in Washington, DC Metro Area, /Vienna, VA, Winchester, VA. Consultant Support Proven experience in data analysis and ability to write queries and visualize data and Expert level experience in Splunk, Power BI, and SQL/SSRS.
If you are a team player that is eager to support a growing organization while contributing to company success, apply today!",-1,SMK Soft Inc,"Vienna, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Williams Consulting, LLC (WCLLC) is seeking a Data Scientist to join our growing team onsite at our Atlanta, GA office. Office hours are Monday-Friday 8:30 am - 5:00 pm. This position is contingent upon award.

Williams Consulting, LLC is an 8(a), HUBZone, Woman-Owned Small Business, and Economically Disadvantaged Woman-Owned Small Business with Federal, State, local, and commercial clients. We take immense pride in our ability to provide exceptional client service, and we value our employees and recognize their contributions to the success of our clients and our company. We offer competitive salaries and support flexible work locations and scheduling, when possible. Our benefits include Medical, Vision, and Dental, Life Insurance, AD&D, Short- & Long-Term Disability Insurance, PTO, and 401k plan with % employer match.",2.4,"Williams Consulting LLC
2.4","Atlanta, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Why be with company?
We all know what a great neighborhood feels like. The sad reality is that every day, our neighborhoods are losing their character, authenticity, and sense of community. From Main Streets to Manhattan, our beloved local businesses are being pushed out at unprecedented rates, replaced with corporate brands or empty storefronts. America is losing its small business backbone—its diversity, energy, and competitive edge.
withco empowers small businesses to become property owners so that they obtain the control, wealth, and permanence only afforded through ownership. We've raised $30M+ from the world's best investors, including Founders Fund, Canaan Partners, Initialized Capital, NFX, and celebrities like Venus Williams and Kevin Durant. Join our mission to make it exciting to be a small business owner in America again!",-1,withco,"New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Title: Data Scientist
Location: Morton, IL
Duration: 12+ Months
Open for C2C as well
Job Description:
The Machine Data Insights team within Machine Analytics is seeking a talented and motivated Data Scientist to develop analyses that support product development analytics, aftermarket analytics, demand forecasting analytics, and other strategic analytics areas of focus. Our team’s mission is to understand our customers where their work gets done. Our analyses reveal machine usage insights that help our customers work safer and more productively and help our enterprise understand the market trends that shape our future business. This role will require a skillset in advanced statistical modeling and machine learning techniques as well as domain knowledge of industrial equipment.",5.0,"DSMH LLC
5.0","Morton, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Lead Data Scientist, Corporate Vice President",$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Inclusively is partnering with a life insurance company to hire a Lead Data Scientist, Corporate Vice President.
ABOUT INCLUSIVELY:
Inclusively is a digital tech platform that connects candidates with disabilities, who may benefit from workplace accommodations, to inclusive employers. This includes all disabilities under the ADA, including mental health conditions (e.g. anxiety, depression, PTSD), chronic illnesses (e.g. diabetes, Long COVID), and neurodivergence (e.g. autism, ADHD). Applicants with one or more of these conditions are encouraged to apply; Inclusively does not require applicants to disclose their specific disability.
Responsibilities",5.0,"Inclusively
5.0","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist/Senior Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Company
Federal Reserve Bank of Minneapolis
The Federal Reserve Bank of Minneapolis has an exciting opportunity for individuals with data science experience. The successful candidate will become a part of the Production Function within the National Stress Testing Program. The individual will work with complex datasets, a variety of statistical modeling techniques, and several programming languages. The individual will collaborate locally with other members of the Minneapolis team as well as nationally with colleagues across the Federal Reserve System. The individual will utilize R and Python to implement models for annual Dodd-Frank Act stress tests, develop automated analytics, and support policy makers with ad hoc analysis. The individual will interact with senior leaders across the Federal Reserve System. Candidates with significant relevant experience will be considered for a senior role.
Responsibilities Include:

Full time
Regular
Yes
Bank Examination
First (United States of America)",3.9,"Federal Reserve Bank of Minneapolis
3.9","Minneapolis, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Clinical Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Abbott is a global healthcare leader that helps people live more fully at all stages of life. Our portfolio of life-changing technologies spans the spectrum of healthcare, with leading businesses and products in diagnostics, medical devices, nutritionals and branded generic medicines. Our 115,000 colleagues serve people in more than 160 countries.
Job Title
Principal Clinical Data Scientist
About Abbott
Abbott is a global healthcare leader, creating breakthrough science to improve people’s health. We’re always looking towards the future, anticipating changes in medical science and technology.",3.8,"Abbott Laboratories
3.8","Pleasanton, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"NCQA is hiring! We are bringing depth to our research and analysis group, and we are looking for Data Scientist who are interested in health care and health policy to add to our growing organization. The qualified candidate will conduct data analysis for various internal and external NCQA projects and using the analysis to interpret patterns of health care quality and potential health policy recommendations. The qualified candidate will derive satisfaction and joy from translating large amounts of meta data into summaries, be naturally curious and invested in data or statistical methods and have a strong communicative and collaborative interests.
Present analytic results orally, develop PowerPoint presentations, and other documents in writing for internal and external customers, incorporating descriptions of methods, relevant literature, and other background material to provide context for the results.",3.6,"National Committee for Quality Assurance
3.6","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Barbaricum is a rapidly growing government contractor providing leading-edge support to federal customers, with a particular focus on Defense and National Security mission sets. We leverage more than 15 years of support to stakeholders across the federal government, with established and growing capabilities across Intelligence, Analytics, Engineering, Mission Support, and Communications disciplines. Founded in 2008, our mission is to transform the way our customers approach constantly changing and complex problem sets by bringing to bear the latest in technology and the highest caliber of talent.

Headquartered in Washington, DC's historic Dupont Circle neighborhood, Barbaricum also has a corporate presence in Tampa, FL and Dayton, OH, with team members across the United States and around the world. As a leader in our space, we partner with firms in the private sector, academic institutions, and industry associations with a goal of continually building our expertise and capabilities for the benefit of our employees and the customers we support. Through all of this, we have built a vibrant corporate culture diverse in expertise and perspectives with a focus on collaboration and innovation. Our teams are at the frontier of the Nation's most complex and rewarding challenges. Join us.",4.0,"Barbaricum
4.0",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Enterprise Knowledge (EK) is hiring for a Data Scientist to join our growing Advanced Data Practice. This individual will be responsible for designing cutting-edge data discovery, integration, and data governance solutions for a wide range of organizations around the world. EK was recognized on KMWorld's list of leaders in Artificial Intelligence, the AI 100: The Companies Empowering Intelligent Knowledge Management.
The Data Scientist will be part of a team working on cutting-edge projects and developing orchestrated data solutions to integrate and transform source data for Artificial Intelligence (AI) solutions. This individual will be able to quickly learn new technologies and apply them to business challenges at large corporations, organizations and federal agencies.The right candidate will have a passion for working with diverse data types and applying new methods and approaches to data challenges with a strategic mindset to advise clients on AI transformations.",3.9,"Enterprise Knowledge LLC
3.9","Arlington, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Engineer,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Data Engineer
Onsite Location: Tampa, Florida
Clearance: TS/SCI
Data Driven. People Centered.
Elder Research Inc. is a Data Science consulting firm specialized in providing analytic solutions to clients in Commercial and Government industries. Providing analytic solutions to hundreds of companies across numerous industries, our team enjoys a great variety in the type of work they do and exposure to a wide range of techniques and tools.",4.5,"Elder Research Inc
4.5","Arlington, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Associate Data Scientist / Data Scientist,$112K - $218K (Employer est.),"Day Zero Diagnostics (DZD) is an exciting startup revolutionizing infectious disease diagnostics by leveraging cutting-edge sample prep technologies, whole genome sequencing and machine learning. We are building the next generation of IVDs, able to perform comprehensive bacterial species ID and antimicrobial resistance and susceptibility (AMR/S) profiling in less than 8 hours of sample receipt, without the need for culture.
Our first application is for Sepsis. Sepsis is responsible for about a third of hospital deaths and costs hospitals in the US about $24B annually. Using the current culture-based approach for pathogen ID and AST that takes 2-5 days and has a 40% failure rate, patients with Sepsis are treated with broad-spectrum antibiotics, leading to significant toxicity, higher rates of organ injury, increased risk of C. difficile infection, and contributing to the growth of the antibiotic resistance problem, globally.",4.4,"Day Zero Diagnostics
4.4","Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist.,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"Description
In this role, you will serve as the technical leader with a highdegree of knowledge in the area of information technology in the health caresettings. This technical leader will: * exercise your expertise in the principles of software development, machinelearning methodologies, integration of data driven assets into clinicalapplications, enterprise level development and operational platforms, and otherrelated technical activities in analytics and informatics * utilize your advanceunderstanding of clinical workflows, medical terminologies, business processesand other core concepts in healthcare information technology * support the organization’squality improvement initiatives by leading projects which require thoroughplanning, architecture design, complex code development, collaboration withproject team members as well as business sponsors and stakeholders, developmentof business process artifacts, providing user training, development of testingand data quality assurance plans, execution of project plans, andoperationalization of analytics assets, e.g. advanced analysis and/or machinelearning predictive models In summary,this position will participate in transforming UCLA Health by analyzing,designing, implementing, and evaluating information and communication systemsthat enhance individual and population health outcomes, improve patient care,and strengthen the clinician-patient relationship.",3.8,"UCLA Health
3.8","Los Angeles, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Engineer - AI/ML/Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"Dallas,Texas
6-8 Years
Full Time
Roles and Responsibilities
Design and develop AI models and algorithms using machine learning techniques and tools, with a focus on NLP.
Work with large datasets, including cleaning, preprocessing, and transforming data to ensure its quality and relevance.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to identify and understand business requirements, use cases, and project objectives.
Implement and integrate machine learning models into production systems and workflows, and optimize their performance.",4.5,"Fission Labs
4.5","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
SENIOR DATA SCIENTIST,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"EXAM NUMBER
E1764A

TYPE OF RECRUITMENT
Open Competitive Job Opportunity

FILING PERIOD
Applications will be accepted starting Friday, September 01, 2023, 9:00 a.m., (PT) through Thursday, September 14, 2023, before 5:00 p.m., (PT).

Get ready to join one of the nation's largest county employers! Recognized by Forbes as one of America's Best Large Employers, the County of Los Angeles offers broad career growth, outstanding benefits, and competitive salaries. We are the largest employer in Southern California, with opportunities for you to make a difference in the lives of over 10 million residents.

At the Registrar-Recorder/County Clerk, it is our mission to serve Los Angeles County by providing essential records management and election services in a fair, accessible, and transparent manner. We are providing you with an amazing opportunity to join our organization of professionals committed to serving our employees, the public, and community. We seek to achieve accountability, professionalism, integrity, respect, and equity.

No experience will be accepted",3.5,"Los Angeles County Department of Human Resources
3.5","Los Angeles, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"Data Scientist

Position Description
CGI is looking for an aspiring Data Scientist who can join in our Applied Intelligence Solutions sector. The candidate will be responsible for designing & developing data ingestion and data transformation framework for our AI product platform. The candidate will also be providing statistical trend analysis on large structured and unstructured data sets and analysis of advanced algorithms including artificial intelligence concepts. The member will work to understand high value opportunities and be a part of the product development team.

Your future duties and responsibilities
Serve as an expert in translating complex data into key strategy insights and valuable actions.

CANDIDATES MUST BE WILLING TO WORK EASTERN TIME ZONE HOURS

Required qualifications to be successful in this role
o Experience working with ML libraries such as Scikit-learn, Spark, Pandas/NumPyTensorflow, Keras, or PyTorch
Graduation from a four-year college or university with a degree in statistics, physics, mathematics, engineering, computer science, or management of information systems

Skill Set Years of Experience Proficiency Level

Programming - Python, R 5+ 4

ML 7+ 4

Data Science 7+ 4

Cloud Platforms (Azure) 3+ 3


At CGI we call our professionals ""members"" to reinforce that all who join our team are, as owners, empowered to participate in the challenges and rewards that come from building a world-class company. CGI's benefits include:

Competitive base salaries
Eligibility to participate in an attractive Share Purchase Plan (SPP) in which the company matches dollar-for-dollar contributions made by eligible employees, up to a maximum, for their job category
401(k) Plan and Profit Participation for eligible members
Generous holidays, vacation, and sick leave plans
Comprehensive insurance plans that include, among other benefits, medical, dental, vision, life, disability, out-of-county emergency coverage in all countries of employment;
Back-up child care, Pet insurance, a Member Assistance Program, a 529 college savings program, a personal financial management tool, lifestyle management programs and more.



While technology is at the heart of our clients' digital transformation, we understand that people are at the heart of business success.

When you join CGI, you become a trusted advisor, collaborating with colleagues and clients to bring forward actionable insights that deliver meaningful and sustainable outcomes. We call our employees ""members"" because they are CGI shareholders and owners and owners who enjoy working and growing together to build a company we are proud of. This has been our Dream since 1976, and it has brought us to where we are today - one of the world's largest independent providers of IT and business consulting services.

At CGI, we recognize the richness that diversity brings. We strive to create a work culture where all belong and collaborate with clients in building more inclusive communities. As an equal-opportunity employer, we want to empower all our members to succeed and grow. If you require an accommodation at any point during the recruitment process, please let us know. We will be happy to assist.

Ready to become part of our success story? Join CGI - where your ideas and actions make a difference.

Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, ethnicity, ancestry, color, sex, religion, creed, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, pregnancy, medical condition, military and veteran status, marital status, sexual orientation or perceived sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, and gender expression, familial status, political affiliation, genetic information, or any other legally protected status or characteristics.

CGI provides reasonable accommodations to qualified individuals with disabilities. If you need an accommodation to apply for a job in the U.S., please email the CGI U.S. Employment Compliance mailbox at US_Employment_Compliance@cgi.com . You will need to reference the requisition number of the position in which you are interested. Your message will be routed to the appropriate recruiter who will assist you. .

We make it easy to translate military experience and skills! Click here to be directed to our site that is dedicated to veterans and transitioning service members.

All CGI offers of employment in the U.S. are contingent upon the ability to successfully complete a background investigation. Background investigation components can vary dependent upon specific assignment and/or level of US government security clearance held. CGI will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrests and conviction records in accordance with all local regulations and ordinances.

CGI will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with CGI's legal duty to furnish information.",3.9,"CGI Group, Inc.
3.9","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Engineer/Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"Qualifications:
Skills associated with being a data engineer/data scientist Must be well versed in data manipulation, data organization, and process improvement

Must have extensive knowledge of Tableau, creating metrics reports, and creating dashboards with proper data visualization

Must be proficient in Python, R, Spark and/or Power Bi Some experience using Git, GitHub and GitLab for code repository

Some knowledge of Hadoop and connecting/setting up live Tableau dashboards Some knowledge of AI/Machine Learning

Some knowledge of RPA and how to automate processes, including automation of existing dashboard and reporting processes

Some knowledge of agile working processes, Scrumban and product management processes


Contractor would be responsible for accomplishing the following objectives:

Review and validate the current process, data management practices and data organization to ensure data is appropriately obtained, combined and protected within data repositories, published dashboards and reporting processes

Automate the process where possible – suggest using Python and/or Tableau but are open to other tools as long as they are consistent with tools used in the FR; many data sources and/or data refresh processes are manual – looking to reduce the level of manual intervention to support analytic solutions

Refine and modernize the current reports by creating a new look and feel that is sustainable and allows for the expansion of customers to be reported on.

The idea is to utilize productivity gains from automation to offset the expansion of customer base and ability to use dashboards are the main reporting tool for our users

Create documentation that describes the new processes end-to-end

Create user access processes to support expansion of customer base, and ensure data is appropriately secured and accessible only by those who have a business need to the data

Contractor must be able to work in small teams and be comfortable with knowledge sharing Risks Existing data sources are moving to new solutions which may impact the existing data collection, analysis and reporting processes.

These processes will need to be updated as new solutions are implemented, and we will need to ensure updates enable automation as much as possible to further support expansion of analytic capabilities.",3.9,"Ampcus Incorporated
3.9","Richmond, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist 2,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"Current Employees:
If you are a current Staff, Faculty or Temporary employee at the University of Miami, please click here to log in to Workday to use the internal application process. To learn how to apply for a faculty or staff position using the Career worklet, please review this tip sheet .
The department of Neurology has an exciting opportunity for a Full Time Data Scientist 2 to work at UHealth Boca Raton. The Data Scientist 2 is a subject matter expert at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization, using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. In addition, the Data Scientist 2 uses a variety of data mining and analysis methods, using a range of data tools, building and implementing models, using and creating algorithms and creating and running simulations. Moreover, the Data Scientist 2 provides recommendations to drive business results with data-based insights and influences a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams.
Full time
Staff
r8",3.9,"University of Miami
3.9","Boca Raton, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist (Remote),$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"Data Scientist (Remote)
Are you an experienced Data Scientist looking for a new challenge?
Do you value care management and quality improvement?
Are you motivated, energetic, and excited to become part of the Acentra Health team?
If so, you might be our next new team member!
Who we need:
The Data Scientist is responsible for leveraging analytical skills, statistical knowledge, and machine learning expertise to derive meaningful insights from complex health-related datasets. Collaborate with cross-functional teams and contribute to the development of data-driven solutions aimed at improving healthcare outcomes and decision-making processes.
Acentra Health is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran",3.1,"Acentra Health
3.1","Cary, NC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Senior Data Scientist, Ads Fraud Protection",$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"The opportunity
At Unity, our Trust & Safety team plays a crucial role in fostering developer confidence in Unity's Network. We prioritize providing safe access to supply and demand along with insights and controls in a privacy-focused world.
As our new Senior Data Scientist in our Ads Fraud Protection team, you will be partnering closely with the Trust & Safety department, which focuses on safeguarding our advertisers from invalid activities and ensuring the integrity of the supply. You will collaborate with our engineering and product teams to analyze data and build reliable, accurate, and scalable Machine Learning models that detect fraudulent traffic among games and developers. With an emerging set of products, evolving problems, and an enthusiastic team committed to growth, you will have the opportunity to drive positive change at various levels within the organization and influence the technical direction and team culture.",3.4,"Unity Technologies
3.4","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Bioinformatics Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Summary:
Zel Tech is seeking a highly qualified Bioinformatics Data Scientist that will provide SME support to our government customer in Charlottesville, Virginia or Melbourne, Florida.
Responsibilities:
The Bioinformatics Data Scientist shall aide in the following areas:
Provides direct support for bioinformatics, regex queries, developing and searching key words and biological ontologies.
Focused data discovery and retrieval from given datasets.",3.8,"Zel Technologies
3.8","Melbourne, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Senior Data Scientist, L'Oréal Research & Innovation",$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Title Senior Data Scientist
Division: Research & Innovation
Location: Clark, NJ
Reports To: VP, NA Digital Transformation IT
Who We Are:
For more than a century, L’Oréal has devoted its energy, innovation, and scientific excellence solely to one business: Beauty. Our goal is to offer each and every person around the world the best of beauty in terms of quality, efficacy, safety, sincerity and responsibility to satisfy all beauty needs and desires in their infinite diversity.",4.0,"L'Oreal
4.0","Clark, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Staff Software Engineer | Machine Learning,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"Position Summary...

What you'll do...

Walmart Global Tech is looking to hire a Staff Software Engineer - Machine Learning for one of our offices in US. The Staff Software Engineer (ML) in Applied AI team will drive AI discovery, research, algorithmic solution design, selection of practical data and modeling platforms, transformation of data strategies, and rapid prototyping targeted to deliver important activations within Walmart US .

This role will be focused on elevating ML/AI capabilities for operational and execution decision engines with alignment to unified associate signals and workload optimization. You will be responsible for high level ML/AI conceptualization, feature engineering, evaluation of ML/AI models and frameworks, development and experimentation, and pilot testing and iterative model refinement. You will work collaboratively with Product and Tech teams to productionize and scale ML/AI solutions and establish model monitoring and management processes. The will play a pivotal role in deciding how do we develop ML/AI algorithms, at scale, that are linked to strategic business choices.


Our team works closely with our US stores and eCommerce business to better serve customers by empowering team members, stores, and merchants with technological innovation. From groceries and entertainment to sporting goods and crafts, Walmart U.S. offers an extensive selection that our customers value, whether they shop online at Walmart.com, through one of our mobile apps, or in-store. Focus areas include customers, stores and employees, in-store service, merchant tools, merchant data science, and search and personalization.






Imagine working in an environment where one line of code can make life easier for hundreds of millions of people. That's what we do at Walmart Global Tech. We're a team of software engineers, data scientists, cybersecurity expert's and service professionals within the world's leading retailer who make an epic impact and are at the forefront of the next retail disruption. People are why we innovate, and people power our innovations. We are people-led and tech-empowered. We train our team in the skillsets of the future and bring in experts like you to help us grow. We have roles for those chasing their first opportunity as well as those looking for the opportunity that will define their career. Here, you can kickstart a great career in tech, gain new skills and experience for virtually every industry, or leverage your expertise to innovate at scale, impact millions and reimagine the future of retail.


We use a hybrid way of working that is primarily in office coupled with virtual when not onsite. Our campuses serve as a hub to enhance collaboration, bring us together for purpose and deliver on business needs. This approach helps us make quicker decisions, remove location barriers across our global team and be more flexible in our personal lives.


Benefits: Beyond our great compensation package, you can receive incentive awards for your performance. Other great perks include 401(k) match, stock purchase plan, paid maternity and parental leave, PTO, multiple health plans, and much more.


Walmart, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer - By Choice. We believe we are best equipped to help our associates, customers and the communities we serve live better when we really know them. That means understanding, respecting and valuing diversity- unique styles, experiences, identities, ideas and opinions - while being inclusive of all people.

The above information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed in the role. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all responsibilities and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. The full Job Description can be made available as part of the hiring process.

At Walmart, we offer competitive pay as well as performance-based incentive awards and other great benefits for a happier mind, body, and wallet. Health benefits include medical, vision and dental coverage. Financial benefits include 401(k), stock purchase and company-paid life insurance. Paid time off benefits include PTO (including sick leave), parental leave, family care leave, bereavement, jury duty, and voting. Other benefits include short-term and long-term disability, company discounts, Military Leave Pay, adoption and surrogacy expense reimbursement, and more.

You will also receive PTO and/or PPTO that can be used for vacation, sick leave, holidays, or other purposes. The amount you receive depends on your job classification and length of employment. It will meet or exceed the requirements of paid sick leave laws, where applicable. For information about PTO, see https://one.walmart.com/notices .

Live Better U is a Walmart-paid education benefit program for full-time and part-time associates in Walmart and Sam's Club facilities. Programs range from high school completion to bachelor's degrees, including English Language Learning and short-form certificates. Tuition, books, and fees are completely paid for by Walmart.

Eligibility requirements apply to some benefits and may depend on your job classification and length of employment. Benefits are subject to change and may be subject to a specific plan or program terms. For information about benefits and eligibility, see One.Walmart at https://bit.ly/3iOOb1J .

The annual salary range for this position is $144,000.00-$216,000.00

Additional compensation includes annual or quarterly performance incentives.

Additional compensation for certain positions may also include:





Outlined below are the required minimum qualifications for this position. If none are listed, there are no minimum qualifications.

Option 1: Bachelor's degree in computer science, computer engineering, computer information systems, software engineering, or related area and 4 years' experience in software engineering or related area.Option 2: 6 years' experience in software engineering or related area.



Outlined below are the optional preferred qualifications for this position. If none are listed, there are no preferred qualifications.

Master's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Computer Information Systems, Software Engineering, or related area and 2 years' experience in software engineering or related area


640 W California Avenue, Sunnyvale, CA 94086-4828, United States of America",3.4,"Walmart
3.4","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Decision Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"JOB DESCRIPTION

JPMorgan Chase & Co. has expanded its consumer business and we have launched a new digital retail bank in the UK. We are offering consumers a completely new banking experience. Under the Chase brand, the bank provides products and features tailored to meet the needs of customers in the UK, made available via an innovative mobile app.
Our team is at the heart of building this new venture, focused on developing offerings that put the customer at the center. We have created a new organization and we are looking for solution-oriented, commercially minded, customer-focused engineers, used to working in a true agile environment who want to be a part of something new, built from the ground up as a green-field with zero legacy initiative within a global, diverse and inclusive team.






Our professionals in our Corporate Functions cover a diverse range of areas from finance and risk to human resources and marketing. Our corporate teams are an essential part of our company, ensuring that we’re setting our businesses, clients, customers and employees up for success.",4.0,"JPMorgan Chase & Co
4.0","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Lead, Data Science",$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"At AES, we raise the quality of life around the world by changing the way energy works. Everyone makes an impact every day in our small, global teams. Apply here to start an extraordinary career today.
Position Summary
The AES US Utilities & Conventional Generation is looking for a Lead Data Scientist to join our growing team of data wranglers that will help us uncover insights and drive key business decisions by using data analytics and artificial intelligence. The Lead Data Scientists will guide the Data Science Team to use data to find patterns, build algorithms, and generally help AES’ business leaders make more inquisitive decisions to deliver better products and solutions. The analytics will also serve as the foundation for machine learning use cases across several business applications.
The primary use cases will be in applying data mining techniques, performing statistical analysis to improve asset reliability across our green generation portfolio, make our energy grids more resilient and able to cope with tomorrows renewables demands, and drive operational efficiencies for our US Utilities and conventional generation teams.
AES is an Equal Opportunity Employer who is committed to building strength and delivering long-term sustainability through diversity and inclusion. Respecting all backgrounds, differences and perspectives enables us to improve the lives of our people, customers, suppliers, contractors, and the communities in which we live and work. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity and/or expression, race, national origin, ethnicity, age, religion, marital status, physical or mental disability, pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical condition, military or veteran status, or any other characteristic protected under applicable law. E-Verify Notice: AES will provide the Social Security Administration (SSA) and if necessary, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) with information from each new employee's I-9 to confirm work authorization.",4.2,"The AES Corporation
4.2","Indianapolis, IN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"Data Scientist
Reston, Virginia · Government/Military
Data Scientist
Full-time, W2 only
U.S. Veterans preferred
On premise at Government facility
Requires TS/SCI, Full Scope Poly (must have already and be current, no exceptions)

Immediate hire

General Work Environment and Requirements
The customer applies technical resources to accelerate the timely, reliable, and secure delivery of open source data, information, and insights. Position requires developer support developing tailored solutions to tackle unique global collection problems. The work may be performed independently or within a team environment depending on the specific problem statement. Work will include developing Amazon Web Services (AWS)-based resources and the Sponsor needs skills spanning many compute, storage, and networking services.",5.0,"The Metamorphosis Group, Inc.
5.0","McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Lead Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"Join Skillz and Level Up Your Career!
Are you ready to take your career to the next level? Join Skillz, the first publicly-traded mobile esports platform that hosts billions of casual mobile gaming tournaments for millions of players worldwide. Skillz is revolutionizing the gaming industry, providing the ultimate platform for competitive mobile games. By fostering social competition within games, Skillz empowers developers to create multi-million dollar franchises while connecting players through fair, enjoyable, and meaningful competition.
At Skillz, we firmly believe that everyone is born with unique skills and deserves to experience an epic win. We understand the thrill of achievement and the satisfaction of overcoming challenges. That's why we passionately champion game developers and players alike, empowering them to unleash their full potential through the power of competition.",2.8,"Skillz Inc.
2.8","Las Vegas, NV",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"The Data Science team develops and deploys analytic solutions to equip stakeholders with data-based insights empowering them to effectively measure performance, establish improvement goals, comprehend relationships between variables, predict outcomes and make strategic decisions. The Sr. Data Scientist will be involved in all steps of the process including data gathering, cleaning, validation, analysis, modeling, visualization, and presentation - and will often be responsible for directing the technical work of others on the team as well as in other functions in the department or division. The Sr. Data Scientist acts as the primary expert for two or more technically advanced solutions as described in the responsibilities section below.
This is a remote position with occasional on-site meetings (Texas residency required).

Responsibilities:
Design workflow for and guide information systems experts to identify data sources, gather and validate necessary data. Work closely with senior operational and/or clinical experts to ensure that complex data content is complete, accurate and relevant. Intermediate knowledge related to database management is required. Intermediate proficiency in SQL or other data gathering technology and familiarity with Big Data concepts is strongly preferred. Introductory experience with Microsoft Visual Studio and SQL Server Management Studio is preferred.
Guide others and/or perform complex statistical analyses of data sets to identify performance status, trends over time and key drivers. Advanced knowledge of descriptive and inferential statistics with demonstrated proficiency in sampling theory, forecasting, regression, non-normal distributions and hypothesis testing is required. Advanced proficiency in a statistical software package (Minitab, JMP, Stata, QI Macros, Alteryx, SAS Enterprise Miner, etc.) is required.
Create, present and publish elegant graphical representations of analyses and key findings and their impact to strategic business indicators to a wide variety of stakeholders. Advanced proficiency in PowerPoint and a data visualization software package (Microstrategy, Power BI, SAS VA or Tableau) is required White paper or research paper publication experience strongly preferred. Public speaking experience required. Knowledge of basic color theory is preferred.
Participate in or lead quality/process improvement initiatives or other strategic programs as the voice of the data ensuring that data limitations, interpretation and insights are accurately comprehended by stakeholders and decision makers. Topics may include clinical, operational and/or financial domains. Familiarity with Lean Six Sigma and healthcare operations is strongly preferred. Financial acumen including ability to read and interpret financial statements is preferred.
Based on team and organizational needs, continuously develop advanced Data Science skills in one or more areas of data wrangling, statistical analysis, visualization and communications, artificial intelligence, machine learning, big data, etc.. Demonstrated ability to research and self-teach both technical and soft skills is required.
Act as the team's resident expert in two or more technically advanced analytic solutions such as GIS data mapping, complex visualization, process simulation, predictive modeling, machine learning, natural language processing, program evaluation and other specialties. Intermediate proficiency in programming languages such as R or Python (or similar) is required.
Guide the activities of junior team members. Mentor other peers in area of specialty to support their development. Teach statistical concepts and methods to various stakeholders as needed. Formal peer training experience required.
Work Experience
10+ years in data wrangling, analysis, visualization and advanced techniques (per above) required
Education
Four-year Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience Computer Science, Engineering (all types), Mathematics, Statistics, and Economics. Candidates with other STEM degrees such as core sciences (Physics, Chemistry, etc.) could be considered Required
Graduate or professional work or advanced degree; or equivalent experience Preferred
Licenses and Certifications

Machine Learning and/or Artificial Intelligence (or equivalent) Preferred
Lean Six Sigma Black Belt Preferred
SAS Enterprise Guide, Enterprise Miner, Visual Analytics, Developer, Predictive Modeling Preferred
About Us
Children’s Health values the role each member of our team plays in helping us make life better for children. We employ more than 7,500 people and provide rewarding career opportunities that help them reach their highest potential.
We also hold Magnet recognition from the American Nurses Credentialing Center for nursing excellence, we serve as the primary pediatric teaching facility for the University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center , and we are widely recognized for delivering high quality care .
Children’s Health has also been named one of the 150 Top Places to Work in Healthcare by Becker’s Healthcare for nine consecutive years. We invite you to learn more about Children’s Health.
Benefits

Children’s Health offers competitive pay, a comprehensive benefits program and opportunities for learning and career development. We promote a diverse and inclusive workplace, and our team members have a voice in their work through surveys and town halls.",4.2,"Children's Health
4.2","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"At Trella Health, we are passionate and committed to our mission – empowering meaningful change in healthcare. Since our founding in 2015, we continue to grow our team, enhance our solution and services offerings, accelerate into new markets, and expand our customer base. We are rapidly growing and are looking for new Trellavators to join our team!
""What is a Trellavator?"" you ask. Innovate and elevate is the name of our game! We go above and beyond to collaborate with and support each other – we believe that when a colleague or customers succeeds, we succeed. By learning from others, building on our successes, and taking risks, we constantly raise the bar – continuous improvement is in our DNA. Our word is paramount, we keep our commitments, and we always follow through. We have a strong, reliable support system that fuels growth, collaboration, and passion – and together, we create a positive environment where everyone at Trella Health, including the customers we support, can thrive. Are you ready to learn more about the opportunities with our team? Trell-yeah you are!",4.8,"Trella Health
4.8",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"Comcast brings together the best in media and technology. We drive innovation to create the world's best entertainment and online experiences. As a Fortune 50 leader, we set the pace in a variety of innovative and fascinating businesses and create career opportunities across a wide range of locations and disciplines. We are at the forefront of change and move at an amazing pace, thanks to our remarkable people, who bring cutting-edge products and services to life for millions of customers every day. If you share in our passion for teamwork, our vision to revolutionize industries and our goal to lead the future in media and technology, we want you to fast-forward your career at Comcast.

Job Summary
Job Description Summary Strategic Analytics is a fast-growing team that provides deep insights and advanced analytics to senior leaders across Comcast Cable. As internal consultants, we support the strategic decisions that drive Comcast’s growth, improve its products, and improve its customers’ experiences. Our team is looking for a hands-on analyst who can leverage Comcast’s abundant data assets to become a trusted partner for our business leaders and solve their most complex problems. Responsible for leveraging internal and external data to provide insights and information which supports a facts-based decision making process. Provides input into strategy, analysis methods, and tool selection. Has in-depth experience, knowledge and skills in own discipline. Usually determines own work priorities. Acts as resource for colleagues with less experience.",3.8,"Comcast
3.8","Philadelphia, PA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"McKesson is an impact-driven, Fortune 10 company that touches virtually every aspect of healthcare. We are known for delivering insights, products, and services that make quality care more accessible and affordable. Here, we focus on the health, happiness, and well-being of you and those we serve - we care. What you do at McKesson matters. We foster a culture where you can grow, make an impact, and are empowered to bring new ideas. Together, we thrive as we shape the future of health for patients, our communities, and our people. If you want to be part of tomorrow's health today, we want to hear from you.

We are seeking an experienced Data Scientist to develop and implement innovative, data-driven solutions for our McKesson Medical Surgical business. The successful candidate will have a strong background in statistics, machine learning techniques and analytic solution development for marketing and sales applications.





: 3+ years in data science, with a track record of delivering innovative data-driven solutions.

: BS or BA in computer science, statistics, mathematics, or a related field. Advanced degree preferred.



At McKesson, we care about the well-being of the patients and communities we serve, and that starts with caring for our people. That's why we have a Total Rewards package that includes comprehensive benefits to support physical, mental, and financial well-being. Our Total Rewards offerings serve the different needs of our diverse employee population and ensure they are the healthiest versions of themselves. For more information regarding benefits at McKesson, please click here.

As part of Total Rewards, we are proud to offer a competitive compensation package at McKesson. This is determined by several factors, including performance, experience and skills, equity, regular job market evaluations, and geographical markets. In addition to base pay, other compensation, such as an annual bonus or long-term incentive opportunities may be offered.



$101,300 - $168,900



All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.Qualified applicants will not be disqualified from consideration for employment based upon criminal history.

McKesson is committed to being an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer and offers opportunities to all job seekers including job seekers with disabilities. If you need a reasonable accommodation to assist with your job search or application for employment, please contact us by sending an email to Disability_Accommodation@McKesson.com. Resumes or CVs submitted to this email box will not be accepted.

Current employees must apply through the internal career site.",3.8,"McKesson
3.8","Richmond, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"This is a remote role*

Adela Summary:
Adela’s mission is to develop innovative and accessible technologies that harness biology and change the way we diagnose and treat disease. ‍ Adela’s genome-wide methylation enrichment technology was originally developed by Chief Scientific Officer Dr. Daniel De Carvalho, PhD, at University Health Network’s Princess Margaret Cancer Centre. ‍ Adela is initially planning to develop the technology for use across the entire cancer continuum—for detection, diagnosis and management of disease.",-1,"Adela, Inc.","New Haven, CT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"About Alethea
Founded in 2019, Alethea is a tech company that detects and mitigates instances of disinformation and social media manipulation to help clients navigate the new digital reality. We protect clients from the threat of disinformation that targets brands, reputations, employee safety, or financial bottom lines through our industry-leading investigation and remediation services.
Position Summary
Reporting to the Head of Data Science, Alethea is seeking a Principal Data Scientist to take a leadership position within our Data Science and Machine Learning team. The team works closely with our Analysis and Engineering teams to derive insights from a diverse set of data sources and to develop machine learning solutions for detecting and mitigating online disinformation and manipulation. As a data scientist, you will lead efforts in creating models, tools, and frameworks that help identify instances of online disinformation and the actors behind them. You will help scale our machine learning infrastructure and data pipelines and enable our customers to make better data-driven decisions. You must be deeply technical, having extensive experience developing and deploying state-of-the-art machine learning models while balancing trade-offs between timeliness, resource consumption, and performance. This position has high visibility and will have a significant impact on the company's success.",5.0,"Alethea
5.0","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Lead Data Scientist - Engagement & Customer Experience Analytics - Corporate Investment Banking,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"JOB DESCRIPTION

Job Summary:

The Marketing and Communications Analytics Team leverages data and analytics across the firm to build meaningful insights for our marketers, which provides value to our clients and enhances dynamic advantages for our businesses. We have a strong partnership with our dedicated technology partners, who provide us with our cutting-edge data and analytics infrastructure.
The successful candidate will have the opportunity to develop and apply a variety of machine learning and predictive algorithms and influence the long-term evolution of our data science roadmap. This person will need to be entrepreneurial, able to deal with ambiguity and work in a highly collaborative environment. Also, they will identify specific and actionable opportunities to solve business problems and collaborate with multiple marketing teams to propel change.






The Corporate & Investment Bank is a global leader across investment banking, wholesale payments, markets and securities services. The world’s most important corporations, governments and institutions entrust us with their business in more than 100 countries. We provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk and extend liquidity in markets around the world.",4.0,"JPMorgan Chase & Co
4.0","Jersey City, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"Data Scientist

Lexical Intelligence provides software and services related to processing large-scale biomedical information sources. Our NLP and analytics software is used by policy and decision makers to evaluate and prioritize current and emerging areas of research.

We are looking for a data scientist to work at the National Institutes of Health in Bethesda, MD. The data scientist will have extensive experience in NLP and applying statistical methods and techniques, statistical significance and hypothesis testing, analysis of corpora utilizing advanced statistical modeling techniques including machine learning, standard linear models, or random forests. The data scientist will have a firm understanding of the nuances involved in unbalanced training sets, test/train/validation splits, gold standards, significance testing, and hyperparameter optimization. The data scientist shall be able to work well within a team of analysts, data scientists, and software developers. Applicants selected will be subject to a pre-employment background and reference check.",-1,"Lexical Intelligence, LLC","Bethesda, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Lead Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"OneSignal is a leading omnichannel customer engagement solution, powering personalized customer journeys across mobile and web push notifications, in-app messaging, SMS, and email. On a mission to democratize engagement, we enable over a million businesses to keep their users - including readers, fans, players and shoppers - engaged and up to date by delivering 12 billion messages daily.
1 in 5 new apps launches using OneSignal! We support companies in 140 countries, including Zynga, USA Today, Bitcoin.com, Eventbrite, Tribune, and many more - from startups and small businesses just getting off the ground to established companies communicating with millions of customers.
We’re venture-backed by SignalFire, Rakuten Ventures, Y Combinator, HubSpot, and BAM Elevate (read more about our recent Series C!). We offer remote work as the default option in the United States in California, New York, Pennsylvania, Texas, and Utah as well as in the UK and Singapore - with plans to expand the locations we support in the future. We also have offices in San Mateo, CA, New York City, and London, UK. Hiring in Singapore is done in partnership with a local PEO.",4.2,"OneSignal
4.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"Our Maritz team is adding a Sr. Data Scientist to the group!

The Sr. Data Scientist will leverage statistical analysis, causal inference, machine learning, data visualization, strategic thinking, behavioral science, and data storytelling to create value for Maritz clients.

This person will work intimately with the client success and data engineering teams to complete projects and ensure client satisfaction. The ideal candidate would be able to identify and solve data science problems, communicate solutions to non-technical stakeholders, and own relationships with clients.

Primary Responsibilities

30% - Owns relationships with internal and external stakeholders. Works with client and sales teams to develop account strategies and deliver client solutions. Mentors junior team members to develop their data science and data analysis skills. Presents findings and recommendations to C-level clients in face-to-face meetings, emphasizing data-driven strategic insights to drive business performance.",3.9,"Maritz Inc.
3.9","Fenton, MO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"About AKASA

Our mission is to enable human health.

AKASA is the leading developer of AI for healthcare operations. Founded in 2019, AKASA has raised $85M in funding and has grown to more than 200 employees.

Our founding team includes Silicon Valley leaders who have founded or been founding team members of multiple companies with successful exits. Our investors include Andreessen Horowitz, BOND, and Costanoa Ventures, among others. Recognized in 2021 among Top 150 “Most Innovative Digital Health Startups” by CB Insights, Top 75 “Best Places to Work” by Modern Healthcare, Certified as a “Great Place to Work” two years in a row, and ranked #34 of Top 100 Healthcare Companies in 2021 by The Healthcare Technology Report. Learn more at www.AKASA.com.",3.4,"AKASA
3.4",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"Position Summary:
As a Senior Data Scientist, you will drive the development and implementation of next-generation Supply Chain & Logistics Analytics for Penske. With a robust background in data science and a strong command of machine learning, coding, and distributed computing systems such as PySpark, your role will be instrumental in establishing and advancing Penske's predictive analytics capabilities, particularly at the enterprise level.
In addition to your hands-on contributions, you will serve as a mentor to less experienced data scientists, guiding them towards professional growth and instilling a culture of best practices within the team. As a Senior Data Scientist, you will simultaneously navigate multiple projects, each of significant scale and complexity, with potential organization-wide impact. You will be expected to provide detailed analysis, formulate project approaches, and define their scope. Success in this role involves extensive cross-functional collaboration with customers, vendors, and suppliers.",3.5,"Penske Truck Leasing and Logistics
3.5","Reading, PA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"OneSignal is a leading omnichannel customer engagement solution, powering personalized customer journeys across mobile and web push notifications, in-app messaging, SMS, and email. On a mission to democratize engagement, we enable over a million businesses to keep their users - including readers, fans, players and shoppers - engaged and up to date by delivering 12 billion messages daily.
1 in 5 new apps launches using OneSignal! We support companies in 140 countries, including Zynga, USA Today, Bitcoin.com, Eventbrite, Tribune, and many more - from startups and small businesses just getting off the ground to established companies communicating with millions of customers.
We’re venture-backed by SignalFire, Rakuten Ventures, Y Combinator, HubSpot, and BAM Elevate (read more about our recent Series C!). We offer remote work as the default option in the United States in California, New York, Pennsylvania, Texas, and Utah as well as in the UK and Singapore - with plans to expand the locations we support in the future. We also have offices in San Mateo, CA, New York City, and London, UK. Hiring in Singapore is done in partnership with a local PEO.",4.2,"OneSignal
4.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"Company
Big Data Federation tackles some of the world’s complex financial and economic challenges. We apply machine-learning technologies to our mass data to generate predictions and signals for our asset management subsidiary. Our team comprises a group of technologists, mathematicians, data scientists, industry analysts, economists, and programmers. The company was incorporated in 2015, is headquartered in San Jose, California and has an European office in Moldova. We are backed by one of the world’s largest venture capital firms.
Job Profile
This is an exciting role in which Silicon Valley meets Wall Street. You will play a key role in bringing technological innovation to the financial industry. In particular you will use your finely honed mathematical, computer science, and coding skills to create data-driven investment strategies and novel trading opportunities for our asset management firm. We particularly welcome passionate, data-oriented candidates eager to learn new skills, and mentor their colleagues in areas where they themselves excel.",-1,Big Data Federation,"San Jose, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$106K - $155K (Glassdoor est.),"Greetings from KonnectingTree!
We are looking for a full-stack Data Scientist for a full-time position. Kindly go through the job description and let me know if interested.
Job Description:
Strong Python skills.
▪ Experience with popular tools and libraries in the Python data science and machine learning ecosystem: eg pandas, Jupyter, scikit-learn, darts, Matplotlib, Plotly, XGBoost, Optuna, dask.
▪ Experience training and tuning machine learning models.",-1,Konnectingtree,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Job Description
Honolulu,HI,US
Remote Work:
No
Job Number:
R0179639

Data Scientist
The Opportunity:



Salary at Booz Allen is determined by various factors, including but not limited to location, the individual’s particular combination of education, knowledge, skills, competencies, and experience, as well as contract-specific affordability and organizational requirements. The projected compensation range for this position is $73,000.00 to $166,000.00 (annualized USD). The estimate displayed represents the typical salary range for this position and is just one component of Booz Allen’s total compensation package for employees.",4.2,"Booz Allen Hamilton
4.2","Honolulu, HI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist.
Twice a week in Jersey City. Locals Preferred
Must hAves:
More high level the better
Python
Time Series Forecasting- Univariate (ARIMA/SARIMA)/Multivariate(VARMA/SVARMA)
Lead Level Experience
Lead efforts to develop a model for internal cloud service capacity forecasting
Collaborate with the Capacity Management and Demand Management teams
Undertake preprocessing of structured and unstructured data.
Analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns.
Present information using data visualization techniques.
Establish a repeatable process for this model's use
Completely document the model, its assumptions, methodology, validation and results
Identify gaps and opportunities for improvement
Proven experience as a Data Scientist or Data Analyst
Strong math skills (e.g., statistics, algebra, calculus)
Minimum of 2 years' experience with time series forecasting – Univariate (ARIMA/SARIMA)/Multivariate(VARMA/SVARMA)
Experience in data mining
Understanding of machine-learning and operations research
Strong Python skills with Pandas, numpy, sklearn, statsmodels
Experience using Microsoft suite of applications (Excel, PowerPoint),
Analytical mind and business acumen
Problem-solving aptitude
Excellent communication and presentation skills
BSc/BA in Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering or relevant field; graduate degree in Data Science or other quantitative field is preferred
Experience with Agile processes
Experience with Jira
¿¿Virtual server capacity / demand forecasting
Institutional knowledge of Bank operations and Cloud Services and Operations a plus.
Facility with source code management using git
Familiarity with business intelligence tools such as Tableau and Alteryx
Familiarity with data transformation tools such as SSIS, DQS and DQM
Familiarity with data frameworks such as ETL Framework",-1,Verdant Infotech Solutions,"Jersey City, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Requires strong understanding of statistical analysis and mathematical analysis; knowledge and understanding of data modeling and visualization; understanding of graph theory, and application of graph database and modeling; ability to develop cloud analytics and machine learning algorithms; Python scripting ability is preferred; proficient use of tools, tradecraft and databases

Our Promise
eureka offers a highly competitive total compensation package and a focus on providing our employees with the flexibility to strive for the ideal work/life balance as well as numerous social activities and support to charitable pursuits",-1,eureka strategic consulting,"Columbia, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"The New York City Council, an equal opportunity employer, seeks an experienced professional to serve as a Data Scientist in the Oversight & Investigations Division.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES:
The Oversight & Investigations Division (“OID”) of the New York City Council (the “Council”) plays a critical role in the Council’s oversight of New York City government agencies. OID conducts complex investigations of issues involving fraud, waste, abuse, and other important matters to the Council. Through OID, the Council both focuses and expands upon its legislative work, and OID interacts directly with the Speaker’s Office, Council Members, and Committees to identify and conduct its investigations.
The Data Scientist will:",3.9,"New York City Council
3.9","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Engineer,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"At Bayer we’re visionaries, driven to solve the world’s toughest challenges and striving for a world where 'Health for all Hunger for none’ is no longer a dream, but a real possibility. We’re doing it with energy, curiosity and sheer dedication, always learning from unique perspectives of those around us, expanding our thinking, growing our capabilities and redefining ‘impossible’. There are so many reasons to join us. If you’re hungry to build a varied and meaningful career in a community of brilliant and diverse minds to make a real difference, there’s only one choice.

Senior Data Engineer",3.9,"Bayer
3.9","Chesterfield, MO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"The JAAW Group is proud to support the Department of Veterans Affairs and our Military! This positions requires the following skills and capabilities.

Evaluate data definitions in current and legacy patient advocacy tracking system and recommend changes to data definitions. Develop communication about these changes in Patient Advocate Tracking System (PATS) to ensure documentation accuracy and compliance.

Identify and define a set of Key Performance Indicators (KPIs) to be used to measure complaint resolution and patient advocacy. Contractor shall provide a detailed methodology for defining mentioned KPIs.",-1,The JAAW Group,"Cottonwood Heights, UT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Galaxy Technologies is looking to hire a highly creative data scientist to address data analytics challenges in our organization, to collect large volumes of data from varying sources, clean and interpret data, create solutions to overcome challenges, and communicate with interested parties.
To succeed in this position; you need to be curious, creative, and tech-savvy. You need to stay up to date with data programming software and apps, have an outstanding understanding of statistics and mathematics and be proficient in writing algorithms. Top candidates will be persistent and have excellent analytical and problem-solving skills.
Data Scientist Responsibilities:
Having meetings with team members regarding projects.",2.6,"Galaxy Technologies
2.6","Riverside, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist
New York, New York
Barclays Services Corp.
What will you be doing?
On behalf of global financial services firm, utilize mathematics and statistics to perform data analysis to support the identification, measurement and prevention of Conduct Risk
Provide solutions for Financial Crime Anti-Money Laundering (AML) ranging from Transaction Monitoring system optimization through non-linear optimization to the development of bespoke reports and dashboards to identify outlier customer and client behavior",4.0,"Barclays
4.0","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Fullpower®-AI delivers a complete B2B IoT platform for AI-powered algorithms, remote contactless biosensing together with end-to-end engineering services, and customization of software in the field of life sciences, health, and biotechnology. Fullpower's platform is vetted and deployed as a PaaS, backed by a patent portfolio of 135+ patents, and is SOC 2 Type II certified. Fullpower's key areas of expertise include contactless biosensing, remote monitoring, non-invasive sleep technology, and the development of new technologies for others in the life sciences and biotechnology fields. Fullpower's B2B PaaS customers are in medical solutions, remote-contactless biosensing, bedding solutions, wearable, and wellness services.
Fullpower is seeking a passionate, team-oriented, and self-motivated Data Scientist interested in working on our next generation of products and algorithms and modeling rich, biomedical sensor data with a view toward medical, health, and fitness outcomes.",4.3,"Fullpower Technologies, Inc.
4.3","Santa Cruz, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Exciting Opportunity for a Data Scientist in the Cutting-Edge Cold Chain Solutions Industry!
Are you a passionate Data Scientist looking to make a significant impact in the rapidly evolving cold-chain solutions field? Join our dynamic team and contribute your expertise to revolutionize how we manage temperature-sensitive products worldwide.
Key Responsibilities:
Manage predictive analytics projects from discovery through execution and ongoing maintenance and improvement
Collaborate with Global Product Managers for both digital and tangible solutions to understand requirements, dependencies, and KPIs",3.4,"CSafe Global
3.4","Monroe, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Senior Data Scientist
Who we are

El Toro is the leader in accurate, measurable, and trusted IP Targeting technology. Our customers gain a competitive advantage from our advanced analytics and marketing technology, as we deliver empirical results that matter. Our technologies have been awarded 16 patents, and we continue to grow rapidly and shape the future of the industry. As innovators, driving customer acquisition and business intelligence for clients in a variety of verticals, we value diversity and inclusion as key to our growth, and we want to continue expanding with exceptional individuals at the helm. Are you ready to grab your career by the horns?

Why you’ll love working here",4.1,"El Toro.com
4.1","Louisville, KY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"2HB Incorporated is seeking a Data Scientist in order to support its government customer based in Virginia. The candidate shall sustain Sponsor’s existing capabilities for ingesting high-volumes of disparate datasets at near-real time, correlating with the historical holdings, and enabling querying via ad hoc and recurring jobs dependent on complex data model(s). The candidate shall ensure existing capabilities dependent on “core” collections are sustained at the same (or better) Levels. The candidate shall use Sponsor project management systems, such as JIRA and Confluence, to define and track requirements.

The Candidate shall possess and provide the following required skills and demonstrated experience:",5.0,"2HB Incorporated
5.0",Virginia,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist V Data Science,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Job Summary:

In addition to the responsibilities listed below, this position is also responsible for solving complex client analytics problems; communicating results and methodologies; developing experimental design approaches; defining validity of information, how long information is meaningful, and relation to other information; working with data steward to ensure information is in compliance with regulatory and security policies; and qualifying where information can be stored or what information may be used in support of the use case.

This position is also responsible for utilizing patterns and variations in the volume, speed and other characteristics of data supporting an initiative, data type, and speed or sudden variations in data collection; developing usage and access control policies and systems in collaboration with the data steward; partnering with data stewards in continuous improvement processes impacting data; ensuring the organization understands principles and math behind the process; and leading on-going tracking and monitoring of performance of decision systems and statistical models.




















PrimaryLocation : California,Downey,Downey Boeing - Independence Park
HoursPerWeek : 40
Shift : Day
Workdays : Mon, Tue, Wed, Thu, Fri
WorkingHoursStart : 08:00 AM
WorkingHoursEnd : 04:00 PM
Job Schedule : Full-time
Job Type : Standard
Employee Status : Regular
Employee Group/Union Affiliation : NUE-SCAL-01|NUE|Non Union Employee
Job Level : Individual Contributor
Job Category : Data Analytics
Department : Independence Park - Rx Admin-Analytical Svc (PAS) - 0801
Travel : Yes, 10 % of the Time
Kaiser Permanente is an equal opportunity employer committed to a diverse and inclusive workforce. Applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy), age, sexual orientation, national origin, marital status, parental status, ancestry, disability, gender identity, veteran status, genetic information, other distinguishing characteristics of diversity and inclusion, or any other protected status.",3.9,"Kaiser Permanente
3.9","Downey, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist / Data Visualization Specialist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"SierTek Ltd. is seeking Data Scientist / Data Visualization Specialist to support an opportunity at Wright Patterson AFB, in Dayton, Ohio (On-Site or Remote)
Position Overview
The 711th Human Performance Wing (711 HPW), headquartered at Wright-Patterson Air Force Base in Ohio, is the first human-centric warfare wing to consolidate human performance research, education, and consultation under a single organization. Established under the Air Force Research Laboratory, the 711 HPW is comprised of the Airman Systems Directorate (RH), and the United States Air Force School of Aerospace Medicine (USAFSAM)). The Wing delivers unparalleled capability to the Air Force through a combination of world class infrastructure and expertise of its diverse workforce of military, civilian and contractor personnel encompassing 75 occupational specialties including science and engineering, occupational health and safety, medical professions, technicians, educators, and business operations and support.",3.8,"Siertek Ltd
3.8",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Job Description
We are an awesome and experienced team, a fast-growing Space Startup involving senior executives and leaders from well-known commercial and government organizations. We have an incredible pool of partnerships, leaders, and talent from well-known commercial companies and governments in the Space ecosystem. We promote all facets of diversity.
Experience in previous startups is a strong plus.
Experience from the Space industry is not required.
Summary",-1,Fabrx Space,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Senior Data Scientist, Discovery Biology",$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"The Role: BigHat Biosciences is seeking an exceptional Senior Data Scientist (or experienced Data Scientist)* to accelerate our selection of therapeutic programs, discovery of drug targets, and program development.

*At BigHat we believe in titles that are commensurate with skill set, relative organizational impact, and value contribution; more or less experienced candidates are encouraged to apply, with the understanding that responsibilities and title would adjust as appropriate.
Key Responsibilities
Development of novel statistical/ML methods that leverage a range of unique data types from the BigHat platform, our partners, and public sources to drive decisions on therapeutic target selection",4.2,"BigHat Biosciences
4.2","San Mateo, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Position: Data Scientist
Location: Oakland, CA
Duration: Long-term
Working on only W2.
Job Description:
Client is seeking a Senior Data Scientist to be a part of a high-performance Agile Metrics, Analytics and Reporting Team (MART) within the Healthcare domain.
This is a multi-year engagement for a San Francisco Bay Area resident or Consultant who can relocate prior to commencement. Master or Ph.D. degrees are preferred.",4.9,"Delviom LLC
4.9","Oakland, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
DATA SCIENTIST,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Duties
Performs a broad range of data analyses assignments entailing unique problems, creativity, innovative use of techniques, advance approaches, and/or new technology in support of CCI EMSO objectives.
Conducts expert-level research in the areas of analytical technologies and business processes to recommend methodologies authoritatively to better leverage data analytics in support of CDM CCI EMSO objectives.
Performs authoritative analysis of complex user requirements and design programs to support them. Interfaces with senior leadership on complex data problems, makes sound recommendations, and implements data decisions based on expert scientific data principles and affordable solutions.",4.1,"US Department of the Air Force - Agency Wide
4.1","Fort Washington, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Our new global headquarters is conveniently located in Irvine, CA near John Wayne Airport in the Park Place development. For our onsite and hybrid employees you will be able to enjoy amenities such as access to many restaurants and shops, running trails, a fitness deck, outdoor seating, dry cleaning, car wash, free garage parking, car charging stations, shuttle service for train commuters, outdoor games like bocce, horseshoes, gaming tables, pickle ball, and basketball. For more information on Park Place visit www.parkplaceirvine.com
Who We Are:
Ever wonder who brings the entertainment to your flights? Panasonic Avionics Corporation is #1 in the industry for delivering inflight products such as movies, games, WiFi, and now Bluetooth headphone connectivity!





The salary range of $74,000-$124,000 is just one component of Panasonic’s total package. The final offer amount may vary based on factors including but not limited to individual’s knowledge, skills, experience, and location. In addition, this role may be eligible for discretionary bonuses and incentives.

Base pay offered may vary depending on skills, experience, job-related knowledge and location.",3.2,"Panasonic Avionics Corporation
3.2","Irvine, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist (Remote),$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"*We are open to supporting 100% remote work anywhere within the US*
Based on your experiences and interests, we may ask you as a technology professional to support growth-related activities, including (but not limited to) RFI, RFP, prototypes, and oral presentations. Team members are also expected to uphold and maintain appropriate certifications necessary for their practice expertise.
What you will be doing:
Engages with customer organizations at multiple levels, manages key stakeholders and fosters key relationships to develop a deep and thorough understanding of analytics needs within our customers’ enterprise
Design and develop data preparation components and processes that extract and transform data across multiple databases and sources
Conduct data exploration and identify approaches for model development, feature definition, and application of machine learning.
ICF is a global advisory and technology services provider, but we’re not your typical consultants. We combine unmatched expertise with cutting-edge technology to help clients solve their most complex challenges, navigate change, and shape the future.

$90,940.00 - $154,598.00
Nationwide Remote Office (US99)",3.8,"ICF
3.8","Reston, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Cleared Data Scientist (All Levels),$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Responsibilities:
Noblis is seeking to hire a Cleared Data Scientist (All Levels) with an ACTIVE Top Secret with SCI and Polygraph in Chantilly, VA

As a Data Scientist with our team, you will be working with our federal clients to rapidly develop innovative solutions for our clients’ immediate mission challenges. In your role, you will work on teams with other data scientists, software developers, and SMEs to apply the best practices and state of the art data science and machine learning processes. As a data scientist you will be working alongside cyber analysts to provide them services to develop AI/ML models on selected data to facilitate object detection, data triage, search/optimization, inference, facial recognition, behavior detection, and automated discovery and decision making, maintaining model versioning system and experience identifying new vulnerabilities in models.

On our team, you will:
Qualifications:


Client Engagement: · Learn about and support Noblis’ client engagement, corporate values, and corporate strategic priorities, including providing input to proposal writers. · Build a productive relationship with your client and understand their structure and goals. · Participate in the proposal process by providing input to proposal writers. Overview:",4.5,"Noblis
4.5","Chantilly, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Healthcare Research Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Hennepin Healthcare is an integrated system of care that includes HCMC, a nationally recognized Level I Adult Trauma Center and Level I Pediatric Trauma Center and acute care hospital, as well as a clinic system with primary care clinics located in Minneapolis and across Hennepin County. The comprehensive healthcare system includes a 473-bed academic medical center, a large outpatient Clinic & Specialty Center, and a network of clinics in the North Loop, Whittier, and East Lake Street neighborhoods of Minneapolis, and in the suburban communities of Brooklyn Park, Golden Valley, Richfield, and St. Anthony Village. Hennepin Healthcare has a large psychiatric program, home care, and operates a research institute, philanthropic foundation, and Hennepin EMS. The system is operated by Hennepin Healthcare System, Inc., a subsidiary corporation of Hennepin County.
Equal Employment Opportunities: We believe equity is essential for optimal health outcomes and are committed to achieve optimal health for all by actively eliminating barriers due to racism, poverty, gender identity, and other determinants of health. We are committed to equitable care and working in an environment that celebrates, promotes, and protects diversity, equity, inclusion, and belonging. We are committed to bringing in individuals with new cultural perspectives to assist in creating a more equitable healthcare organization.",3.8,"Hennepin Healthcare
3.8","Minneapolis, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist (100% Remote),$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"ARE YOU A CURRENT US FOODS EMPLOYEE? PLEASE APPLY DIRECTLY THROUGH OUR INTERNAL WORKDAY CAREER SITE.

Join Our Community of Food People!

The Principal Data Scientist is responsible for the technical quality of analytics and data science work across the organization and for promoting cutting edge artificial intelligence/machine learning (AI/ML) innovation to maximize business impact. Utilize your exceptional business and technical acumen to research, architect, and advocate with senior leaders to differentiate and select AI/ML solutions.

In this role, you will establish and maintain the standards for decision and data scientists by developing best practices regarding code reviews, white papers, and model management. In addition, you will play a critical role in the talent development and strategic talent pipelining and acquisition process.

The Principal Data Scientist position has been segmented as Remote Anywhere meaning the work is completed 100% remote/virtual anywhere in the United States except Hawaii or United States Territories.


As a Principal Data Scientist, you will be expected to:





As a Principal Data Scientist, you have:



The following information is provided in accordance with certain state and local laws. Compensation depends on experience, geographic locations, and other factors permitted by law. In Colorado, the expected compensation for this role is between $175,000 and $190,000. In New York, the expected compensation for this role is between $175,000 and $203,000. In California, the expected compensation for this role is between $175,000 and $203,000. In Washington, the expected compensation for this role is between $175,000 and $203,000. This role is also eligible for annual incentive plan bonus and long-term incentive program (LTI) . Benefits for this role include health insurance, pre-tax spending accounts, retirement benefits, paid time off, short-term and long-term disability, employee stock purchase plan, and life insurance. To review available benefits, please click here: https://www.usfoods.com/careers/benefits.html .

#REMOTE

#LI-SK1",3.5,"US Foods
3.5","Rosemont, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"POSITION SUMMARY:
The Data Scientist is a highly motivated and goal-oriented data scientist, who is instrumental in analyzing and making inferences from large healthcare and omics data sets and is meticulous and detail-oriented. The Data Scientist will have training in statistics, epidemiology, applied mathematics, data science, engineering, or a related quantitative field, and possess some programming skills. The candidate should also be a quick learner, flexible and able to adapt to the needs of the project.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Design and execution of meticulous and well-thought-out data analysis for generating hypotheses from large omics or healthcare data sets",-1,BPGbio,"Framingham, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist-II- Global Services,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"At F5, we strive to bring a better digital world to life. Our teams empower organizations across the globe to create, secure, and run applications that enhance how we experience our evolving digital world. We are passionate about cybersecurity, from protecting consumers from fraud to enabling companies to focus on innovation.

Everything we do centers around people. That means we obsess over how to make the lives of our customers, and their customers, better. And it means we prioritize a diverse F5 community where each individual can thrive.
Join our Global Services Data team within Global Services Support and help us realize our goal of providing insightful data visualization, machine learning modeling, and predictive analytics to help our business teams report on internal metrics.
**This opportunity is a hybrid role at our Seattle HQ location or Liberty Lake, WA
Deliver more relevant and insightful experiences for our employees and customers, and contribute to our collective ability to make data led decisions as a Data Scientist!
The annual U.S. base pay range for this position is: $92,225.00 - $138,337.00",4.0,"f5
4.0","Liberty Lake, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"About InterDigital
InterDigital develops fundamental wireless and video technologies that are at the core of mobile devices, networks, and services worldwide. We solve many of the industry's most critical and complex technical challenges, inventing solutions for more efficient broadband networks and richer multimedia experiences, years ahead of market deployment. InterDigital has licenses and strategic relationships with many of the world's leading wireless companies. Founded in 1972, InterDigital is listed on NASDAQ and is included in the S&P MidCap 400® index. For more information please visit www.interdigital.com.
Summary
InterDigital is currently seeking a Data Scientist to work in our IS Department. We are looking for a Data Scientist to provide insights into the business through statistical analysis, data mining and data visualization techniques. The successful candidate will be intricately involved with our Data Management and Information Delivery team in the governance, development and maintenance of our reporting solution including the refinement of a data framework and implementation of Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence solutions.",3.8,"INTERDIGITAL COMM CORP
3.8","Conshohocken, PA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Duties
WHAT IS THE ONLINE SERVICE (OLS)DIVISION?
A description of the business units can be found at: https://www.jobs.irs.gov/about/who/business-divisions


The following are the duties of this position at the full working level. If this vacancy includes more than one grade and you are selected at a lower grade level, you will have the opportunity to learn to perform these duties and receive training to help you grow in this position.
Participates as a Senior Data Scientist in the advanced analytics projects undertaken; defining, approving, coordinating, evaluating, and analyzing team performance with responsibility for resolving gaps, conflicts and the day-to-day performance of the team assigned; driving the team toward the desired outcomes of projects. This includes getting signoffs on project documentation, participating in code reviews, and coordinating and getting project delivery acceptance. Leads verbal and written communications with business partners at all levels to clearly articulate the approach and the findings of interpretable analytical models and ensure that outcomes of the project are fully understood and to provide trainings on complex analytics solutions. Consults with senior level managers, executives, and a variety of other technical and nontechnical staff within OLS and across the IRS as required for specific policy interpretations and translation of technical problems and conditions. Responsible for constantly holding the picture of OLS and the IRS's drive for digital and cultural transformation to a customer-centric orientation with a data and analytics emphasis by improving the overall data and analytics environment while being pragmatic and agile and in synch with the needs of the business at all times. Responsible for the growth of data in the OLS data and reporting environment by leading the certification of data sets available for reporting, collaborating with IRS information technology leaders on desired new technologies and techniques to create efficient process around data extraction, loading, transformation, governance, and cataloguing for better and reduced time to insights for the busines",3.6,"US Internal Revenue Service
3.6","Huntsville, AL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Stars",$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"We’re unique. You should be, too.
We’re changing lives every day. For both our patients and our team members. Are you innovative and entrepreneurial minded? Is your work ethic and ambition off the charts? Do you inspire others with your kindness and joy?
We’re different than most primary care providers. We’re rapidly expanding and we need great people to join our team.
The Data Scientist, STARS utilizes analytical, statistical and programming skills to collect, analyze and interpret large data sets. The incumbent in this role uses those data sets to find opportunities for Medicare STARS improvement. The incumbent then applies the information to develop data-driven solutions to this difficult business challenge. The incumbent creates complex models to predict performance and evaluate initiatives. The Data Scientist, STARS has a wide range of technical competencies including: statistics and machine learning, coding languages, databases and reporting technologies.",3.4,"ChenMed
3.4","Miami, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Expert",$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Requisition ID # 151754

Job Category: Accounting / Finance
Job Level: Individual Contributor
Business Unit: Electric Operations
Work Type: Hybrid
Job Location: Oakland; Alameda; Alta; American Canyon; Angels C& Antioch; Auberry; Auburn; Avenal; Avila Beach; Bakersfield; Balch C& Bear Valley; Belden; Bellota; Belmont; Benicia; Berkeley; Brentwood; Brisbane; Buellton; Burney; Buttonwillow; Calistoga; Campbell; Canyon Dam; Canyondam; Capitola; Caruthers; Chico; Clearlake; Clovis; Coalinga; Colusa; Concord; Concord; Corcoran; Cottonwood; Cupertino; Daly City; Danville; Davis; Dinuba; Downieville; Dublin; Emeryville; Eureka; Fairfield; Folsom; Fort Bragg; Fortuna; Fremont; French C& Fresno; Fresno; Fulton; Garberville; Geyserville; Gilroy; Goodyear; Grass Valley; Guerneville; Half Moon Bay; Hayward; Hinkley; Hollister; Holt; Huron; Jackson; Kerman; King City; Lakeport; Lemoore; Lincoln; Linden; Livermore; Lodi; Loomis; Los Banos; Lower Lake; Madera; Magalia; Manteca; Manton; Mariposa; Martell; Marysville; Maxwell; Menlo Park; Merced; Meridian; Millbrae; Milpitas; Modesto; Monterey; Montgomery Creek; Morgan Hill; Morro Bay; Moss Landing; Mountain View; Napa; Needles; Newark; Newman; Novato; Oakdale; Oakhurst; Oakley; Olema; Orinda; Orland; Oroville; Palo Alto; Palo Cedro; Paradise; Parkwood; Paso Robles; Petaluma; Pioneer; Pismo Beach; Pittsburg; Placerville; Pleasant Hill; Point Arena; Potter Valley; Quincy; Rancho Cordova; Red Bluff; Redding; Richmond; Ridgecrest; Rio Vista; Rocklin; Roseville; Round Mountain; Sacramento; Salida; Salinas; San Bruno; San Carlos; San Francisco; San Francisco; San Jose; San Luis Obispo; San Mateo; San Rafael; San Ramon; San Ramon; Sanger; Santa Cruz; Santa Maria; Santa Nella; Santa Rosa; Selma; Shaver Lake; Sonoma; Sonora; South San Francisco; Springville; Stockton; Storrie; Taft; Tracy; Turlock; Twain; Ukiah; Vacaville; Vallejo; Walnut Creek; Wasco; Washington; Watsonville; West Sacramento; Wheatland; Whitmore; Willits; Willow Creek; Willows; Windsor; Winters; Woodland; Yuba City

Department Overview
Electric Operations is responsible for every aspect of PG&E's electric distribution and transmission operations and maintenance, as well as Power Generation operations. The Team manages over 100,000 circuit miles of electric distribution lines and over 18,000 circuit miles of interconnected transmission lines, and operates and maintains PG&E's hydroelectric, fossil, solar generation, and battery storage facilities, providing approximately 5,300 megawatts of generating capacity for customers. Electric Operations is comprised of approximately 6,500 coworkers.

Position Summary
The Work Readiness & Integration team works closely with partners across Projects & Construction (P&C) and the broader Electric Operations (EO) group to coordinate metric development, analytics, and monitor and provide visibility on P&C performance. Activities include developing and refreshing Data Visualizations within Power BI, conducting analysis and deep dives on variances, unit and cost forecasts, and operational trends. This position creates tools to analyze operational, productivity and efficiency metrics and scorecards that will help recommend operational improvements and potential mitigations. The team manages the Weekly Operating Reviews as well as Monthly Operating Reviews for the P&C leadership team and may lead cross-functional and continuous improvement initiatives.

The successful candidate will design, develop, and execute scripts, programs, models, algorithms, and processes, using structured and unstructured data from disparate sources and sizes, generating actionable insights for strategy and policy development, process improvement, and product enhancement. The position may work on technical development phases: data engineering, analytics/modeling, and visualization/user interface while interacting with technical and non-technical clients to resolve analysis and technical issues.

This position is hybrid, working from your remote office and your assigned work location based on business need. The a ssigned work location will be within the PG&E Service Territory.

PG&E is providing the salary range that the company in good faith believes it might pay for this position at the time of the job posting. This compensation range is specific to the locality of the job. The actual salary paid to an individual will be based on multiple factors, including, but not limited to, specific skills, education, licenses or certifications, experience, market value, geographic location, and internal equity. Although we estimate the successful candidate hired into this role will be placed towards the middle or entry point of the range, the decision will be made on a case-by-case basis related to these factors.


$ 132,000
$ 226,000
&/OR
$ 125,000
$215 ,000

Job Responsibilities
Create and develop iterative Data Visualizations to track operational performance for EO Projects & Construction teams using Power BI. Mentors other team members to support creation of tools and actionable analytics and dashboards querying data from SAP, SQL, & Excel
Leads cross-functional teams to support the development of metrics, balanced scorecards, dashboards, and trend performance analytics for use at various Weekly Operating Reviews
Partners with all levels across EO to gather, analyze and monitor operational results and develop variance explanations; presents results and recommendations on operational performance, efficiency, and productivity scorecard metrics to Electric Distribution (ED) leadership. Provides insights into operational results and strategic advice to leaders as needed.
Conducts gaps/needs assessments, capacity analysis, and benchmark comparisons to recommend and implement improvements and corrective actions
Provides ad-hoc in-depth analysis on complex issues to provide recommendations on solutions
Serves as mentor to Analysts and Senior Analysts and provides short-term relief for Senior Manager
Collaborates with and provides analytical support Program Managers to forecast year-end results based on current trends, provides analytic support for weekly stakeholder meetings to drive work execution pipeline
Manages development of quantitative models and tools.
Assesses properties and characteristics of quantitative tools, models, formulas and algorithms, and methodologies, and analytic procedures and processes.
Develops new or revises complex models to predict business demand trends, and volume and expenditures forecasts.
Presents findings and makes recommendations to high level leaders.
Performs analysis on complex data models requiring customized reports and data and presents recommendations.
Oversees resolution of moderately complex projects and programs.

Qualifications


Bachelor's degree in Statistics, Economics, Applied Sciences, Business Administration or comparable quantitative field or equivalent related work experience.
Job-related experience, 8 years, OR Masters Degree and job-related experience, 6 years, OR Doctorate Degree and job-related experience, 3 years


Power BI Experience
Graduate Degree in job-related discipline or equivalent experience
Utility industry experience, 5 years

#featuredjob",4.0,"PG&E Corporation
4.0","Oakland, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"ABOUT THE COMPANY
Our founders, food industry veterans Mike and Tisha, knew that food wasn't what it used to be, so they wanted to make it better - by creating a new kind of farm. A farm that grows up to 300 times more food than an ordinary farm on a smaller footprint, without a drop of pesticides. Farms powered with 100% renewable energy, growing with 95% less water and delivering food within 48 hours for longer freshness for our customers and less food waste.
80 Acres Farms is a vertical farming leader, operating commercial farms in Ohio, Kentucky, and soon-to-be Georgia in addition to research and development farms in Arkansas and The Hauge, Netherlands. All farms utilize state-of-the-art technology and analytics developed by the Company's subsidiary, Infinite Acres.",3.4,"80 Acres Farms
3.4","Hamilton, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Tiktok e-commerce,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

The Data Science team of TikTok e-commerce team plays a key role in business growth with our professional techniques, valuable insights, and problem solving skills. We are looking for talents who are passionate about content e-commerce businesses to join us to make something new.

Job description
1.Understand business logic and requirements, and translate to data analysis framework, metrics systems and dashboard;
2.Describe the situation of businesses, explain the fluctuations of business, and provide valuable suggestions with reports;
3.Driving the growth of reach/advertising, and improving ROI; exploring and optimizing the measurement of LTV and ROI;
4.Have previous experience or able to quickly learn supply chain, operation and product in the Ecommerce setting and work on finding KOL, optimizing supply chain and improving user experience;
5.Collaborate with supply chain and product teams to estimate inventory and sales, validate and improve the accuracy of the model.
Qualifications
1.Bachelor degree or above, major in mathematics, statistics, computer science is preferred; or major in science or engineering or engaged in data statistics, analysis, modeling related working areas after graduation;
2.At least 3 years of working experience in data analysis, and have a good business sense in e-commerce;
3.Proficient in SQL and tableau and familiar with Python or R for data analysis and modelling;
4.Machine learning and predictive modelling experience is a plus.
5.To succeed in the role, you need to be a proactive, self-driven and impact-driven person.
6.Be able to work with cross-functional teams in a fast-paced environment.
7.Our team encourages working smart over working hard.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at USRC@tiktok.com
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $132187 - $312000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



At ByteDance/TikTok our benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support ByteDancers to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off(PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.",3.5,"TikTok
3.5","San Jose, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Overview:
LMI is seeking a skilled Data Scientist. Successful Data Scientists demonstrate competency in project execution, leadership critical thinking, relationship management, and business growth while upholding the highest standard of ethical behavior.

LMI is a consultancy dedicated to improving the business of government, drawing from deep expertise in advanced analytics, digital services, logistics, and management advisory services. Established as a private, not-for-profit organization in 1961, LMI is a trusted third party to federal civilian and defense agencies, free of commercial and political bias. We operate completely free of political and commercial bias, and we are entirely aligned with the goals of our clients. Our clients value our specialized services in logistics, intelligence, homeland security, health care, and energy and environment markets. We believe government can make a difference, and we seek talented, hardworking people who share that conviction. We offer a generous compensation package with excellent benefits that start the first day of employment. Business casual dress, flex time, and tuition reimbursement are a few of our many work-life benefits available to our employees.
Responsibilities:

Qualifications:",4.2,"Logistics Management Institute
4.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist - Card Program Management,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Position Summary
Marqeta is on a mission to change the way money moves. We're one of the earliest enablers of embedded finance, a market opportunity sized up in the trillions. Our card issuing platform provides unprecedented flexibility and control for companies to issue cards, authorize transactions, and manage payment operations in real time. Marqeta is powering the most well known brands in the new economy (Block, Cash App, Affirm, Instacart, Doordash, Uber, Walmart, etc). Today nearly 8 out of 10 Americans use a product powered by Marqeta every week. This is the opportunity of a lifetime to work with innovators around the world and unlock equitable financial access for all.
As Marqeta's Senior Data Scientist reporting to the Director of Data Science, you will be responsible for devising the metrics and performance tracking framework for the Card Program Management Organization. The Card Program Management team is made up of diverse, agile-thinking, and highly-skilled professionals; we use our combined capabilities to enable the organization with innovation, speed, agility, scalability and efficiency. Bringing an innovative, high tech, modern and inspiring approach that helps to align employees with Marqeta's vision, fun culture and business strategy is essential.",3.8,"Marqeta
3.8",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Machine Learning Data Scientist TS/SCI with Poly $100K- $200k + 15% 401k,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Title: Machine Learning Data Scientist (TS/SCI with Poly)
Location: McLean, VA
Base Salary: $100,000.00 - $200,000.00 per year
15% Employer 401k contribution (Regardless of Employee Contribution)
PTO: 30 days annual total
Stock Option
$3000 annual training budget
Medical/Dental/Vision: company funded, cash incentives if you waive
Flexible work schedule
Referral bonuses
Paid Paternal and Maternal Leave",5.0,"Millennial Software
5.0","McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Lead Data Scientist,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"High performing team members. Challenging projects. A stable and profitable company. And a great place to work! This is what you can expect if you join the Quisitive team. Founded in 2016, Quisitive is a publicly traded, global Microsoft partner specializing in Microsoft platform and complementary technologies, custom solutions, and offerings that drive digital transformation and business value for enterprise customers. Our team of professionals has a long history of successfully delivering award-winning Microsoft solutions, and our culture of continual learning ensures that we remain committed to Microsoft's long-term strategy. Quisitive was recently named the 2023 Microsoft US Health and Life Sciences AND Solution Assessments Partner of the Year.
What do we attribute our award-winning success to? The people we hire, of course! People don't join the Quisitive team for a job. They come to Quisitive to build a career – to continue their infinite quest to learn; to deliver on the most innovative and exciting work of their lives; and to be part of a high-performing and fun culture. We'll provide you the tools and leadership that you need to be successful, and let you do what you do best!",3.5,"Quisitive
3.5","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist II,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"GumGum is a contextual-first, global digital advertising platform that uses advanced AI technology to serve captivating creative ads that drive consumer attention, without the use of personal data. At GumGum, we don't need to know who you are to deliver relevant and engaging ads that align with your active frame of mind. We believe that a digital advertising industry based on context rather than personal data builds a more equitable and less invasive future for the internet and is better for consumers, publishers and advertisers alike. Our blueprint for the future, The Mindset Matrix™, combines the power of context and creative in digital advertising to deliver superior attention and drive consumer action without sacrificing personal data.
To be a part of this next phase of digital advertising that prioritizes data privacy, please visit www.gumgum.com/careers
The is responsible for delivering ML solutions that enhance our ability to serve high-relevance and high-value advertisements - without tracking user behaviors. These solutions will focus on optimizing our ad-serving pathways, improving our operational decision making, and supporting a next-generation Ad Exchange Platform. The ideal candidate will have a strong foundation of statistical principles and ML techniques, experience working with large-scale volumes of data, and a practiced understanding of deploying ML models to production applications. This position will report to the Senior Manager, Data Engineering as part of a Data Science team within the Media division.",4.3,"GumGum
4.3","Santa Monica, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Overview:
About Wipro:
Wipro Limited (NYSE: WIT, BSE: 507685, NSE: WIPRO) is a leading technology services and consulting company focused on building innovative solutions that address clients’ most complex digital transformation needs. We leverage our holistic portfolio of capabilities in consulting, design, engineering, operations, and emerging technologies to help clients realize their boldest ambitions and build future-ready, sustainable businesses. A company recognized globally for its comprehensive portfolio of services, strong commitment to sustainability and good corporate citizenship, we have over 250,000 dedicated employees serving clients across 66 countries. We deliver on the promise of helping our customers, colleagues, and communities thrive in an ever-changing world.
A PROUD HISTORY OF OVER 75 YEARS",3.1,"Wipro Limited
3.1","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Algorithm Developer,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Raptor Scientific, a Global Aerospace & Defense Test and Measurement Company, is seeking an
exceptional Engineer or Applied Mathematician with expertise in signal processing to join our
dynamic team. You will have the opportunity to work on challenging projects that demand a deep
understanding of signal processing algorithms and imaging techniques. Your expertise in handling
I/Q data and proficiency in programming languages such as C, C#, and MATLAB will be
instrumental in driving our technological advancements. In this role, you will play a pivotal part in
developing and optimizing advanced technologies that will enhance the performance and
capabilities of our mission-critical aerospace and defense systems.
















world applications.
visualization and imaging applications.
identifying opportunities for innovation and improvement.
minimum.
tering, detection, estimation, and classification.
neering teams.",5.0,"Raptor Scientific
5.0","Livermore, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Role: Senior Data Scientist
Work Mode: 100% Remote
Duration: 6+Months
ClinDCast is looking for skilled Senior Data Scientist for one of our reputed clients. This profile is 100% remote.
Job Description:
A Senior Data Scientist is a professional with extensive experience and expertise in data science, machine learning, and statistical analysis. They play a critical role in extracting insights and generating value from large and complex datasets.",4.0,"ClinDCast LLC
4.0",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist II (Consumer Lending),$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"We are a hybrid, remote-office company dedicated to growing our talent anywhere!
We have onsite locations in: Sioux Falls, SD, Scottsdale, AZ, Troy, MI, Franklin, TN, Dallas, TX
At Pathward, we take tremendous pride in our purpose to create financial inclusion for all™. We are a financial empowerment company that works with innovators to increase financial availability, choice, and opportunity for all. We strive to remove barriers that traditional institutions put in the way of financial access, and promote economic mobility by providing responsible, secure, high quality financial products.
We are a team of problem solvers and innovators who celebrate our differences and know that our unique perspectives make us stronger and well-positioned for success. We celebrate, and embrace, our team members through our approach, and we believe that we are strongest when we embrace the voices of our employees, customers, partners, and the communities we serve.",4.1,"Pathward, N.A.
4.1",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Principal Data Scientist, Applied AI",$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Movable Ink scales content personalization for marketers through data-activated content generation and AI decisioning. The world's most innovative brands rely on Movable Ink to maximize revenue, simplify workflow and boost marketing agility. Headquartered in New York City with close to 600 employees, Movable Ink serves its global client base with operations throughout North America, Central America, Europe, Australia, and Japan.
We are looking for a Principal Data Scientist who will work with our Product and Engineering teams to create artificial intelligence based recommendations and insights extracted from modeling and analysis of very large sets including Movable Ink's historical data. The ideal candidate is an expert at using large datasets of various kinds and presenting insights from those datasets to senior leaders. This data may include images, text and hypertext to find opportunities for computer vision, natural language processing. This candidate should have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to create value for our clients.",3.9,"Movable Ink
3.9",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist (Marketing),$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Position Summary:
Penn Foster Group is building out a modern Machine Learning platform that will affect change across all lines of business. To help push this effort further, Penn Foster is hiring for a hands-on Data Science professional looking to build out the predictive models that will drive the engine. Working closely with the Analytics and Data Teams, the Data Scientist will be focused on models to support Penn Foster's acquisition and retention initiatives. The data scientist will become the thought leader for predictive/prescriptive analytics and will mentor other analytics professionals to level up their data science skills.

Essential Job Functions:
Partner with stakeholders across marketing and product teams to identify opportunities to apply new advanced analytics to improve acquisition and retention efforts


We strive toward Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion at Penn Foster Group by intentionally building teams that are diverse – in identities, lived experiences, and ideas to create a culture where people feel connected to each other and have a sense of belonging. We value diversity, equity, and inclusion because it is the foundation that enables us to achieve what we set out to do as an organization – from maximizing the number of learners who can reach their goals while giving them the kinds of experiences we want them to have, to becoming the type of company we want to work in.


At Penn Foster Group, we are transforming online learning to help learners by uniting Penn Foster, CareerStep, Ashworth College, James Madison High School, the New York Institute of Photography, the New York Institute of Art and Design, and other education platforms. Together, we create an accelerated path to greater economic mobility through real-world skills and knowledge that enable them to achieve long-term success in the workplaces of the future. Our history dates back to 1890 when our founder, Thomas Foster, pioneered distance education by offering training by mail for coal miners to get the necessary skills for safer jobs. Today, with the partners who use our education and training programs, we continue that mission of providing accessible training and education for in-demand skills and are building a workforce that’s prepared for the future job market.",3.1,"Penn Foster Group
3.1",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Company
Federal Reserve Bank of St. Louis
The Supervision Division of the Federal Reserve Bank of St. Louis oversees banking institutions and provides central bank services in the 8th District. The Supervision Division’s Digital Transformation Consulting (DTC) team helps solve business problems to inform business decisions by using data science techniques, such as statistical models and machine learning, to automate manual tasks, provide insights, increase efficiency, and build forecasting capabilities.

We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist to work within the DTC team to conceive, design, and implement intelligent solutions for partners across a variety of subject matter domains. You will report to a manager and work onsite in the St. Louis office. DTC is a growing unit where team members participate in setting a strategic direction, market our products to potential clients, and communicate capabilities with stakeholders.
Full time
Regular
Yes
Information Technology
First (United States of America)",2.5,"Federal Reserve Bank of St. Louis
2.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist. Team Lead.,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Job Category: Technical
Job Type: Full Time
Job Location: Remote
Team: AI
About Kyla
Kyla helps you live longer. First, Kyla collects your medical history, blood sample, and DNA. Then, Kyla AI analyzes your medical data to identify your top health risks, estimate your remaining lifetime, and give you simple, doctor-validated daily goals to increase your life expectancy. Finally, Kyla monitors your progress 24×7, diagnoses, and treats your conditions with the help of doctors.
Join our Kyla.com team of medical providers, product leaders, engineers, and AI scientists to grant people the power to understand their health from a new perspective in order to improve their life expectancy. Our ActionUrgentCare.com medical infrastructure consists of 14 Medical Clinics and a High Complexity Laboratory in California, USA, and has been in business for 10+ years. We’re working with Fortune 500 companies, schools, and individuals by the thousands and are rapidly growing.",3.5,"Kyla
3.5",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Intermediate Data Scientist,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Title Intermediate Data Scientist
Team Data Services Team
Position Summary: The position involves acquiring, cleaning, and preprocessing data using SQL and Python, followed by a deep analysis of complex datasets to generate actionable business insights. The role requires developing and automating custom reports, creating data visualizations, and scripting for automation tasks. Collaboration with different teams is essential for understanding their needs, communicating findings clearly, and applying technical skills for problemsolving. Ensuring adherence to data governance and privacy policies is also crucial. The successful candidate should be familiar with data science principles, database structures, and data governance and be proficient in Python. They should have strong skills in data wrangling, statistical analysis, report generation, data visualization, and effective communication. They should be capable of analytical thinking, attention to detail, selflearning, team collaboration, creative problemsolving, time management, and resilience.",4.0,"University of Oklahoma
4.0","Oklahoma City, OK",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Trainee,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Overview:
Axle Informatics is a scientific research and information technology company that offers innovative computer services, informatics, and bioresearch solutions to research centers and healthcare organizations around the globe. With expertise in software engineering, bioinformatics, data science, molecular research, and program management, we focus on developing and applying technological tools and scientific techniques to empower the world of research. We work with some of the top research organizations and facilities in the country including multiple institutes at the National Institutes of Health (NIH). Axle is offering this postion hybrid.

We are looking for Data Science Trainees to support portions of engineering based Data Science projects which Axle Informatics teams are working on currently at the National Center for Advancing Translational Science (NCATS) and the NIH.

Responsibilities:
Qualifications:",3.4,"Axle Informatics
3.4","Rockville, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Physical location of this position is Huntsville, Alabama.

Are you passionate about the chance to bring your data quality improvement experience to a world class organization that is leading the way in both content and technology to serve and protect our citizens home and abroad? Do you have the skills necessary to manage, understand, and analyze in-house and customer data including text mining, developing predictive systems, risk scoring, creating efficient algorithms, data quality improvement and other related activities? Then Thomson Reuters Special Services (TRSS) is looking for you!

What You’ll Do: As a Data Scientist, you will be responsible for driving, identify, evaluate, design and implement statistical analyses of gathered open source, proprietary, and customer data to create analytic metrics and tools to support TRSS analysts, customers and existing product offerings. Successful candidates will have the opportunity to contribute directly to the features and capabilities deployed in our applications. They will work with customers to assist in gathering requirements and contributing to Statements of Work (SOWs) for new sales or POCs, and executing design post sale while getting deeply involved into the delivery of the proposed solutions. The role will interface with the customer and provide continuity of technical and data-exploration expertise to ensure we are delivering a workable solution that meets the customer requirements and technical capabilities. The position requires a proactive, mission-oriented person who strives to produce the best possible work for the customer.",3.6,"Thomson Reuters
3.6","McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Formed in 2011, INADEV is focused on its founding principle to build innovative customer-centric solutions incredibly fast, secure, and at scale. We deliver world-class digital experiences to some of the largest federal agencies and commercial companies. Our technical expertise and innovations are comprised of codeless automation, identity intelligence, immersive technology, artificial intelligence/machine learning (AI/ML), virtualization, and digital transformation.
POSITION DESCRIPTION:
INADEV is seeking a strong cross-functional candidate to join our team to help in all stages of the program lifecycle from capture to team building to running the full program. The ideal candidate is extremely passionate about the domain, has a technical background, and experience within the federal government, in either a full-time capacity or as a government contractor. We are currently looking for a data scientist that will help us discover the information hidden in vast amounts of data and help us make smarter decisions to deliver even better products. Primary focus will be in natural language processing (NLP), applying data mining techniques, doing statistical analysis and building high quality prediction systems.",4.3,"INADEV
4.3",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"When you join Verizon
Verizon is one of the world’s leading providers of technology and communications services, transforming the way we connect around the world. We’re a human network that reaches across the globe and works behind the scenes. We anticipate, lead, and believe that listening is where learning begins. In crisis and in celebration, we come together—lifting up our communities and striving to make an impact to move the world forward. If you’re fueled by purpose, and powered by persistence, explore a career with us. Here, you’ll discover the rigor it takes to make a difference and the fulfillment that comes with living the #NetworkLife.
What you’ll be doing...
In this hybrid role, you'll have a defined work location that includes work from home and assigned office days set by your manager.
40",3.8,"Verizon
3.8","Basking Ridge, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Growth (Senior),$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"#TeamNextdoor
Nextdoor is where you connect to the neighborhoods that matter to you so you can belong. Our purpose is to cultivate a kinder world where everyone has a neighborhood they can rely on.
Neighbors around the world turn to Nextdoor daily to receive trusted information, give and get help, get things done, and build real-world connections with those nearby — neighbors, businesses, and public services. Today, neighbors rely on Nextdoor in more than 305,000 neighborhoods across 11 countries.
Meet Your Future Neighbors
As a Data Scientist at Nextdoor, you will be responsible for design and oversight of product experiments, own complex analysis to drive company and product strategy, and deploy online and offline models to a production environment. We use a semi-embedded team structure, in which a group of data team members works on a specific product or pillar, interfacing directly with product and engineering stakeholders. The Data Science group is made up of people from a diverse set of backgrounds and perspectives, trained in fields as wide-ranging as psychology, geology, physics, and statistics. We are the mathematical decision scientists for their product development organization and play an active and collaborative role in building and improving the product.",3.1,"Nextdoor
3.1","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr Data Scientist,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"General Information
Location:
US-AZ - Phoenix
Position Type:
Full Time
Virtual Eligible:
Yes
Job Category:",4.1,"University of Phoenix
4.1","Phoenix, AZ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist / Engineer,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"We are looking for someone with strong skills in data analysis related to the retail industry and who also possesses a familiarity with software development as the candidate will be working closely with our software development team. The ideal candidate:
Primary Responsibilities Include:
Identifies business trends and problems through complex big data analysis.
Interprets results from our proprietary data capture engine using variety of techniques, ranging from simple data aggregation via statistical analysis to data-mining independently.
Designs and develops sophisticated charts and methods to visually demonstrate data results for AWM’s Sales Team and customers.",3.7,"AWM SMART SHELF
3.7",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist

PearlX Infrastructure LLC | Location: Remote-first | Full time

About PearlX
Founded in 2019, PearlX builds, owns, operates flexible infrastructure. For our energy customers, PearlX’s portfolio enables resilience and independence. For our infrastructure investors, PearlX eases capital formation and enables the energy transition. The Company’s mission is to generate long-life current yield for its partners and shareholders. We believe that mission is achieved by selling the most flexible electron with the highest energy margins.",5.0,"PearlX
5.0","Charlottesville, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist III - Veterans Health Administration,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Qlarant is a not-for-profit corporation that partners with public and private sectors to create high quality, safe, and efficient delivery of health care and human services programs. We have multiple lines of business including population health, utilization review, managed care organization quality review, and quality assurance for programs serving individuals with developmental disabilities. Qlarant is also a national leader in fighting fraud, waste and abuse for large organizations across the country. In addition, our Foundation provides grant opportunities to those with programs for under-served communities.
Qlarant has an exciting opportunity for experienced Data Scientists seeking to utilize their Veterans Health Administration (VHA) data experience. Qualified applicants must have experience working with VHA data and live in the DC metro area. This is not an immediate opening and is contingent upon contract approval. While a home-based position, you must be able to travel to DC or other locations when required. This is a full-time regular position that offers a collaborative and inclusive work environment, opportunities for advancement, excellent benefits, a generous leave program and a retirement plan that features an employer contribution equal to 10% of your annual earnings.



Required Skills



Required Experience",3.4,"Qlarant
3.4","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"To learn more about Arkansas Blue Cross and Blue Shield Hiring Policies, please click
here
.
Arkansas Blue Cross is only seeking applicants for remote positions from the following states:
Arkansas, Florida, Georgia, Illinois, Kansas, Louisiana, Minnesota, Mississippi, Oklahoma, South Carolina, Tennessee, Texas, Virginia and Wisconsin.
Workforce Scheduling
Flex
Job Summary
The Data Scientist uses the enterprise’s vast data repositories to identify key signals capable of predicting and optimizing the results of the enterprise’s business plan implementations. Incumbent exercises expert knowledge of available data, key business drivers, statistics, mathematics, and open-source software toolsets to derive relevant insights informing business decision-making. The incumbent regularly engages data mining techniques (data discovery, exploration, extraction, modeling, and evaluation) alongside software engineering tasks (software integration, deployment, and maintenance) to accomplish these responsibilities.
Assists in the development of machine learning pipelines and automate machine learning tasks as much as possible., Collaborates with team members (machine learning engineers and data analysts) to complete data pipelines for machine learning deployments, Debugs issues within machine learning pipelines and maintain their accuracy., Develops predictive and prescriptive models to assist business areas with decision-making on key initiatives of the Enterprise., Gathers and presents findings of models to other as necessary to assist understanding and explanation to the model., Identifies key data within available data that increases forecasting of performance., Monitors for data drift within models., Other duties as assigned., Stays abreast on machine learning techniques in the market through training and research.
Regular",4.1,"Arkansas Blue Cross and Blue Shield
4.1","Little Rock, AR",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist/Analyst - Supply Chain,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"SageHome, a market leader in the aging-in-place home improvement space, is experiencing INCREDIBLE GROWTH and is on its way to becoming the largest bathroom remodeler in North America. We are the bathroom experts, and our business is selling and installing walk-in tubs and walk-in showers to provide a safe, modern look to our customer’s homes. Backed by the resources and expertise of Cairngorm Capital, we are experiencing tremendous growth via organic expansion and acquisition activity with a goal to build out a nationwide business in less than five years. We have made it our mission to bring healthcare and home services together to deliver high-quality home modification products and services to our customers.
There is nothing more vital to our growth plans than the people on our team, taking pride in our energy, capabilities, customer first mentality, and positive attitude to provide one of the best work environments in the business. Our team members represent and reflect our core values of Compassion & Caring, Integrity, Inclusion, Innovation & Empowerment, and Ownership. As we continue to build for growth, we are seeking an experienced to join our dynamic team.",3.6,"New Bath Today
3.6","Marietta, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Our employees are our most valuable asset.
Job Description
Data Scientist wanted by Virtus Investment Advisers to work in San Diego, CA. Develop financial products using natural language processing. Conduct research and assess the correlation between data science and financial/investment trends and ideas. Investigate methods for financial analysis. Build predictive machine learning and deep learning models to harvest investment insights from financial text data. Requires: Master’s degree in electrical engineering, computer science, data science, or a closely related field. Requires 3 years of experience in data science and/or data analysis, including machine learning, neural networks, and Natural Language Processing. All required experience may have been gained concurrently. The offered salary for this position is $137,000. All required experience may have been gained concurrently.
#LI-DNI",3.5,"Virtus Investment Partners, Inc.
3.5","San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"About the Data Scientist position
We are looking for a skilled Data Scientist who will help us analyze large amounts of raw information to find patterns and use them to optimize our performance. You will build data products to extract valuable business insights, analyze trends and help us make better decisions.
We expect you to be highly analytical with a knack for analysis, math and statistics, and a passion for machine-learning and research. Critical thinking and problem-solving skills are also required.",3.7,"Victory
3.7",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Bayesian Statistician (Data Scientist),$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"Bayesian Statistician (Data Scientist)
Aurora, CO

ICR has opportunities available for experienced and motivated Data Scientists with a Bayesian statistics background.

Essential Job Responsibilities

This Data Scientist will be expected to:
Work independently on complex technical tasks that require in-depth data analysis methodologies and data/information collection
Develop unique technical solutions for applications in the intelligence field",4.6,"ICR inc.
4.6","Aurora, CO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist,$132K - $312K (Employer est.),"DLA Piper is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran. Job applicant poster viewing center.

About Us
DLA Piper is, at its core, bold, exceptional collaborative and supportive. Our people are the backbone, heart and soul of our firm. Wherever you are in your professional journey, DLA Piper is a place you can engage in meaningful work and grow your career. Let’s see what we can achieve. Together.",3.9,"DLA Piper
3.9","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Job Description
Honolulu,HI,US
Remote Work:
No
Job Number:
R0179639

Data Scientist
The Opportunity:



Salary at Booz Allen is determined by various factors, including but not limited to location, the individual’s particular combination of education, knowledge, skills, competencies, and experience, as well as contract-specific affordability and organizational requirements. The projected compensation range for this position is $73,000.00 to $166,000.00 (annualized USD). The estimate displayed represents the typical salary range for this position and is just one component of Booz Allen’s total compensation package for employees.",4.2,"Booz Allen Hamilton
4.2","Honolulu, HI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Principal Data Scientist, Machine Learning",$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Rec Room is the best place to build and play games together. Players can chat, hang out, play in millions of rooms, or build something new to share with the world! We have a vibrant commercial ecosystem within Rec Room, and our goal is to enable creators to be rewarded for their work. Come join us on the ground floor to help optimize the ecosystem for both players and the business.
As a Principal Machine Learning Data Scientist, you'll be responsible for designing, developing, and implementing machine learning models to power our in-game store recommendations and serve users content that they'd find valuable. You'll be supporting creators in making a living on the platform, as well as playing a critical role in the success of Rec Room as a business.
WHAT YOU'LL DO:",4.5,"Rec Room
4.5","Seattle, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Job Description
As a Data Scientist, you will help healthcare run efficiently through AI models that improve the distribution and manufacturing of healthcare products. You will understand key problems faced by business partners across the business, and ask good questions. You will brainstorm possible statistical solutions with help from Senior Data Scientists. You will own AI experiments, failing fast and pivot to the right solution. Finally, you will operationalize models with help from Senior Machine Learning Engineers.
Responsibilities
Extract data from multiple data sources like Microsoft SQL Server, Oracle, Azure Blob, and Azure SQL using SQL or Python",4.8,"NutaNXT Technologies
4.8","Santa Clara, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Supply Chain - Data Scientist Co-Op - January 2024,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Staples is business to business. You’re what binds us together.
We are searching for you: fresh talent with new ideas, innovation, passion and drive to bring to Staples. We have student and graduate opportunities where you’ll help businesses of all sizes to be more successful and productive while building a career fueled by purpose, people, and triumph. Whether you are looking for a summer internship, co-op, or an entry-level role, we’ll help you develop the technical and soft skills you need to thrive in the future.
This position is a part of the Staples, Inc. hybrid work model, 3 days in the office and 2 days remote.
**Must be a student enrolled at Northeastern University in order to be eligible for the Co-Op Program.**",3.4,"Staples
3.4","Framingham, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"About us
L4B Software is a global engineering deep-tech company headquartered in Munich, Germany, and Santa Clara, California. Since 2004, the company has been providing software engineering solutions and services for leading OEMs in automotive, consumer electronics, smartphone manufacturing, and medical devices.
L4B offers an undisputed ""full stack"" embedded-system solution that ensures end-to-end support for Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) and embedded-OS maintenance phases. Additionally, the company provides extensive engineering services and support for Embedded Systems based on Embedded Linux, Android/AOSP, QNX, bare-Metal, and RTOS, such as:
Design & optimizations of low-level software such as boot loaders and Board Support Packages (BSPs)",4.1,"L4B Software GmbH
4.1","Santa Clara, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Are you seeking a contract or permanent assignment with CloudXsparks Technologies, Inc.? You have the opportunity to extend your career pathway. Our recruiting teams are holding techno-functional experience in the Information technology industry and they are well-versed in interviewing candidates with respect to their interpersonal skills. They are here to assist you more than ever. We are always looking for and interested to hear from talented individuals who can make a difference and complement our existing teams of professionals. Please email your resume to our team of recruiters. Our careers email: hr@cloudxsparks.com
Data Scientist
Skillset We Looking for : • Knowledge of statistical programming languages like R, Python, and database query languages like SQL, Hive, Pig. • Good statistical skills, including knowledge of statistical tests, distributions, regression, maximum likelihood estimators, etc. • Good knowledge of machine learning methods like k-Nearest Neighbors, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests. • understanding the fundamentals of Multivariable Calculus and Linear Algebra is important as they form the basis of a lot of predictive performance or algorithm optimization techniques. • Proficiency in handling imperfections in data is an important aspect of a data scientist job description. • Experience with Data Visualization Tools like Tableau etc.",-1,CloudXsparks Technologies,"Lebanon, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Jr.",$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist
Altamira delivers a variety of analytic and engineering capabilities to the US National Security community, but the tech culture and the caliber of the individuals that bring these capabilities to fruition are what really set us apart. We’re a curious, responsive, dedicated bunch spread across many corporate cultures. Dayton, OH is highly focused on the Space-based mission set with a heavy emphasis on sensor exploitation and analysis; Tampa, FL focuses on ‘art-of-the-possible’ analytics of all kinds with an emphasis on graph technologies, NLP, and wrangling complex data sets; and all forces converge at our headquarters in the Northern Virginia/Washington DC area where we host our tech events and support engineering and analytic missions across several IC and DOD agencies.
While our work occurs in different states and different mission domains, we’ve got analytics at the heart of every operation and genuine curiosity for new methods, techniques, and solutions. We’ve also got some awesome benefits like the Altamira Healthy Living program, with ongoing competitions and a flexible spending stipend for health and wellness-related items.",4.1,"Altamira
4.1","Fort Bragg, NC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Role: Data Scientist
Location: Orlando, FL
Type: Contract
Visa: Any visa except H1-B

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
List the job's essential or most important functions and responsibilities. Include all important aspects of the job - whether performed daily, weekly, monthly, or annually; and any that occur at irregular intervals.

Perform data mining, cleaning, and aggregation processes.
Prepare data, develop-implement-optimize data models, and conduct in-depth analyses.

Bachelor's or Master's degree inInformation Systems / Data Science / Computer Science / Statistics / Mathematics / Engineeringor a related field


3+ years of experience in a data science or related role",3.7,"INTELETECH GLOBAL INC
3.7","Altamonte Springs, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Enterprise Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Distinguishing Features of the Class
Come join the City of Des Moines' exciting new Data and Analytics Team where you can dream big and build big! Do you love using your passion to create novel technology solutions from the ground up? Do you want to have a positive impact on your community? Are you excited about working with data in fascinating subject matter areas, from law enforcement and crime statistics to engineering and public works? We are looking for people like you!

We are currently hiring for two positions: Enterprise Data Engineer and Enterprise Data Scientist. If you think you might fit either role, apply to both!

The Enterprise Data Scientist is part of the City’s Data and Analytics team in the Information Technology Department under the supervision of the Deputy CIO or designee. The principal function of an employee in this class is to work with City data to produce meaningful analysis, visualizations, and communications to stakeholders. This person will have a deep understanding of enterprise business data needs and create statistics and tools which provide business intelligence to both City departments and the public. The data scientist will oversee the City’s data and analytics tools, applications, and dashboards as well as advise on best practices for data analysis and dissemination. This position will also advise on data security and data governance best practices.",3.5,"City of Des Moines, IA
3.5","Des Moines, IA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Expertise France is currently seeking a talented and dedicated Data Scientist to join their team. The company is renowned for its commitment to providing high-quality services and constantly seeks to innovate and improve. As a Data Scientist at Expertise France, you will be given the opportunity to contribute to a variety of projects, leveraging your skills to analyze and interpret complex data to help drive the company forward. You will be working in a vibrant, fast-paced environment where your input will be highly valued and your growth encouraged. If you are passionate about data and eager to make an impact, this role at Expertise France is the perfect fit for you.

Tasks

Collect and clean large datasets from various sources
Analyze data using statistical techniques and machine learning algorithms
Requirements

Benefits",3.7,"Expertise France
3.7",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist I,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Freeport-McMoRan is a leading international mining company with headquarters in Phoenix, Arizona. We operate large, long-lived, geographically diverse assets with significant proven and probable reserves of copper, gold, and molybdenum. The company has a dynamic portfolio of operating, expansion and growth projects in the copper industry. Freeport-McMoRan is one of the world’s largest publicly traded copper producers, the world’s largest producer of molybdenum and a significant gold producer. We have a long and successful history of conducting our business in a safe, highly efficient and socially-responsible manner.
We have the assets, the talent, the drive and the financial strength to provide attractive and rewarding careers of our employees. We encourage you to take the time to explore the opportunity to advance your career at Freeport-McMoRan.
This position has the possibility to work remotely up to 100% of the time. The position will require occasional travel to the Phoenix corporate offices and/or site locations . This position may be performed anywhere in the U.S. except California, Connecticut, New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Michigan, Illinois, Kentucky and New York. Additional states may be excluded from remote work based on business factors. Should the positions shift to in-office work in the future, the company will offer relocation benefits at that time should the position meet the established eligibility for these benefits.",4.1,"Freeport McMoRan
4.1","Phoenix, AZ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Data Scientist
Location: DC Metro Area, McLean, VA, or Reston, VA
Clearance Required: TS/SCI with polygraph
People Centered. Data Driven
Elder Research Inc. is a data science consulting firm specialized in providing analytic solutions to clients in commercial and government industries. Providing analytic solutions to hundreds of companies across numerous industries, our team enjoys a great variety in the type of work they do and exposure to a wide range of techniques and tools.",4.5,"Elder Research Inc
4.5","Reston, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Software Development Engineer,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"3+ years of non-internship professional software development experience
2+ years of non-internship design or architecture (design patterns, reliability and scaling) of new and existing systems experience
Experience programming with at least one software programming language
Amazon Advertising is one of Amazon's fastest growing businesses, responsible for defining and delivering advertising solutions that drive product discovery and sales. Our advertising solutions are strategically important to our Retail and Marketplace businesses driving long term growth. We deliver billions of ad impressions and millions of clicks daily and are breaking fresh ground to create world-class advertising solutions.

Actions, Insights, and Recommendation Solutions (AIRS) is at the forefront of our amazing growth machine enabling our teams to deliver at scale. Our goal is to scale account management multifold by investing in strategic applications that improve productivity of external advertising customers and internal account management executives. We are highly motivated, collaborative and fun-loving with an entrepreneurial spirit and bias for action. With a broad mandate to experiment and innovate, we are growing at an unprecedented rate with a seemingly endless range of new opportunities.

Our team has built a recommendation platform which enable advertisers to discover packaged advertising solutions and adopt them with a single click. As part of our next phase, we are personalizing our recommendations further using context aware science-backed modules, while simultaneously enabling customization of recommendations by users to deliver the most optimum solution.


Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. Our senior engineers provide support to new engineers through design guidance and code reviews. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded engineer and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.
We use agile development strategies and want software engineering leaders who can thrive in a fast paced, high-energy work environment.

We are open to hiring candidates to work out of one of the following locations:

Seattle, WA, USA

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.

Our compensation reflects the cost of labor across several US geographic markets. The base pay for this position ranges from $115,000/year in our lowest geographic market up to $223,600/year in our highest geographic market. Pay is based on a number of factors including market location and may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Amazon is a total compensation company. Dependent on the position offered, equity, sign-on payments, and other forms of compensation may be provided as part of a total compensation package, in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits. For more information, please visit https://www.aboutamazon.com/workplace/employee-benefits. Applicants should apply via our internal or external career site.",3.7,"Amazon.com Services LLC
3.7","Seattle, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Reno, NV
ADM is seeking candidates for the position of Data Scientist to assist and lead in the evaluation of energy efficiency programs.
ADM is a professional service corporation providing energy efficiency program evaluation and research for electric and gas utilities and other clients across North America for over 40 years. Our evaluations are a critical aspect of energy efficiency program design and implementation; we collaborate with clients and program implementation contractors to achieve real-time, transparent evaluation. Our collaborative approach is an integral part of successful programs that decrease ratepayer energy bills while also achieving environmental goals such as deferring fossil fuel power plant projects.",3.7,"ADM Associates
3.7","Reno, NV",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Position Description:
Full-time

Workplace Type: Remote

ABOUT AVOYA

At Avoya Travel, were reimagining the way people plan and book vacations. Through our patented platform and business model, we connect travelers with travel experts to bring vacation dreams to life. With specialized brand and destination knowledge paired with exclusive deals and high-tech, high-touch customer service, Avoya is one of the largest and fastest growing travel companies in North America. Our number one goal is to enrich our lives through unique travel experiences.

Our team members are united in their enthusiasm for enriching the lives of others, passion for travel and exploration in their own lives, and commitment to achieve remarkable results. Avoya offers employees a comprehensive pay and benefits package, frequent learning and development events, flexible hybrid and remote work opportunities, generous travel incentives, and a work hard, play hard culture. With wellness and work/life balance at the forefront, Avoya Travel will empower you to flourish in the ultra-rewarding travel industry and most importantly HAVE FUN while doing it.

Avoya is seeking new talent to join our amazing team and seeks qualified candidates that thrive in innovative, collaborative environments.

ABOUT THE OPPORTUNITY

Avoya Travel is hiring a full-time Data Scientist.

We are seeking a talented and innovative Data Scientist to join our travel industry team. As a Data Scientist, you will be at the forefront of leveraging data-driven insights to optimize our travel services, enhance customer experience, and drive business growth. Your expertise in data analysis, machine learning, and statistical modeling will be crucial in identifying patterns, trends, and opportunities within our vast datasets. The ideal candidate should have a strong passion for the travel industry, possess advanced analytical skills, and be able to translate data findings into actionable recommendations.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITES

Extract and analyze large volumes of data from various sources to derive valuable insights and trends.

Develop company A/B testing framework and test model quality.

Develop data pipelines and databases to streamline data collection and analysis processes.

Use statistical techniques to identify patterns, correlations, and anomalies in the data.

Build and deploy predictive models using machine learning algorithms to forecast demand, pricing, and customer behavior.

Implement recommendation systems to personalize travel offers and enhance customer satisfaction.

Collaborate with stakeholders to identify business challenges and develop data-driven solutions.

Conduct impact assessments to evaluate the effectiveness of data-driven initiatives.

Analyze customer data to segment travelers based on preferences, behaviors, and demographics.

Develop personalized marketing strategies to target specific customer segments.

Monitor key performance indicators (KPIs) to assess the performance of travel products and services.

Recommend improvements and optimizations to enhance business outcomes.

Create clear and concise data visualizations and reports to communicate findings to non-technical stakeholders.

Present data-driven insights in a compelling manner to support decision-making.

Ensure data quality, integrity, and security in compliance with industry regulations.

Stay updated on data privacy and protection guidelines.

Assist with other tasks and/or special projects as required.

REQUIRED SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE, AND ABILITIES

Expertise with data mining, mathematics, and statistical analysis.

Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.

Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests, and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications.

Advanced experience in pattern recognition and predictive modeling.

Expert level knowledge of Excel, R, SQL, and Python is required; knowledge of other programming languages (SAS, Java, C++, etc.) is an added bonus.

Experience in using business intelligence tools (e.g., Power BI) and open-source programming tools (Tensorflow, PyTorch).

Experience with Cloud (e.g., Azure ML, Databricks, Azure Data Factory) and open-source tools (ML Flow, Airflow).

Ability to work effectively across teams and on multiple projects.

Excellent verbal and written communication skills.

EXPERIENCE AND/OR EDUCATION

Bachelors degree (or equivalent) in statistics, applied mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering or relevant field, Data Science, or another quantitative field preferred.

Two or more years of project management experience

Professional certification

Google Analytics, Google Ads, and Cordial.

PHYISCAL REQUIREMENTS

Prolonged periods of sitting at a desk and working on a computer.

Must be able to lift to 15lbs at a time.

Ability to travel to home office or other locations as needed.

Avoya Travel offers competitive pay, flexible work schedules (we offer in-office, hybrid, and remote roles), affordable health benefits (medical, dental, vision) and a wide variety of ancillary benefits (pet insurance, life insurance, LTD, accident, and legal coverages, etc.) that full-time employees can begin using the 1st of the month after theyre hired. We also offer a 401(k)-retirement plan with employer match and employee discounts on travel.

For those hired to work in our San Marcos Innovation Center, youll enjoy a beautiful work environment that offers stand-up desks, complimentary snacks and beverages, an employee arcade, and a wellness- relaxation room.

Your adventure awaits- apply today https://www.avoyatravel.com/about/careers/.

RevAgency, LLC values diversity in its workforce and is proud to be an equal employment opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, disability, or any other legally protected status.

Avoya Travel uses E-Verify and conducts reference and criminal background checks.",4.0,"Rev Agency, LLC
4.0","San Marcos, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Job Title: Data Scientist Overview:
EverWatch is a government solutions company providing advanced defense, intelligence, and deployed support to our country’s most critical missions. We are a full-service government solutions company. Harnessing the most advanced technology and solutions, we strengthen defenses and control environments to preserve continuity and ensure mission success.

Founded in 2010, BrainTrust is an ever-growing and evolving company, with focus areas of Software Engineering (Machine Learning, Cloud Computing, HPC, Data Mining, HLT), Mission Operations (System Integration, Sensors, Deployment, Training, Support), and System Engineering (System Design, Requirements, Process Engineering, Resource Allocation).

In August of 2020, BrainTrust joined forces with EverWatch. This integration will enhance the merged company’s set of technical capabilities, mission expertise, and contract presence for intelligence community customers.


Responsibilities:


Qualifications:
Clearance Level: TS/SCI polygraph Job Locations: US-MD-Annapolis Junction Skills: Machine Learning, Artificial Intelligence",4.4,"BrainTrust
4.4","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Office of the Customer,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Job Profile

Position Overview

At PNC, our people are our greatest differentiator and competitive advantage in the markets we serve. We are all united in delivering the best experience for our customers. We work together each day to foster an inclusive workplace culture where all of our employees feel respected, valued and have an opportunity to contribute to the company’s success. As a Data Scientist you will join PNC's Customer Experience Analytics team within the Office of the Customer department. This position is primarily based in a PNC location. Responsibilities require time in the office or in the field on a regular basis. Some responsibilities may be performed remotely, at manager’s discretion.

The schedule for this position is Monday through Friday from 8:00am to 5:00pm EST. In office requirement 3 days per week.


customer experience by developing models using structured and unstructured data.

Language Processing
design, clustering)
Job Description

Performs analytical tasks on vast amounts of structured and unstructured data to extract actionable business insights.
Participates in the data gathering, data processing and data mining of large and complex datasets.
Develops algorithms using advanced mathematical and statistical techniques like machine learning to predict business outcomes and recommend optimal actions to management.
Runs analytical experiments in a methodical manner to find opportunities for product and process optimization. Assists in the presentation of business insights to management using visualization technologies and data storytelling.
May partner with Data Architects, Data Analysts, Data Engineers and Visualization Experts to develop data-driven solutions for the business.

PNC Employees take pride in our reputation and to continue building upon that we expect our employees to be:
Customer Focused - Knowledgeable of the values and practices that align customer needs and satisfaction as primary considerations in all business decisions and able to leverage that information in creating customized customer solutions.
Managing Risk - Assessing and effectively managing all of the risks associated with their business objectives and activities to ensure they adhere to and support PNC's Enterprise Risk Management Framework.

Competencies

Data Architecture – Knowledge and ability to create models and standards to govern which data is collected, and how it is stored, arranged, integrated, and put to use in data systems and in organizations.

Data Mining – Knowledge of tools, techniques and practices in data mining technologies used to acquire essential business information.

Disruptive Innovation – Knowledge of concepts, principles, and approaches of disruptive innovation; ability to adopt the knowledge into related processes and practices.

Information Capture – Knowledge of the processes and the ability to identify, capture and document relevant business information in an auditable, organized, understandable and easily retrievable manner.

Machine Learning – Knowledge of principles, technologies and algorithms of machine learning; ability to develop, implement and deliver related systems, products and services.

Data, Process, Events, Objects – Knowledge of and the ability to use tools and techniques for analyzing and documenting logical relationships among data, processes or events.

Prototyping – Knowledge of and ability to implement prototyping disciplines, tools and techniques in evolutionary models within the target environment.

Query and Database Access Tools – Knowledge of and the ability to use, support and access facilities for extracting and formatting a database management system.

Work Experience

Roles at this level typically require a university / college degree, with 3+ years of relevant / direct industry experience. Certifications are often desired. In lieu of a degree, a comparable combination of education, job specific certification(s), and experience (including military service) may be considered.

Education

Masters

Additional Job Description

Benefits
PNC offers employees a comprehensive range of benefits to help meet your needs now and in the future. Depending on your eligibility, options for full-time employees include medical/prescription drug coverage (with a Health Savings Account feature); dental and vision options; employee and spouse/child life insurance; short- and long-term disability protection; maternity and parental leave; paid holidays, vacation days and occasional absence time; 401(k), pension and stock purchase plans; dependent care reimbursement account; back-up child/elder care; adoption assistance; educational assistance and a robust wellness program with financial incentives. To learn more about these and other programs, including benefits for part-time employees, visit pncbenefits.com > New to PNC.


If an accommodation is required to participate in the application process, please contact us via email at AccommodationRequest@pnc.com . Please include “accommodation request” in the subject line title and be sure to include your name, the job ID, and your preferred method of contact in the body of the email. Emails not related to accommodation requests will not receive responses. Applicants may also call 877-968-7762 and select Option 4: Recruiting for accommodation assistance. All information provided will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodations.

At PNC we foster an inclusive and accessible workplace. We provide reasonable accommodations to employment applicants and qualified individuals with a disability who need an accommodation to perform the essential functions of their positions.


PNC provides equal employment opportunity to qualified persons regardless of race, color, sex, religion, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran status, or other categories protected by law.

California Residents

Refer to the California Consumer Privacy Act Privacy Notice to gain understanding of how PNC may use or disclose your personal information in our hiring practices.",3.6,"PNC Financial Services Group
3.6","Pittsburgh, PA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"10 - 26 Yr Full time Data Scientist Data Scientist
Posted 3 years ago
Overview
Job Title: Data Scientist
Location: Fairfax, VA 22033
Duration: Contract to Hire
Job Description:
Work experience in addition to a degree: 3 – 5 years of data engineering/science-related activities with overall 10+ years’ experience.
Graduation from a four-year college or university with a degree in statistics, physics, mathematics, engineering, computer science, or management of information systems.",-1,Thought Pulse,"Fairfax, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Research Associate Data Scientist - Nursing Research,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Join us as we translate today's discoveries into tomorrow's medicine!
Cedars-Sinai Division of Nursing is committed to engaging nursing staff to develop and provide excellent evidence-driven clinical care. The Department of Nursing Research and Performance Improvement promotes sound and ethical research methods to study patient care and population health.
Our esteemed Nursing Research Department members all have the strong credentials and experience required to conduct their own research and mentor nurses throughout the organization. They lead in generating, applying and evaluating best practices that promote safe, quality patient experiences and outcomes. Join our research team that excels in research design and methodology, and works closely with interprofessional research teams. To learn more, please visit Nursing Research and Innovation | Cedars-Sinai.
Are you ready to be a part of breakthrough research?
The Research Associate Data Scientist participates in biomedical research projects using programming, data -mining, statistics, machine -learning, and visualization techniques to develop, evaluate, and/or apply algorithms and software for data analysis. Responsibilities include querying databases, data processing, supervised and unsupervised machine learning, deploying production models, and communication of scientific findings via peer-reviewed publications and scientific conferences. Writes clean, performant, reusable code managed on GitHub to perform repeatable analyses and to train and deploy models to multiple environments.



Research Associate Data Scientist - Nursing Research
Dept of Nursing Research
Cedars-Sinai Medical Center
Information Technology
Business Intelligence/Reporting
Full-time
8 hour shift
Day
$78,400.00 - $133,100.00",4.1,"CEDARS-SINAI
4.1","Los Angeles, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"New York, NY
Description
We are looking for a highly analytical and innovation-driven Senior Data Scientist to lead the department and craft a bold vision around the intersection of machine learning, high performance computing, and big data in the setting of biology and genomics. Your work in predictive analytics and big data at Envisagenics will help save lives and deliver cures to people faster than ever before. You will leave work every day knowing that your work will make a huge difference to patients around the world, and you will help grow the data scientist team.
Envisagenics is already widely recognized as a leader in RNA therapeutics, with investors such as Microsoft and Breakout Labs. As a member of a start-up company, you should be excited about shaping the team and participating in multiple roles. You should also be pro-active in your contributions and ready to evolve as the team grows.",-1,Envisagenics,"New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Product Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"We're Celonis, the global leader in execution management and process mining technology, and one of the 50 most valuable private companies in the world. We believe that every company can unlock its full execution capacity - and for that, we need you to join us.

The Team:
As a member of the Engineering organization, the Product Analytics & Data Sciences team provides analytic support and a strategic perspective to the product and engineering teams to enable them to make evidence-based conclusions. We deliver actionable insights by collecting, organizing, and interpreting data about user journeys, product telemetry, incidents, infrastructure utilization, sales motions, and much more. We transform data into analytic assets by conducting exploratory analysis, identifying outliers, validating hypotheses, building statistical models, quantifying risk; communicating findings through well-crafted stories and critical recommendations.",3.7,"Celonis SE
3.7","Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"FULL TIME
LOCATION: N/A
About the Position: S3 Partners is seeking an exceptional Data Scientist to join our growing team. S3 is an innovative force at the center of technology, data analytics and financial markets and we are looking for highly motivated, competitive people who like to win.
Specific Responsibilities Include:
Improve and innovate models including statistical and machine learning techniques across various asset-classes (e.g. equities, fixed income, derivatives, FX, etc.)
Develop predictive analytics model using Machine Learning",-1,S3Partners.com,"New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Lead Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Career Area:
Information Analytics
Job Description:
Caterpillar Inc. seeks Lead Data Scientists at its facility located at 100 NE Adams Street, Peoria, IL 61629.
Multiple openings
JOB DESCRIPTION:
Will be responsible for building tools, dashboards and processes to enable (E2E) telemetry data quality monitoring, finding source of quality issues and work with process partners to resolve the problems at source. Will primarily focus on the data quality evaluation of a very large set of diverse data from IoT connected assets, our integrated network of dealers and enterprise data. Will analyze output of data quality rules and evaluation of their impact, as well as root cause analysis of data quality problems. Will also use analytics and visualization methods to solve problems for Caterpillar internal customers. Will use quantitative techniques to solve problems; using a depth of knowledge in quantitative analytic methods, data management, and or associated digital technologies suitable to handle all but the most complex issues. Will design, develop, and maintain Telemetry data quality dashboards and reports. Will provide analytics support to Connectivity Division Projects; will consolidate output of data quality problems into a workable CPI project. Will refine solutions to better fit complex situations, making timely decisions, and communicating effectively with all project stakeholders.",4.0,"Caterpillar
4.0","Peoria, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Position Description
This position is responsible for applying machine learning and text analytics techniques for financial market analysis. The location is in DC, SEC headquarters. Onsite. Full time. Compensation $90K-150K/year (including bonus) + benefits. It is not a government job. It is a position of a private consulting firm but the client is the government agency SEC. Require Green Card or Citizenship. Public trust clearance is required before hiring.

Duties
developing text analytics capabilities, and any related support, such as: developing and writing project-specific programs to process data sets using modern analytical methods, statistical modeling techniques, machine learning and statistical processes; analyzing and interpreting statistical data; computing supporting metrics; producing and maintaining models or other analytical products.


shall have a minimum of a Master’s degree in computer science, statistics, or applied mathematics, and demonstrated experience of four (4) years in creating machine learning pipelines to derive insights from data (i.e., from data aggregation and cleaning, to using machine learning techniques). The key personnel should be familiar with unsupervised (e.g., clustering), semi-supervised (e.g., label propagation) and supervised learning (e.g., ensemble classifiers) algorithms, and when it is appropriate to use each. Knowledge of deep learning paradigms and architectures is a plus. The candidate shall provide resources that have deep experience in creating, managing, and analyzing large datasets. The candidate shall be familiar with contemporary scripting languages such as Python and R, the Hadoop computational ecosystem, Oracle relational databases, and the Linux/UNIX operating system.


If you are interested in the position, please send us an email at contact@digitcompass.com with your resume and cover letter. Thank you!",-1,DigitCompass,"Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Senior Data Scientist - Amazon Transportation, Sort Tech",$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"5+ years of data scientist or similar role involving data extraction, analysis, statistical modeling and communication experience
5+ years of data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python) or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R, SAS, Matlab, etc.) experience
Master's degree in a quantitative field such as statistics, mathematics, data science, business analytics, economics, finance, engineering, or computer science, or Bachelor's degree and 8+ years of professional or military experience
Experience with statistical models e.g. multinomial logistic regression
The Amazon Transportation organization is seeking a talented, self-directed Senior Data Scientist to design data science models, run experiments, research new algorithms, and find new ways to improve middle mile analytics to optimize the Customer experience within the Sort Tech team. Sort Tech’s technology and services powers every package to move throughout the Amazon network. We enable across Associates and Robotics, and support the worldwide transportation network across Fulfillment Centers, Sort Centers, Air Gateways and more. We also build visibility platforms that enable operations managers to monitor and refine their volume and staffing, and optimize their operational processes. Our systems process millions of packages a day and ensure that Amazon can meet the customer delivery promise. Our mission is to build the most efficient and optimal transportation system on the planet using our engineering muscle as our biggest advantage.

As Senior Data Scientist you will work closely with other research scientists, machine learning experts, and economists worldwide, to design and run experiments, research new algorithms, and find new ways to improve middle mile analytics to optimize the Customer experience. You will partner with technology and product leaders to solve business and technology problems using scientific approaches to build new services that surprise and delight our customers.

This role offers wide scope, autonomy, and ownership. Science at Amazon is a highly experimental activity, although theoretical analysis and innovation are also welcome. Our scientists work closely with software engineers to put algorithms into practice. They also work on cross-disciplinary efforts with other scientists within Amazon worldwide. The candidate should be willing to take on challenging initiatives and be capable of working both independently and with others as a team.

Key job responsibilities
About the team
Amazon’s global fulfillment network ship items are ordered on Amazon to any place on earth. There is a complex network of Amazon warehouses through which packages travel before reaching the customer. With a scale of millions of packages, each with different attributes and delivery requirements, what results is a highly dense graph of nodes.

We have built a highly respected software engineering team which is focused on solving complex problems in worldwide transportation using workflows, optimization algorithms, and machine learning systems. These are large-scale distributed systems handling millions of packages being shipped through the Amazon logistics network.

We are open to hiring candidates to work out of one of the following locations:

Bellevue, WA, USA

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.

Our compensation reflects the cost of labor across several US geographic markets. The base pay for this position ranges from $127,300/year in our lowest geographic market up to $247,600/year in our highest geographic market. Pay is based on a number of factors including market location and may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Amazon is a total compensation company. Dependent on the position offered, equity, sign-on payments, and other forms of compensation may be provided as part of a total compensation package, in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits. For more information, please visit https://www.aboutamazon.com/workplace/employee-benefits. Applicants should apply via our internal or external career site.",3.7,"Amazon.com Services LLC
3.7","Bellevue, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Position: SR Data Scientist
Location: San Francisco, CA
Duration: Long Term Contract
Remote Till Covid 19
E xperience in applied data science, analytics, data storytelling.
Supervised/developed/delivered end-to-end NLP/ML solutions
Translated business problem into NLP/ML solutions
• Write well documented code that can be shared and used across teams, and can scale to be used in existing products. SQL, Advanced Python or R (descriptive / predictive models), Tableau Visualization. Working knowledge of Hadoop, BigQuery, Presto, Vertica",3.9,"Surya Systems
3.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Setting the Standard for Exceptional Care
For ninety years, Silver Hill Hospital has been at the forefront of psychiatry and leading the way in providing the best treatment for psychiatric illnesses and addiction. Our track record of success is based on a carefully executed team effort, one that uses an array of powerful tools, talent and knowledge to help people turn their lives around. We have opportunities available for individuals who have a passion to make a difference in the lives of our patients.
Senior Data Scientist
Silver Hill Hospital is seeking an experienced and detail-oriented Senior Data Scientist to join our Information Technology (IT) team. The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for building and maintaining the organization's data assets and implementing data visualization strategies to ensure Silver Hill Hospital operates at peak efficiency. The ideal candidate will have a strong background in IT and data science, as well as excellent communication, organization, and analytical skills.",4.1,"Silver Hill Hospital
4.1","New Canaan, CT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist (Hybrid),$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Resp & Qualifications
PURPOSE:
Identifies and solves business problems by using various numerical techniques, algorithms, and models in statistical modeling, machine learning, operations research, and data mining. Uses advanced analytical capabilities to support data science initiatives. Communicates across product teams and with customers and educates on artificial intelligence, machine learning, and statistical models. Acting as a liaison and interface between analytics, business units and other departments. The incumbent will be expected to work a portion of their week from home and a portion of their week at a CareFirst location based on business needs and work activities/deliverables that week.

ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:",3.6,"CareFirst BlueCross BlueShield
3.6","Baltimore, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist- CalAIM,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Salary: $51.00 - $68.72 Per Hour
Community Programs is a program office within Health Services Administration, a division under the Los Angeles County Department of Health Services (DHS). Community Program’s mission is to improve the health and wellbeing of LA County’s people experiencing homelessness by providing housing and intensive care management services. In addition to other responsibilities this position may have a lead role in the tracking, reporting, quality assurance, and billing efforts for CalAIM, a Medi-Cal waiver program. They will be using their expertise to help lead a team of predictive analysts who will be providing data collection, analytic, and billing support for CalAIM services tracking and Medi-Cal billing while simultaneously building dashboards and providing regular descriptive analyses.",3.3,"Heluna Health
3.3","Los Angeles, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$73K - $166K (Employer est.),"Passionate about development in leading technologies? Looking to become a major player on a diverse team in your next career adventure? Koddi Data Scientists drive innovation by embracing challenges and leveraging decision science to solve complex problems in adtech. In this position, you will be responsible for designing, building, and deploying complex systems to model and glean useful insights from billions of rows of data. You will inform decisions based on complex statistical modeling using machine learning, optimizing and forecasting algorithms powered by industry-leading technologies.
WHAT YOU WILL DO
Build production grade models on large-scale datasets to optimize marketing performance by utilizing advanced statistical modeling, machine learning, and optimization and marketing science research",3.7,"Koddi
3.7",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Supply Chain Data Analytics Specialist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Abiomed, part of Johnson & Johnson MedTech, is a leading provider of medical devices that provide circulatory and respiratory support, with a mission of recovering hearts & saving lives. Abiomed's ""Patients First!"" culture drives our skilled workforce and strong relationships with clinicians. Our innovative product portfolio and robust pipeline provide us the incredible opportunity to bring lifesaving technology to more patients around the world than ever before. Founded in 1981, Abiomed has a proven track record for growth, integrity and innovation. Remote work options may be considered on a case-by-case basis and if approved by the company
I Am Abiomed | I Am Heart Recovery | Patients First!
Abiomed is looking for an experienced analyst/data scientist to help lead the global supply chain organization into the future. The Supply Chain Data Analytics Specialist will partner with functional leads/SME’s, business stakeholders, and IT to understand needs and opportunities, and translate them into analytics and reports that allow team to understand relationships and performance more deeply, forecast and sense changes, and monitor performance to plan.",4.2,"Johnson & Johnson
4.2","Danvers, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr Dir & Data Scientist - AI & Underwriting Automation,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Who Are We?
Taking care of our customers, our communities and each other. That’s the Travelers Promise. By honoring this commitment, we have maintained our reputation as one of the best property casualty insurers in the industry for over 160 years. Join us to discover a culture that is rooted in innovation and thrives on collaboration. Imagine loving what you do and where you do it.
Job Category
Data Science
Compensation Overview
The annual base salary range provided for this position is a nationwide market range and represents a broad range of salaries for this role across the country. The actual salary for this position will be determined by a number of factors, including the scope, complexity and location of the role; the skills, education, training, credentials and experience of the candidate; and other conditions of employment. As part of our comprehensive compensation and benefits program, employees are also eligible for performance-based cash incentive awards.
$154,100.00 - $254,200.00
2
Travelers Data Scientists are taking the organization to the next level of intelligence by using advanced statistical techniques and machine learning algorithms. As a Sr. Director & Data Scientist, supporting the AI & UW Automation value stream you will lead a team responsible for challenging conventional thinking and use data to communicate insights and tell the story to business and analytics leadership. You will also collaborate with technology partners to drive analytics out to our products in the marketplace, giving Travelers a competitive advantage.",4.1,"The Travelers Companies, Inc.
4.1","Hartford, CT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Supply Chain Consultant - Sr. Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Supply Chain Consultant - Sr. Data Scientist
Job Description
You’re not the person who will settle for just any role. Neither are we. Because we’re out to create Better Care for a Better World, and that takes a certain kind of person and teams who care about making a difference. Here, you’ll bring your professional expertise, talent, and drive to building and managing our portfolio of iconic, ground-breaking brands. In this role, you’ll help us deliver better care for billions of people around the world. It starts with YOU.
The Supply Chain Operating Office Senior Data Scientist is accountable to develop data-driven decision-making insights for the KCNA supply chain end-to-end operations and focus on process mining and analytics to ensure supply chain business process and technology capabilities are effective and efficient. The senior data scientist role will deliver advanced analytics methodologies, development and insights to drive successful transformational activities across all areas of supply chain.
USA-WI-Neenah
Employee
Regular
Full time",4.1,"Kimberly-Clark
4.1","Neenah, WI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Software Bloc LLC, Plano, TX
Technologies –Proficient in Python and R with experience in SQL, GitHub (not a deal breaker), and AWS/Azure and cloud storage related experience.
Full Time

JOB DESCRIPTION

Your role will work to inform the business on strategic recommendations on data collection, integration, and retention requirements incorporating business needs and knowledge of best practices",-1,Software Bloc,"Plano, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Health Data Scientist, Senior",$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Description
Location:
Bethesda,MD,US
Remote Work:
Yes
Job Number:
R0179749

Health Data Scientist, Senior
The Opportunity:
Salary at Booz Allen is determined by various factors, including but not limited to location, the individual’s particular combination of education, knowledge, skills, competencies, and experience, as well as contract-specific affordability and organizational requirements. The projected compensation range for this position is $93,300.00 to $212,000.00 (annualized USD). The estimate displayed represents the typical salary range for this position and is just one component of Booz Allen’s total compensation package for employees.",4.2,"Booz Allen Hamilton
4.2","Bethesda, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Supply Chain Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"This role will support the Kroger Transportation Center in Nashville, TN
Work can be performed remotely
Company Name: Kroger Logistics
Position Type: Employee
FLSA Status: Exempt

Position Summary

Responsible for developing solutions to the most complex business challenges within the Kroger Supply Chain. Lead the division on analytics and data science projects, with the ability to effectively communicate results, summarize findings and propose next steps. Create tools for Kroger Supply Chain to gain descriptive, predictive, and prescriptive insights using knowledge of visualization techniques, statistics, machine learning, programming, data engineering and modeling. Mentor other analysts and business partners on data science techniques. Demonstrate the company's core values of respect, honesty, Integrity, diversity, inclusion and safety.",3.1,"Kroger Logistics
3.1","Cincinnati, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"ACI is seeking a highly ambitious, adaptable, structured, and detail-oriented Data Scientist to join our vibrant team in Bethesda, MD.

Overall Position Summary and Objectives
The All of Us, Office of Data Analytics, Data Scientist focus on the business analytics, metrics collection, and analysis efforts in All of Us. Designing and implementing advanced configurations for complex data sets. Compiling data analysis and conducting sophisticated analysis using tools and natural language processing. Producing ad hoc reports to answer questions Processing data holdings to extract topics that could be parsed to further illuminate areas of customer interest and collection priorities",3.5,"ACI Federal Inc
3.5","Bethesda, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Bioinformatics Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Summary:
Zel Tech is seeking a highly qualified Bioinformatics Data Scientist that will provide SME support to our government customer in Charlottesville, Virginia or Melbourne, Florida.
Responsibilities:
The Bioinformatics Data Scientist shall aide in the following areas:
Provides direct support for bioinformatics, regex queries, developing and searching key words and biological ontologies.
Focused data discovery and retrieval from given datasets.",3.8,"Zel Technologies
3.8","Melbourne, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Position Overview:
Here at ShyftLabs, we are searching for an experienced Data Scientist who can derive performance improvement and cost efficiency in our product through a deep understanding of the ML and infra system, and provide a data driven insight and scientific solution.

ShyftLabs is a growing data product company that was founded in early 2020, and works primarily with Fortune 500 companies. We deliver digital solutions built to help accelerate the growth of businesses in various industries, by focusing on creating value through innovation.

Job Responsibilities:
Data Analysis and research: analyzing a large dataset with queries and scripts, extracting valuable signals out of noise, and producing actionable insights into how we could complete and improve a complex ML and bidding system.",3.8,"ShyftLabs
3.8","Denver, CO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Science/ Machine Learning Engineer,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"New York office
Perpetual is an award winning product design and software development agency in NYC. We work on a variety of innovative and exciting projects, ranging from creative interactive front-end experiences to advanced scalable back-end and data systems. Our clients include several successful startups and innovative large corporations like Reuters, Elle Magazine, Car & Driver, Sonder, Unpakt, The Inside, MIT, University of California and Reliance Jio. Our team has prior experience at companies like McKinsey, Verizon, Reuters, Code & Theory and Fantasy Interactive. We follow best practices in Product Management, UX Design and Software Engineering.
We are looking for a Data Scientist who will support our client product development initiatives with insights gained from analyzing product data. The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. They must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. They must have a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights. They must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.",3.8,"Perpetual
3.8","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Reston, VA

Full Time

TS/SCI w/ CI Poly *


US Citizenship and the ability to obtain and maintain the clearance level stated above are required for this specific opportunity. Tria Federal (Tria) is unable to sponsor at this time.",-1,Tria Federal (Tria),"Reston, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Model e Customer Business Systems",$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Ford is redefining how it will build a better world for the future by creating a culture and opportunities where employees will capitalize on Ford’s excellence in designing and building the most iconic products while also helping develop the future of world-class connected Battery Electric Vehicles (BEV). We call this new business Model e. The creation of Model e was informed by the success of small, passionate Ford teams that developed the Mustang Mach-E SUV and F-150 Lightning pickup, as well as Ford’s dedicated EV division in China. Similarly, dedicated teams within Model e will create the software platforms and fully networked vehicle architectures to support delightful, always-on and ever-improving vehicles and experiences that will allow us to deliver over 50% of our total sales in BEV and 33 million connected vehicles by 2030. We are building a team of the world’s best software, electrical and automotive talent and turning them loose to create shockingly great electric vehicles and digital experiences for new generations of customers. These changes in our business will allow us the greatest opportunity to bring value and serve customers since Henry Ford scaled the Model T.",4.0,"Ford Motor Company
4.0","Detroit, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"We are a leading financial services provider committed to making decisions easier and lives better for our customers and colleagues around the world. From our environmental initiatives to our community investments, we lead with values throughout our business. To help us stand out, we help you step up, because when colleagues are healthy, respected and meaningfully challenged, we all thrive. Discover how you can grow your career, make impact and drive real change with our Winning Team today.
Working Arrangement
Hybrid
Job Description
Boston, Massachusetts
$83,440.00 USD - $154,960.00 USD
Company: John Hancock Life Insurance Company (U.S.A.)",4.0,"John Hancock
4.0","Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"ICON International is seeking a Data Scientist to join our growing Data Science department within the ICON Technology Group (ITG), focusing on developing and implementing data solutions for our media fulfillment departments. The ideal candidate will be a key contributor and will work directly with internal stakeholders to define requirements and craft deliverables that meet or exceed stakeholder needs.
Our Data Science team supports ICON’s core business by delivering solutions that increase profitability via insightful reporting and achieve cost savings through automation. We leverage Domo as our primary data visualization tool, giving our executives real-time views of the business and giving users actionable daily reporting. Domo is powered by data sources from ODBC SQL queries, API connectors, and Excel uploads. Candidates should be adept at pulling data from a variety of sources (e.g., Facebook, Twitter, Google Campaign Manager) via API connectors, and transforming data through Domo’s ETL functionality and/or programming languages (particularly VBA or Python). Candidate should also be comfortable leveraging technology to implement automation in our processes to streamline data reporting and compress delivery timelines.",3.5,"ICON International
3.5","Stamford, CT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Type: Full-Time
Primary Location: US
Education: Bachelor’s Degree
Salary Range: 12 week Program
Job Description
There is no doubt that banking and financial services represent the most complex data & domain environment in existence today. Due to a lost decade brought on by the financial crisis in 2008, today’s banks are only now beginning their data journey. Over the coming decade, the sector will change inexorably. The challenges of helping achieve this change will be led by an elite group of data experts who start their careers over this period. Prospect 33’s Global Data Lab will give you the opportunity to take a deep dive into the full project life cycle and work in this complex domain & data environment to gain real-world experience and critical domain knowledge. This is not your typical training course; this is a real-world project training environment designed to overcome the critical challenge of preparing a group of data scientists with little to no experience in financial services to become the leaders of our industry tomorrow. Our program combines our deep domain knowledge with real-world data science solutions in an immersive three-month program. You will still have instructional sessions and mentors to lean on, however, the primary focus will be on a project that is a piece of a larger whole and defined at the time of the cohort’s start. You will be working on something that has not yet been done in the industry. We work directly with our clients to find a project that can drive the industry forward and lead to innovation. You won’t have to work on those canned, boring projects like customer churn predictions; this is uncharted territory where you won’t be working on anything that you’d be able to find in another program. Our goal is to show the client what is possible, and through that demonstrate your skills and value to them so that they will hire you to help them realize the full solution in their environment.",4.6,"Prospect 33
4.6","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist (Artificial Intelligence / Machine Learning),$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"ABS Group is a global company that provides data-driven risk and reliability solutions and technical services that help our clients enhance the safety, integrity, quality, and environmental efficiency of their critical assets and operations.
In this Data Scientist (AI/ML) position, you will analyze data complex datasets from a federal agency and implement complex algorithms to increase efficiency. Analyses will involve critical thinking and moderate statistical analysis to unravel complex and often messy data. The ideal candidate is a team player, critical thinker, and problem solver who enjoys working in a dynamic, collaborative environment. If you are a motivated self-starter with intellectual curiosity, we’re just what you’re looking for.
Responsibilities:
Translate client needs and project tasking into individual, actionable next steps",3.7,"ABS Consulting
3.7","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Context Labs is seeking a Data Scientist to support the deployment of Context Labs’ Decarbonization as a Service™ platform, built on our Immutably™ Data Fabric technology. The candidate will perform research and analysis required by customer projects to deploy data-driven business products related to greenhouse gas mitigation within the energy industry. Responsibilities include the design and implementation of pipelines for ingestion, provenance, visualization, and analysis of data from a wide variety of data sources, building and testing predictive models using machine learning and advanced statistics, with a strong emphasis on the latter. This is a diverse role requiring skills from software development to applied mathematics and statistics. This role will report to the Chief Data & Analytics Officer.

Responsibilities",-1,Context Labs,"Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Engineer,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture,

Assemble large, complex data sets that meet functional / non-functional business requirements.
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL and AWS ‘big data’ technologies.
Build analytics tools that utilize the data pipeline to provide actionable insights into customer acquisition, operational efficiency and other key business performance metrics.

Required Skills:",4.1,"Tek Ninjas
4.1",Texas,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"JLL supports the Whole You, personally and professionally.

Our people at JLL are shaping the future of real estate for a better world by combining world class services, advisory and technology to our clients. We are committed to hiring the best, most talented people in our industry; and we support them through professional growth, flexibility, and personalized benefits to manage life in and outside of work. Whether you’ve got deep experience in commercial real estate, skilled trades, and technology, or you’re looking to apply your relevant experience to a new industry, we empower you to shape a brighter way forward so you can thrive professionally and personally.

About the role:
JLL Technologies Enterprise Analytics team is a central organization that oversees JLL’s data strategy. Enterprise Analytics is an internal consulting team that provides data driven expertise to various business and support functions. The Data Scientist 2 is an experienced role that combines data-driven story-telling and business process analysis. If you have a penchant for using data to drive insight which helps different functions within JLL frame decisions and drive action, then this is the role for you. The successful candidate is a curious problem-solver and self-starter that thrives in a fast-paced environment.


Develop, execute and monitor complex insights and analytical solutions to business problems using a variety of analytical approaches and methodologies.

Analyze performance trends and identify areas of opportunity to solve a business problem. Prepare and present findings and analysis to stakeholders and ensure alignment with objectives and goals - drive faster, smarter data driven decisions.

Generate revenue or cost save opportunities through data-driven insights and proactively identify opportunities to optimize the performance and efficiency of existing processes/procedures.

Keep track of new technologies to get ahead of competition and create analytics as a competitive advantage for JLL. Proactively identify new analytics techniques to develop differentiated analytics solutions to drive results.

Monitor data / information management processes to ensure data quality and consistency in support of business initiatives. This includes acquiring new data sources and performing data discovery to understand data values and relationships.

Ensure proper escalation, prioritization and remediation of data quality issues.

Explore and utilize new data mining and data visualization tools to conduct ad-hoc analysis as required.

Mentor less experienced analysts on standards and techniques to improve their accuracy and efficiency.


2-5 years of work experience in risk, audit, retail, healthcare, marketing or operations analytics.

Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field such as Statistics, Mathematics, Analytics, Econometrics or Data Science and Information Management. Advance degree preferred.

Extensive experience in descriptive, prescriptive and predictive analytics.

2-5 years of strong programming experience with SQL, Python, R or other data mining and analysis tools.

Ability to quickly understand, process and consume industrial scale databases using one of these tools.

Experience in technologies including CRM (SalesForce, Microsoft Dynamics) and/or Advanced Analytics (Microsoft Azure, Databricks) is a plus.

2-5 years of experience developing insights and dashboards using a BI tool such as Cognos, Power BI or Tableau.

Advanced skills using Excel and PowerPoint.

Effective written and verbal communication skills, including technical writing to work with multiple cross- functional teams.

Experience with data architecture, data integration/ETL and/or data warehousing deployed in a complex environment is a plus.

If this job description resonates with you, we encourage you to apply even if you don’t meet all of the requirements below. We’re interested in getting to know you and what you bring to the table!

Personalized benefits that support personal well-being and growth:

JLL recognizes the impact that the workplace can have on your wellness, so we offer a supportive culture and comprehensive benefits package that prioritizes mental, physical and emotional health.

About JLL –

We’re JLL—a leading professional services and investment management firm specializing in real estate. We have operations in over 80 countries and a workforce of over 102,000 individuals around the world who help real estate owners, occupiers and investors achieve their business ambitions. As a global Fortune 500 company, we also have an inherent responsibility to drive sustainability and corporate social responsibility. That’s why we’re committed to our purpose to shape the future of real estate for a better world. We’re using the most advanced technology to create rewarding opportunities, amazing spaces and sustainable real estate solutions for our clients, our people, and our communities.

Our core values of teamwork, ethics and excellence are also fundamental to everything we do and we’re honored to be recognized with awards for our success by organizations both globally and locally.

Creating a diverse and inclusive culture where we all feel welcomed, valued and empowered to achieve our full potential is important to who we are today and where we’re headed in the future. And we know that unique backgrounds, experiences and perspectives help us think bigger, spark innovation and succeed together.",3.9,"JLL
3.9","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
AI Engineer/Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Benefits/Perks
Competitive Compensation
Flexible Scheduling
Career Growth Opportunities
Job Summary
We are seeking a detail-oriented Data Scientist to join our team. As a Data Scientist, you will analyze large amounts of raw data to discover patterns and insights that will help to improve our company. We will rely on you to collect and analyze data, build models, and present your findings in an easy-to-understand manner. The ideal candidate has an analytical mind and a passion for data.

Responsibilities",-1,TLC Millimeterwave Products Inc,"Minneapolis, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Machine Learning Engineer,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"HOW MIGHT YOU DEFY IMAGINATION?
You’ve worked hard to become the professional you are today and are now ready to take the next step in your career. How will you put your skills, experience and passion to work toward your goals? At Amgen, our shared mission—to serve patients—drives all that we do. It is key to our becoming one of the world’s leading biotechnology companies, reaching over 10 million patients worldwide. Come do your best work alongside other innovative, driven professionals in this meaningful role.
Senior Machine Learning Engineer
Live
What you will do
Let’s do this. Let’s change the world. In this vital role you will be part of the technical/engineering team, develop data flow pipelines to extract, transform, and load data from various data sources in various data format to enterprise data lake and data warehouse system in three regions in AWS, provide data analytics and predictive analysis to business users. We look for people who can work in a team, able to mentor junior engineers, is curious to learn and able to develop data engineering and machine learning engineering solution in a fast-moving environment.

Join Us

If you're seeking a career where you can truly make a difference in the lives of others, a career where you can work at the absolute forefront of biotechnology with the top minds in the field, you'll find it at Amgen.

Amgen, a biotechnology pioneer, discovers, develops and delivers innovative human therapeutics. Our medicines have helped millions of patients in the fight against cancers, kidney disease, rheumatoid arthritis and other serious illnesses.

As an organization dedicated to improving the quality of life for people around the world, Amgen fosters an inclusive environment of diverse, ethical, committed and highly accomplished people who respect each other but compete intensely to win. Together, we live the Amgen values as we continue advancing science to serve patients.

Amgen is an Equal Opportunity employer and will consider all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or disability status.

We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation.",4.1,"Amgen
4.1","Thousand Oaks, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Staff Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"About us
At Udemy, we're on a mission to improve lives through the power of learning. We're a leading global learning company and one of the world's largest education platforms, with more than 59 million learners. Our goal is to provide flexible, effective skill development to empower organizations and individuals.
Talented people are everywhere, and the right opportunity can be hard to come by. That's why we're focused on revolutionizing learning, using our skills and expertise to help others develop theirs and reach their full potential. Individually, we bring our unique perspective to reimagine the way we share knowledge. Together, we can improve lives by making learning more accessible for our learners, our instructors, and businesses around the world.",4.1,"Udemy
4.1","Denver, CO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Description:
Recruitment service provider(s) do not contact COE to offer recruiting assistance for this position.
About COE
Have you ever dreamed of going to a job that you love? Well, you need to look no further - COE is an award-winning workplace with a balanced focus on client, employee, and company. We offer competitive benefits and a flexible environment focused on your success. We encourage all interested candidates to apply! It’s time to see if COE is the right place for the next step in your career - we are ready to invest in you!
As an EEO employer, COE celebrates diversity and is committed to creating an inclusive environment of equitability where equal opportunities are available to all applicants and COE employees. Qualified candidates will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status.



From: The Center For Organizational Excellence, Inc",3.8,"The Center For Organizational Excellence, Inc
3.8","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Source Systems is now inviting the brightest, creative and passionate minds to become a part of our Data Scientist Internship Program. Work with our industry experts to gain unrivaled knowledge at both the strategic level (generating bold and innovative ideas for data science-driven growth) and at the tactical level across multiple teams (building and testing hypotheses, creating predictive analytics models, incorporating findings into proof points supporting product launches). These invaluable experiences will greatly increase your skills and value to employers. We know what it takes to leverage powerful data systems that are used to provide important results for company planning and key decision making.
Job Description
A position at Source Systems is a rich experience that cannot be duplicated in any other learning/working environment. We are looking for a Data Scientist Intern that helps us discover the information hidden in vast amounts of data, and help us make smarter decisions to deliver even better products. Your primary focus will be in applying data mining techniques, doing statistical analysis, and building high-quality prediction systems integrated with our products.",2.2,"Source Enterprises
2.2","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Title:
Data Scientist
The KBR team in Colorado Springs, CO is seeking a highly motivated Data Scientist to join us in supporting our great nation, specifically on the Air Force Tactical Exploitation of National Capabilities (TENCAP) IRAD contract.
Air Force TENCAP exploits National space, cyber and intelligence capabilities to deliver rapid, cost-dominant and innovative warfighting solutions across the full spectrum of Air Force and Joint military missions. AF TENCAP is a Congressionally mandated rapid acquisition organization supporting tactical and operational warfighters and serves as the Air Force executive agent for the Military Exploitation of Reconnaissance and Intelligence Technologies (MERIT) program. As the Air Force's leader for National-to-Tactical capability development, AF TENCAP collaborates with leading experts across the Intelligence Community, Department of Defense, National Laboratories, industry, inter-agency, academia, and partner nations.",3.9,"KBR
3.9","Colorado Springs, CO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Junior Scientific Programmer/Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"All required qualifications must be documented on application materials.
Required Qualifications:
B.A./B.S. in Computer Science/Math/Statistics/Physics/Informatics or related technical disciplines and 2 years of related experience or a combination of education and experience in a research or technical environment to equal six (6) years.
Experience with R or Matlab or Python. Experience with SQL.
Experience writing code for complex computer programs independently. Please provide a link to samples of your code available online (Github or similar services).
Experience with basic machine learning or statistical methods.",4.2,"University of Minnesota
4.2","Minneapolis, MN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Overviews
Location:
Salt Lake City, UTAH
Job Title:
Data Engineer
Experience:
9 Years
Employement:
Full Time",5.0,"CloudBerg Tec
5.0","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Bioinformatics Research Scientist- Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"St. Jude Children's Research Hospital has an exciting opportunity for a Senior Bioinformatic Research Scientist in the NeuroImage Analysis Core.
The NeuroImage Analysis core is in the Department of Developmental Neurobiology (DNB) is a team of computational scientists with a focus on turning image data into biological knowledge. We utilize computational tools at the cross-section of biology and cutting-edge microscopy methods to understand how brains are built during development and how neurons function in the brain and malfunction in disease. Explore the nexus of image analysis and data science. Dive into our unique and complex data, tackling neurobiology's toughest challenges through innovative computational research. Join us, simplify the intricate, and make a real difference.
This role is eligible for St. Jude’s alternating work mode.",4.6,"St. Jude Children's Research Hospital
4.6","Memphis, TN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Principal Data Scientist,$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Working with Us
Challenging. Meaningful. Life-changing. Those aren’t words that are usually associated with a job. But working at Bristol Myers Squibb is anything but usual. Here, uniquely interesting work happens every day, in every department. From optimizing a production line to the latest breakthroughs in cell therapy, this is work that transforms the lives of patients, and the careers of those who do it. You’ll get the chance to grow and thrive through opportunities uncommon in scale and scope, alongside high-achieving teams rich in diversity. Take your career farther than you thought possible.
Bristol Myers Squibb recognizes the importance of balance and flexibility in our work environment. We offer a wide variety of competitive benefits, services and programs that provide our employees with the resources to pursue their goals, both at work and in their personal lives. Read more: careers.bms.com/working-with-us.",3.9,"Bristol Myers Squibb
3.9","San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Senior Data Scientist, AI",$67K - $92K (Glassdoor est.),"Hi, we're Oscar. We're hiring a Senior Data Scientist, AI to join our Data team.
Oscar is the first health insurance company built around a full stack technology platform and a focus on serving our members. We started Oscar in 2012 to create the kind of health insurance company we would want for ourselves—one that behaves like a doctor in the family.
About the Role:
As a Senior Data Scientist, AI, you will partner closely with our Product, Engineering, and Operations teams to develop workflows and insights that make it easy for teams across Oscar to leverage AI. You will build and deploy AI applications to explore and productionalize new use cases and to increase Oscar's operational efficiency. You will leverage LLMs and other advanced AI models to automate and augment existing time-consuming or error-prone workflows. Example applications include summarizing calls from members, extracting structured data from contracts and medical charts, and helping users navigate our provider directory. This work will lead to improved member experience, increased efficiency and lower costs for our members.",3.4,"Oscar Health
3.4","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist - Research (Remote),$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"We're a Little Different

Our mission is clear. We bring to life a healing ministry through our compassionate care and exceptional service.

At Mercy, we believe in careers that match the unique gifts of unique individuals - careers that not only make the most of your skills and talents, but also your heart. Join us and discover why Modern Healthcare Magazine named us in its ""Top 100 Places to Work.""

Overview: Senior Data Scientist - Research

Position can be Remote (work from home)


Mercy is seeking a Senior Data Scientist to work within a team of other advanced professional data scientists, engineers, and application developers in the generation, extraction, and compilation of data to perform creative, high-quality, state-of-the-art analyses and evaluations that produce insights, support decision-making, and drive impact within a leading and transforming healthcare organization. This position will support Mercy's efforts to deliver on the vision of personalized, predictive, and proactive care. The candidate should demonstrate expertise with data extraction, management, analysis with data analytics tools, be able deliver outputs on a timeline, and lead others in the completion of related work. The candidate should be able to effectively document, develop, and communicate project plans and analytic findings with a variety of technical/non-technical stakeholders.






Day-one comprehensive health, vision and dental coverage, PTO, tuition reimbursement and employer-matched retirement funds are just a few of the great benefits offered to eligible co-workers, including those working 32 hours or more per pay period!



At Mercy, our supportive community will be behind you every step of your day, especially the tough ones. You will have opportunities to pioneer new models of care and transform the health care experience through advanced technology and innovative procedures. We're expanding to help our communities grow. Join us and be a part of it all.



Compassion and professionalism go hand-in-hand with us. Having a positive outlook and a strong sense of advocacy is in perfect step with our mission and vision. We're also collaborative and unafraid to do a little extra to deliver excellent care - that's just part of our commitment. If that sounds like a good fit for you, we encourage you to apply.",3.6,"Mercy
3.6","Chesterfield, MO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Sales Insights",$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"About Us:
We're on a mission to make it possible for every person, team, and company to be able to tailor their software to solve any problem and take on any challenge. Computers may be our most powerful tools, but most of us can't build or modify the software we use on them every day. At Notion, we want to change this with focus, design, and craft.
We've been working on this together since 2016, and have customers like Pixar, Mitsubishi, Figma, Plaid, Match Group, and thousands more on this journey with us. Today, we're growing fast and excited for new teammates to join us who are the best at what they do. We're passionate about building a company as diverse and creative as the millions of people Notion reaches worldwide.
Notion is an in person company, and currently requires its employees to come to the office for two Anchor Days (Mondays & Thursdays) and requests that employees spend the majority of their week in the office (including a third day).",4.9,"Notion
4.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Summary: T3i is looking to hire an experienced and motivated Data Scientist to join our Team.

Required Skills and Experience:
Active Top Secret Security Clearance with SSBI.
Bachelors Degree in Mathematics, Physics, Statistics or related field.
Minimum five (5) years of professional software / algorithm development.
Experience with software development lifecycle and use of associated tools.
Proficient in Python, R, Matlab, Lua, or other data science-centric programming language.
Mathematical knowledge of optimization, multivariate calculus, probability & statistics, linear algebra, and numerical methods.",3.7,"T3i, Inc.
3.7","Aurora, CO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Clinical Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Responsibilities:
Work alongside statisticians and data management to perform in-depth exploration of raw data collected from various sources, such as clinical trials, real-world, and public domain data. Guide evidence-based product development by extracting therapeutic intelligence from such data sources.
Use strong programming skills for data analysis involving cleaning and transforming raw data, creating insightful visualizations, designing new attributes, studying data quality, correlations and distributions, and quantifying results.
Implement advanced machine learning techniques (classification, regression, clustering) to train predictive models, identify patterns and trends, tune model performance, and handle overfitting.",3.9,"Otsuka
3.9","Princeton, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"To support the continued growth of our enterprise, we are seeking a Data Scientist to utilize advanced analytics to provide accurate, relevant, and actionable insights that enable us to maintain and improve the profitability of all Colony Brands catalog titles. If you possess a passion for innovative analysis and cross-functional collaboration – this could be the place for you! You’ll develop models using a variety of statistical techniques, produce model prediction adjustments based on historical data and prepare reports outlining the testing and validation of each model. You’ll develop robust and flexible processes for major analytical production tasks and create automated, fail-safe tools for standard analytical tasks such as predictive modeling, profiling and clustering.

You’ll also be responsible for:",3.8,"Colony Brands, Inc.
3.8","Monroe, WI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"WellTrust Medical is actively seeking an accomplished Data Scientist to drive independent data science, machine learning, and analytical insights using member, financial, and organizational data. Your role will play a pivotal part in facilitating mission-critical decision-making processes across various facets of our organization. Your responsibilities will encompass understanding business requirements, and recognizing opportunities for innovation in products, services, and process enhancements through cutting-edge data science techniques. You'll craft descriptive, predictive, and prescriptive models and insights to instigate impactful change throughout our organization.
Responsibilities:
Build and maintain reports using My SQL Server",-1,WellTrust Medical Group,"Charlotte, NC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Description:

Handle large datasets, coding advanced analytical models to perform data analysis, and developing predictive models.
Build broad range of statistical models, predictive modeling, acquisition, cross-sell, up-sell, segmentation, retention, risk assessment, sales forecasting, and customer loyalty using classical statistical/econometric methods, data mining approaches, and machine learning.
Collaborate with infrastructure architects in assessing and addressing the requirements for more automated, streamlined systems and for the data governance required for agile and responsive data manipulation.",-1,Cloudwick,"Newark, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Archetype’s Analytic Insights consulting practice develops insights for our customers through innovative technology solutions. Archetype sees the value in data science and self-service analytics, providing these capabilities to our customers. At Archetype, you will get to work with the best of breed products that include Snowflake, Fivetran, dbt, Tableau, ThoughtSpot, Dataiku, DataRobot and partner with our strong growing consulting team.
Job Description
Archetype is seeking a Data Scientist to work with our customers and prospects to educate them on machine learning best practices and implantation. This role’s responsibilities include:
Working with prospects’, customer’ and Archetype’s executives, data analyst, product managers, data architects, and engineers to define requirements, design solutions, and build/test/deploy these solutions",4.2,"Archetype
4.2","Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"The Data Scientist will work with business units and data teams to solve large scale strategic problems and identify value generation opportunities through the use of advanced data models and algorithms.
The ideal candidate must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/analysis methods, developing algorithms and simulations, and deploying and maintaining data solutions. They will also have to balance highly technical problem-solving with communicating results and project status updates with technical and non-technical leaders.
Apply Machine Learning, Reinforcement Learning, and Numerical Optimization to tackle complex challenges ranging from pipeline operations to supply chain optimization.
Required
Preferred",4.2,"Magellan Midstream Holdings GP, LLC
4.2","Tulsa, OK",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Overview:
Oasis has an exciting opportunity for a Data Scientist located at the Redstone Arsenal in Huntsville, AL. In your role as a Data Scientist, you will use statistical techniques to plan tests and analyze and interpret data. Data Scientists are expected to use statistical techniques to help test teams make better decisions and improve their operations.

LOCATION: Redstone Arsenal, AL
TRAVEL:",4.4,"Oasis Systems LLC
4.4","Huntsville, AL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Description
The ideal candidate should possess hands-on engineering experience using machine learning and statistical tools to leverage data management and customer experience. This role will also be involved with our client’s Innovation team which aims at building up next generation digital platform to bring completely new experiences to their customers.
Competencies
Excellent communication skills and ability to communicate with our clients in the US.
Bachelor’s degree in a computational science with over 2 years of postgraduate work experience in Machine Learning/Statistics/Data Science. Master’s degree is preferred.",-1,The Transformation Group,"New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Location: New York, NY
Department: Science
Type: Full Time
Min. Experience: Mid Level
As a member of RISIRISA Team, you will be joining an interdisciplinary group of scientists, mathematicians, designers, and engineers that work with commercial, public and social sector clients to help them solve their most challenging problems and get the most out of their data.
As a Data Scientist, you will apply your mathematical, scientific, and/or economic training to analyze large volumes of data, model complex human-scale problems, and develop algorithms to serve various needs.",-1,RISIRISA,"New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Offchain Labs has developed a suite of scaling solutions for Ethereum. This includes Arbitrum, an Optimistic Rollup, that instantly scales apps, reducing costs and increasing capacity, without sacrificing Ethereum's security. Porting contracts to Arbitrum requires no code changes or downloads since it’s compatible with existing Ethereum developer languages and tooling. Arbitrum today is the leading Ethereum scaling solution with dominant market share including hundreds of apps on the platform and over 50% of all rollup liquidity.

Our team is extremely passionate and works tirelessly to bridge the gap between what blockchain is and what blockchain can be. We strive to maintain an atmosphere that fosters innovation and new ideas through collaboration, research, and deep discussions. After raising an initial round of $3.8M in seed funding in January 2019 and a $20M series A, as well as a $100M series B in 2021, we are ready to hire additional team members that have an interest in working in the blockchain space and a knack for approaching problems in unconventional ways",5.0,"Offchain Labs
5.0",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist (Secret Clearance),$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Description:

The Amivero Team
Amivero’s team of IT professionals delivers digital services that elevate the federal government, whether national security or improved government services. Our human-centered, data-driven approach is focused on truly understanding the environment and the challenge, and reimagining with our customer how outcomes can be achieved.
Our team of technologists leverage modern, agile methods to design and develop equitable, accessible, and innovative data and software services that impact hundreds of millions of people.
As a member of the Amivero team you will use your empathy for a customer’s situation, your passion for service, your energy for solutioning, and your bias towards action to bring modernization to very important, mission-critical, and public service government IT systems.
Requirements:",4.5,"Amivero
4.5",Florida,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Data science and computer vision are the heart of our products at Orbital Insight. We live at the intersection of all our company’s engineering, product, partnerships, and solution engineering efforts. We deeply understand all geospatial data sources we bring into our TerraScope Platform, including satellite and aerial imagery, and a wide array of geolocation data. We understand our customers’ business questions, pain points, and how our products aim to answer those questions and soothe those pains. Our Model Engineering team builds algorithms and capabilities that expose the valuable information contained within the multitudes of data we ingest and put it into context for our customers. We strive to define, and continually refine, the State-of-the-Art in AI and analytics, and are on our way to building the best data science team in the world for large scale automated analysis of geospatial data sources.

As a member of our data science team, you will have the opportunity to tackle new and interesting machine learning problems and work with a brilliant team of scientists and engineers. Our team has a true passion for data and a commitment to building the highest performing models and products for our customers. If you join us, you’ll have the freedom to approach, own, and solve problems creatively. Come be a part of our journey to build the world’s best team in AI and analytics for geospatial data.",4.6,"Orbital Insight
4.6","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Quantitative Researcher (Data Scientist),$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Summary
Quantitative Researchers at Atto Trading are responsible for building models, strategies for our automated trading system. As a mix of the trading and software developer roles, this work involves many things: analyzing large datasets, building and testing models, creating new trading strategies, and writing the code that implements them.
The successful candidate will join the team of existing researchers. In addition to possessing excellent analytical and technical skills, the successful candidate will be a creative problem solver and a strong team player.
Responsibilities",-1,Atto Trading,"Miami Beach, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Overview:
Bigbear.ai is seeking an experienced Data Scientist to join our team to support an exciting opportunity as part of our Virtual Anticipation Network (VANE) and Dominate Federal Product efforts. This position will be fully remote within the United States.

This is an opportunity to be part of one of the fastest growing AI/ML companies in the industry. At BigBear.ai, we're in this business together. We own it, we make it thrive, and we enjoy the challenges of our work. We know that our employees play the largest role in our continual success. That is why we foster an environment of growth and development, with an emphasis on opportunity, recognition, and work-life balance. We give the same high level of commitment to our employees that we give to our clients. If BigBear.ai sounds like the place where you want to be, we'd enjoy speaking with you.
What you will do:
What you need to have:
What we'd like you to have:
About BigBear.ai:",3.1,"Bigbear.ai
3.1","Columbia, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Engineer,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Job ID: 2212770
Location: MCLEAN, VA, US
Date Posted: 2022-08-24
Category: Information Technology
Subcategory: Data Scientist
Schedule: Full-time
Shift: Day Job
Travel: No


Covid Policy: SAIC does not require COVID-19 vaccinations or boosters. Customer site vaccination requirements must be followed when work is performed at a customer site.",4.0,"SAIC
4.0","McLean, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist (Datasets) - New York,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"** Must have at least a BS in Computer Science and at least 3 years of work experience after graduation from university.
** Please do not apply if you don't have hands-on experience with large-scale foundation dataset/data distribution building.

About The Role
Reality Defender seeks a data scientist to join the R&D team. You’d work on product-oriented methods for generative (deepfake) audio, image and video detection and tackle cutting-edge deep learning.

Responsibilities
You can independently create, curate and model bias for large-scale multimodal dataset.",-1,Reality Defender,"New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"We create possibilities that move life and commerce forward
Welcome to Manhattan Associates. Our supply chain commerce technology positively affects how people on six continents work, shop and live. If you want to tackle complex problems, push limits and redefine what’s possible, you’ve come to the right place.
As a Data Scientist within Manhattan Associate’s Global R&D organization, you will contribute to the research, evolution, innovation, and productionalization of advanced analytic methods, Data Science, Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning capabilities across our industry leading Supply Chain solutions. As a member of the Data Science Team, you will help with the analysis and solution designs of complex analytical supply chain management problems using a variety of methods from Predictive Analytics, Forecasting, Statistical Analysis and Modeling, Data Science, Simulation, AI and Machine Learning to ensure that the analytical business tasks and processes used within our solutions have been reliably and accurately modeled and productionalized. You will be viewed a strong practitioner within the disciplines of Analytics, Data Science, and/or Machine Learning.",4.1,"Manhattan Associates
4.1","Atlanta, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Join our collaborative and global team as a Data Scientist within Business Technology Solutions (BTS), supporting the Global Compound Logistics and Operations (GCLO) organization. In this role, you will have the opportunity to apply your lab experience to develop and enhance your business-tech skills while contributing to AbbVie's mission of positively impacting patients' lives by advancing the future of medicine. Our organization invests in your customized career development, providing you with the tools and resources needed to succeed.
In this role you will be responsible for:
Working closely with the Global Compound Logistics and Operations (GCLO) organization to understand business workflows and requirements and translate them into technical specifications and solutions.",3.9,"ABBVIE
3.9","Worcester, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Epidemiology Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Madison, Wisconsin
SCHOOL OF MEDICINE AND PUBLIC HEALTH/INFORMATICS AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Research
Remote
Staff-Full Time
Opening at: Aug 29 2023 at 11:10 CDT
Closing at: Sep 17 2023 at 23:55 CDT
285608-AS",4.9,"University of Wisconsin–Madison
4.9","Madison, WI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Company Description

Chubb is the world’s largest publicly traded property and casualty insurer. With operations in 54 countries, Chubb provides commercial and personal property and casualty insurance, personal accident and supplemental health insurance, reinsurance and life insurance to a diverse group of clients. The company is distinguished by its extensive product and service offerings, broad distribution capabilities, exceptional financial strength, underwriting excellence, superior claims handling expertise and local operations globally.

Key Objectives

This position will bring knowledge and expertise in modeling methodologies, dataset generation and transformation, statistical programming and analysis to Chubb. Opportunities will exist to work in a dynamic environment on a broad spectrum of global analytical initiatives, impacting underwriting and marketing. The role will be responsible for applying statistical and data mining techniques to identify profitable growth areas and optimize portfolio performance. The person will be expected to understand and analyze insurance risk factors and articulate results to the various stakeholders, including but not limited to underwriters, product managers and actuarial. The p osition can be based in either Philadelphia, PA or Jersey City, NJ.

Major Duties and Responsibilities

Build predictive models and analytic solutions, with minimal supervision, to support the underwriting and marketing functions within Chubb.
Assist in brainstorming potential data sources that may contain predictive variables. Identify, acquire, evaluate, and document data from these various sources, both internal and external.
Collaborate in extracting and manipulating data using data management tools from internal and external data sources.
Understand and combine data from various sources to create analytics data sets. Develop a strong working knowledge of how current systems and data sources are populated and sourced.
Analyze data, draw meaningful conclusions, and assist in developing solutions to help drive profitability and/or growth.
Introduce novel methodologies, algorithms, tools, and technologies to solve assigned problems.
Collaborate with other analytics teams (i.e., Applied AI, Emerging Risks) to achieve objectives.
Build partnerships with key counterparts.
Communicate and present findings to business partners to ensure successful integration of projects into business process. Proactively follow up on any issues that were raised during presentations.
Participate in developing solutions to implement models into production. Work with I/T in the design and testing of models.
Monitor the performance and usage of models. Ensure that the reports suit the needs of the audience.
Create and maintain clear and concise documentation associated with models.
Support business requests which require statistical analysis.
May lead a small team of direct reports (1-2 analysts). Create goals, oversee projects on a regular basis and provide timely feedback.
Provide training guidance and assistance to colleagues.

Qualifications
Desired Qualifications

Minimum of a Bachelor’s Degree, preferably in Statistics, Mathematics, Analytics or Computer Science. Advanced degree in Statistics or Predictive Analytics is strongly preferred.
3+ years of predictive analytics experience, preferably in the insurance industry.
Understanding of business challenges, design analytical solutions, using advanced modeling techniques and synthesize insights to business decision making process.
Intermediate knowledge in statistical analysis and multivariate procedures. Knowledge of Machine Learning techniques and AI is a plus.
Experience with a statistical package (Python, R) and/or data management (SQL) and/or programming is required . Experience with GitHub and Databricks is a plus.
Experience with text analytics, including NLP, is a plus.
Proficient in Microsoft Suite applications.
Excellent oral and written communication skills. Ability to articulate an understanding of their work products.
Able to complete analytical tasks independently with some guidance, if necessary.
Strong organizational skills, able to work well under deadlines in a changing environment and perform multiple tasks effectively and concurrently. Produces accurate work products in a timely manner.
Ability and desire to work in a fast-paced, team-oriented environment.
Business experience and knowledge of P&C industry is a plus.

In Jersey City, NJ the pay range for the role is $59,000 to $93,000. The specific offer will depend on an applicant’s skills and other factors. This role may also be eligible to participate in a discretionary annual incentive program. Chubb offers a comprehensive benefits package, more details on which can be found at https://careers.chubb.com/global/en/north-america . This range is specific to Jersey City, NJ and may not be applicable to other locations.
EEO Statement
At Chubb, we are committed to equal employment opportunity and compliance with all laws and regulations pertaining to it. Our policy is to provide employment, training, compensation, promotion,and other conditions or opportunities of employment, without regard to race, color, religious creed, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, marital status, national origin,ancestry, mental and physical disability, medical condition, genetic information, military and veteran status, age, and pregnancy or any other characteristic protected by law.Performance and qualifications are the only basis upon which we hire, assign, promote, compensate, develop and retain employees. Chubb prohibits all unlawful discrimination, harassment and retaliationagainst any individual who reports discrimination or harassment.",3.7,"Chubb INA Holdings Inc.
3.7","Philadelphia, PA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Join a team of the top 1%.

We believe in attracting and retaining the brightest technical minds from diverse backgrounds and nationalities to come together and create an enriched pool of global talent. Recognized as one of North America's fastest-growing companies, we aim to attract people who are passionate about technology and creating a real impact while working in collaborative environment with the latest technologies.

Our mission is to solve our client's most complex digital challenges by engaging the brightest of technical minds. We are looking for candidates who thrive in an innovative and collaborative environment who love solving problems and having fun while doing it.

Location: Foster City, CA (onsite)


Apply machine learning algorithms and statistical models to solve complex business problems and generate actionable insights.

Design, develop, and implement data science solutions, including feature engineering, model development, and evaluation.

Architect scalable and efficient data pipelines for data preprocessing, feature extraction, and model training.

Conduct exploratory data analysis (EDA) to understand data characteristics, identify patterns, and gain insights into data quality and availability.

Mentor and lead junior data scientists, providing technical guidance and fostering their growth and development.

Communicate complex analytical concepts and findings to both technical and non-technical stakeholders in a clear and concise manner.

Stay updated with the latest advancements in machine learning algorithms, tools, and techniques.


Bachelors or Masters degree in a quantitative field such as Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, or related disciplines.

Minimum of 5 years of experience in data science, with a focus on machine learning and exploratory data analysis.

Proficiency in machine learning algorithms, statistical models, and their practical application.

Strong programming skills in languages such as Python or R for data manipulation, model development, and evaluation.

Solid understanding of data preprocessing techniques, feature engineering, and model evaluation methods.

Experience in designing and implementing scalable data pipelines for preprocessing, feature extraction, and model training.

Strong problem-solving and analytical skills, with the ability to think critically and creatively.

Excellent communication and leadership skills, with the ability to mentor and lead junior data scientists.

Experience with end-to-end problem solving and ownership for at least one major thread of a data science project

Familiarity with the technological stack needed to deliver data science projects end to end - Git or any other VCS, orchestration tools etc.


Experience with ML on cloud-based data platforms and services, such as AWS, Azure, or Google Cloud Platform

Experience with deep learning frameworks such as TensorFlow or PyTorch.

Familiarity with big data technologies such as Hadoop, Spark, or distributed computing frameworks.

Knowledge of natural language processing (NLP) techniques and tools.

Proficiency in data visualization tools, such as Plotly or Matplotlib, for presenting insights and results.

Active participation in data science communities, conferences, or open-source projects.

Publications or patents in the field of data science or machine learning.

Great teams do amazing things, but truly diverse teams are the ones who can achieve extraordinary results, together. You can build your dream career at Accolite/Xerris in a culture of learning, inclusion, and openness. We encourage applications from everyone regardless of race, religion, colour, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, or disability status.

Is this you? If so, come join us to transform the future with the top tech talent to solve real-world business problems.",3.8,"Accolite
3.8","Foster City, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Architect / Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Description
Will be a member of the Global Business Intelligence team in a role spanning both Data Science and Data Architect functions
- working with BI developers/business analysts as well as business teams to determine analysis opportunities using a variety of data types (structured, unstructured) and sources (internal enterprise Data Warehouse, public cloud and external SaaS).
Partner and collaborate with other IST and business teams in strategic projects including Project ONE (replatform of applications to Salesforce.com) to innovate around analytics, identifying new sources of data, and overall project strategy support.
Translating business needs into an efficient and effective analysis plan, performing and managing execution of analysis, and translating findings into insight in an effort to ensure adoption and business integration.",4.1,"Mary Kay Inc
4.1","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Data Scientist
Job Category: Science
Time Type: Full time
Minimum Clearance Required to Start: TS/SCI
Employee Type: Regular
Percentage of Travel Required: Up to 10%
Type of Travel: Local
CACI has openings for Data Scientist at the Army’s National Ground Intelligence Center (NGIC) as part of Identity Intelligence Analytical Support (I2AS) Program.


Company Overview: At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, status as a protected veteran, or any other protected characteristic.",4.0,"CACI
4.0","Charlottesville, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Lead Data Scientist
Join an expert team that is breaking records in real-time Big Data performance
Change the way the world manipulates and analyzes large quantities of data
Address our customer’s data pain points and delight them with your solutions
SpaceCurve is building Big Data analytic solutions focused on spatial, temporal, sensor and graph applications. Targeting mobile, life sciences, oil and gas and government markets. Our unique database technology can power real-time models of reality. We are enabling completely new applications and radical enhancements to existing applications.
The role:",3.3,"SpaceCurve
3.3","Seattle, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Working Hours : Full Time
Locations : Livonia, Michigan

Soothsayer is seeking Data Scientist who has an interest in solving challenging ML/ AI problems. The Data Science team works on a variety of exciting analytics (ML, AI) projects.
Job Responsibilities
Solve cutting edge, challenging problems working alongside a great team of world class data scientists and analytics experts",2.9,"Soothsayer Analytics
2.9","Livonia, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Short-term trading desk Data Scientist (m/f/t),$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Short-term trading desk Data Scientist (m/f/t)
Location(s):
Chicago, IL, US, 60654
RWE Supply & Trading Americas, LLC
To start as soon as possible, full time, permanent
Your future plans
As a data scientist within the Short-term trading team of the Commercial Asset Optimization Department, you will utilize existing corporate and external data sources, build your own data pools and analyze all commodity-related market data in close collaboration with the traders. It is the purpose of this position to create trading ideas based on your findings and provide a thorough risk-return-analysis. The focus is on data related to the asset portfolio of solar and wind power generation across the US. Additionally, you will support the battery optimization activities, i.e. improve the algorithms for dispatch decisions in collaboration with in-house expert groups. Being part of a small team with a very broad remit, you will have the opportunity to be deeply involved in a wide-range of topics gaining cross commodity experience – and apply your data scientist knowledge to decision making processes.",4.2,"RWE
4.2","Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$90K - $124K (Glassdoor est.),"Excella is a leading provider of Agile software development and data and analytics solutions to clients in the federal, commercial and non-profit sectors. We believe that great work leads to great things –- our experts measure success by the positive impact we make on our clients, community, and colleagues. We are growing fast and need passionate, innovative people who love working with technology and are ready to make an impact. Here's what you can expect from us:
Workplace sites look different for everyone – whether it's your home or the office, we believe in a flexible work/life balance that supports you regardless of your location. We offer a home office allowance that can be used for home office furniture/equipment, a daily pass for a coworking space, etc. Our commute reimbursement plan has you covered for whether you bike, Metro, or drive to work.
We offer top of industry medical, dental, and vision benefits with multiple options to choose from such as an employer-contributed health savings account, infertility coverage, and orthodontia so you can select the plan that works best for you.",4.0,"Excella
4.0","Arlington, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Decision Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"At PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL), we believe that every person has the right to participate fully in the global economy. Our mission is to democratize financial services to ensure that everyone, regardless of background or economic standing, has access to affordable, convenient, and secure products and services to take control of their financial lives.
Job Description Summary: The Global Collections Strategy team is seeking a Decision Scientist with prior Collections and Digital Channels experience to join our organization. The ideal candidate will possess a highly developed technical skillset (SQL, Python, etc), as well as the business acumen to distill analytical results into actionable outcomes. Frequent collaboration with cross-border stakeholder teams is required as part of this role.
Job Description:
PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $84500 to $204600",4.0,"PayPal
4.0",Arkansas,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Tiktok e-commerce,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.

Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.

The Data Science team of TikTok e-commerce team plays a key role in business growth with our professional techniques, valuable insights, and problem solving skills. We are looking for talents who are passionate about content e-commerce businesses to join us to make something new.

Job description
1.Understand business logic and requirements, and translate to data analysis framework, metrics systems and dashboard;
2.Describe the situation of businesses, explain the fluctuations of business, and provide valuable suggestions with reports;
3.Driving the growth of reach/advertising, and improving ROI; exploring and optimizing the measurement of LTV and ROI;
4.Have previous experience or able to quickly learn supply chain, operation and product in the Ecommerce setting and work on finding KOL, optimizing supply chain and improving user experience;
5.Collaborate with supply chain and product teams to estimate inventory and sales, validate and improve the accuracy of the model.
Qualifications
1.Bachelor degree or above, major in mathematics, statistics, computer science is preferred; or major in science or engineering or engaged in data statistics, analysis, modeling related working areas after graduation;
2.At least 3 years of working experience in data analysis, and have a good business sense in e-commerce;
3.Proficient in SQL and tableau and familiar with Python or R for data analysis and modelling;
4.Machine learning and predictive modelling experience is a plus.
5.To succeed in the role, you need to be a proactive, self-driven and impact-driven person.
6.Be able to work with cross-functional teams in a fast-paced environment.
7.Our team encourages working smart over working hard.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at USRC@tiktok.com
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $132187 - $312000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



At ByteDance/TikTok our benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support ByteDancers to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off(PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.",3.5,"TikTok
3.5","San Jose, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Overview:
Are you keen on harnessing the potential of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML) to drive unprecedented business insights? At Apptio you'll collaborate with a dedicated team, delving into big data, unraveling its intricacies, and devising thoughtful, lasting product solutions. We're seeking individuals who appreciate thorough analysis, the nuances within data, and the crafting of effective, forward-thinking solutions. Join us in creating products that solve real problems in unique ways.
Responsibilities:
Spearhead the design, development, and deployment of ML and NLP models, ensuring they align with product objectives and goals.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, particularly product managers and engineers, to integrate models into product offerings and optimize their performance post-deployment.
Qualifications:",4.1,"Apptio
4.1","Bellevue, WA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Scientist I,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Our Clinical Informatics Team is seeking a data scientist to join our team of highly motivated and passionate scientists and engineers working to improve our understanding of disease and health. We are looking for a candidate interested in developing and implementing novel approaches in translational medicine or applying analytic and interpretive methods to integrate a wide variety of observational health and genomic data and leverage it towards improving treatment and prevention. Our goal is to use these data to improve diagnostics, identify novel treatments, and offer clinical insights into rare genetic disorders. We aim to deliver clinical applications into practice that will help shorten the diagnosis odyssey and target treatment and care to individuals' health profiles rather than relying on a one-size-fits-all model, in order to improve patient outcomes. We are developing innovative new tools that address a range of needs prioritized by our physician partners using a vast repository of health and genomic data. The right candidate will work with other scientists in the Clinical Informatics team, R&D, as well as the Product, Commercial, and Business Development teams in a multidisciplinary environment.",2.5,"GeneDx
2.5","Gaithersburg, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Research Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Swayable is a fast-growing cloud analytics product that measures public opinion and the impact of messages and advertising content on it. Its 35-person team is backed by top technology and social impact investors, including Y Combinator. Founded in 2018 by two physics PhDs, it is led by the former Executive Director for Digital Strategy at the New York Times. Clients include major consumer-facing brands (Square, Paramount Pictures, Amazon), researchers (MIT, Yale, Stanford), and mission-aligned advocacy campaigns (including multiple Democratic Presidential candidates and winning Midterm campaigns).

Joining Swayable means being on a team whose work changes the course of history. The technology we develop is at the leading edge of transforming some of the world’s most important campaign organizations and enterprises: combatting disinformation, protecting democracy, and supporting the sustainable growth of consumer-facing brands.",-1,Swayable,"New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Principal Data Scientist, Delivery Technology",$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Overview

Are you passionate about data science? Do you describe yourself as an innovative problem solver? Looking for an opportunity that will directly impact the customer experience at GoPuff? Come join the GoPuff Data Science team and #ChangeTheGame. GoPuff is a high-growth startup that is revolutionizing hyper-local instant e-commerce. We warehouse and deliver tens of thousands of products to your door super fast.

As a Principal Data Scientist at GoPuff working on the Delivery Technology Team, you will lead the vision and delivery of data-driven models to optimize the delivery experience for consumers and delivery partners on our platform across dispatch optimization, delivery routing/ETAs, driver pricing/incentives, as well as the delivery partner experience. All of that, with a direct impact on the delivery experience that is so core to serving our customers’ immediate needs. You’ll have the opportunity to make a huge impact on the future success of GoPuff.",3.0,"Gopuff
3.0",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist I,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Pax8 is the leading value-added cloud-based SaaS distributor, simplifying the cloud journey for our partners by integrating technology, business intelligence and proactive service to deliver an unparalleled experience. Serving thousands of partners through the indirect sales channel, our mission is to be the world's favorite place to buy cloud products. We are a fast-growing, dynamic and high-energy startup organization, allowing you to make a meaningful impact on the business. Culture is important to us, and at Pax8, it's business, and it IS personal. We are passionate, creative and humorously offbeat. We work hard, keep it fun, and expect the best.
We Elev8 each other. We Advoc8 for our partners. We Innov8 continuously. We Celebr8 life.
No matter who you are, Pax8 is a place you can call home. We know there's no such thing as a ""perfect"" candidate, so we don't look for the right ""fit"" – instead, we look for the add. We encourage you to apply for a role at Pax8 even if you don't meet 100% of the bullet points. We believe in cultivating an environment with a diversity of perspectives, in hopes that we can all thrive in an inclusive environment.",4.1,"Pax8
4.1",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Healthcare Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Job Details
Description
Do you have the analytic skills to find insight in a pile of healthcare data? Do you thrive in a fast-paced environment? Milliman’s NYC/Atlanta Health Practice is seeking professionals from a variety of analytic and clinical backgrounds to join our vibrant staff. We offer challenging projects, world-class resources, expert colleagues, a collaborative environment, and diverse client projects. Work, learn, and grow with us.
Milliman’s NYC/Atlanta Health Practice consults to clients on disease processes, treatments, costs, healthcare reform, risk, and payer systems. Our clients span all sectors of the health industry. Our services include analyzing financial arrangements, innovative contracts, disease states, therapeutic value, benefit design, healthcare reform, and health systems. We have brought unparalleled actuarial, analytical, and operational expertise to these clients.",3.9,"Milliman
3.9","Atlanta, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
VIE - Strategic Operations Data Scientist - USA,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Air Liquide Large Industries provides our customers with industrial gas and energy solutions that are vital to their own industrial production. We own and operate over 2,000 miles of industrial gas pipelines in the U.S. supplying mainly oxygen, nitrogen, hydrogen and syngas in large quantities from multiple production sources to major customers in the chemicals, petrochemicals, refining and steel industries. Our pipeline operations and industrial gas production facilities are closely monitored 24/7 within our leading-edge operations control center located in Houston, Texas. Our operations control group monitors over 89,000 data points and assists with product supply and coordination. We are constantly optimizing our supply network to provide high reliability and energy efficiencies allowing Air Liquide to adjust supply needs more quickly and effectively enabling growth to our customers.
How will you CONTRIBUTE and GROW?
We deliver enormous volumes of oxygen, nitrogen, hydrogen and syngas to large industrial customers in Texas and Louisiana through extensive pipeline networks.
The Smart Innovative Operations (SIO) Center consists of both a real time and strategic operations team in order to safely, reliably and optimally operate 2,000+ miles of pipeline networks of varying products. Here are our core duties:

System Reliability

System Optimization

Effective Communication

The main pillars of our mission are:",3.8,"Air Liquide
3.8","Houston, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Overview: Darwill is a nationally recognized print and marketing communications firm based in the west suburbs of Chicago. As a premier provider of complex marketing products, including direct mail, employee communications and marketing collateral, we influence excellent results for CMO’s, Directors of Marketing and Print Production Professionals by providing ideas, workflow solutions, cutting edge production technologies and a seamless execution process. Our diverse product offering includes data acquisition, email appends, integrated marketing services, production workflows, custom print production, direct mail solutions, fulfillment and complete lettershop, bindery and mailing services.
We are looking for a highly skilled Senior Data Scientist to join our team and help us build and deploy machine learning models that solve real-world marketing problems. The ideal candidate will have a strong understanding of machine learning principles and algorithms, as well as experience using Databricks for model development and deployment.",4.2,"Darwill, Inc.
4.2",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Staff Data Scientist / Protein Design,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"This is a (minimum four days/week in office) full-time position based in our Menlo Park, CA office. This position reports to the Director of Data Science of the Company.
Aether Biomachines is on a mission to build the post-scarcity future using peptide-based nanotechnology as the driving force for the next industrial revolution. By creating the world's most advanced high-throughput robotic laboratory, we are generating data at unprecedented scales to fuel deep learning algorithms. We're assembling a diverse and dynamic team of self-starters, engineers, sci-fi enthusiasts, and visionaries, and we invite you to join us on this journey.
We're breaking barriers in laboratory automation to power world-class machine learning models with faster, broader, and more robust robotic sample processing systems. We aim to transform peptides from niche catalysts into general-purpose molecular assemblers using our platform, enabling a future of abundance for the human race.",3.6,"Aether Biomachines
3.6","Menlo Park, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr Data Scientist (Innovation Lab),$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"OVERVIEW:
CR is currently seeking a Senior Data Scientist for our Innovation Lab team to help design and prototype solutions to many urgent problems consumers face today.

You will serve as the embedded senior data scientist on a fast-moving team, responsible for delivering proofs of concept and demonstrating new, innovative ways CR can show up for consumers. In this role, you will regularly ship work that has a real impact on the marketplace and people’s lives. You’ll be reporting to Innovation Lab’s Director of Product R&D.

Under our CRFlex program, this position is eligible for Fully Remote status for candidates who live more than 75 miles from one of our main office locations (Yonkers, NY, Washington DC, Colchester, CT). Additionally, the successful candidate must reside in one of the following locations: Arizona, California, Connecticut, Illinois, Massachusetts, Michigan, New Hampshire, New York, Texas, Vermont, Washington D.C.

HOW YOU'LL MAKE AN IMPACT:



ABOUT YOU:

WHO WE ARE: Consumer Reports is an independent, nonprofit organization dedicated to a fair and just marketplace for consumers. Our team is made up of truth tellers, change agents, and consumer advocates who investigate and build coalitions to fight for fairness and justice in the marketplace. We leverage our evidence-based approach to demand safer products, a healthier environment, and equitable services for everyone. Our mission starts with you. We offer medical benefits from that start on your first day as a CR employee that include behavioral health coverage and unlimited sick days. There’s also generous family planning benefits and a generous 401K match. Learn more about how CR’s advocates for strong benefits on behalf of their employees here: https://www.consumerreports.org/cro/careers/landing-page/index.htm FAIR PAY & A JUST WORKPLACE: At Consumer Reports, we are committed to fair, transparent pay and we strive to provide competitive, market-informed compensation. The target salary range for this position is $130k to $145k. It is anticipated that most qualified candidates will fall near the middle of this range. Compensation for the successful candidate will be informed by the candidate’s particular combination of knowledge, skills, competencies, and experience. Consumer Reports proudly seeks to build a richly diverse workforce by hiring people with a diversity of thoughts, identities, perspectives, and experiences that help advance the difference we make for consumers, and by ensuring our people experience equity and inclusion in their work lives. We encourage members of traditionally underrepresented communities to apply, including women, LGBTQIA people, people of color, and people with disabilities.",3.3,"Consumer Reports
3.3","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Junior Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Club Quarters Application- US

Junior Data Scientist
The Junior Data Scientist is a talented, creative, and motivated data scientist who loves data. The role is supporting our organization with data research and transformation for analytics. This individual will be responsible for ensuring data availability in a timely manner and data accuracy from many disparate systems for reporting and statistical analysis.

MAJOR DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
•
Build and maintain systems and processes by which we can review and verify the integrity and quality of our data before sharing with internal and external parties
REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS
•
EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE
KEY RELATIONSHIPS",3.4,"Club Quarters
3.4","Stamford, CT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Thank you for your interest in joining our team! Qurate Retail Group comprises six leading retail brands – QVC®, HSN®, Ballard Designs®, Frontgate®, Garnet Hill® and Grandin Road® – all dedicated to providing a more human way to shop. Qurate Retail Group is the largest player in video commerce (""vCommerce""), which includes video-driven shopping across linear TV, ecommerce sites, digital streaming and social platforms.
The Opportunity
Reporting to the Manager, Data Scientist, the Sr. Data Scientist takes an active role in advancing the Data Science practice at Qurate, not only by implementing some of the most complex and highest-priority modeling and measurement projects, but also by identifying and building support for projects and capabilities to provide the greatest business impact.
This role is hybrid-remote, and is based in West Chester, PA.",3.3,"QVC
3.3","West Chester, PA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist/Data Modeler,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Overview:
LMI is seeking a skilled Data Scientist to join our growing team supporting the United States Postal Service. The Data Scientist will provide modeling and optimization analysis in support of a major USPS program.
LMI: Innovation at the Pace of Need™
At LMI, we’re reimagining the path from insight to outcome at the new speed of possible. Combining a legacy of over 60 years of federal expertise with our innovation ecosystem, we minimize time to value and accelerate mission success. We energize the brightest minds with emerging technologies to inspire creative solutioning and push the boundaries of capability. LMI advances the pace of progress, enabling our customers to thrive while adapting to evolving mission needs.
Responsibilities:
Qualifications:",4.2,"Logistics Management Institute
4.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"AirDNA began with a big dream in a balmy California garage in 2015. Since then, the technology startup has grown into the leading provider of data and business intelligence for the billion-dollar travel and vacation rental industry—with offices in Denver and Barcelona.

Our self-serve MarketMinder platform eliminates guesswork and equips Airbnb hosts with smart and competitive insights needed to succeed in the ever-evolving short-term rental landscape.

We also arm enterprise clients with customized reports and in-depth dashboards to ensure they can scale and invest strategically. These customers include hundreds of top financial institutions, real estate companies, vacation rental managers, and destination marketing organizations around the world.

We track the daily performance of over 10 million Airbnb and Vrbo properties across 120,000 global markets. We also collect data from over a million partner properties. This marriage of scraped and source data, enhanced by our proprietary algorithms, makes our solutions the most accurate and comprehensive in the world.",4.2,"AirDNA
4.2","Denver, CO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist/Analytics,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Category(s): Performance/Analytics/Quality, Data Science
Full Time / Part Time: Full-Time
Shift: First
Summary:
The Operations Excellence data scientist will be responsible for extracting, manipulating, analyzing, and interpreting vast amounts of data using advanced mathematical and statistical expertise in support of our executive senior leadership team and operations excellence department. The data scientist will “slice and dice” data using various methods and create new visions for the future. This person is also a proficient specialist who applies mathematical, problem-solving, and coding skills to manage big data, extracting valuable insights. The data scientist will stay up to date with the latest advancements and apply them effectively to enhance data analytics capabilities. This position designs tailor-made solutions from this data, aiding Baystate Health in achieving our strategic objectives in the pursuit of advancing care and enhancing lives.",3.5,"Baystate Health
3.5","Springfield, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist (Web Development & Quality),$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Job Details
New ideas are all around us, but only a few will change the world. That’s our focus at JPL. We ask the biggest questions, then search the universe for answers—literally. We build upon ideas that have guided generations, then share our discoveries to inspire generations to come. Your mission—your opportunity—is to seek out the answers that bring us one step closer. If you’re driven to discover, create, and inspire something that lasts a lifetime and beyond, you’re ready for JPL.
Located in Pasadena, California, JPL has a campus-like environment situated on 177 acres in the foothills of the San Gabriel Mountains and offers a work environment unlike any other: we inspire passion, foster innovation, build collaboration, and reward excellence.
$112,070 - $128,544",4.4,"JPL/NASA
4.4","Pasadena, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Restaurant365 is a SaaS company disrupting the restaurant industry! Our cloud-based platform provides a unique, centralized solution for accounting and back-office operations for restaurants. Restaurant365’s culture is focused on empowering team members to produce top-notch results while elevating their skills. We’re constantly evolving and improving to make sure we are and always will be “Best in Class” ... and we want that for you too!

As a Senior Data Scientist, you'll be an integral member of our dynamic Data & Analytics team, responsible for creating, deploying, and maintaining long-term models as products to drive revenue and reduce costs for Restaurant365 and its customers. You'll work closely with cross-functional stakeholders to understand the business beyond the data, and you will partner with the business to implement strategies based on your analysis and conclusions of model output. With your deep expertise in statistics, feature engineering, experimentation, and analysis, you'll help uncover insights and trends that drive our business forward, while also mentoring and elevating analysts and engineers on the Data & Analytics team as well as other teams in R&D. Additionally, you’ll use your knowledge and requirements to collaborate with data engineers as we continue to build a modern data infrastructure. If you're a curious, strategic, and results-oriented problem solver who loves statistics, feature engineering, and good food, we'd love to have you join our team.",4.1,"Restaurant365
4.1",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Passionate about helping clients make the most of their analytics investments? Driven to succeed in a competitive and rapidly-changing business? Looking for an opportunity with a premiere provider of specialized consulting services with a collaborative, team oriented approach?
We are currently accepting applications from talented individuals who seek to advance their career within a fast-paced and challenging environment. We offer all CognoWiz team members a highly competitive compensation package that includes benefits and opportunities for both personal and professional growth.
Master’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering any, Technology or related and 2 yrs of exp to analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns. Manipulate, transform and combine datafrom multiple data sources for use in analytics and reporting. Produce high ad hoc and standard reports, using R or SAS procedures. Efficiently identify and correct syntax and programming logic errors in SQL, Tableau and SAS code. Integrate R/SAS analysis with Tableau to deliver the results of statistical analysis within Tableau dashboards. Perform inferential statistical analysis in R or SAS, including statistical tests for significance, such as null-hypothesis testing, to validate results of analysis.",4.9,"Cognowiz
4.9","Herndon, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Leading the future in luxury electric and mobility
At Lucid, we set out to introduce the most captivating, luxury electric vehicles that elevate the human experience and transcend the perceived limitations of space, performance, and intelligence. Vehicles that are intuitive, liberating, and designed for the future of mobility.
We plan to lead in this new era of luxury electric by returning to the fundamentals of great design – where every decision we make is in service of the individual and environment. Because when you are no longer bound by convention, you are free to define your own experience.
Come work alongside some of the most accomplished minds in the industry. Beyond providing competitive salaries, we’re providing a community for innovators who want to make an immediate and significant impact. If you are driven to create a better, more sustainable future, then this is the right place for you.

The Data Science and Machine Learning team at Lucid is on the mission to design, develop, and deploy AI solutions to help make safe and sustainable products and services on par with Lucid’s Luxury brand. Data generated by electric vehicles is rich and diverse and driving insight from them is a very exciting and challenging task. The Data Scientist at Lucid is setting data science foundation for our fast-growing data team, to enable the company tackle engineering and business challenges by designing analytics and AI solutions. This opportunity involves defining the path to discover trends, patterns and hidden insights from data while collaborating with the most brilliant talents in the automotive industry to build AI products.",3.2,"Lucid Motors
3.2","Newark, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Jr. ORSA / Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Responsibilities:
Peraton seeks Junior Data Scientist/ORSA to join our Mission Assurance and Operations Research Analysis (MA/ORSA) team in support of the Joint Force Headquarters DoDIN. Location: Fort Meade, Maryland.

Working as expert to assist JFHQ-DODIN understand, identify, assess, and managing risks effecting the secure operation and defensibility of cyberspace, inclusive of DoD intelligence systems, missions support systems, weapon systems, new technology, capabilities, networks, cyber physical system, control systems, cloud environments, data stores, etc.

In this role, helps devise modeling and measuring techniques to investigate complex issues and solve problems as a member of a team.

Duties include:
Qualifications:


Peraton Overview:
Target Salary Range: $112,000 - $179,000. This represents the typical salary range for this position based on experience and other factors. EEO: An Equal Opportunity Employer including Disability/Veteran.",3.6,"Peraton
3.6","Fort Meade, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Machine Learning Engineer,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"As our first Machine Learning Engineer at Assetario you will be the ‘bridge’ between our data science and engineering team. You will execute the engineering side of putting our ML algorithms into production.

This is an ideal opportunity to be part of one of the fastest growing startups in the industry, with the opportunity to grow a division and team around you as we scale.
‍
EUROPE
REMOTE
We are Assetario
We love data. We are gamers. We are engineers. Phenomenal team of MIT graduates, technical experts and advisors who lead multi-billion-dollar businesses.
Our engineering and data teams cooperate with the goal of building a smart platform to process your users’ data, to drive personalised app experiences. Our platform processes hundreds of terabytes of data with tens of millions of daily active users with hundreds of ML models in production.",-1,Assetario,Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist (Data Stewardship),$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Description
Clarity Innovations connects human creativity with emerging technology to design, develop, and deploy software that enhances mission success. Our focus is redefining the Department of Defense's relationship with technology by encouraging the use of DevSecOps and Agile methodologies, small-teams constructs, modern tech stacks, and automation. Our software improves the lives and work of our end users and enhances innovation. We fulfill our responsibility to our country by delivering mission-changing results that help shape a better and safer world.

Job Description:",4.8,"Clarity Innovations, LLC
4.8","Hurlburt Field, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Lead Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Job Description:
General Function / Summary:
CNG Holdings is actively recruiting for someone that possesses strong critical thinking and problem-solving skills, specifically with the keen ability to rapidly transition between critical projects. The Lead Analytics Analyst is responsible for leading the development and implementation of advanced analytical models and strategies to drive business growth, enhance risk management and optimize operations efficiency. The primary focus will be on modeling and strategy definition, leveraging your expertise in data analysis, statistical modeling and lending/leasing domain knowledge.
Essential Duties:
Lead development and implementation of advanced analytical models and strategies for various business functions, such as credit risk assessment, loss/revenue prediction, customer segmentation, and marketing campaigns.",4.1,"CNG Holdings, Inc
4.1",Ohio,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist (Multiple Levels),$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Description:

A little about us:
The Red Alpha Data Science practice grew out of Red Alpha's reputation in Software and System Engineering with our Department of Defense clients. As sometimes happens, customers who trust our expertise in adjacent areas asked Red Alpha to assist with some of their burgeoning Data Science problems.
Culturally, it probably suffices to say that we take our work seriously, but not ourselves. Our leaders have spent time in the trenches and have cursed daylight savings time changes and trailing whitespace as many times as you have. We like to say that we spend 80% of our time cleaning the data...and 20% of our time complaining about cleaning the data. Joking aside, our voices matter, and it is easy to see how our decisions affect the Data Science practice and Red Alpha as a whole. We have a clear vision of where we are headed.
Requirements:",5.0,"Red Alpha LLC
5.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"About the Team:
The VIZIO Unified Data Team is looking for a highly talented and motivated data scientist to help deliver strategic initiatives across the organization. We look for people who can effectively partner with product management, engineering, and business leaders to deliver easy, effective, and insightful analytics. We are a growing team, focusing on challenging problems that make a difference to our business. We concentrate on high- impact, high-value development, and analysis. We are looking for someone who is versatile, methodical, excited by modern technology and enjoys focusing on tackling software challenges.

The position is for onsite at our Denver location.
What You Will Do:
Work cross-functionally with Product Managers and stake holders across the company to gather feedback and requirements.
About You:
About VIZIO:",2.4,"VIZIO, Inc.
2.4","Denver, CO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Description:
Position Summary
The Senior Data Scientist is responsible for providing advanced expertise in applied statistical methodologies for the Camden Coalition’s Data and Quality Improvement team. This person supports internal and external partners through the development of quantitative research and evaluation methodologies, data visualization, predictive modeling, and the application of appropriate advanced statistical methods. The Senior Data Scientist is tasked with proactively formulating new and creative ideas for leveraging the organization’s diverse collection of data to advance organizational objectives and designing research methods to study the impact of Camden Coalition programs and advance the field of complex care.
Requirements:",3.8,"Camden Coalition of Healthcare
3.8","Camden, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Senior Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"Senior Data Scientist, San Diego, CA
Company:
PointPredictive is a fast-growing technology start-up that leverages a patented combination of artificial and natural intelligence [Ai+Ni] to provide risk assessments in the auto lending, mortgage, and retail space. The platform has been proven to reduce lender loan losses by 40-60% with review rates of 5-10% of their applications, resulting in higher productivity of lender risk management departments, significantly lower losses to their bottom lines, and improved customer experience. The company was founded in 2013 by a seasoned team of technology entrepreneurs with over 20 years of experience in the startup space (including several acquisitions) and has financial backing from top tier investors.",-1,"Point Predictive, Inc.","San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Sr. Data Scientist,$85K - $205K (Employer est.),"We exist to wow our customers. We know we're doing the right thing when we hear our customers say, ""How did we ever live without Coupang?"" Born out of an obsession to make shopping, eating, and living easier than ever, we're collectively disrupting the multi-billion-dollar e-commerce industry from the ground up. We are one of the fastest-growing e-commerce companies that established an unparalleled reputation for being a dominant and reliable force in South Korean commerce.We are proud to have the best of both worlds — a startup culture with the resources of a large global public company. This fuels us to continue our growth and launch new services at the speed we have been since our inception. We are all entrepreneurial surrounded by opportunities to drive new initiatives and innovations. At our core, we are bold and ambitious people that like to get our hands dirty and make a hands-on impact. At Coupang, you will see yourself, your colleagues, your team, and the company grow every day.Our mission to build the future of commerce is real. We push the boundaries of what's possible to solve problems and break traditional tradeoffs. Join Coupang now to create an epic experience in this always-on, high-tech, and hyper-connected world.",3.6,"Coupang
3.6","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job ID: 2003041
Career Area: Sales & Marketing
Job Category: Salaried
Location: Headquarters & Technology Center – Auburn Hills
48326, US
Date Posted: September 11, 2023
Brand: FCA Group

Refer a Friend

Job Overview
Qualifications

Within the Commercial Analytics area, we leverage cutting edge technologies to allow us to deliver exceptional customer experiences. Significant challenges and opportunities await those who join us in this newly created division of FCA. We are on the threshold of the biggest revolution in personal transportation. We need great people who share our passions.

Everything you do — and learn — will be leading to the future at Stellantis is a place where people are empowered to drive change, where bold challenges are taken on and an entrepreneurial spirit is ever present. Our culture never settles on the status quo; rather, collaboration, curiosity, and unconventional thinking. Every employee, regardless of position in the company, is expected to drive change and lead people.

We employ five key leadership principles that reflect our core values and provide the foundation for the cultural transformation of our workforce: We are a meritocracy. Leadership is a function of leading change and leading people. We embrace and cherish competition. We aim to achieve best-in-class performance. We deliver what we promise.

Stellantis is looking to hire a Senior Data Science. This position will play a pivotal role in the design, development, and application of analytic practices within Business Analytics, supporting the delivery of data science and machine learning-based projects for commercial analytics. The bulk of the work will be in areas of data exploration, analytic design and consulting, and model design and implementation using advanced statistical, machine learning (ML), and artificial intelligence AI methods.


Guide and inspire the organization about the business potential and strategy of data science, ML, and AI
Identify data-driven/ML business opportunities
Research in new and emerging analytic methods and apply them to the development of new business solutions
Contribute to the continuing education of data scientists as an expert and leader in an area of advanced analytic e.g. optimization
Support and contribute to data science projects as a technical subject matter expert in analytic method within commercial analytics
Exploratory data analysis, identifying analytic opportunities and challenges
Contribute to Business Analytics projects using statistical analysis, machine learning, and visualization techniques to various data, such as regression, classification, linear optimization, and deep learning.
Advise data scientists on best practices for the clear visualization and interpretation of analytic results
Experimental design, hypothesis testing, and metrics to accurately measure the performance if analytic products meeting the needs of the business
Integrate domain knowledge into the analytic solutions (for example, from an understanding of financial risk, customer journey, quality prediction, sales, marketing)
Collaborate with ML operations (MLOps), data engineers, IT resources, and business customers to evaluate and implement ML deployment options
Support monitoring the execution and health of production ML models within an area of analytic expertise
Advise on best practices around analytic production infrastructure
Train other business and IT staff on basic data science principles and techniques
Promote collaboration with the data science COE within an area of analytic expertise

EOE/Disability/Veteran

EOE / Disability / Veteran

At Stellantis, we assess candidates based on qualifications, merit and business needs. We welcome applications from people of all gender identities, age, ethnicity, nationality, religion, sexual orientation and disability. Diverse teams will allow us to better meet the evolving needs of our customers and care for our future.

Our benefits reflects the STELLANTIS commitment to helping you reach your personal and professional goals. In addition to an environment that promotes career development, we offer benefits for a healthy lifestyle and a rewarding future, designed to take care of you and your family, in various stages of life.

As a global company, our employee packages will vary by country, customary norms and the legal entity into which you are hired.",3.6,"Stellantis
3.6","Auburn Hills, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Bioinformatics Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Summary:
Zel Tech is seeking a highly qualified Bioinformatics Data Scientist that will provide SME support to our government customer in Charlottesville, Virginia or Melbourne, Florida.
Responsibilities:
The Bioinformatics Data Scientist shall aide in the following areas:
Provides direct support for bioinformatics, regex queries, developing and searching key words and biological ontologies.
Focused data discovery and retrieval from given datasets.",3.8,"Zel Technologies
3.8","Melbourne, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Level 1,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"OPS Consulting is seeking candidates for Data Scientists.

The position requires experience with:
Analysis
Process Automation
Data Normalization
Data Visualization
Machine Learning
Statistics
Cloud Analytics
Mathematics/Statistics
Computer Science
Domain Expertise/Analysis
Presentation",4.2,"OPS Consulting, LLC
4.2","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Meet Zartico, the world’s first Destination Operating System.

Zartico’s mission is to empower DMOs to be better stewards of the world’s tourist destinations through improved data intelligence and decision-making. Makers of the first Destination Operating System, Zartico harnesses and streamlines complex data to provide a full-spectrum of data science, benchmarking and analytical services for use in marketing, community development and sustainability efforts. Based in Salt Lake City, Utah, Zartico has over thirty years of experience in technology, tourism, and destination, travel and tourism marketing.

Zartico is looking to add a Data Scientist to the team. In this role, you will be designing and developing new tools, architecture, and models to flexibly extract actionable information from large, complex data sets. To be successful in this role, you will need a strong background in mathematical and statistical reasoning, comfortability programming (SQL and Python required), experience designing, evaluating and testing models with/on complex data sets, and an ability to problem solve effectively in ambiguous settings.",-1,"Zartico, Inc.",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Palo Alto",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Rhombus is purposefully transforming the nation's defense and national security enterprises with Guardian, its Artificial Intelligence platform for strategic, operational, and tactical decision-making at the speed of relevance.
We are looking for people who are driven by a sense of purpose. In this role, you will serve to solve our customer's uniquely complex problems. We expect you to be a systems-level thinker and a real doer. You will excel in this role if you are hungry to make a difference and are intellectually bold. And we sure hope that you smile when you hear our clients say, ""If we can dream it, Rhombus can do it.""
Come join our cross-disciplinary and world-class team of technologists who are working hard every day to deliver game-changing solutions to transform national security.",-1,Rhombus,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Position Summary
HDC seeks a Data Scientist to lead data analysis projects to inform high-priority policy and operational discussions. The data scientist will also support the implementation of our data governance program and assist in building key data resources for use across the Corporation. Our data analytics and governance programs are the result of concerted investments in the Corporation’s data infrastructure necessary to support our growing lending activities and portfolio. Accordingly, the Data Scientist will infuse best practices in data analytics and data stewardship into the agency’s culture. This position will report to the Director of Data Management and, as part of the Division of Policy and Analytics, will have significant contact with senior agency leaders and stakeholders across all agency departments.",3.9,"New York City Housing Development Corporation (HDC)
3.9","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Description:

POSITION SUMMARY:
The Actuarial Analyst position will support projects to improve efficiency and accuracy of existing metrics. The role will also participate in research for other metrics to improve our analytics and management of our business.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES AND ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Facilitates and monitors our standard data processing
Participates in ad hoc projects that may include rate filings, pricing studies, data analytics and claim trends
Requirements:",4.2,"Trean Corporation
4.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Natural Language Processing and Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Posting Details
Posting Details
Position Number:
128495

Title:
Faculty Specialist

Functional Title:
Natural Language Processing and Data Scientist",4.2,"University of Maryland
4.2","College Park, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist || Hybrid Houston, TX || Contract role",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Hi
This is regarding to a position of a DATA Scientist
Title: Data Scientist (Oil & Gas Hydraulics)
Location: Houston, TX (Hybrid)
Only Local candidates Needed
Duration: Long term
We are seeking a skilled Data Scientist with experience in building optimization and machine learning models specifically for oil and gas hydraulics use cases. As a Data Scientist, you will play a critical role in analysing and improving hydraulics processes within the oil and gas industry. Your expertise in data science and machine learning will be instrumental in driving operational efficiency and cost optimization.",3.8,"Valsatech Corp
3.8","Houston, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Role: Data Scientist

On-Site: Tampa, Florida
Salary: $60,000 - $75,000
TS/SCI Clearance Required
Position Description:
Our Scientist/Analyst is an integral member of an analytic and engineering team. The data scientist is expected to participate in the design, development, and implementation of novel analytics to address a variety of customer problem sets. We are highly interested in individuals who can craft narratives around their analytics, producing highly visual representations of both the output and the innerworkings of analytic methods. The Data Scientist should be versed in statistics, predictive modeling, machine learning, computational simulation, geospatial modeling, network science, or other analytic techniques. This individual will also have a firm grasp of the environments in which the analytics must be deployed, whether stand-alone, within a broader software architecture, in the cloud, etc. While a heavy programming background is not required, sufficient technical knowledge to implement the analytics is highly desired.",-1,Recruiting Heroes LLC,"Tampa, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Build the solution that transforms the real estate industry!
We are looking for a Machine Learning superhero who can ignite our day-to-day activities with their creativity.
Want to infuse a $30B+ sector of the insurance and real estate industry with predictive analytics and a tech-forward customer experience? Looking for a fully remote startup culture supported by a profitable business model? Join Mashvisor and help us build an entirely new type of real estate model.

Our Values
Customer Obsessed – We always put our customers first.",3.8,"Mashvisor Inc.
3.8",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Cambiar Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"TITLE: Data Scientist
Cambiar Education
June 2023
ABOUT CAMBIAR
By joining Cambiar Education, you join a network of individuals committed to changing the marketplace for education innovation to prove undeniably that every student can succeed and thrive. As an organization, we respect each other's time, value each other as individuals, and strive to support staff in a number of ways, including with a comprehensive and competitive benefits plan.",-1,Formation Ventures (Run the Future),Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
DATA SCIENTIST,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"10/14/2020

Edison, NJ (Remote)

Job Description:
The person will be part of the Data Science team for a Diaspak’s client. He/ She will work with different stakeholders as SME for data engineering/data science work.
A typical work day will involve working with stakeholders in individual contributor role and upscaling the quality of team’s deliverables.
The person will also be required to participate actively in brainstorming sessions for improvement opportunities and take it to completion.
A suitable candidate should have 8-10 years of experience in a similar role and should possess a go -getter attitude. He/ She should be able to deal with aggressively changing environment.
Experience in insurance preferred but not mandatory.


8+ years of experience in analytics, machine learning, advanced statistical techniques, AI and data engineering jobs.
Excellent communication & presentation skills.
Experience in managing Python codes and collaborating with customer on model evolution.
Excellent in project management, team management and conflict management skills.
Good knowledge of data base management and Hadoop/Spark, SQL, HIVE, Python (expertise).
Superior analytical and problem solving skills.
Should be able to work on a problem independently and prepare client ready deliverable with minimal or no supervision.


Ability to understand data models and identify ETL optimization opportunities. Exposure to ETL tools is preferred.
Should have strong grasp of advanced SQL functionalities (joins, nested query, and procedures).
Strong ability to translate functional specifications / requirements to technical requirements.",3.5,"Diaspark Inc.
3.5",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Research & Development Engineer (Associate Scientist) - Full Time Campus,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Location
Mason
Job Description
Your first step towards an amazing career in Research and Development (R&D) at Procter and Gamble (P&G) starts with applying to this job. Within R&D, you’ll be actively involved in creating, reimagining and launching new innovations which improve our consumers lives… all around the world.
What will I do?

Our Associate Scientists are constantly learning, growing and, ultimately, improving how our products perform. In this role, you will find new ways to innovate, develop and manufacture consumer products. Since we’re a highly collaborative company, you will have the opportunity to work with some of the best and brightest technical and commercial partners, while also coaching others to realize their fullest potential.










Full time
R000085969
Recent Grads/Entry Level - Campus (Job Segmentation)
$85,000.00 - $115,000.00 / year",4.1,"Procter & Gamble
4.1","Mason, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - NLP,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"You are a research scientist and engineer who wants to work in the areas of machine learning, natural language processing, information extraction, graphical models, summarization, information retrieval, recommend systems, and/or knowledge graphs. You will bring new ideas, evangelizing them, and shepherding their adoption within the team. You extract and identify relevant, meaningful, and actionable information from structured and unstructured data in real-time and provide advanced ways of accessing this data (such as search, summarization, and recommendations).
What you will do:
Proactively explore, research, describe, and analyze data.
Develop tools and strategies related to text analytics, machine learning, and semantic enrichment
Develop and maintain strong working relationships across departments and with key partners and stakeholders.",3.4,"Bloomberg BNA
3.4","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"$70,000.00 - $85,000.00 a year

Job Description

Restaurant Depot is the leading wholesale distributor of food, equipment and supplies to independent grocery retailers and foodservice operators across the United States.
We seek a highly motivated, technically proficient and business savvy data scientist for our growing analytics function. You will have the opportunity to work on a variety of interesting data science projects that have far reaching implications for all stakeholders across our organization.







Brand: Restaurant Depot
Address: 1710 Whitestone Expressway Whitestone, NY - 11357
Property Description: 590 - RD EAST COAST CORP. OFFICE
Property Number: 590",3.0,"Restaurant Depot
3.0","Whitestone, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Defense and Security,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Who You'll Work With
You will be based in our Washington, D.C. office as part of our Defense and Security team.
You will work with senior members of the US defense and security community on some of their highest priority issues. Typically, you’ll work locally in the Washington, D.C. area in blended teams of 3 – 5 colleagues, each with varying types of expertise (e.g., digital, strategy, operations, analytics).
What You'll Do
You will develop and apply data science methods to improve and optimize our clients performance needs.",4.8,"McKinsey & Company
4.8","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Aderas, Inc. is seeking a Data Scientist to join the team.

Primary Job Duties:
Able to take various data sets (both public and private) from different sources from flat sheets to structured and unstructured databases to APIs, clean and transform them as needed to conduct advanced analyses,e.g., predictive models, quasi-causal analyses, qualitative analyses, and advanced machine learning methods.
Able to visualize and communicate data in compelling, easily digestible manners both in static and interactive forms.
Able to develop and deliver data capacity-building content for internal non-technical audiences, including 1:1 mentorship and formal trainings, written references.

Must be able to obtain a Public Trust

Remote

Join the Aderas team!

At Aderas, we are looking to recruit and retain only the best and brightest. If you like working with emerging technologies, using your unique personal skills to solve technical, functional, and organizational issues, and can easily adapt to the ever-changing IT market, then Aderas is the place for you! We are a vibrant company delivering implementation services support for enterprise solutions and custom application development. We strive to form long-term partnerships with our clients to foster an environment based on trust, a proven history of delivery, and camaraderie.

Why Aderas?

We sincerely try to shape our employees' lives by administering a generous package of employee benefits. Our company culture encourages collaboration, creative thinking, and growth. Headquartered in Reston Town Center, in Reston, VA, the Aderas main office is a short step away from shopping, dining, and a movie theater.

Beyond the tangible and intangible rewards, Aderas provides the following:",4.5,"Aderas, Inc
4.5","Reston, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Distinguished Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"About the Company
At Torc, we have always believed that autonomous vehicle technology will transform how we travel, move freight, and do business.
A leader in autonomous driving since 2007, Torc has spent over a decade commercializing our solutions with experienced partners. Now a part of the Daimler family, we are focused solely on developing software for automated trucks to transform how the world moves freight.
Join us and catapult your career with the company that helped pioneer autonomous technology, and the first AV software company with the vision to partner directly with a truck manufacturer.",4.3,"Torc Robotics
4.3","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Product Engagement",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"At Realtor.com®, we have among the most comprehensive and accurate coverage of real estate listings and the most engaged users across all the online real estate portals. Our mission is to make buying, selling, renting, and living in homes easier and more rewarding for everyone.
Building your career? Build it better at Realtor.com®. Join us and help change the world of real estate, one home at a time.
Come to work for http://Realtor.com ![ A leader in online real estate and backed by industry experience and the News Corp Brand, http://Realtor.com
http://Realtor.com currently has an opportunity for a Data Scientist, Product Analytics, reporting to the Director of Analytics for Growth Product. http://Realtor.com is in the middle of aggressive strategic growth driven off of newly integrated entities, and continuing our record growth and consumer engagement will be critical to http://Realtor.com 's strategic success in the industry. Specifically, this role's core responsibilities will focus on partnering directly with the major functions of the business to drive consumer engagement, conversion and overall optimization of the consumer's journey for our emerging product and service areas. There is a tremendous opportunity to make a huge impact in a short amount of time!",3.7,"Realtor.com Careers
3.7","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Cyber Insurance Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Who we are

American International Group, Inc. (AIG) is a leading global insurance organization. AIG member companies provide a wide range of property casualty insurance in approximately 70 countries and jurisdictions. These diverse offerings include products and services that help businesses and individuals protect their assets and manage risks.

We’re also committed to making a positive difference for our colleagues and in the communities where we work and live. We encourage colleagues to give back to the causes they care most about, supporting these efforts through our Volunteer Time Off and Matching Grants Programs.

Get to know the business

General Insurance is a leading provider of insurance products and services for commercial and personal insurance customers. It includes one of the world’s most far-reaching property casualty networks. General Insurance offers a broad range of products to customers through a diversified, multichannel distribution network.

About the role

The Cyber Portfolio Analytics team delivers data-driven analytics and insights to AIG’s Cyber business leaders. The team supports critical business decisions including underwriting strategy / market positioning, risk appetite and limit setting, capital allocation, portfolio risk management (including catastrophe and clash) and reinsurance / risk transfer.

The team is seeking a Cyber Insurance Data Scientist to build the next generation of AIG’s Cyber Underwriting Model and develop advanced analytics to drive business strategy. The ideal candidate will have deep technical expertise modeling insurance risk, and be highly analytical, collaborative, strategic and a forward-thinker. The candidate will partner with Cyber Security and Cyber Insurance Data Analytics Leads to build an industry-leading analytics platform to drive underwriting at transactional and portfolio levels.


Serve as the team’s lead technical expert and build analytics and predictive models to drive cyber insurance underwriting decisions. With the Head of Cyber Portfolio Analytics, translate model output into actionable, data-driven underwriting strategies; present findings and recommendations to Cyber Product Leadership to drive cyber underwriting strategy. Lead the technical design, modeling methodology and coding of AIG’s account-level, underwriting risk model; review technical details, test model accuracy and update to reflect the latest trends and threat environment. Work closely with the team’s Cyber Security Data Analytics Lead to assess the quality / lift of external data sets for use in predictive modeling.


Mid-level experience in general insurance (preferably Cyber insurance) with focus on building predictive analytics and underwriting models.
Strong expertise in the full model development process – from data wrangling, to data matching, ETL, model building, testing and deployment; highly proficient at coding in one or more languages (e.g., Python, R, SQL, Spark); adept at using data visualization techniques (e.g., R Shiny, Tableau) for exploratory data analysis.
Deep / thorough command of data science and advanced analytics methods (e.g., supervised and unsupervised machine learning) to measure cyber security risk.
Experience working cross-functionally with operations and information technology (IT) to move analytical models from development into a production environment.
Bachelor’s degree from a four-year college or university; Masters degree is strongly preferred. Technical education in a quantitative field (e.g., Actuarial Science, Analytics, Data Science, Engineering, Statistics, etc.).
Demonstrated ability to work across interdisciplinary teams to enhance risk-based decision making.
Strong communication skills (oral and written) and unique ability to translate data and technical insights into logical and compelling business recommendations.
Strong ability to identify, analyze and solve problems as well as the ability to learn rapidly, adapt quickly to change, exercise influence, and manage and prioritize multiple concurrent projects.

For positions based in New York City, the base salary range is $115,000-$170,000 and the position is eligible for a bonus in accordance with the terms of the applicable incentive plan. In addition, we’re proud to offer a range of competitive benefits, a summary of which can be viewed here: Benefits Overview.

#LI-CN1

A look at our Benefits

We're proud to offer a range of employee benefits and resources that help you protect what matters most - your health care, savings, financial protection and wellbeing. We provide a variety of leaves for personal, health, family and military needs. For example, our ""Giving Back"" program allows you to take up to 16 hours a year to volunteer in your community. Our global mental health and wellness days off provide all colleagues with a paid day off to focus on their mental health and wellbeing.

We also believe in fostering our colleagues' development and offer a range of learning opportunities for colleagues to hone their professional skills to position themselves for the next steps of their careers. We have a tuition reimbursement program for eligible colleagues to enhance their education, skills, and knowledge in areas that relate to their current position or future positions to which they may transfer or progress.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer

American International Group, Inc., its subsidiaries and affiliates are committed to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and its policies and procedures reflect this commitment. We provide equal opportunity to all qualified individuals regardless of race, color, religion, age, gender, gender expression, national origin, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected categories such as sexual orientation. At AIG, we believe that diversity and inclusion are critical to our future and our mission – creating a foundation for a creative workplace that leads to innovation, growth, and profitability. Through a wide variety of programs and initiatives, we invest in each employee, seeking to ensure that our people are not only respected as individuals, but also truly valued for their unique perspectives.

https://www.aig.com/about-us/diversity-equity-and-inclusion

AIG is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodations to job applicants and employees with physical or mental disabilities. If you believe you need a reasonable accommodation in order to search for a job opening or to complete any part of the application or hiring process, please send an email to candidatecare@aig.com. Reasonable accommodations will be determined on a case-by-case basis.


RK - Risk

Up to 25%

No

AIG PC Global Services, Inc.",3.7,"AIG
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"The Bay Area Environmental Research (BAER) Institute, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization
focused on enabling and conducting research in Earth and space science, is seeking a Data
Scientist for the NASA Ames Earth Science Division with experience in the areas of satellite
remote sensing and advanced data analytics including
This position will work with the NASA Earth Exchange (NEX; https://nasa.gov/nex) at NASA",4.8,"Bay Area Environmental Research Institute
4.8","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Posted
21-Aug-2023
Service line
Corporate Segment
Role type
Full-time
Areas of Interest
Digital & Technology/Information Technology
Location(s)
Dallas - Texas - United States of America

CBRE Group, Inc. is the world’s largest commercial real estate services and investment firm, with a revenue of $27.75 Billion (as recorded on September 30, 2021) and more than 100,000 employees (excluding affiliate offices). CBRE has been on the Fortune 500 list each year since 2008, ranking #126",4.0,"CBRE
4.0","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Assertive Professionals is in search of an Data Scientist to support or National Security Customer in Charlottesville, VA.
This position is Open and funded with a $1,200 annual compliance bonus! We will submit all qualified applicants for approval and when a position opens up, we will notify you.
Senior - Base annual compensation is between $130,000 and $140,000 and is based on experience and working 1920 hours with 160 hours of PTO.
We offer an excellent benefits package, including PTO, 401k Match at 5%, Profit Sharing, Company paid Life Insurance, Dental, Vision, STD/LTD, and two options under a national medical plan with employee contribution.",4.8,"Assertive Professionals
4.8","Charlottesville, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Candidates must live in or be willing to relocate to the Louisville, KY area. This position allows for a hybrid work from home and in office schedule.
Introduction
Galen College of Nursing is a vibrant and growing, single-purpose nursing college focused on expanding access to quality nursing education. Our culture is at the forefront of everything we do. Galen's fundamental goals are to be the best place for nursing education and the best place to work and one cannot be true without the other.
Benefits
At Galen College of Nursing, we want to ensure your needs are met. We offer a variety of comprehensive medical, dental, and vision plans along with some unique benefits including:",3.7,"Galen College of Nursing
3.7","Louisville, KY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist I, Bioinformatics",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Summary

The Bioinformatics department has an opening for a Data Scientist I. This role will employ a highly skilled data scientist with expertise in developing machine learning models to curate and analyze large, multi-modal datasets generated by the SimCenter at UT Southwestern Medical School. Experience with using machine learning for analyses of video-based data sets is a plus. They will work closely with our software and AI engineers to ensure that the models are integrated into actionable user interfaces.

Job Duties

Analyzes and develops formalisms, algorithms and software for applications in biomedical research.

Develops and maintains software tools and infrastructure for resolving specific problems.

Assists in the development, testing and revision of programs in a team with diverse bioinformatics expertise.

Performs other duties as assigned.


Clean, organize, and analyze large, multi-model data sets

Build, train, test, and evaluate machine learning models on our proprietary data sets

Understand and implement the latest video-based machine learning models

Continuously improve the performance of the models by analyzing results and experimenting with different techniques

Collaboratively ensure the models are integrated into the user interfaces.

Experience and Education

M.S. in Computer Science, Bioinformatics, (Bio)mathematics, (Bio)statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, or related field OR B.S. with demonstrated experience in broadly defined areas of bioinformatics.

0 - 2 years post-graduation experience in data analysis and/or scientific software development.


Strong experience with Python and related data science libraries such as Pandas, Numpy, Scikit-learn.

Strong experience with machine learning frameworks such as Tensorflow or PyTorch.

Experience with video analysis with machine learning, specifically with CNNs and other deep learning models.

Experience with data visualization tools such as Matplotlib or Seaborn.

Strong understanding of data science and machine learning principles and best practices.

Experience with cloud platforms such as AWS or GCP.

Strong debugging and problem-solving skills.

Why UT Southwestern?

With over 75 years of excellence in Dallas-Fort Worth, Texas, UT Southwestern is committed to excellence, innovation, teamwork, and compassion. At UT Southwestern, we invest in you with opportunities for career growth and development that align with your future goals and help to provide security for you and your family. Our highly competitive benefits package offers healthcare, PTO and paid holidays, on-site childcare, wage, merit increases and so much more that are all available on the day you start work. UT Southwestern is honored to be a Veteran Friendly work environment that is home to approximately 800 veterans. We value your integrity, dedication, and the commitment you’ve made to our country. We’re proud to support your next mission. Ranked by Forbes as one of the Top 10 National Employers, we invite you to be a part of the UT Southwestern team where you’ll discover teamwork, professionalism, and consistent opportunities for growth.

This position is security-sensitive and subject to Texas Education Code §51.215, which authorizes UT Southwestern to obtain criminal history record information. UT Southwestern Medical Center is committed to an educational and working environment that provides equal opportunity to all members of the University community. As an equal opportunity employer, UT Southwestern prohibits unlawful discrimination, including discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or veteran status. To learn more, please visit: why-work-here/diversity-inclusion",3.9,"UT Southwestern
3.9","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Autonomous System,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Join us in creating the technology that helps the world act together
We are a B2B technology innovation leader pioneering the future where networks meet cloud. At Nokia you will have a positive impact on people’s lives and help build the capabilities needed for a more productive, sustainable, and accessible world.
Be part of a culture built on an inclusive way of working where we are open to your ideas, you are empowered to take risks and are encouraged to be fearless in bringing your authentic self to work.
The team you'll be part of
Cloud and Network Services
As Nokia's growth engine, we create value for communication service providers and enterprise customers by leading the transition to cloud-native software and as-a-service delivery models. Our inclusive team of dreamers, doers and disruptors push the limits from impossible to possible. Advanced Technology Group is a leading-edge technology validation and new solution incubation organization within Cloud & Network Services. We explore cutting edge technology and the use of it in the area of 5G/6G, distributed clouds/edge clouds, APIs/SDKs and platforms, AR/VR/XR, AI/ML, crypto/smart contracts/NFT etc. We innovate and incubate new solutions utilizing these technology. We are driving new ideas for the telco transformation and specifically how we could transform networks into easily consumable capabilities in digital ecosystem and hence enable developers to build altogether new type of applications for Industry 4.0.",4.2,"NOKIA
4.2","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Chief Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"About Us FacilityConneX’s mission is to provide the industrial and commercial customer a world-class
real time continuous monitoring system for any equipment or facility - Anytime, Anywhere.
Partnered with GE and leveraging many of their best software technologies, FacilityConneX
offers an industry leading experience for customers to gain insight on their own systems and
data. Our cloud based solution, FacilityConneX, is a wholly owned subsidiary of AutomaTech,
Inc. For more information, go to www.facilityconnex.com

AutomaTech offers a great work environment, professional development, challenging careers,
and competitive compensation. AutomaTech is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",-1,FacilityConneX,"Nashua, NH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, All Levels",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Who are we?
Independent Software is a consulting, product, and solutions firm dedicated to the practical application of software and system engineering technologies to solve complex problems. We bring together world class engineers with proven engineering best practices, domain expertise, commercial technologies, and proven agile management approaches to create high value solutions aimed at helping our customers meet their most critical business and mission objectives.


Why Independent Software?
We are focused on continual learning and evolution. We don’t do things because “that’s the way we’ve always done things”; we listen to our employees and adapt to the changing marketplace. We look at the big picture and encourage our engineers to get training and certifications in emerging technologies that will help shape our customer’s mission.",4.6,"Independent Software
4.6","Fort Meade, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Title:
Data
Scientist

Experience Level:
Senior

Location:
Tampa

Clearance: TS/SCI

Quiet Professionals, LLC
is seeking a
Data
Scientist who will f
ormulate and lead guided, multifaceted analytic studies against large volumes of data. Develop AI/ML models to enrich data providing further utility to the analysts. Conducts complex data assessments to determine operational utility of proposed data sets in answering priority intelligence 4 requirements. Develop and maintain data pipelines to ingest applicable data into AI/ML engines and tools. Discovers links and connections in disparate datasets providing context to intelligence analysts",4.5,"Echo Analytics
4.5","Tampa, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job ID: 2003041
Career Area: Sales & Marketing
Job Category: Salaried
Location: Headquarters & Technology Center – Auburn Hills
48326, US
Date Posted: September 11, 2023
Brand: FCA Group

Refer a Friend

Job Overview
Qualifications

Within the Commercial Analytics area, we leverage cutting edge technologies to allow us to deliver exceptional customer experiences. Significant challenges and opportunities await those who join us in this newly created division of FCA. We are on the threshold of the biggest revolution in personal transportation. We need great people who share our passions.

Everything you do — and learn — will be leading to the future at Stellantis is a place where people are empowered to drive change, where bold challenges are taken on and an entrepreneurial spirit is ever present. Our culture never settles on the status quo; rather, collaboration, curiosity, and unconventional thinking. Every employee, regardless of position in the company, is expected to drive change and lead people.

We employ five key leadership principles that reflect our core values and provide the foundation for the cultural transformation of our workforce: We are a meritocracy. Leadership is a function of leading change and leading people. We embrace and cherish competition. We aim to achieve best-in-class performance. We deliver what we promise.

Stellantis is looking to hire a Senior Data Science. This position will play a pivotal role in the design, development, and application of analytic practices within Business Analytics, supporting the delivery of data science and machine learning-based projects for commercial analytics. The bulk of the work will be in areas of data exploration, analytic design and consulting, and model design and implementation using advanced statistical, machine learning (ML), and artificial intelligence AI methods.


Guide and inspire the organization about the business potential and strategy of data science, ML, and AI
Identify data-driven/ML business opportunities
Research in new and emerging analytic methods and apply them to the development of new business solutions
Contribute to the continuing education of data scientists as an expert and leader in an area of advanced analytic e.g. optimization
Support and contribute to data science projects as a technical subject matter expert in analytic method within commercial analytics
Exploratory data analysis, identifying analytic opportunities and challenges
Contribute to Business Analytics projects using statistical analysis, machine learning, and visualization techniques to various data, such as regression, classification, linear optimization, and deep learning.
Advise data scientists on best practices for the clear visualization and interpretation of analytic results
Experimental design, hypothesis testing, and metrics to accurately measure the performance if analytic products meeting the needs of the business
Integrate domain knowledge into the analytic solutions (for example, from an understanding of financial risk, customer journey, quality prediction, sales, marketing)
Collaborate with ML operations (MLOps), data engineers, IT resources, and business customers to evaluate and implement ML deployment options
Support monitoring the execution and health of production ML models within an area of analytic expertise
Advise on best practices around analytic production infrastructure
Train other business and IT staff on basic data science principles and techniques
Promote collaboration with the data science COE within an area of analytic expertise

EOE/Disability/Veteran

EOE / Disability / Veteran

At Stellantis, we assess candidates based on qualifications, merit and business needs. We welcome applications from people of all gender identities, age, ethnicity, nationality, religion, sexual orientation and disability. Diverse teams will allow us to better meet the evolving needs of our customers and care for our future.

Our benefits reflects the STELLANTIS commitment to helping you reach your personal and professional goals. In addition to an environment that promotes career development, we offer benefits for a healthy lifestyle and a rewarding future, designed to take care of you and your family, in various stages of life.

As a global company, our employee packages will vary by country, customary norms and the legal entity into which you are hired.",3.6,"Stellantis
3.6","Auburn Hills, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Bioinformatics Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Summary:
Zel Tech is seeking a highly qualified Bioinformatics Data Scientist that will provide SME support to our government customer in Charlottesville, Virginia or Melbourne, Florida.
Responsibilities:
The Bioinformatics Data Scientist shall aide in the following areas:
Provides direct support for bioinformatics, regex queries, developing and searching key words and biological ontologies.
Focused data discovery and retrieval from given datasets.",3.8,"Zel Technologies
3.8","Melbourne, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Level 1,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"OPS Consulting is seeking candidates for Data Scientists.

The position requires experience with:
Analysis
Process Automation
Data Normalization
Data Visualization
Machine Learning
Statistics
Cloud Analytics
Mathematics/Statistics
Computer Science
Domain Expertise/Analysis
Presentation",4.2,"OPS Consulting, LLC
4.2","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Meet Zartico, the world’s first Destination Operating System.

Zartico’s mission is to empower DMOs to be better stewards of the world’s tourist destinations through improved data intelligence and decision-making. Makers of the first Destination Operating System, Zartico harnesses and streamlines complex data to provide a full-spectrum of data science, benchmarking and analytical services for use in marketing, community development and sustainability efforts. Based in Salt Lake City, Utah, Zartico has over thirty years of experience in technology, tourism, and destination, travel and tourism marketing.

Zartico is looking to add a Data Scientist to the team. In this role, you will be designing and developing new tools, architecture, and models to flexibly extract actionable information from large, complex data sets. To be successful in this role, you will need a strong background in mathematical and statistical reasoning, comfortability programming (SQL and Python required), experience designing, evaluating and testing models with/on complex data sets, and an ability to problem solve effectively in ambiguous settings.",-1,"Zartico, Inc.",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Palo Alto",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Rhombus is purposefully transforming the nation's defense and national security enterprises with Guardian, its Artificial Intelligence platform for strategic, operational, and tactical decision-making at the speed of relevance.
We are looking for people who are driven by a sense of purpose. In this role, you will serve to solve our customer's uniquely complex problems. We expect you to be a systems-level thinker and a real doer. You will excel in this role if you are hungry to make a difference and are intellectually bold. And we sure hope that you smile when you hear our clients say, ""If we can dream it, Rhombus can do it.""
Come join our cross-disciplinary and world-class team of technologists who are working hard every day to deliver game-changing solutions to transform national security.",-1,Rhombus,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Position Summary
HDC seeks a Data Scientist to lead data analysis projects to inform high-priority policy and operational discussions. The data scientist will also support the implementation of our data governance program and assist in building key data resources for use across the Corporation. Our data analytics and governance programs are the result of concerted investments in the Corporation’s data infrastructure necessary to support our growing lending activities and portfolio. Accordingly, the Data Scientist will infuse best practices in data analytics and data stewardship into the agency’s culture. This position will report to the Director of Data Management and, as part of the Division of Policy and Analytics, will have significant contact with senior agency leaders and stakeholders across all agency departments.",3.9,"New York City Housing Development Corporation (HDC)
3.9","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Description:

POSITION SUMMARY:
The Actuarial Analyst position will support projects to improve efficiency and accuracy of existing metrics. The role will also participate in research for other metrics to improve our analytics and management of our business.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES AND ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Facilitates and monitors our standard data processing
Participates in ad hoc projects that may include rate filings, pricing studies, data analytics and claim trends
Requirements:",4.2,"Trean Corporation
4.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Natural Language Processing and Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Posting Details
Posting Details
Position Number:
128495

Title:
Faculty Specialist

Functional Title:
Natural Language Processing and Data Scientist",4.2,"University of Maryland
4.2","College Park, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist || Hybrid Houston, TX || Contract role",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Hi
This is regarding to a position of a DATA Scientist
Title: Data Scientist (Oil & Gas Hydraulics)
Location: Houston, TX (Hybrid)
Only Local candidates Needed
Duration: Long term
We are seeking a skilled Data Scientist with experience in building optimization and machine learning models specifically for oil and gas hydraulics use cases. As a Data Scientist, you will play a critical role in analysing and improving hydraulics processes within the oil and gas industry. Your expertise in data science and machine learning will be instrumental in driving operational efficiency and cost optimization.",3.8,"Valsatech Corp
3.8","Houston, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Role: Data Scientist

On-Site: Tampa, Florida
Salary: $60,000 - $75,000
TS/SCI Clearance Required
Position Description:
Our Scientist/Analyst is an integral member of an analytic and engineering team. The data scientist is expected to participate in the design, development, and implementation of novel analytics to address a variety of customer problem sets. We are highly interested in individuals who can craft narratives around their analytics, producing highly visual representations of both the output and the innerworkings of analytic methods. The Data Scientist should be versed in statistics, predictive modeling, machine learning, computational simulation, geospatial modeling, network science, or other analytic techniques. This individual will also have a firm grasp of the environments in which the analytics must be deployed, whether stand-alone, within a broader software architecture, in the cloud, etc. While a heavy programming background is not required, sufficient technical knowledge to implement the analytics is highly desired.",-1,Recruiting Heroes LLC,"Tampa, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Build the solution that transforms the real estate industry!
We are looking for a Machine Learning superhero who can ignite our day-to-day activities with their creativity.
Want to infuse a $30B+ sector of the insurance and real estate industry with predictive analytics and a tech-forward customer experience? Looking for a fully remote startup culture supported by a profitable business model? Join Mashvisor and help us build an entirely new type of real estate model.

Our Values
Customer Obsessed – We always put our customers first.",3.8,"Mashvisor Inc.
3.8",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Cambiar Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"TITLE: Data Scientist
Cambiar Education
June 2023
ABOUT CAMBIAR
By joining Cambiar Education, you join a network of individuals committed to changing the marketplace for education innovation to prove undeniably that every student can succeed and thrive. As an organization, we respect each other's time, value each other as individuals, and strive to support staff in a number of ways, including with a comprehensive and competitive benefits plan.",-1,Formation Ventures (Run the Future),Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
DATA SCIENTIST,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"10/14/2020

Edison, NJ (Remote)

Job Description:
The person will be part of the Data Science team for a Diaspak’s client. He/ She will work with different stakeholders as SME for data engineering/data science work.
A typical work day will involve working with stakeholders in individual contributor role and upscaling the quality of team’s deliverables.
The person will also be required to participate actively in brainstorming sessions for improvement opportunities and take it to completion.
A suitable candidate should have 8-10 years of experience in a similar role and should possess a go -getter attitude. He/ She should be able to deal with aggressively changing environment.
Experience in insurance preferred but not mandatory.


8+ years of experience in analytics, machine learning, advanced statistical techniques, AI and data engineering jobs.
Excellent communication & presentation skills.
Experience in managing Python codes and collaborating with customer on model evolution.
Excellent in project management, team management and conflict management skills.
Good knowledge of data base management and Hadoop/Spark, SQL, HIVE, Python (expertise).
Superior analytical and problem solving skills.
Should be able to work on a problem independently and prepare client ready deliverable with minimal or no supervision.


Ability to understand data models and identify ETL optimization opportunities. Exposure to ETL tools is preferred.
Should have strong grasp of advanced SQL functionalities (joins, nested query, and procedures).
Strong ability to translate functional specifications / requirements to technical requirements.",3.5,"Diaspark Inc.
3.5",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Research & Development Engineer (Associate Scientist) - Full Time Campus,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Location
Mason
Job Description
Your first step towards an amazing career in Research and Development (R&D) at Procter and Gamble (P&G) starts with applying to this job. Within R&D, you’ll be actively involved in creating, reimagining and launching new innovations which improve our consumers lives… all around the world.
What will I do?

Our Associate Scientists are constantly learning, growing and, ultimately, improving how our products perform. In this role, you will find new ways to innovate, develop and manufacture consumer products. Since we’re a highly collaborative company, you will have the opportunity to work with some of the best and brightest technical and commercial partners, while also coaching others to realize their fullest potential.










Full time
R000085969
Recent Grads/Entry Level - Campus (Job Segmentation)
$85,000.00 - $115,000.00 / year",4.1,"Procter & Gamble
4.1","Mason, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - NLP,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"You are a research scientist and engineer who wants to work in the areas of machine learning, natural language processing, information extraction, graphical models, summarization, information retrieval, recommend systems, and/or knowledge graphs. You will bring new ideas, evangelizing them, and shepherding their adoption within the team. You extract and identify relevant, meaningful, and actionable information from structured and unstructured data in real-time and provide advanced ways of accessing this data (such as search, summarization, and recommendations).
What you will do:
Proactively explore, research, describe, and analyze data.
Develop tools and strategies related to text analytics, machine learning, and semantic enrichment
Develop and maintain strong working relationships across departments and with key partners and stakeholders.",3.4,"Bloomberg BNA
3.4","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"$70,000.00 - $85,000.00 a year

Job Description

Restaurant Depot is the leading wholesale distributor of food, equipment and supplies to independent grocery retailers and foodservice operators across the United States.
We seek a highly motivated, technically proficient and business savvy data scientist for our growing analytics function. You will have the opportunity to work on a variety of interesting data science projects that have far reaching implications for all stakeholders across our organization.







Brand: Restaurant Depot
Address: 1710 Whitestone Expressway Whitestone, NY - 11357
Property Description: 590 - RD EAST COAST CORP. OFFICE
Property Number: 590",3.0,"Restaurant Depot
3.0","Whitestone, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Defense and Security,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Who You'll Work With
You will be based in our Washington, D.C. office as part of our Defense and Security team.
You will work with senior members of the US defense and security community on some of their highest priority issues. Typically, you’ll work locally in the Washington, D.C. area in blended teams of 3 – 5 colleagues, each with varying types of expertise (e.g., digital, strategy, operations, analytics).
What You'll Do
You will develop and apply data science methods to improve and optimize our clients performance needs.",4.8,"McKinsey & Company
4.8","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Aderas, Inc. is seeking a Data Scientist to join the team.

Primary Job Duties:
Able to take various data sets (both public and private) from different sources from flat sheets to structured and unstructured databases to APIs, clean and transform them as needed to conduct advanced analyses,e.g., predictive models, quasi-causal analyses, qualitative analyses, and advanced machine learning methods.
Able to visualize and communicate data in compelling, easily digestible manners both in static and interactive forms.
Able to develop and deliver data capacity-building content for internal non-technical audiences, including 1:1 mentorship and formal trainings, written references.

Must be able to obtain a Public Trust

Remote

Join the Aderas team!

At Aderas, we are looking to recruit and retain only the best and brightest. If you like working with emerging technologies, using your unique personal skills to solve technical, functional, and organizational issues, and can easily adapt to the ever-changing IT market, then Aderas is the place for you! We are a vibrant company delivering implementation services support for enterprise solutions and custom application development. We strive to form long-term partnerships with our clients to foster an environment based on trust, a proven history of delivery, and camaraderie.

Why Aderas?

We sincerely try to shape our employees' lives by administering a generous package of employee benefits. Our company culture encourages collaboration, creative thinking, and growth. Headquartered in Reston Town Center, in Reston, VA, the Aderas main office is a short step away from shopping, dining, and a movie theater.

Beyond the tangible and intangible rewards, Aderas provides the following:",4.5,"Aderas, Inc
4.5","Reston, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Distinguished Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"About the Company
At Torc, we have always believed that autonomous vehicle technology will transform how we travel, move freight, and do business.
A leader in autonomous driving since 2007, Torc has spent over a decade commercializing our solutions with experienced partners. Now a part of the Daimler family, we are focused solely on developing software for automated trucks to transform how the world moves freight.
Join us and catapult your career with the company that helped pioneer autonomous technology, and the first AV software company with the vision to partner directly with a truck manufacturer.",4.3,"Torc Robotics
4.3","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Product Engagement",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"At Realtor.com®, we have among the most comprehensive and accurate coverage of real estate listings and the most engaged users across all the online real estate portals. Our mission is to make buying, selling, renting, and living in homes easier and more rewarding for everyone.
Building your career? Build it better at Realtor.com®. Join us and help change the world of real estate, one home at a time.
Come to work for http://Realtor.com ![ A leader in online real estate and backed by industry experience and the News Corp Brand, http://Realtor.com
http://Realtor.com currently has an opportunity for a Data Scientist, Product Analytics, reporting to the Director of Analytics for Growth Product. http://Realtor.com is in the middle of aggressive strategic growth driven off of newly integrated entities, and continuing our record growth and consumer engagement will be critical to http://Realtor.com 's strategic success in the industry. Specifically, this role's core responsibilities will focus on partnering directly with the major functions of the business to drive consumer engagement, conversion and overall optimization of the consumer's journey for our emerging product and service areas. There is a tremendous opportunity to make a huge impact in a short amount of time!",3.7,"Realtor.com Careers
3.7","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Cyber Insurance Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Who we are

American International Group, Inc. (AIG) is a leading global insurance organization. AIG member companies provide a wide range of property casualty insurance in approximately 70 countries and jurisdictions. These diverse offerings include products and services that help businesses and individuals protect their assets and manage risks.

We’re also committed to making a positive difference for our colleagues and in the communities where we work and live. We encourage colleagues to give back to the causes they care most about, supporting these efforts through our Volunteer Time Off and Matching Grants Programs.

Get to know the business

General Insurance is a leading provider of insurance products and services for commercial and personal insurance customers. It includes one of the world’s most far-reaching property casualty networks. General Insurance offers a broad range of products to customers through a diversified, multichannel distribution network.

About the role

The Cyber Portfolio Analytics team delivers data-driven analytics and insights to AIG’s Cyber business leaders. The team supports critical business decisions including underwriting strategy / market positioning, risk appetite and limit setting, capital allocation, portfolio risk management (including catastrophe and clash) and reinsurance / risk transfer.

The team is seeking a Cyber Insurance Data Scientist to build the next generation of AIG’s Cyber Underwriting Model and develop advanced analytics to drive business strategy. The ideal candidate will have deep technical expertise modeling insurance risk, and be highly analytical, collaborative, strategic and a forward-thinker. The candidate will partner with Cyber Security and Cyber Insurance Data Analytics Leads to build an industry-leading analytics platform to drive underwriting at transactional and portfolio levels.


Serve as the team’s lead technical expert and build analytics and predictive models to drive cyber insurance underwriting decisions. With the Head of Cyber Portfolio Analytics, translate model output into actionable, data-driven underwriting strategies; present findings and recommendations to Cyber Product Leadership to drive cyber underwriting strategy. Lead the technical design, modeling methodology and coding of AIG’s account-level, underwriting risk model; review technical details, test model accuracy and update to reflect the latest trends and threat environment. Work closely with the team’s Cyber Security Data Analytics Lead to assess the quality / lift of external data sets for use in predictive modeling.


Mid-level experience in general insurance (preferably Cyber insurance) with focus on building predictive analytics and underwriting models.
Strong expertise in the full model development process – from data wrangling, to data matching, ETL, model building, testing and deployment; highly proficient at coding in one or more languages (e.g., Python, R, SQL, Spark); adept at using data visualization techniques (e.g., R Shiny, Tableau) for exploratory data analysis.
Deep / thorough command of data science and advanced analytics methods (e.g., supervised and unsupervised machine learning) to measure cyber security risk.
Experience working cross-functionally with operations and information technology (IT) to move analytical models from development into a production environment.
Bachelor’s degree from a four-year college or university; Masters degree is strongly preferred. Technical education in a quantitative field (e.g., Actuarial Science, Analytics, Data Science, Engineering, Statistics, etc.).
Demonstrated ability to work across interdisciplinary teams to enhance risk-based decision making.
Strong communication skills (oral and written) and unique ability to translate data and technical insights into logical and compelling business recommendations.
Strong ability to identify, analyze and solve problems as well as the ability to learn rapidly, adapt quickly to change, exercise influence, and manage and prioritize multiple concurrent projects.

For positions based in New York City, the base salary range is $115,000-$170,000 and the position is eligible for a bonus in accordance with the terms of the applicable incentive plan. In addition, we’re proud to offer a range of competitive benefits, a summary of which can be viewed here: Benefits Overview.

#LI-CN1

A look at our Benefits

We're proud to offer a range of employee benefits and resources that help you protect what matters most - your health care, savings, financial protection and wellbeing. We provide a variety of leaves for personal, health, family and military needs. For example, our ""Giving Back"" program allows you to take up to 16 hours a year to volunteer in your community. Our global mental health and wellness days off provide all colleagues with a paid day off to focus on their mental health and wellbeing.

We also believe in fostering our colleagues' development and offer a range of learning opportunities for colleagues to hone their professional skills to position themselves for the next steps of their careers. We have a tuition reimbursement program for eligible colleagues to enhance their education, skills, and knowledge in areas that relate to their current position or future positions to which they may transfer or progress.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer

American International Group, Inc., its subsidiaries and affiliates are committed to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and its policies and procedures reflect this commitment. We provide equal opportunity to all qualified individuals regardless of race, color, religion, age, gender, gender expression, national origin, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected categories such as sexual orientation. At AIG, we believe that diversity and inclusion are critical to our future and our mission – creating a foundation for a creative workplace that leads to innovation, growth, and profitability. Through a wide variety of programs and initiatives, we invest in each employee, seeking to ensure that our people are not only respected as individuals, but also truly valued for their unique perspectives.

https://www.aig.com/about-us/diversity-equity-and-inclusion

AIG is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodations to job applicants and employees with physical or mental disabilities. If you believe you need a reasonable accommodation in order to search for a job opening or to complete any part of the application or hiring process, please send an email to candidatecare@aig.com. Reasonable accommodations will be determined on a case-by-case basis.


RK - Risk

Up to 25%

No

AIG PC Global Services, Inc.",3.7,"AIG
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"The Bay Area Environmental Research (BAER) Institute, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization
focused on enabling and conducting research in Earth and space science, is seeking a Data
Scientist for the NASA Ames Earth Science Division with experience in the areas of satellite
remote sensing and advanced data analytics including
This position will work with the NASA Earth Exchange (NEX; https://nasa.gov/nex) at NASA",4.8,"Bay Area Environmental Research Institute
4.8","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Posted
21-Aug-2023
Service line
Corporate Segment
Role type
Full-time
Areas of Interest
Digital & Technology/Information Technology
Location(s)
Dallas - Texas - United States of America

CBRE Group, Inc. is the world’s largest commercial real estate services and investment firm, with a revenue of $27.75 Billion (as recorded on September 30, 2021) and more than 100,000 employees (excluding affiliate offices). CBRE has been on the Fortune 500 list each year since 2008, ranking #126",4.0,"CBRE
4.0","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Assertive Professionals is in search of an Data Scientist to support or National Security Customer in Charlottesville, VA.
This position is Open and funded with a $1,200 annual compliance bonus! We will submit all qualified applicants for approval and when a position opens up, we will notify you.
Senior - Base annual compensation is between $130,000 and $140,000 and is based on experience and working 1920 hours with 160 hours of PTO.
We offer an excellent benefits package, including PTO, 401k Match at 5%, Profit Sharing, Company paid Life Insurance, Dental, Vision, STD/LTD, and two options under a national medical plan with employee contribution.",4.8,"Assertive Professionals
4.8","Charlottesville, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Candidates must live in or be willing to relocate to the Louisville, KY area. This position allows for a hybrid work from home and in office schedule.
Introduction
Galen College of Nursing is a vibrant and growing, single-purpose nursing college focused on expanding access to quality nursing education. Our culture is at the forefront of everything we do. Galen's fundamental goals are to be the best place for nursing education and the best place to work and one cannot be true without the other.
Benefits
At Galen College of Nursing, we want to ensure your needs are met. We offer a variety of comprehensive medical, dental, and vision plans along with some unique benefits including:",3.7,"Galen College of Nursing
3.7","Louisville, KY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist I, Bioinformatics",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Summary

The Bioinformatics department has an opening for a Data Scientist I. This role will employ a highly skilled data scientist with expertise in developing machine learning models to curate and analyze large, multi-modal datasets generated by the SimCenter at UT Southwestern Medical School. Experience with using machine learning for analyses of video-based data sets is a plus. They will work closely with our software and AI engineers to ensure that the models are integrated into actionable user interfaces.

Job Duties

Analyzes and develops formalisms, algorithms and software for applications in biomedical research.

Develops and maintains software tools and infrastructure for resolving specific problems.

Assists in the development, testing and revision of programs in a team with diverse bioinformatics expertise.

Performs other duties as assigned.


Clean, organize, and analyze large, multi-model data sets

Build, train, test, and evaluate machine learning models on our proprietary data sets

Understand and implement the latest video-based machine learning models

Continuously improve the performance of the models by analyzing results and experimenting with different techniques

Collaboratively ensure the models are integrated into the user interfaces.

Experience and Education

M.S. in Computer Science, Bioinformatics, (Bio)mathematics, (Bio)statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, or related field OR B.S. with demonstrated experience in broadly defined areas of bioinformatics.

0 - 2 years post-graduation experience in data analysis and/or scientific software development.


Strong experience with Python and related data science libraries such as Pandas, Numpy, Scikit-learn.

Strong experience with machine learning frameworks such as Tensorflow or PyTorch.

Experience with video analysis with machine learning, specifically with CNNs and other deep learning models.

Experience with data visualization tools such as Matplotlib or Seaborn.

Strong understanding of data science and machine learning principles and best practices.

Experience with cloud platforms such as AWS or GCP.

Strong debugging and problem-solving skills.

Why UT Southwestern?

With over 75 years of excellence in Dallas-Fort Worth, Texas, UT Southwestern is committed to excellence, innovation, teamwork, and compassion. At UT Southwestern, we invest in you with opportunities for career growth and development that align with your future goals and help to provide security for you and your family. Our highly competitive benefits package offers healthcare, PTO and paid holidays, on-site childcare, wage, merit increases and so much more that are all available on the day you start work. UT Southwestern is honored to be a Veteran Friendly work environment that is home to approximately 800 veterans. We value your integrity, dedication, and the commitment you’ve made to our country. We’re proud to support your next mission. Ranked by Forbes as one of the Top 10 National Employers, we invite you to be a part of the UT Southwestern team where you’ll discover teamwork, professionalism, and consistent opportunities for growth.

This position is security-sensitive and subject to Texas Education Code §51.215, which authorizes UT Southwestern to obtain criminal history record information. UT Southwestern Medical Center is committed to an educational and working environment that provides equal opportunity to all members of the University community. As an equal opportunity employer, UT Southwestern prohibits unlawful discrimination, including discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or veteran status. To learn more, please visit: why-work-here/diversity-inclusion",3.9,"UT Southwestern
3.9","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Autonomous System,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Join us in creating the technology that helps the world act together
We are a B2B technology innovation leader pioneering the future where networks meet cloud. At Nokia you will have a positive impact on people’s lives and help build the capabilities needed for a more productive, sustainable, and accessible world.
Be part of a culture built on an inclusive way of working where we are open to your ideas, you are empowered to take risks and are encouraged to be fearless in bringing your authentic self to work.
The team you'll be part of
Cloud and Network Services
As Nokia's growth engine, we create value for communication service providers and enterprise customers by leading the transition to cloud-native software and as-a-service delivery models. Our inclusive team of dreamers, doers and disruptors push the limits from impossible to possible. Advanced Technology Group is a leading-edge technology validation and new solution incubation organization within Cloud & Network Services. We explore cutting edge technology and the use of it in the area of 5G/6G, distributed clouds/edge clouds, APIs/SDKs and platforms, AR/VR/XR, AI/ML, crypto/smart contracts/NFT etc. We innovate and incubate new solutions utilizing these technology. We are driving new ideas for the telco transformation and specifically how we could transform networks into easily consumable capabilities in digital ecosystem and hence enable developers to build altogether new type of applications for Industry 4.0.",4.2,"NOKIA
4.2","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Chief Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"About Us FacilityConneX’s mission is to provide the industrial and commercial customer a world-class
real time continuous monitoring system for any equipment or facility - Anytime, Anywhere.
Partnered with GE and leveraging many of their best software technologies, FacilityConneX
offers an industry leading experience for customers to gain insight on their own systems and
data. Our cloud based solution, FacilityConneX, is a wholly owned subsidiary of AutomaTech,
Inc. For more information, go to www.facilityconnex.com

AutomaTech offers a great work environment, professional development, challenging careers,
and competitive compensation. AutomaTech is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",-1,FacilityConneX,"Nashua, NH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, All Levels",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Who are we?
Independent Software is a consulting, product, and solutions firm dedicated to the practical application of software and system engineering technologies to solve complex problems. We bring together world class engineers with proven engineering best practices, domain expertise, commercial technologies, and proven agile management approaches to create high value solutions aimed at helping our customers meet their most critical business and mission objectives.


Why Independent Software?
We are focused on continual learning and evolution. We don’t do things because “that’s the way we’ve always done things”; we listen to our employees and adapt to the changing marketplace. We look at the big picture and encourage our engineers to get training and certifications in emerging technologies that will help shape our customer’s mission.",4.6,"Independent Software
4.6","Fort Meade, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Title:
Data
Scientist

Experience Level:
Senior

Location:
Tampa

Clearance: TS/SCI

Quiet Professionals, LLC
is seeking a
Data
Scientist who will f
ormulate and lead guided, multifaceted analytic studies against large volumes of data. Develop AI/ML models to enrich data providing further utility to the analysts. Conducts complex data assessments to determine operational utility of proposed data sets in answering priority intelligence 4 requirements. Develop and maintain data pipelines to ingest applicable data into AI/ML engines and tools. Discovers links and connections in disparate datasets providing context to intelligence analysts",4.5,"Echo Analytics
4.5","Tampa, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job ID: 2003041
Career Area: Sales & Marketing
Job Category: Salaried
Location: Headquarters & Technology Center – Auburn Hills
48326, US
Date Posted: September 11, 2023
Brand: FCA Group

Refer a Friend

Job Overview
Qualifications

Within the Commercial Analytics area, we leverage cutting edge technologies to allow us to deliver exceptional customer experiences. Significant challenges and opportunities await those who join us in this newly created division of FCA. We are on the threshold of the biggest revolution in personal transportation. We need great people who share our passions.

Everything you do — and learn — will be leading to the future at Stellantis is a place where people are empowered to drive change, where bold challenges are taken on and an entrepreneurial spirit is ever present. Our culture never settles on the status quo; rather, collaboration, curiosity, and unconventional thinking. Every employee, regardless of position in the company, is expected to drive change and lead people.

We employ five key leadership principles that reflect our core values and provide the foundation for the cultural transformation of our workforce: We are a meritocracy. Leadership is a function of leading change and leading people. We embrace and cherish competition. We aim to achieve best-in-class performance. We deliver what we promise.

Stellantis is looking to hire a Senior Data Science. This position will play a pivotal role in the design, development, and application of analytic practices within Business Analytics, supporting the delivery of data science and machine learning-based projects for commercial analytics. The bulk of the work will be in areas of data exploration, analytic design and consulting, and model design and implementation using advanced statistical, machine learning (ML), and artificial intelligence AI methods.


Guide and inspire the organization about the business potential and strategy of data science, ML, and AI
Identify data-driven/ML business opportunities
Research in new and emerging analytic methods and apply them to the development of new business solutions
Contribute to the continuing education of data scientists as an expert and leader in an area of advanced analytic e.g. optimization
Support and contribute to data science projects as a technical subject matter expert in analytic method within commercial analytics
Exploratory data analysis, identifying analytic opportunities and challenges
Contribute to Business Analytics projects using statistical analysis, machine learning, and visualization techniques to various data, such as regression, classification, linear optimization, and deep learning.
Advise data scientists on best practices for the clear visualization and interpretation of analytic results
Experimental design, hypothesis testing, and metrics to accurately measure the performance if analytic products meeting the needs of the business
Integrate domain knowledge into the analytic solutions (for example, from an understanding of financial risk, customer journey, quality prediction, sales, marketing)
Collaborate with ML operations (MLOps), data engineers, IT resources, and business customers to evaluate and implement ML deployment options
Support monitoring the execution and health of production ML models within an area of analytic expertise
Advise on best practices around analytic production infrastructure
Train other business and IT staff on basic data science principles and techniques
Promote collaboration with the data science COE within an area of analytic expertise

EOE/Disability/Veteran

EOE / Disability / Veteran

At Stellantis, we assess candidates based on qualifications, merit and business needs. We welcome applications from people of all gender identities, age, ethnicity, nationality, religion, sexual orientation and disability. Diverse teams will allow us to better meet the evolving needs of our customers and care for our future.

Our benefits reflects the STELLANTIS commitment to helping you reach your personal and professional goals. In addition to an environment that promotes career development, we offer benefits for a healthy lifestyle and a rewarding future, designed to take care of you and your family, in various stages of life.

As a global company, our employee packages will vary by country, customary norms and the legal entity into which you are hired.",3.6,"Stellantis
3.6","Auburn Hills, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Bioinformatics Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Summary:
Zel Tech is seeking a highly qualified Bioinformatics Data Scientist that will provide SME support to our government customer in Charlottesville, Virginia or Melbourne, Florida.
Responsibilities:
The Bioinformatics Data Scientist shall aide in the following areas:
Provides direct support for bioinformatics, regex queries, developing and searching key words and biological ontologies.
Focused data discovery and retrieval from given datasets.",3.8,"Zel Technologies
3.8","Melbourne, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Level 1,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"OPS Consulting is seeking candidates for Data Scientists.

The position requires experience with:
Analysis
Process Automation
Data Normalization
Data Visualization
Machine Learning
Statistics
Cloud Analytics
Mathematics/Statistics
Computer Science
Domain Expertise/Analysis
Presentation",4.2,"OPS Consulting, LLC
4.2","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Meet Zartico, the world’s first Destination Operating System.

Zartico’s mission is to empower DMOs to be better stewards of the world’s tourist destinations through improved data intelligence and decision-making. Makers of the first Destination Operating System, Zartico harnesses and streamlines complex data to provide a full-spectrum of data science, benchmarking and analytical services for use in marketing, community development and sustainability efforts. Based in Salt Lake City, Utah, Zartico has over thirty years of experience in technology, tourism, and destination, travel and tourism marketing.

Zartico is looking to add a Data Scientist to the team. In this role, you will be designing and developing new tools, architecture, and models to flexibly extract actionable information from large, complex data sets. To be successful in this role, you will need a strong background in mathematical and statistical reasoning, comfortability programming (SQL and Python required), experience designing, evaluating and testing models with/on complex data sets, and an ability to problem solve effectively in ambiguous settings.",-1,"Zartico, Inc.",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Palo Alto",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Rhombus is purposefully transforming the nation's defense and national security enterprises with Guardian, its Artificial Intelligence platform for strategic, operational, and tactical decision-making at the speed of relevance.
We are looking for people who are driven by a sense of purpose. In this role, you will serve to solve our customer's uniquely complex problems. We expect you to be a systems-level thinker and a real doer. You will excel in this role if you are hungry to make a difference and are intellectually bold. And we sure hope that you smile when you hear our clients say, ""If we can dream it, Rhombus can do it.""
Come join our cross-disciplinary and world-class team of technologists who are working hard every day to deliver game-changing solutions to transform national security.",-1,Rhombus,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Position Summary
HDC seeks a Data Scientist to lead data analysis projects to inform high-priority policy and operational discussions. The data scientist will also support the implementation of our data governance program and assist in building key data resources for use across the Corporation. Our data analytics and governance programs are the result of concerted investments in the Corporation’s data infrastructure necessary to support our growing lending activities and portfolio. Accordingly, the Data Scientist will infuse best practices in data analytics and data stewardship into the agency’s culture. This position will report to the Director of Data Management and, as part of the Division of Policy and Analytics, will have significant contact with senior agency leaders and stakeholders across all agency departments.",3.9,"New York City Housing Development Corporation (HDC)
3.9","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Description:

POSITION SUMMARY:
The Actuarial Analyst position will support projects to improve efficiency and accuracy of existing metrics. The role will also participate in research for other metrics to improve our analytics and management of our business.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES AND ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Facilitates and monitors our standard data processing
Participates in ad hoc projects that may include rate filings, pricing studies, data analytics and claim trends
Requirements:",4.2,"Trean Corporation
4.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Natural Language Processing and Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Posting Details
Posting Details
Position Number:
128495

Title:
Faculty Specialist

Functional Title:
Natural Language Processing and Data Scientist",4.2,"University of Maryland
4.2","College Park, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist || Hybrid Houston, TX || Contract role",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Hi
This is regarding to a position of a DATA Scientist
Title: Data Scientist (Oil & Gas Hydraulics)
Location: Houston, TX (Hybrid)
Only Local candidates Needed
Duration: Long term
We are seeking a skilled Data Scientist with experience in building optimization and machine learning models specifically for oil and gas hydraulics use cases. As a Data Scientist, you will play a critical role in analysing and improving hydraulics processes within the oil and gas industry. Your expertise in data science and machine learning will be instrumental in driving operational efficiency and cost optimization.",3.8,"Valsatech Corp
3.8","Houston, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Role: Data Scientist

On-Site: Tampa, Florida
Salary: $60,000 - $75,000
TS/SCI Clearance Required
Position Description:
Our Scientist/Analyst is an integral member of an analytic and engineering team. The data scientist is expected to participate in the design, development, and implementation of novel analytics to address a variety of customer problem sets. We are highly interested in individuals who can craft narratives around their analytics, producing highly visual representations of both the output and the innerworkings of analytic methods. The Data Scientist should be versed in statistics, predictive modeling, machine learning, computational simulation, geospatial modeling, network science, or other analytic techniques. This individual will also have a firm grasp of the environments in which the analytics must be deployed, whether stand-alone, within a broader software architecture, in the cloud, etc. While a heavy programming background is not required, sufficient technical knowledge to implement the analytics is highly desired.",-1,Recruiting Heroes LLC,"Tampa, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Build the solution that transforms the real estate industry!
We are looking for a Machine Learning superhero who can ignite our day-to-day activities with their creativity.
Want to infuse a $30B+ sector of the insurance and real estate industry with predictive analytics and a tech-forward customer experience? Looking for a fully remote startup culture supported by a profitable business model? Join Mashvisor and help us build an entirely new type of real estate model.

Our Values
Customer Obsessed – We always put our customers first.",3.8,"Mashvisor Inc.
3.8",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Cambiar Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"TITLE: Data Scientist
Cambiar Education
June 2023
ABOUT CAMBIAR
By joining Cambiar Education, you join a network of individuals committed to changing the marketplace for education innovation to prove undeniably that every student can succeed and thrive. As an organization, we respect each other's time, value each other as individuals, and strive to support staff in a number of ways, including with a comprehensive and competitive benefits plan.",-1,Formation Ventures (Run the Future),Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
DATA SCIENTIST,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"10/14/2020

Edison, NJ (Remote)

Job Description:
The person will be part of the Data Science team for a Diaspak’s client. He/ She will work with different stakeholders as SME for data engineering/data science work.
A typical work day will involve working with stakeholders in individual contributor role and upscaling the quality of team’s deliverables.
The person will also be required to participate actively in brainstorming sessions for improvement opportunities and take it to completion.
A suitable candidate should have 8-10 years of experience in a similar role and should possess a go -getter attitude. He/ She should be able to deal with aggressively changing environment.
Experience in insurance preferred but not mandatory.


8+ years of experience in analytics, machine learning, advanced statistical techniques, AI and data engineering jobs.
Excellent communication & presentation skills.
Experience in managing Python codes and collaborating with customer on model evolution.
Excellent in project management, team management and conflict management skills.
Good knowledge of data base management and Hadoop/Spark, SQL, HIVE, Python (expertise).
Superior analytical and problem solving skills.
Should be able to work on a problem independently and prepare client ready deliverable with minimal or no supervision.


Ability to understand data models and identify ETL optimization opportunities. Exposure to ETL tools is preferred.
Should have strong grasp of advanced SQL functionalities (joins, nested query, and procedures).
Strong ability to translate functional specifications / requirements to technical requirements.",3.5,"Diaspark Inc.
3.5",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Research & Development Engineer (Associate Scientist) - Full Time Campus,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Location
Mason
Job Description
Your first step towards an amazing career in Research and Development (R&D) at Procter and Gamble (P&G) starts with applying to this job. Within R&D, you’ll be actively involved in creating, reimagining and launching new innovations which improve our consumers lives… all around the world.
What will I do?

Our Associate Scientists are constantly learning, growing and, ultimately, improving how our products perform. In this role, you will find new ways to innovate, develop and manufacture consumer products. Since we’re a highly collaborative company, you will have the opportunity to work with some of the best and brightest technical and commercial partners, while also coaching others to realize their fullest potential.










Full time
R000085969
Recent Grads/Entry Level - Campus (Job Segmentation)
$85,000.00 - $115,000.00 / year",4.1,"Procter & Gamble
4.1","Mason, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - NLP,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"You are a research scientist and engineer who wants to work in the areas of machine learning, natural language processing, information extraction, graphical models, summarization, information retrieval, recommend systems, and/or knowledge graphs. You will bring new ideas, evangelizing them, and shepherding their adoption within the team. You extract and identify relevant, meaningful, and actionable information from structured and unstructured data in real-time and provide advanced ways of accessing this data (such as search, summarization, and recommendations).
What you will do:
Proactively explore, research, describe, and analyze data.
Develop tools and strategies related to text analytics, machine learning, and semantic enrichment
Develop and maintain strong working relationships across departments and with key partners and stakeholders.",3.4,"Bloomberg BNA
3.4","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"$70,000.00 - $85,000.00 a year

Job Description

Restaurant Depot is the leading wholesale distributor of food, equipment and supplies to independent grocery retailers and foodservice operators across the United States.
We seek a highly motivated, technically proficient and business savvy data scientist for our growing analytics function. You will have the opportunity to work on a variety of interesting data science projects that have far reaching implications for all stakeholders across our organization.







Brand: Restaurant Depot
Address: 1710 Whitestone Expressway Whitestone, NY - 11357
Property Description: 590 - RD EAST COAST CORP. OFFICE
Property Number: 590",3.0,"Restaurant Depot
3.0","Whitestone, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Defense and Security,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Who You'll Work With
You will be based in our Washington, D.C. office as part of our Defense and Security team.
You will work with senior members of the US defense and security community on some of their highest priority issues. Typically, you’ll work locally in the Washington, D.C. area in blended teams of 3 – 5 colleagues, each with varying types of expertise (e.g., digital, strategy, operations, analytics).
What You'll Do
You will develop and apply data science methods to improve and optimize our clients performance needs.",4.8,"McKinsey & Company
4.8","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Aderas, Inc. is seeking a Data Scientist to join the team.

Primary Job Duties:
Able to take various data sets (both public and private) from different sources from flat sheets to structured and unstructured databases to APIs, clean and transform them as needed to conduct advanced analyses,e.g., predictive models, quasi-causal analyses, qualitative analyses, and advanced machine learning methods.
Able to visualize and communicate data in compelling, easily digestible manners both in static and interactive forms.
Able to develop and deliver data capacity-building content for internal non-technical audiences, including 1:1 mentorship and formal trainings, written references.

Must be able to obtain a Public Trust

Remote

Join the Aderas team!

At Aderas, we are looking to recruit and retain only the best and brightest. If you like working with emerging technologies, using your unique personal skills to solve technical, functional, and organizational issues, and can easily adapt to the ever-changing IT market, then Aderas is the place for you! We are a vibrant company delivering implementation services support for enterprise solutions and custom application development. We strive to form long-term partnerships with our clients to foster an environment based on trust, a proven history of delivery, and camaraderie.

Why Aderas?

We sincerely try to shape our employees' lives by administering a generous package of employee benefits. Our company culture encourages collaboration, creative thinking, and growth. Headquartered in Reston Town Center, in Reston, VA, the Aderas main office is a short step away from shopping, dining, and a movie theater.

Beyond the tangible and intangible rewards, Aderas provides the following:",4.5,"Aderas, Inc
4.5","Reston, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Distinguished Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"About the Company
At Torc, we have always believed that autonomous vehicle technology will transform how we travel, move freight, and do business.
A leader in autonomous driving since 2007, Torc has spent over a decade commercializing our solutions with experienced partners. Now a part of the Daimler family, we are focused solely on developing software for automated trucks to transform how the world moves freight.
Join us and catapult your career with the company that helped pioneer autonomous technology, and the first AV software company with the vision to partner directly with a truck manufacturer.",4.3,"Torc Robotics
4.3","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Product Engagement",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"At Realtor.com®, we have among the most comprehensive and accurate coverage of real estate listings and the most engaged users across all the online real estate portals. Our mission is to make buying, selling, renting, and living in homes easier and more rewarding for everyone.
Building your career? Build it better at Realtor.com®. Join us and help change the world of real estate, one home at a time.
Come to work for http://Realtor.com ![ A leader in online real estate and backed by industry experience and the News Corp Brand, http://Realtor.com
http://Realtor.com currently has an opportunity for a Data Scientist, Product Analytics, reporting to the Director of Analytics for Growth Product. http://Realtor.com is in the middle of aggressive strategic growth driven off of newly integrated entities, and continuing our record growth and consumer engagement will be critical to http://Realtor.com 's strategic success in the industry. Specifically, this role's core responsibilities will focus on partnering directly with the major functions of the business to drive consumer engagement, conversion and overall optimization of the consumer's journey for our emerging product and service areas. There is a tremendous opportunity to make a huge impact in a short amount of time!",3.7,"Realtor.com Careers
3.7","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Product Engagement",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"At Realtor.com®, we have among the most comprehensive and accurate coverage of real estate listings and the most engaged users across all the online real estate portals. Our mission is to make buying, selling, renting, and living in homes easier and more rewarding for everyone.
Building your career? Build it better at Realtor.com®. Join us and help change the world of real estate, one home at a time.
Come to work for http://Realtor.com ![ A leader in online real estate and backed by industry experience and the News Corp Brand, http://Realtor.com
http://Realtor.com currently has an opportunity for a Data Scientist, Product Analytics, reporting to the Director of Analytics for Growth Product. http://Realtor.com is in the middle of aggressive strategic growth driven off of newly integrated entities, and continuing our record growth and consumer engagement will be critical to http://Realtor.com 's strategic success in the industry. Specifically, this role's core responsibilities will focus on partnering directly with the major functions of the business to drive consumer engagement, conversion and overall optimization of the consumer's journey for our emerging product and service areas. There is a tremendous opportunity to make a huge impact in a short amount of time!",-1,"Realtor.com Careers
3.7","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"The Bay Area Environmental Research (BAER) Institute, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization
focused on enabling and conducting research in Earth and space science, is seeking a Data
Scientist for the NASA Ames Earth Science Division with experience in the areas of satellite
remote sensing and advanced data analytics including
This position will work with the NASA Earth Exchange (NEX; https://nasa.gov/nex) at NASA",4.8,"Bay Area Environmental Research Institute
4.8","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Posted
21-Aug-2023
Service line
Corporate Segment
Role type
Full-time
Areas of Interest
Digital & Technology/Information Technology
Location(s)
Dallas - Texas - United States of America

CBRE Group, Inc. is the world’s largest commercial real estate services and investment firm, with a revenue of $27.75 Billion (as recorded on September 30, 2021) and more than 100,000 employees (excluding affiliate offices). CBRE has been on the Fortune 500 list each year since 2008, ranking #126",4.0,"CBRE
4.0","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Assertive Professionals is in search of an Data Scientist to support or National Security Customer in Charlottesville, VA.
This position is Open and funded with a $1,200 annual compliance bonus! We will submit all qualified applicants for approval and when a position opens up, we will notify you.
Senior - Base annual compensation is between $130,000 and $140,000 and is based on experience and working 1920 hours with 160 hours of PTO.
We offer an excellent benefits package, including PTO, 401k Match at 5%, Profit Sharing, Company paid Life Insurance, Dental, Vision, STD/LTD, and two options under a national medical plan with employee contribution.",4.8,"Assertive Professionals
4.8","Charlottesville, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Candidates must live in or be willing to relocate to the Louisville, KY area. This position allows for a hybrid work from home and in office schedule.
Introduction
Galen College of Nursing is a vibrant and growing, single-purpose nursing college focused on expanding access to quality nursing education. Our culture is at the forefront of everything we do. Galen's fundamental goals are to be the best place for nursing education and the best place to work and one cannot be true without the other.
Benefits
At Galen College of Nursing, we want to ensure your needs are met. We offer a variety of comprehensive medical, dental, and vision plans along with some unique benefits including:",3.7,"Galen College of Nursing
3.7","Louisville, KY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist I, Bioinformatics",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Summary

The Bioinformatics department has an opening for a Data Scientist I. This role will employ a highly skilled data scientist with expertise in developing machine learning models to curate and analyze large, multi-modal datasets generated by the SimCenter at UT Southwestern Medical School. Experience with using machine learning for analyses of video-based data sets is a plus. They will work closely with our software and AI engineers to ensure that the models are integrated into actionable user interfaces.

Job Duties

Analyzes and develops formalisms, algorithms and software for applications in biomedical research.

Develops and maintains software tools and infrastructure for resolving specific problems.

Assists in the development, testing and revision of programs in a team with diverse bioinformatics expertise.

Performs other duties as assigned.


Clean, organize, and analyze large, multi-model data sets

Build, train, test, and evaluate machine learning models on our proprietary data sets

Understand and implement the latest video-based machine learning models

Continuously improve the performance of the models by analyzing results and experimenting with different techniques

Collaboratively ensure the models are integrated into the user interfaces.

Experience and Education

M.S. in Computer Science, Bioinformatics, (Bio)mathematics, (Bio)statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, or related field OR B.S. with demonstrated experience in broadly defined areas of bioinformatics.

0 - 2 years post-graduation experience in data analysis and/or scientific software development.


Strong experience with Python and related data science libraries such as Pandas, Numpy, Scikit-learn.

Strong experience with machine learning frameworks such as Tensorflow or PyTorch.

Experience with video analysis with machine learning, specifically with CNNs and other deep learning models.

Experience with data visualization tools such as Matplotlib or Seaborn.

Strong understanding of data science and machine learning principles and best practices.

Experience with cloud platforms such as AWS or GCP.

Strong debugging and problem-solving skills.

Why UT Southwestern?

With over 75 years of excellence in Dallas-Fort Worth, Texas, UT Southwestern is committed to excellence, innovation, teamwork, and compassion. At UT Southwestern, we invest in you with opportunities for career growth and development that align with your future goals and help to provide security for you and your family. Our highly competitive benefits package offers healthcare, PTO and paid holidays, on-site childcare, wage, merit increases and so much more that are all available on the day you start work. UT Southwestern is honored to be a Veteran Friendly work environment that is home to approximately 800 veterans. We value your integrity, dedication, and the commitment you’ve made to our country. We’re proud to support your next mission. Ranked by Forbes as one of the Top 10 National Employers, we invite you to be a part of the UT Southwestern team where you’ll discover teamwork, professionalism, and consistent opportunities for growth.

This position is security-sensitive and subject to Texas Education Code §51.215, which authorizes UT Southwestern to obtain criminal history record information. UT Southwestern Medical Center is committed to an educational and working environment that provides equal opportunity to all members of the University community. As an equal opportunity employer, UT Southwestern prohibits unlawful discrimination, including discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or veteran status. To learn more, please visit: why-work-here/diversity-inclusion",3.9,"UT Southwestern
3.9","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Autonomous System,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Join us in creating the technology that helps the world act together
We are a B2B technology innovation leader pioneering the future where networks meet cloud. At Nokia you will have a positive impact on people’s lives and help build the capabilities needed for a more productive, sustainable, and accessible world.
Be part of a culture built on an inclusive way of working where we are open to your ideas, you are empowered to take risks and are encouraged to be fearless in bringing your authentic self to work.
The team you'll be part of
Cloud and Network Services
As Nokia's growth engine, we create value for communication service providers and enterprise customers by leading the transition to cloud-native software and as-a-service delivery models. Our inclusive team of dreamers, doers and disruptors push the limits from impossible to possible. Advanced Technology Group is a leading-edge technology validation and new solution incubation organization within Cloud & Network Services. We explore cutting edge technology and the use of it in the area of 5G/6G, distributed clouds/edge clouds, APIs/SDKs and platforms, AR/VR/XR, AI/ML, crypto/smart contracts/NFT etc. We innovate and incubate new solutions utilizing these technology. We are driving new ideas for the telco transformation and specifically how we could transform networks into easily consumable capabilities in digital ecosystem and hence enable developers to build altogether new type of applications for Industry 4.0.",4.2,"NOKIA
4.2","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Chief Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"About Us FacilityConneX’s mission is to provide the industrial and commercial customer a world-class
real time continuous monitoring system for any equipment or facility - Anytime, Anywhere.
Partnered with GE and leveraging many of their best software technologies, FacilityConneX
offers an industry leading experience for customers to gain insight on their own systems and
data. Our cloud based solution, FacilityConneX, is a wholly owned subsidiary of AutomaTech,
Inc. For more information, go to www.facilityconnex.com

AutomaTech offers a great work environment, professional development, challenging careers,
and competitive compensation. AutomaTech is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",-1,FacilityConneX,"Nashua, NH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, All Levels",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Who are we?
Independent Software is a consulting, product, and solutions firm dedicated to the practical application of software and system engineering technologies to solve complex problems. We bring together world class engineers with proven engineering best practices, domain expertise, commercial technologies, and proven agile management approaches to create high value solutions aimed at helping our customers meet their most critical business and mission objectives.


Why Independent Software?
We are focused on continual learning and evolution. We don’t do things because “that’s the way we’ve always done things”; we listen to our employees and adapt to the changing marketplace. We look at the big picture and encourage our engineers to get training and certifications in emerging technologies that will help shape our customer’s mission.",4.6,"Independent Software
4.6","Fort Meade, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Title:
Data
Scientist

Experience Level:
Senior

Location:
Tampa

Clearance: TS/SCI

Quiet Professionals, LLC
is seeking a
Data
Scientist who will f
ormulate and lead guided, multifaceted analytic studies against large volumes of data. Develop AI/ML models to enrich data providing further utility to the analysts. Conducts complex data assessments to determine operational utility of proposed data sets in answering priority intelligence 4 requirements. Develop and maintain data pipelines to ingest applicable data into AI/ML engines and tools. Discovers links and connections in disparate datasets providing context to intelligence analysts",4.5,"Echo Analytics
4.5","Tampa, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job ID: 2003041
Career Area: Sales & Marketing
Job Category: Salaried
Location: Headquarters & Technology Center – Auburn Hills
48326, US
Date Posted: September 11, 2023
Brand: FCA Group

Refer a Friend

Job Overview
Qualifications

Within the Commercial Analytics area, we leverage cutting edge technologies to allow us to deliver exceptional customer experiences. Significant challenges and opportunities await those who join us in this newly created division of FCA. We are on the threshold of the biggest revolution in personal transportation. We need great people who share our passions.

Everything you do — and learn — will be leading to the future at Stellantis is a place where people are empowered to drive change, where bold challenges are taken on and an entrepreneurial spirit is ever present. Our culture never settles on the status quo; rather, collaboration, curiosity, and unconventional thinking. Every employee, regardless of position in the company, is expected to drive change and lead people.

We employ five key leadership principles that reflect our core values and provide the foundation for the cultural transformation of our workforce: We are a meritocracy. Leadership is a function of leading change and leading people. We embrace and cherish competition. We aim to achieve best-in-class performance. We deliver what we promise.

Stellantis is looking to hire a Senior Data Science. This position will play a pivotal role in the design, development, and application of analytic practices within Business Analytics, supporting the delivery of data science and machine learning-based projects for commercial analytics. The bulk of the work will be in areas of data exploration, analytic design and consulting, and model design and implementation using advanced statistical, machine learning (ML), and artificial intelligence AI methods.


Guide and inspire the organization about the business potential and strategy of data science, ML, and AI
Identify data-driven/ML business opportunities
Research in new and emerging analytic methods and apply them to the development of new business solutions
Contribute to the continuing education of data scientists as an expert and leader in an area of advanced analytic e.g. optimization
Support and contribute to data science projects as a technical subject matter expert in analytic method within commercial analytics
Exploratory data analysis, identifying analytic opportunities and challenges
Contribute to Business Analytics projects using statistical analysis, machine learning, and visualization techniques to various data, such as regression, classification, linear optimization, and deep learning.
Advise data scientists on best practices for the clear visualization and interpretation of analytic results
Experimental design, hypothesis testing, and metrics to accurately measure the performance if analytic products meeting the needs of the business
Integrate domain knowledge into the analytic solutions (for example, from an understanding of financial risk, customer journey, quality prediction, sales, marketing)
Collaborate with ML operations (MLOps), data engineers, IT resources, and business customers to evaluate and implement ML deployment options
Support monitoring the execution and health of production ML models within an area of analytic expertise
Advise on best practices around analytic production infrastructure
Train other business and IT staff on basic data science principles and techniques
Promote collaboration with the data science COE within an area of analytic expertise

EOE/Disability/Veteran

EOE / Disability / Veteran

At Stellantis, we assess candidates based on qualifications, merit and business needs. We welcome applications from people of all gender identities, age, ethnicity, nationality, religion, sexual orientation and disability. Diverse teams will allow us to better meet the evolving needs of our customers and care for our future.

Our benefits reflects the STELLANTIS commitment to helping you reach your personal and professional goals. In addition to an environment that promotes career development, we offer benefits for a healthy lifestyle and a rewarding future, designed to take care of you and your family, in various stages of life.

As a global company, our employee packages will vary by country, customary norms and the legal entity into which you are hired.",3.6,"Stellantis
3.6","Auburn Hills, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Bioinformatics Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Summary:
Zel Tech is seeking a highly qualified Bioinformatics Data Scientist that will provide SME support to our government customer in Charlottesville, Virginia or Melbourne, Florida.
Responsibilities:
The Bioinformatics Data Scientist shall aide in the following areas:
Provides direct support for bioinformatics, regex queries, developing and searching key words and biological ontologies.
Focused data discovery and retrieval from given datasets.",3.8,"Zel Technologies
3.8","Melbourne, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Level 1,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"OPS Consulting is seeking candidates for Data Scientists.

The position requires experience with:
Analysis
Process Automation
Data Normalization
Data Visualization
Machine Learning
Statistics
Cloud Analytics
Mathematics/Statistics
Computer Science
Domain Expertise/Analysis
Presentation",4.2,"OPS Consulting, LLC
4.2","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Meet Zartico, the world’s first Destination Operating System.

Zartico’s mission is to empower DMOs to be better stewards of the world’s tourist destinations through improved data intelligence and decision-making. Makers of the first Destination Operating System, Zartico harnesses and streamlines complex data to provide a full-spectrum of data science, benchmarking and analytical services for use in marketing, community development and sustainability efforts. Based in Salt Lake City, Utah, Zartico has over thirty years of experience in technology, tourism, and destination, travel and tourism marketing.

Zartico is looking to add a Data Scientist to the team. In this role, you will be designing and developing new tools, architecture, and models to flexibly extract actionable information from large, complex data sets. To be successful in this role, you will need a strong background in mathematical and statistical reasoning, comfortability programming (SQL and Python required), experience designing, evaluating and testing models with/on complex data sets, and an ability to problem solve effectively in ambiguous settings.",-1,"Zartico, Inc.",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Palo Alto",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Rhombus is purposefully transforming the nation's defense and national security enterprises with Guardian, its Artificial Intelligence platform for strategic, operational, and tactical decision-making at the speed of relevance.
We are looking for people who are driven by a sense of purpose. In this role, you will serve to solve our customer's uniquely complex problems. We expect you to be a systems-level thinker and a real doer. You will excel in this role if you are hungry to make a difference and are intellectually bold. And we sure hope that you smile when you hear our clients say, ""If we can dream it, Rhombus can do it.""
Come join our cross-disciplinary and world-class team of technologists who are working hard every day to deliver game-changing solutions to transform national security.",-1,Rhombus,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Position Summary
HDC seeks a Data Scientist to lead data analysis projects to inform high-priority policy and operational discussions. The data scientist will also support the implementation of our data governance program and assist in building key data resources for use across the Corporation. Our data analytics and governance programs are the result of concerted investments in the Corporation’s data infrastructure necessary to support our growing lending activities and portfolio. Accordingly, the Data Scientist will infuse best practices in data analytics and data stewardship into the agency’s culture. This position will report to the Director of Data Management and, as part of the Division of Policy and Analytics, will have significant contact with senior agency leaders and stakeholders across all agency departments.",3.9,"New York City Housing Development Corporation (HDC)
3.9","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Description:

POSITION SUMMARY:
The Actuarial Analyst position will support projects to improve efficiency and accuracy of existing metrics. The role will also participate in research for other metrics to improve our analytics and management of our business.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES AND ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Facilitates and monitors our standard data processing
Participates in ad hoc projects that may include rate filings, pricing studies, data analytics and claim trends
Requirements:",4.2,"Trean Corporation
4.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Natural Language Processing and Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Posting Details
Posting Details
Position Number:
128495

Title:
Faculty Specialist

Functional Title:
Natural Language Processing and Data Scientist",4.2,"University of Maryland
4.2","College Park, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist || Hybrid Houston, TX || Contract role",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Hi
This is regarding to a position of a DATA Scientist
Title: Data Scientist (Oil & Gas Hydraulics)
Location: Houston, TX (Hybrid)
Only Local candidates Needed
Duration: Long term
We are seeking a skilled Data Scientist with experience in building optimization and machine learning models specifically for oil and gas hydraulics use cases. As a Data Scientist, you will play a critical role in analysing and improving hydraulics processes within the oil and gas industry. Your expertise in data science and machine learning will be instrumental in driving operational efficiency and cost optimization.",3.8,"Valsatech Corp
3.8","Houston, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Role: Data Scientist

On-Site: Tampa, Florida
Salary: $60,000 - $75,000
TS/SCI Clearance Required
Position Description:
Our Scientist/Analyst is an integral member of an analytic and engineering team. The data scientist is expected to participate in the design, development, and implementation of novel analytics to address a variety of customer problem sets. We are highly interested in individuals who can craft narratives around their analytics, producing highly visual representations of both the output and the innerworkings of analytic methods. The Data Scientist should be versed in statistics, predictive modeling, machine learning, computational simulation, geospatial modeling, network science, or other analytic techniques. This individual will also have a firm grasp of the environments in which the analytics must be deployed, whether stand-alone, within a broader software architecture, in the cloud, etc. While a heavy programming background is not required, sufficient technical knowledge to implement the analytics is highly desired.",-1,Recruiting Heroes LLC,"Tampa, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Build the solution that transforms the real estate industry!
We are looking for a Machine Learning superhero who can ignite our day-to-day activities with their creativity.
Want to infuse a $30B+ sector of the insurance and real estate industry with predictive analytics and a tech-forward customer experience? Looking for a fully remote startup culture supported by a profitable business model? Join Mashvisor and help us build an entirely new type of real estate model.

Our Values
Customer Obsessed – We always put our customers first.",3.8,"Mashvisor Inc.
3.8",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Cambiar Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"TITLE: Data Scientist
Cambiar Education
June 2023
ABOUT CAMBIAR
By joining Cambiar Education, you join a network of individuals committed to changing the marketplace for education innovation to prove undeniably that every student can succeed and thrive. As an organization, we respect each other's time, value each other as individuals, and strive to support staff in a number of ways, including with a comprehensive and competitive benefits plan.",-1,Formation Ventures (Run the Future),Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
DATA SCIENTIST,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"10/14/2020

Edison, NJ (Remote)

Job Description:
The person will be part of the Data Science team for a Diaspak’s client. He/ She will work with different stakeholders as SME for data engineering/data science work.
A typical work day will involve working with stakeholders in individual contributor role and upscaling the quality of team’s deliverables.
The person will also be required to participate actively in brainstorming sessions for improvement opportunities and take it to completion.
A suitable candidate should have 8-10 years of experience in a similar role and should possess a go -getter attitude. He/ She should be able to deal with aggressively changing environment.
Experience in insurance preferred but not mandatory.


8+ years of experience in analytics, machine learning, advanced statistical techniques, AI and data engineering jobs.
Excellent communication & presentation skills.
Experience in managing Python codes and collaborating with customer on model evolution.
Excellent in project management, team management and conflict management skills.
Good knowledge of data base management and Hadoop/Spark, SQL, HIVE, Python (expertise).
Superior analytical and problem solving skills.
Should be able to work on a problem independently and prepare client ready deliverable with minimal or no supervision.


Ability to understand data models and identify ETL optimization opportunities. Exposure to ETL tools is preferred.
Should have strong grasp of advanced SQL functionalities (joins, nested query, and procedures).
Strong ability to translate functional specifications / requirements to technical requirements.",3.5,"Diaspark Inc.
3.5",United States,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Research & Development Engineer (Associate Scientist) - Full Time Campus,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Location
Mason
Job Description
Your first step towards an amazing career in Research and Development (R&D) at Procter and Gamble (P&G) starts with applying to this job. Within R&D, you’ll be actively involved in creating, reimagining and launching new innovations which improve our consumers lives… all around the world.
What will I do?

Our Associate Scientists are constantly learning, growing and, ultimately, improving how our products perform. In this role, you will find new ways to innovate, develop and manufacture consumer products. Since we’re a highly collaborative company, you will have the opportunity to work with some of the best and brightest technical and commercial partners, while also coaching others to realize their fullest potential.










Full time
R000085969
Recent Grads/Entry Level - Campus (Job Segmentation)
$85,000.00 - $115,000.00 / year",4.1,"Procter & Gamble
4.1","Mason, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - NLP,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"You are a research scientist and engineer who wants to work in the areas of machine learning, natural language processing, information extraction, graphical models, summarization, information retrieval, recommend systems, and/or knowledge graphs. You will bring new ideas, evangelizing them, and shepherding their adoption within the team. You extract and identify relevant, meaningful, and actionable information from structured and unstructured data in real-time and provide advanced ways of accessing this data (such as search, summarization, and recommendations).
What you will do:
Proactively explore, research, describe, and analyze data.
Develop tools and strategies related to text analytics, machine learning, and semantic enrichment
Develop and maintain strong working relationships across departments and with key partners and stakeholders.",3.4,"Bloomberg BNA
3.4","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"$70,000.00 - $85,000.00 a year

Job Description

Restaurant Depot is the leading wholesale distributor of food, equipment and supplies to independent grocery retailers and foodservice operators across the United States.
We seek a highly motivated, technically proficient and business savvy data scientist for our growing analytics function. You will have the opportunity to work on a variety of interesting data science projects that have far reaching implications for all stakeholders across our organization.







Brand: Restaurant Depot
Address: 1710 Whitestone Expressway Whitestone, NY - 11357
Property Description: 590 - RD EAST COAST CORP. OFFICE
Property Number: 590",3.0,"Restaurant Depot
3.0","Whitestone, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Defense and Security,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Who You'll Work With
You will be based in our Washington, D.C. office as part of our Defense and Security team.
You will work with senior members of the US defense and security community on some of their highest priority issues. Typically, you’ll work locally in the Washington, D.C. area in blended teams of 3 – 5 colleagues, each with varying types of expertise (e.g., digital, strategy, operations, analytics).
What You'll Do
You will develop and apply data science methods to improve and optimize our clients performance needs.",4.8,"McKinsey & Company
4.8","Washington, DC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Aderas, Inc. is seeking a Data Scientist to join the team.

Primary Job Duties:
Able to take various data sets (both public and private) from different sources from flat sheets to structured and unstructured databases to APIs, clean and transform them as needed to conduct advanced analyses,e.g., predictive models, quasi-causal analyses, qualitative analyses, and advanced machine learning methods.
Able to visualize and communicate data in compelling, easily digestible manners both in static and interactive forms.
Able to develop and deliver data capacity-building content for internal non-technical audiences, including 1:1 mentorship and formal trainings, written references.

Must be able to obtain a Public Trust

Remote

Join the Aderas team!

At Aderas, we are looking to recruit and retain only the best and brightest. If you like working with emerging technologies, using your unique personal skills to solve technical, functional, and organizational issues, and can easily adapt to the ever-changing IT market, then Aderas is the place for you! We are a vibrant company delivering implementation services support for enterprise solutions and custom application development. We strive to form long-term partnerships with our clients to foster an environment based on trust, a proven history of delivery, and camaraderie.

Why Aderas?

We sincerely try to shape our employees' lives by administering a generous package of employee benefits. Our company culture encourages collaboration, creative thinking, and growth. Headquartered in Reston Town Center, in Reston, VA, the Aderas main office is a short step away from shopping, dining, and a movie theater.

Beyond the tangible and intangible rewards, Aderas provides the following:",4.5,"Aderas, Inc
4.5","Reston, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Distinguished Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"About the Company
At Torc, we have always believed that autonomous vehicle technology will transform how we travel, move freight, and do business.
A leader in autonomous driving since 2007, Torc has spent over a decade commercializing our solutions with experienced partners. Now a part of the Daimler family, we are focused solely on developing software for automated trucks to transform how the world moves freight.
Join us and catapult your career with the company that helped pioneer autonomous technology, and the first AV software company with the vision to partner directly with a truck manufacturer.",4.3,"Torc Robotics
4.3","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Product Engagement",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"At Realtor.com®, we have among the most comprehensive and accurate coverage of real estate listings and the most engaged users across all the online real estate portals. Our mission is to make buying, selling, renting, and living in homes easier and more rewarding for everyone.
Building your career? Build it better at Realtor.com®. Join us and help change the world of real estate, one home at a time.
Come to work for http://Realtor.com ![ A leader in online real estate and backed by industry experience and the News Corp Brand, http://Realtor.com
http://Realtor.com currently has an opportunity for a Data Scientist, Product Analytics, reporting to the Director of Analytics for Growth Product. http://Realtor.com is in the middle of aggressive strategic growth driven off of newly integrated entities, and continuing our record growth and consumer engagement will be critical to http://Realtor.com 's strategic success in the industry. Specifically, this role's core responsibilities will focus on partnering directly with the major functions of the business to drive consumer engagement, conversion and overall optimization of the consumer's journey for our emerging product and service areas. There is a tremendous opportunity to make a huge impact in a short amount of time!",3.7,"Realtor.com Careers
3.7","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Cyber Insurance Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Who we are

American International Group, Inc. (AIG) is a leading global insurance organization. AIG member companies provide a wide range of property casualty insurance in approximately 70 countries and jurisdictions. These diverse offerings include products and services that help businesses and individuals protect their assets and manage risks.

We’re also committed to making a positive difference for our colleagues and in the communities where we work and live. We encourage colleagues to give back to the causes they care most about, supporting these efforts through our Volunteer Time Off and Matching Grants Programs.

Get to know the business

General Insurance is a leading provider of insurance products and services for commercial and personal insurance customers. It includes one of the world’s most far-reaching property casualty networks. General Insurance offers a broad range of products to customers through a diversified, multichannel distribution network.

About the role

The Cyber Portfolio Analytics team delivers data-driven analytics and insights to AIG’s Cyber business leaders. The team supports critical business decisions including underwriting strategy / market positioning, risk appetite and limit setting, capital allocation, portfolio risk management (including catastrophe and clash) and reinsurance / risk transfer.

The team is seeking a Cyber Insurance Data Scientist to build the next generation of AIG’s Cyber Underwriting Model and develop advanced analytics to drive business strategy. The ideal candidate will have deep technical expertise modeling insurance risk, and be highly analytical, collaborative, strategic and a forward-thinker. The candidate will partner with Cyber Security and Cyber Insurance Data Analytics Leads to build an industry-leading analytics platform to drive underwriting at transactional and portfolio levels.


Serve as the team’s lead technical expert and build analytics and predictive models to drive cyber insurance underwriting decisions. With the Head of Cyber Portfolio Analytics, translate model output into actionable, data-driven underwriting strategies; present findings and recommendations to Cyber Product Leadership to drive cyber underwriting strategy. Lead the technical design, modeling methodology and coding of AIG’s account-level, underwriting risk model; review technical details, test model accuracy and update to reflect the latest trends and threat environment. Work closely with the team’s Cyber Security Data Analytics Lead to assess the quality / lift of external data sets for use in predictive modeling.


Mid-level experience in general insurance (preferably Cyber insurance) with focus on building predictive analytics and underwriting models.
Strong expertise in the full model development process – from data wrangling, to data matching, ETL, model building, testing and deployment; highly proficient at coding in one or more languages (e.g., Python, R, SQL, Spark); adept at using data visualization techniques (e.g., R Shiny, Tableau) for exploratory data analysis.
Deep / thorough command of data science and advanced analytics methods (e.g., supervised and unsupervised machine learning) to measure cyber security risk.
Experience working cross-functionally with operations and information technology (IT) to move analytical models from development into a production environment.
Bachelor’s degree from a four-year college or university; Masters degree is strongly preferred. Technical education in a quantitative field (e.g., Actuarial Science, Analytics, Data Science, Engineering, Statistics, etc.).
Demonstrated ability to work across interdisciplinary teams to enhance risk-based decision making.
Strong communication skills (oral and written) and unique ability to translate data and technical insights into logical and compelling business recommendations.
Strong ability to identify, analyze and solve problems as well as the ability to learn rapidly, adapt quickly to change, exercise influence, and manage and prioritize multiple concurrent projects.

For positions based in New York City, the base salary range is $115,000-$170,000 and the position is eligible for a bonus in accordance with the terms of the applicable incentive plan. In addition, we’re proud to offer a range of competitive benefits, a summary of which can be viewed here: Benefits Overview.

#LI-CN1

A look at our Benefits

We're proud to offer a range of employee benefits and resources that help you protect what matters most - your health care, savings, financial protection and wellbeing. We provide a variety of leaves for personal, health, family and military needs. For example, our ""Giving Back"" program allows you to take up to 16 hours a year to volunteer in your community. Our global mental health and wellness days off provide all colleagues with a paid day off to focus on their mental health and wellbeing.

We also believe in fostering our colleagues' development and offer a range of learning opportunities for colleagues to hone their professional skills to position themselves for the next steps of their careers. We have a tuition reimbursement program for eligible colleagues to enhance their education, skills, and knowledge in areas that relate to their current position or future positions to which they may transfer or progress.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer

American International Group, Inc., its subsidiaries and affiliates are committed to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and its policies and procedures reflect this commitment. We provide equal opportunity to all qualified individuals regardless of race, color, religion, age, gender, gender expression, national origin, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected categories such as sexual orientation. At AIG, we believe that diversity and inclusion are critical to our future and our mission – creating a foundation for a creative workplace that leads to innovation, growth, and profitability. Through a wide variety of programs and initiatives, we invest in each employee, seeking to ensure that our people are not only respected as individuals, but also truly valued for their unique perspectives.

https://www.aig.com/about-us/diversity-equity-and-inclusion

AIG is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodations to job applicants and employees with physical or mental disabilities. If you believe you need a reasonable accommodation in order to search for a job opening or to complete any part of the application or hiring process, please send an email to candidatecare@aig.com. Reasonable accommodations will be determined on a case-by-case basis.


RK - Risk

Up to 25%

No

AIG PC Global Services, Inc.",3.7,"AIG
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"The Bay Area Environmental Research (BAER) Institute, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization
focused on enabling and conducting research in Earth and space science, is seeking a Data
Scientist for the NASA Ames Earth Science Division with experience in the areas of satellite
remote sensing and advanced data analytics including
This position will work with the NASA Earth Exchange (NEX; https://nasa.gov/nex) at NASA",4.8,"Bay Area Environmental Research Institute
4.8","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Principal Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Posted
21-Aug-2023
Service line
Corporate Segment
Role type
Full-time
Areas of Interest
Digital & Technology/Information Technology
Location(s)
Dallas - Texas - United States of America

CBRE Group, Inc. is the world’s largest commercial real estate services and investment firm, with a revenue of $27.75 Billion (as recorded on September 30, 2021) and more than 100,000 employees (excluding affiliate offices). CBRE has been on the Fortune 500 list each year since 2008, ranking #126",4.0,"CBRE
4.0","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Assertive Professionals is in search of an Data Scientist to support or National Security Customer in Charlottesville, VA.
This position is Open and funded with a $1,200 annual compliance bonus! We will submit all qualified applicants for approval and when a position opens up, we will notify you.
Senior - Base annual compensation is between $130,000 and $140,000 and is based on experience and working 1920 hours with 160 hours of PTO.
We offer an excellent benefits package, including PTO, 401k Match at 5%, Profit Sharing, Company paid Life Insurance, Dental, Vision, STD/LTD, and two options under a national medical plan with employee contribution.",4.8,"Assertive Professionals
4.8","Charlottesville, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Candidates must live in or be willing to relocate to the Louisville, KY area. This position allows for a hybrid work from home and in office schedule.
Introduction
Galen College of Nursing is a vibrant and growing, single-purpose nursing college focused on expanding access to quality nursing education. Our culture is at the forefront of everything we do. Galen's fundamental goals are to be the best place for nursing education and the best place to work and one cannot be true without the other.
Benefits
At Galen College of Nursing, we want to ensure your needs are met. We offer a variety of comprehensive medical, dental, and vision plans along with some unique benefits including:",3.7,"Galen College of Nursing
3.7","Louisville, KY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist I, Bioinformatics",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Summary

The Bioinformatics department has an opening for a Data Scientist I. This role will employ a highly skilled data scientist with expertise in developing machine learning models to curate and analyze large, multi-modal datasets generated by the SimCenter at UT Southwestern Medical School. Experience with using machine learning for analyses of video-based data sets is a plus. They will work closely with our software and AI engineers to ensure that the models are integrated into actionable user interfaces.

Job Duties

Analyzes and develops formalisms, algorithms and software for applications in biomedical research.

Develops and maintains software tools and infrastructure for resolving specific problems.

Assists in the development, testing and revision of programs in a team with diverse bioinformatics expertise.

Performs other duties as assigned.


Clean, organize, and analyze large, multi-model data sets

Build, train, test, and evaluate machine learning models on our proprietary data sets

Understand and implement the latest video-based machine learning models

Continuously improve the performance of the models by analyzing results and experimenting with different techniques

Collaboratively ensure the models are integrated into the user interfaces.

Experience and Education

M.S. in Computer Science, Bioinformatics, (Bio)mathematics, (Bio)statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, or related field OR B.S. with demonstrated experience in broadly defined areas of bioinformatics.

0 - 2 years post-graduation experience in data analysis and/or scientific software development.


Strong experience with Python and related data science libraries such as Pandas, Numpy, Scikit-learn.

Strong experience with machine learning frameworks such as Tensorflow or PyTorch.

Experience with video analysis with machine learning, specifically with CNNs and other deep learning models.

Experience with data visualization tools such as Matplotlib or Seaborn.

Strong understanding of data science and machine learning principles and best practices.

Experience with cloud platforms such as AWS or GCP.

Strong debugging and problem-solving skills.

Why UT Southwestern?

With over 75 years of excellence in Dallas-Fort Worth, Texas, UT Southwestern is committed to excellence, innovation, teamwork, and compassion. At UT Southwestern, we invest in you with opportunities for career growth and development that align with your future goals and help to provide security for you and your family. Our highly competitive benefits package offers healthcare, PTO and paid holidays, on-site childcare, wage, merit increases and so much more that are all available on the day you start work. UT Southwestern is honored to be a Veteran Friendly work environment that is home to approximately 800 veterans. We value your integrity, dedication, and the commitment you’ve made to our country. We’re proud to support your next mission. Ranked by Forbes as one of the Top 10 National Employers, we invite you to be a part of the UT Southwestern team where you’ll discover teamwork, professionalism, and consistent opportunities for growth.

This position is security-sensitive and subject to Texas Education Code §51.215, which authorizes UT Southwestern to obtain criminal history record information. UT Southwestern Medical Center is committed to an educational and working environment that provides equal opportunity to all members of the University community. As an equal opportunity employer, UT Southwestern prohibits unlawful discrimination, including discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or veteran status. To learn more, please visit: why-work-here/diversity-inclusion",3.9,"UT Southwestern
3.9","Dallas, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist Autonomous System,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Join us in creating the technology that helps the world act together
We are a B2B technology innovation leader pioneering the future where networks meet cloud. At Nokia you will have a positive impact on people’s lives and help build the capabilities needed for a more productive, sustainable, and accessible world.
Be part of a culture built on an inclusive way of working where we are open to your ideas, you are empowered to take risks and are encouraged to be fearless in bringing your authentic self to work.
The team you'll be part of
Cloud and Network Services
As Nokia's growth engine, we create value for communication service providers and enterprise customers by leading the transition to cloud-native software and as-a-service delivery models. Our inclusive team of dreamers, doers and disruptors push the limits from impossible to possible. Advanced Technology Group is a leading-edge technology validation and new solution incubation organization within Cloud & Network Services. We explore cutting edge technology and the use of it in the area of 5G/6G, distributed clouds/edge clouds, APIs/SDKs and platforms, AR/VR/XR, AI/ML, crypto/smart contracts/NFT etc. We innovate and incubate new solutions utilizing these technology. We are driving new ideas for the telco transformation and specifically how we could transform networks into easily consumable capabilities in digital ecosystem and hence enable developers to build altogether new type of applications for Industry 4.0.",4.2,"NOKIA
4.2","Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Chief Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"About Us FacilityConneX’s mission is to provide the industrial and commercial customer a world-class
real time continuous monitoring system for any equipment or facility - Anytime, Anywhere.
Partnered with GE and leveraging many of their best software technologies, FacilityConneX
offers an industry leading experience for customers to gain insight on their own systems and
data. Our cloud based solution, FacilityConneX, is a wholly owned subsidiary of AutomaTech,
Inc. For more information, go to www.facilityconnex.com

AutomaTech offers a great work environment, professional development, challenging careers,
and competitive compensation. AutomaTech is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",-1,FacilityConneX,"Nashua, NH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, All Levels",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Who are we?
Independent Software is a consulting, product, and solutions firm dedicated to the practical application of software and system engineering technologies to solve complex problems. We bring together world class engineers with proven engineering best practices, domain expertise, commercial technologies, and proven agile management approaches to create high value solutions aimed at helping our customers meet their most critical business and mission objectives.


Why Independent Software?
We are focused on continual learning and evolution. We don’t do things because “that’s the way we’ve always done things”; we listen to our employees and adapt to the changing marketplace. We look at the big picture and encourage our engineers to get training and certifications in emerging technologies that will help shape our customer’s mission.",4.6,"Independent Software
4.6","Fort Meade, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Title:
Data
Scientist

Experience Level:
Senior

Location:
Tampa

Clearance: TS/SCI

Quiet Professionals, LLC
is seeking a
Data
Scientist who will f
ormulate and lead guided, multifaceted analytic studies against large volumes of data. Develop AI/ML models to enrich data providing further utility to the analysts. Conducts complex data assessments to determine operational utility of proposed data sets in answering priority intelligence 4 requirements. Develop and maintain data pipelines to ingest applicable data into AI/ML engines and tools. Discovers links and connections in disparate datasets providing context to intelligence analysts",4.5,"Echo Analytics
4.5","Tampa, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job ID: 2003041
Career Area: Sales & Marketing
Job Category: Salaried
Location: Headquarters & Technology Center – Auburn Hills
48326, US
Date Posted: September 11, 2023
Brand: FCA Group

Refer a Friend

Job Overview
Qualifications

Within the Commercial Analytics area, we leverage cutting edge technologies to allow us to deliver exceptional customer experiences. Significant challenges and opportunities await those who join us in this newly created division of FCA. We are on the threshold of the biggest revolution in personal transportation. We need great people who share our passions.

Everything you do — and learn — will be leading to the future at Stellantis is a place where people are empowered to drive change, where bold challenges are taken on and an entrepreneurial spirit is ever present. Our culture never settles on the status quo; rather, collaboration, curiosity, and unconventional thinking. Every employee, regardless of position in the company, is expected to drive change and lead people.

We employ five key leadership principles that reflect our core values and provide the foundation for the cultural transformation of our workforce: We are a meritocracy. Leadership is a function of leading change and leading people. We embrace and cherish competition. We aim to achieve best-in-class performance. We deliver what we promise.

Stellantis is looking to hire a Senior Data Science. This position will play a pivotal role in the design, development, and application of analytic practices within Business Analytics, supporting the delivery of data science and machine learning-based projects for commercial analytics. The bulk of the work will be in areas of data exploration, analytic design and consulting, and model design and implementation using advanced statistical, machine learning (ML), and artificial intelligence AI methods.


Guide and inspire the organization about the business potential and strategy of data science, ML, and AI
Identify data-driven/ML business opportunities
Research in new and emerging analytic methods and apply them to the development of new business solutions
Contribute to the continuing education of data scientists as an expert and leader in an area of advanced analytic e.g. optimization
Support and contribute to data science projects as a technical subject matter expert in analytic method within commercial analytics
Exploratory data analysis, identifying analytic opportunities and challenges
Contribute to Business Analytics projects using statistical analysis, machine learning, and visualization techniques to various data, such as regression, classification, linear optimization, and deep learning.
Advise data scientists on best practices for the clear visualization and interpretation of analytic results
Experimental design, hypothesis testing, and metrics to accurately measure the performance if analytic products meeting the needs of the business
Integrate domain knowledge into the analytic solutions (for example, from an understanding of financial risk, customer journey, quality prediction, sales, marketing)
Collaborate with ML operations (MLOps), data engineers, IT resources, and business customers to evaluate and implement ML deployment options
Support monitoring the execution and health of production ML models within an area of analytic expertise
Advise on best practices around analytic production infrastructure
Train other business and IT staff on basic data science principles and techniques
Promote collaboration with the data science COE within an area of analytic expertise

EOE/Disability/Veteran

EOE / Disability / Veteran

At Stellantis, we assess candidates based on qualifications, merit and business needs. We welcome applications from people of all gender identities, age, ethnicity, nationality, religion, sexual orientation and disability. Diverse teams will allow us to better meet the evolving needs of our customers and care for our future.

Our benefits reflects the STELLANTIS commitment to helping you reach your personal and professional goals. In addition to an environment that promotes career development, we offer benefits for a healthy lifestyle and a rewarding future, designed to take care of you and your family, in various stages of life.

As a global company, our employee packages will vary by country, customary norms and the legal entity into which you are hired.",3.6,"Stellantis
3.6","Auburn Hills, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Bioinformatics Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Job Summary:
Zel Tech is seeking a highly qualified Bioinformatics Data Scientist that will provide SME support to our government customer in Charlottesville, Virginia or Melbourne, Florida.
Responsibilities:
The Bioinformatics Data Scientist shall aide in the following areas:
Provides direct support for bioinformatics, regex queries, developing and searching key words and biological ontologies.
Focused data discovery and retrieval from given datasets.",3.8,"Zel Technologies
3.8","Melbourne, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist - Level 1,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"OPS Consulting is seeking candidates for Data Scientists.

The position requires experience with:
Analysis
Process Automation
Data Normalization
Data Visualization
Machine Learning
Statistics
Cloud Analytics
Mathematics/Statistics
Computer Science
Domain Expertise/Analysis
Presentation",4.2,"OPS Consulting, LLC
4.2","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Meet Zartico, the world’s first Destination Operating System.

Zartico’s mission is to empower DMOs to be better stewards of the world’s tourist destinations through improved data intelligence and decision-making. Makers of the first Destination Operating System, Zartico harnesses and streamlines complex data to provide a full-spectrum of data science, benchmarking and analytical services for use in marketing, community development and sustainability efforts. Based in Salt Lake City, Utah, Zartico has over thirty years of experience in technology, tourism, and destination, travel and tourism marketing.

Zartico is looking to add a Data Scientist to the team. In this role, you will be designing and developing new tools, architecture, and models to flexibly extract actionable information from large, complex data sets. To be successful in this role, you will need a strong background in mathematical and statistical reasoning, comfortability programming (SQL and Python required), experience designing, evaluating and testing models with/on complex data sets, and an ability to problem solve effectively in ambiguous settings.",-1,"Zartico, Inc.",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist, Palo Alto",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Rhombus is purposefully transforming the nation's defense and national security enterprises with Guardian, its Artificial Intelligence platform for strategic, operational, and tactical decision-making at the speed of relevance.
We are looking for people who are driven by a sense of purpose. In this role, you will serve to solve our customer's uniquely complex problems. We expect you to be a systems-level thinker and a real doer. You will excel in this role if you are hungry to make a difference and are intellectually bold. And we sure hope that you smile when you hear our clients say, ""If we can dream it, Rhombus can do it.""
Come join our cross-disciplinary and world-class team of technologists who are working hard every day to deliver game-changing solutions to transform national security.",-1,Rhombus,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Position Summary
HDC seeks a Data Scientist to lead data analysis projects to inform high-priority policy and operational discussions. The data scientist will also support the implementation of our data governance program and assist in building key data resources for use across the Corporation. Our data analytics and governance programs are the result of concerted investments in the Corporation’s data infrastructure necessary to support our growing lending activities and portfolio. Accordingly, the Data Scientist will infuse best practices in data analytics and data stewardship into the agency’s culture. This position will report to the Director of Data Management and, as part of the Division of Policy and Analytics, will have significant contact with senior agency leaders and stakeholders across all agency departments.",3.9,"New York City Housing Development Corporation (HDC)
3.9","New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Description:

POSITION SUMMARY:
The Actuarial Analyst position will support projects to improve efficiency and accuracy of existing metrics. The role will also participate in research for other metrics to improve our analytics and management of our business.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES AND ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Facilitates and monitors our standard data processing
Participates in ad hoc projects that may include rate filings, pricing studies, data analytics and claim trends
Requirements:",4.2,"Trean Corporation
4.2",Remote,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Natural Language Processing and Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Posting Details
Posting Details
Position Number:
128495

Title:
Faculty Specialist

Functional Title:
Natural Language Processing and Data Scientist",4.2,"University of Maryland
4.2","College Park, MD",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
"Data Scientist || Hybrid Houston, TX || Contract role",$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Hi
This is regarding to a position of a DATA Scientist
Title: Data Scientist (Oil & Gas Hydraulics)
Location: Houston, TX (Hybrid)
Only Local candidates Needed
Duration: Long term
We are seeking a skilled Data Scientist with experience in building optimization and machine learning models specifically for oil and gas hydraulics use cases. As a Data Scientist, you will play a critical role in analysing and improving hydraulics processes within the oil and gas industry. Your expertise in data science and machine learning will be instrumental in driving operational efficiency and cost optimization.",3.8,"Valsatech Corp
3.8","Houston, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
Data Scientist,$96K - $135K (Glassdoor est.),"Role: Data Scientist

On-Site: Tampa, Florida
Salary: $60,000 - $75,000
TS/SCI Clearance Required
Position Description:
Our Scientist/Analyst is an integral member of an analytic and engineering team. The data scientist is expected to participate in the design, development, and implementation of novel analytics to address a variety of customer problem sets. We are highly interested in individuals who can craft narratives around their analytics, producing highly visual representations of both the output and the innerworkings of analytic methods. The Data Scientist should be versed in statistics, predictive modeling, machine learning, computational simulation, geospatial modeling, network science, or other analytic techniques. This individual will also have a firm grasp of the environments in which the analytics must be deployed, whether stand-alone, within a broader software architecture, in the cloud, etc. While a heavy programming background is not required, sufficient technical knowledge to implement the analytics is highly desired.",-1,Recruiting Heroes LLC,"Tampa, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
